King Pootis;-;My first game on A3 brought me the most horrific experience I've ever had in any game, ever. We're on our way to the objective, a small dump east of a town occupied by enemy forces. I'm leading a team of 4 men. We come to a crossroad and I sprint across, telling my men to hold back. I cross a few more times, trying to get a response from any snipers. Nothing. I run, my LMG gunner runs, my medic runs. But I kept my Marksman on the other side to make sure we'd make it across. Anybody seen Full Metal Jacket all the way through? Remember the sniper scene? The marksman takes a round in the leg as we're running and goes down. He then takes two more in the chest. The kid who was playing had some mad acting skills, he played it up to 11 here. He screams as he's being shot. Crawling, drenched in his own blood. "SARGE? YOU AIN'T LEAVING ME OUT HERE LIKE THIS, RIGHT? I-I WANNA GO WITH YOU GUYS! C'MON SARGE, H-HELP ME! C'MON! PLEASE DON'T LEAVE ME!" he died after that. I cried and he respawned. 11/10, would recommend getting.
Peace;-;This is not a game for people who want fast action movie style gaming, this is a game for people who appreciate the finer things. Having done both military service and picked up MILSIM airsoft as a hobby this game is the closest you will get to what goes on in reality. There are experiences you will have in ARMA 3 that can not be had in COD or BF, experiences that will have you shaking from the adrenaline release. One that comes to mind was a mission to destroy an enemy comms tower, I was squad leader of 8 or so AI:s. As we approached the Comms tower and I told my men to go stealth, no firing unless fired upon. We moved slowly taking advantage of terrain, keeping an watchful eye for enemy patrols. Once the tower was in visual range pace slowed even more and I spent the better part of 30 minutes just looking for enemy patrols and advancing to about 200 meters from the tower. There I positioned my men to cover a wide firing arc as I had spotted quite a few patrols moving in and about the tower. I considered opening fire and probably being able to drop a good portion of the enemy before they could zero in on our position. But a firefight is always a risk, and these AI had been around for a few missions and I had started to anthropomorphize them a bit and secondly I might get hit and killed. As I considered how I would start the engagement a sudden hole opened up in the patrol pattern, I realised the tower is unguarded and I had an opportunity to do something I had not considered. I got up and ran as fast as I could towards the tower, all the time expecting the bullets to start cracking above my head. I kept scanning as I ran whizzling through bushes trying to pick a path that the least visibility to any patrols. After what seemed like far too long I reached the tower and threw out a satchel charge and another for good measure, if one would not bring the tower down it would sure attract attention. I turned around and made my way back, as I closed on my men I started ordering them to fall back, hope growing that I might get out of this alive. Falling back to about 400 meters I finally detonated the satchel charges and the tower fell, from there it was just a short run to the truck and back to Command. I had done it. I had pulled off the perfect mission, not a shot fired and all under my command back alive. That is what this game is about.
[13th] Danius;-;Oh man. Where to even begin with this one. It would be an extreme disservice to simply call Arma 3 a shooter, as it is so, so much more than that. Arma 3 is a military simulator. This is a distinction that its developers hold sacred and are proud of, and one to which I can attest is completely accurate and deserved. But its even more than that. Arma 3 is a gaming platform, upon which so much has already been and will continue to be built for years to come. At its core though, Arma 3 in a supremely excellent military sim. The graphics are stunning, the gameplay is excellent, the mechanics are solid, and Bohemia Interactive has done an absolutely amazing job packaging this all together. New comers to the Arma series (as I was) may initially be overwhelmed by the games complex mechanics and decidedly different pace from your typical FPS/shooter. Enemy engagements happen at much greater distance than is typical in the genre and are often brief, brutal, and more times than not will conclude with your demise. There is no handholding here. No mini-maps, no enemy UI icons/indicators, no hit markers, no health bars. If you get shot a couple of times, you will find yourself unceremoniously dispatched. While this creates a high barrier for entry and a steep learning curve for new players, it provides a unique and distinctive play style. Situational awareness, cover, teamwork, suppressive fire, and generally moving purposefully and as if your  depended on knowing what was behind the next ridge or hiding in the bushes are paramount to your success. Add to these infantry mechanics the amazingly rendered vehicles, armor, helicopters, and planes, each with their own realistic mechanics to learn and master, and you end up with a truly amazing military simulation experience. Out of the box, Arma comes with a great single player campaign comprised of 3 separate acts, each containing ~12-15 missions. The campaign focuses on a well crafted story of a military conflict that has erupted over Arma 3s two HUGE islands of Stratis and Altis. You play the part of a NATO soldier who finds himself stuck in the middle of a complex engagement. The campaign is rewarding, and challenging. (I have yet to complete it as Im stuck on one mission that I simply cant seem to complete.) However the single-player campaign is FAR from the end of this title. The mission editing tools have allowed this amazing community to develop some absolutely awesome single player missions, all of which can be downloaded free of charge from the Steam workshop and numerous other sites around the interwebs. I would also recommend you check out the supremely excellent full game conversion single player mods Whole Lotta Altis and Dynamic Universal War System which will provide countless additional single player hours and could be completely stand alone titles in themselves. Oh and the multiplayer, oh god the multiplayer. Wasteland, King of the Hill, Invade and Annex, Battle Royale, Breaking Point, so many Co-Op opportunities, the amazing looking upcoming Epoch (currently in closed Alpha). Im sure there are so many others that I havent even discovered yet. Each of these represent COMPLETELY USER GENERATED and totally disparate ways to play Multiplayer within the Arma 3 platform. By purchasing Arma 3, you immediately have access to each of these completely gratis and each could essentially be considered totally separate game. In wrapping up this lengthy review, Arma 3 is an amazing experience and a true accomplishment in game development. It is the only game in recent memory that I can say with confidence that I never get bored with playing. Bohemia Interactive has made it clear that they plan to support this game for years to come, and they have built something amazing on which the possibilities are truly endless. Purchase this game. Purchase it now. Thank me later. (IF YOU DO NOT FIND MY REVIEW HELPFUL, please leave a comment as to why. I welcome the constructive feedback.)
ArtificialApple;-;This is quite possibly the most emotional shooter I've ever played, and it's not because of the campaign. Crowd around, children, it's story time. One day, not so long ago, my squad had just destroyed an anti-air battery. Our pilot landed, and the rest of the squad boarded one by one. I was about to get in when the rockets started flying. The chopper lifted off, with my pilot saying that he would return in a few minutes. Unwilling to die before then, I rushed to the nearest cover, a small house by a narrow road. I entered to find a ten year-old player who had also been left behind. He explained that he was a sniper and invited me to join his "clan". I politely declined, explaining that my own squad was inbound. As I finished, a Ghost Hawk flew over the horizon. My squad had arrived. This noble child soldier and I were sprinting to the helicopter when the bullets started hitting. The sniper screamed as a 6.5 mm cartridge entered his leg. His shrieks for help were cut short by one final burst of carbine fire as I climbed in the transport. My new friend was dead. 10/10, would experience survivor guilt again.
Sir Quad Kill aka Sir Charlie;-;If you have friends, this is a great game to play with them. If you don't have any friends, this is a great game to play alone. If you don't have the game to play, get the money for it. If you don't have the money for it, get a job. If you don't have a job, rob the bank. If you get arrested robbing the bank, at least you tried.
theconjuring;-;Children play Call of Duty Boys play Battlefield Men play ARMA
Durga;-;After some 1,400 hours on the game, I can say with FULL VALIDITY this game has ruined my life. If you like realistic physics, teamwork, and every form of warfare, this game is for you. 10/10
Runekn;-;Can't tell you if you should buy it or not, but I can tell you this. You will find annoying bugs, highly requested features that isn't there and lack of content if you're not satisfied with what you have. But when you really get down to it, and experience some of the awesome scenarios you can get in multiplayer and custom sp mission, it's something magical you just can't find in any other game. Arma is not a game which you pick up at launch, play the campaign and a bit of mp, and then trow away. You buy it, love it or hate it, and then play it forever or trow it away immediatly. Arma is a game which you can never called finished. There will always be added to it, be it user or official content, fixes, features or optimizations. Hope I expressed myself correctly and that you learned something from it :) If you like realistic shooters and organized large scale multiplayer warfare, this will be your gem! I'll give it a 9/10, simply because: screw bugs, I've used hundreds of hours on Arma 3 that I would never take back. READ: I will not accept random friend requests! If you have a question, please post it in the comments.
Solly: Panparam;-;It's not a good 'game' for newbies. No, it's not... I use to sit at a place and watch the sunset. I have no idea how to actually shoot, drive and complete missions. It's like my personal sunset simulator. And it's damn beautiful. 10/10
Mr. Bong;-;I have owned this game for a number of weeks now and I have been completely hooked. Great game for the more serious war gamer, not for those who prefer the fast paced combat that you get from Call of Duty series which I consider more for the younger gamers anyway. Arma 3 moves a lot slower and is more squad based than other war games, similar to Battlefield series only slower than that when playing online and you may find yourself on 10 minute helicopter rides just to get into the battlefield and you will be highly satisfied with each kill you make as you know a single round landed by your enemy could be fatal regardless of the weapon they are using. You will have to make good use of any cover you can find and hit the dirt as soon as you hear a bullet crack over your head and then very carefully survey the surrouding area and work out where you are taking fire from as it will usually not be obvious where the fire is coming from and you will find yourself having to hold up for 10-20 minutes in a single location (sometimes longer, I personally have gotten pinned in one location for over an hour) because you are either pinned by enemy fire or it is too dangerous to move forward. You will need to buffer up on your mic communication skills as most players use proper phonetics etc when relaying information to each other on the battlefield such as coordinates and other reconaissance. You can not respawn as quickly as you can in CoD if you are taken down by enemy fire so staying alive is more crucial than any other war game you have played and you wanna hope you are moving up with a squad that has a medic. The graphics are great, the game is a little glitchy at times and the controls take a little getting used to. I recommend buying this game to any serious war game enthusiasts who want to get as close to war as possible (unless doing paintballing or airgunning), and if you do buy the game - I recommend completing the whole VR Tutorial before actually joining a server or playing the Campaign as you will need to really learn all those different keys that may make the difference in a hairy situation in game.
Snark;-;I have played ..no I have lived this game for 2690 hours.. so I'm probably one of the top players.. heck I'm so good at it Bohemia should get me to in-house beta-test their coffee machine... which means I can now do the following blindfolded... I can shoot a rabbit at 2 Kilometers between the eyes I can land a helicopter on a dime at Mach 2 in a raging blizzard I can field strip a 50 tonne tank in under thirty seconds while under small arms fire and RPG attacks I can order Pizza in five different languages using a U.S. Army FM 3-0 Command and control radio I can single-handedly defeat an entire army using nothing more than a MRE ration and a Bowie knife if anyone is going to give a review on ARMA 3 it's going to be me ...this game is good. But the proof is in the pudding so for examples of gameplay: https://www.youtube.com/user/Jester814 Jester gives an in your face gameplay view "That is a TANK!" https://www.youtube.com/user/Dslyecxi Dslyecxi gives the best hands down introduction to techniques, weapons and movement. If you want to know "how" it works - then go watch Dslyecxi. https://www.youtube.com/user/RHINOCRUNCH Go watch Rhinocrunch for shooting peeps in the back and running away screaming in fear they will come back from the dead and then pretending you fear nothing. Just Plain Stupid Funny. There are of course numerous flaws, bugs, and irritants that every multiplayer game has, but the one the gets most peeps irate seems to be the lack of contempory guns. After all the game is set in the near future, so the guns should be differerent (a bit), but I've seen Pashtun tribesmen up in the Hindu Kush who still carry Martini-Henry rifles left over from the 1880 Anglo-Afghan War taking potshots at their neighbours. Weapons never retire, they simply explode. The Vanilla guns are quite good, but I really wish there was a lot of the old guns from Arma 1 and 2, actually what I really want is a combat shotgun, like the Saiga and the AA12. Nothing says "I'm peased to meet you!! MudderF###ker" more than a Atchisson Assault Shotgun 12 gauge to the face. Which brings me to mods. Arma 3 isn't a complete game, its the basic framework upon which the modding community can builld mods, weapons, equipment, vechicles etc, for you to use. So the first thing you do after buying this game is go to: http://www.armaholic.com/ I think this is an excellent source http://play.withsix.com/ Download this, and wait three days as it figures out what cyberspace is or Steam'sWorkshop which I find problematic as it doesn't categorize items, and you find weapons, uniforms, vechicles and pretty well everything mixed up together, but at least it installs correctly, while the other two routes are really annoying to figure out. There are mods for glasses, hats, uniforms, beards, compasses. There are no end of special forces assault rifles, bazookas, sniper rifles, pistols the size of a shetland pony. There are exotic and weird mods for Star Wars, Halo, Zombies and Dinosaurs - yes I said Dinosaurs! Personally I think Bohemia should change its business model and simply pay the modding community for their best work, as in "here young fellah, we like what you've done, sign this paper, have some money and we will stick your work into the offical game, now go make a career of this." All said and done, is this game worth getting? Well do the math - almost 3000 hours gameplay for about $50 or Euros. Then it's not really a question - is it? but I still want my COMBAT SHOTGUN! and I want it called the SNARKANATOR!
Alwarren;-;Recommending this game is a no-brainer. If you are even marginally into shooters with a nag for realism Arma 3 is inevitable. The game won't let you in easily; it has a steep learning curve, and starting out can be quite frustrating. Also, you are less likely to find good public servers; it hardly is hop-on and play like CoD or Battlefield. The best way to experience it is in a clan or community group. Groups range from run-and-gun type gameplay up to strictly milsim stuff, so there should be something for everybody. Bottom line, go get it. It's unique, in every aspect.
svim13;-;Children play Call of Duty Boys play Battlefield Men play ARMA Nice game with nice mods!
Chokehold;-;This game is the reason my girlfriend of four years and I broke up. I do not regret a thing.
MurrayL;-;If you're coming to Arma 3 as an Arma series veteran, you already know what to expect. For the most part, the game hasn't changed since the last installment, but then it's always felt a little bit like Bohemia Interactive are still building on the groundwork laid back in 2001 by Operation Flashpoint, in the world's longest ever game of 'development Buckaroo'. Thankfully, the whole thing has yet to fall to pieces in any significant manner; it's quite happy to continue wobbling uneasily for now. Arma has a reputation. It's known to be frighteningly obtuse, bewilderingly complex, and often hilariously broken. I can tell you right now that Arma 3 is no different, and absolutely still deserves that reputation. Thankfully, I don't think it's unfair to say that this is the closest an Arma game has come to being 'user friendly'. The controls have been tweaked, and the interface refined a little to accommodate more modern tastes. For these improvements alone, I do recommend it to newcomers to the series over any previous entry. Coming from any other modern FPS game, it will still take a good few hours of what can feel an awful lot like hard work to get to grips with the controls, but I honestly think Arma 3 will see a far lower 'drop-out rate' of newbies who were frustrated to the point of giving up by the previous games. At the time of writing, the elephant in the room is the lack of content available. When compared to Arma 2 (which is handsomely bolstered by an array of official expansion packs), the amount of hardware available to play with is frustratingly slim. In many cases, opposing armies are equipped with identical vehicles which get a slightly different paint job at best. For anyone used to the myriad of variants and oddments available in Arma 2, Arma 3 can feel awfully disappointing. Fortunately, this is alleviated to some extent by the strong mod community. It has long been the case that the best parts of the Arma games are the parts not developed by Bohemia Interactive themselves, and Arma 3 is most definitely continuing this 'tradition'. Nevertheless, I can't help but feel that the game could've done with a few months more time in the oven before full public release. Speaking of the mod community, I think it's criminal that almost none of the best, near-indispensible mods from Arma 2 have been officially integrated. For a self-professed 'war simulator', Arma 3 is hugely lacking in basic features like being able to rest your weapon on surfaces (even with a visible bipod), or tow damaged vehicles. For all its flaws, though, Arma 3 is still a blast to play. If you can find a decent group of like-minded gamers with access to a voice-over-net server, you're in for some of the best gaming you'll ever experience. Sure, you'll probably have to load up on mods to satisfy your need for variety. And sure, sometimes the game will crash spectacularly, or the physics engine will flip out and kill you for standing too close to a wall. But when you're standing on a hilltop, looking out over an enemy outpost with your squadmates while a CAS helicopter strafes an enemy APC and spots targets for a distant sniper team; when everything clicks together in the way that only Arma can manage, you'll be glad to have been along for the ride.
Patrick #MFF2K15;-;It's not a good 'game' for newbies. No, it's not... I use to sit at a place and watch the sunset. I had no idea how to actually shoot, drive and complete missions. It's like my personal sunset simulator. And it's damn beautiful. 10/10
BACK ON JULY 20TH;-;Being an avid ArmA 2 Wasteland/DayZ player back in the day (about 1.5 years ago), I relished the thought of a new ArmA coming out. ArmA 2 was practically uknown until it's popularity was increased by DayZ. I found it interesting to jump into a BI (Bohemia Interactive) title that already had a steady fan-base behind it. Having been about a year since I purchased this game (launch) and over 100 hours of solid gameplay I feel that I can finally write a review that encompasses many of the aspects I have experienced within this game. Now I know what you're thinking: "$59.99?! This isn't even considered a triple A title! That's like... that's like the price of CoD: Ghosts!" Now, don't be intimidated by this price, for I can say that off the bat this game is worth a lot more than $59.99. From a value perspective, I found the price to be very reasonable based on the game's content nowadays. Basically, ArmA is a series of hardcore military simulation; constantly reflecting real-world conditions into a video game. In ArmA 2, I feel that this was it's drawback, for there were certain scenarios where it was realistic to a point of frustration (breaking your leg on a 2 foot fall. It's a game guys, relax). ArmA 3 has found a good balance between an FPS/3rd Person shooter game and realism, making it extremely enjoyable as both a simulator and a game. I also found that ArmA 3 has very good support for newbies to the series and is able to really engage players into the fun. I imagine it is much easier to get into ArmA 3 than I did ArmA 2 (I can't judge, I'm not new to it). The engine is decently optimized and is far less clunkier than the ArmA 2 engine, however rocks are still (and I guess forever will be) broken. Perhaps the game is having difficulty conforming such free player movement with an un-even surface. Pro tip: NEVER WALK ON ROCKS UNLESS YOU ABSOLUTELY HAVE TO. The game also has a variety of content; although players coming over from 2 will notice that there are A LOT less guns. This is partly due to the customization of guns. Instead of having a separate gun for each gun variation (M4A1 HOLO, M4A1 CCO, M4A1) you have a base gun and you are able to add sights, lasers, silencers, flashlights, what have you. However, this is not a full excuse- I feel that there are still a lesser amount of overall GUNS to shoot. Perhaps Bohemia Interactive is trying to fine-tune each gun into the patches as opposed to adding a ton of mediocre weapons simply for variety's sake. What's also very surprisingly good in this game is the Nvidia PhysX that was incorporated. Seeing my transport truck's wheels constantly bumping up and down according to the land under me while I drive troops through the night is oh-so-satisfying as well as, well... realistic! The physics engine has been extremely improved and I quite like it. I'd like to finally talk about how the guns shoot and how they sound, for this is after all, a big part of the game. Once again I will compare it to ArmA 2, in saying clearly that ArmA 2 featured a more high-pitched "tappy" sound when you shot with vertical recoil, while 3 brings a much more deeper, louder shot as well as echo to accompany it as the gun travels backwards into your viewmodel as opposed to upwards. The guns definitely feel better for me, but in the end I'd like to classify this judgment as personal preference. Lastly, the gamemodes of ArmA 3 are diverse and excellent, my favourite being Wasteland script. I won't go into detail here. There is also King of Hill, DayZ (OF COURSE, but it's MEH) and of course standard operations. Altis Life is also a really sweet one! Check those out if you end up buying. So yeah, I really like this game and I think that there is so much potential for a growing community. Grab some buddies, hop into Stratis and keep overwatch with some snipers and riflers as you and your team move in through the bushes to grab an objective for more supplies for your squad! Really great game, I'd definitely recommend to any FPS/MILSIM fan! :D
Tryder "On LAN party";-;I wish I had more time to play this game...
HOFF 9000;-;Arma 3 is a tricky game to review, but heres me trying it anyway. The reason why this game is so hard to review lies in the sheer size of the game and the variety of things it may or may not offer for the player. I take Arma 3 for what it is first and foremost: a platform. What you get is a good looking game with a solid (would be great, but you have to do some optimization to boost your performance) engine, two amazing maps (Stratis and Altis, which is probably the most impressive map Ive seen in any open world-ish game) and the prospect of near endless new content from the community. What you dont get is an easy to get into mil-shooter with CoD sized maps and a quick pace. If youre in for uncomplicated, fast paced PvP gameplay, you should probably look elsewhere. If youre sick of that, however, Arma 3 might be just your thing. The strength of the Arma series is freedom (**** yeah). You are free to mod the game into almost anything you want, create any type of mission and make your very own gameplay experience. You have to invest some time into the game, but once you got into it, the opportunities are endless. Want to play huge adversial or coop maps with a hundred players or more? Arma is just your thing and there are big communities (in many different languages) that will help you find that epic experience. Want to play singe player? Well, if you expect strong single player content with interesting characters and storyline and so on, then Arma 3 isnt the game youre looking for. Or is it? Right now Bohemia delivered one part of a three part campaign  those missions are challenging, offer a solid variety of infantry gameplay but dont expect a good story or interesting characters. But as mentioned before  the huge amount of community made missions and mods offer hours and hours of playtime. Personally I prefer small cooperative missions to play with friends. Already the steam workshop has countless missions for 2-5 players. So, should you buy Arma 3? Well, Id certainly recommend it, if any of the things I mentioned above sounds fun to you. It is to say though, that this game is not something that everyone might like, so stay away from it if you are not willing to invest some time into it. I hope that this review helped some people to decide whether or not they should by Arma 3. Please note that Im not a native English speaker, so the language used in this review might seem a little odd for some.
Yummy.!;-;you'll be ready to sacrifice your cat for stable 30fps in mp
Kozak;-;The best and one of the kind military simulator, with unprecedented tactical depth and wide array of additional features, like: - Accurate ballistics & penetration simulation - Good range of vehicles to choose from - No "story rails" and total freedom of choice in sandbox environment - Barely surpassed weapons/gear customization - Greatest community out there with quality mods/addons Worth its cost on 300%
toxune;-;I was talking to a guy in a courtyard and a helicopter squished him. So I stole his gear. 10/10
M I D O R T E C H I E S;-;Arma 3 is like anal, Hard and painful, but you'll get used to it.
www.twitch.tv/nrseven7;-;Drove a tank in a fence, it exploded. This game has awesome Anti-Tank DeFences. 11/10
Ray76;-;I played this game about 90 hours which is more than any of my friends at the moment. Can't really compare it to any other game. Arma is just Arma, period. xD If you haven't played arma before then you migh think that this is the game about shooting or operating armored vehicles, but no, not really. Most of the time you will run around some forests trying to spot the enemy and figure out how to take them out. Then you probably gonna be spoted by the enemy and be dead in a seconds. Repeat. Playing this game requires strategic thinking - you can't just take gun and take enemy out, no, it doesn't work that way. This game features two maps: big and huge, including towns, forests, mountains, flat fields and graaaas grass grass. Yeah, i love grass in this game - looks fantastic. xD So... Where was i? oh, right, the map is big and you can go by your feet or take armored vehicles, civilian vehicles, helicopters or planes... You gonna waste time to get to destination point and after hour of travelling there you will be shot by some weirdo in the woods. Repeat. Anyway, this is nice game(yet you need some great rig to run it) with limitless editor and mod support. Best expirience achieved in coop missions with friends. Team Work is necessary. Pros: +Limitless warfare simulator +Graphics looks beatiful 80% of the time +in-game editor allows you to create your own missions +Steam workshop support: download missions created by other users or get more weapons and vehicles. +It's not CoD +It's not BF4 either +Bugs are fun Cons: -It's probably boring for players from other shooter games -Limitless CPU usage: your cpu will cry like a ith during the 100 vs. 100 battle with tanks and helis. -Graphics doesn't look beautiful 20% of the time. -Not so big default weapon arsenal(but there are mods, hey) -Multiplayer performance sucks sausage -Campaign is not open world and not coop as it was in Arma 2 -Bugs are still bugs even if they're fun -AI has IQ equal to chair. Or maybe table. P.S. Did you really read it all? Lol. If you consider yourself as a "hardcore fps shooter player and cod is for kids bla bla bla" - try arma, waste your time, enjoy true hardcore. P.P.S. I was really bored so i wrote all this. Don't blame me, please.
monjaka;-;Was about to log out before I watched a man named "john" play "In the arms of an angel" while planes were falling around him before eventually killing him. 11/10 for feels, please get this game, for me, for john.
3735943886;-;It's Ok.
Alienboyx #MediocreAtStarcraft;-;10/10 would scuba dive again. Found Crush the turtle and killed him. Currently finding nemo. have a lead, headed to 42 wallaby way. Met a group of seagulls, they seemed to think i had something of theirs, kept repeating mine. Very confused.
black coach jesus;-;Parachuted into kavala and seeked refuge in a local building, airstrikes hit the vicinity and bullets started flying everywhere I get hit by a bullet but my friend revives me I pick up my sniper rifle that was thrown on the floor when the bullet hit me, I turn around look through the broken window and see a glimmer coming from a recon tower I look through my scope and shoot in the general direction and thats when the chat softly alerts me "Sniperman1234 was killed by Bryan" a cheesy grin takes over my face and I jump around in joy only to be stopped by a bullet piercing my heart but once again my friend revives me and softly whispers in my ear "Take cover next time mate" I nod in agreement pick up my sniper and use the "Q" key to lean around the door opening and begin to kill enemies one by one. A helicopter passes quickly and drops off 5 army men via parachute and they land in the street parralel to me and I take them all out one by one, and at this point you're probably thinking "No way!" but alas it's true this game is so realistic and gritty that I had to go to the doctors to get help for my PTSD and all of these events took place in a 1-2 hour match. Just buy the game. Just ing buy it.
Psychonaut;-;tl;dr, detailed review below +++ Devs still dev! ++ Realistic gameplay ++ huge maps ++ Great modding community ++ Great player community ++ Scenario Editor + Graphics / Sound + A lot of weapons and vehicles + CHOPPERS! + 4 different AI difficulties + Great and interesting campaign -- No more gamespy servers due to shutdown :( -- framerate on many PC's. May take some time to fix it -- campaign saves may be corrupted after an update - takes time to learn the basics - desync on multiplayer (which is a server/player issue, no Arma 3 issue) - vehicle physics/collisions (Hunter can move HEMTT etc.) ?? Karts DLC Gameplay Arma 3 is a tactical military/war/combat simulation. You control a soldier on 2 huge maps: Stratis and Altis. Once you get used to the keybindings (there are a lot!) there's nothing that can stop you. If you prefer slow and realistic combat over fast FPSs (such as CS, CoD or BF) it's definitely worth checking out. Arma 3 does not offer a ranking system (some servers do) and you need to check your surroundings before you start shooting someone. Otherwise you'll end up unconscious in the middle of nowhere. Scenarios - Single Player Main Campaign: Arma 3 offers a great campaign with an interesting story line. You're playing as NATO soldier Cpl Kerry. The main campaign is split into 3 chapters/episodes: "Survive", "Adapt" and "Win". In the first chapter you need to survive in a multi-force conflict on Stratis. It's a quite instructive Episode, showing you the Arma 3 101s, such as moving, diving, driving, shooting etc. There's no pop-up message showing you what to do, but usually you can open a "Help" tab by pressing H. The missions on Survive are quite controlled, but if you keep hiding behind a rock your Squad Members will have a hard time or even die. So if you don't want to be left alone, you should do what you're supposed to. The second Episode plays on Altis, where you join a local Guerilla force. In this chapter you learn how to control your own squad and how the communication system works. You still have your orders, but you can leave the base and explore the map whenever you want, playing optional missions or looking for better weapons. Finally, in "Win" you join the NATO reinforcment. In this chapter you need to show what you've learned so far, fighting a lot of enemies ;-) Scenarios - Workshop / SP / COOP The Steam Workshop offers a lot of user created content, which you should definitely check out. Many of them can be played in coop with friends or even on servers. There are some stock Arma 3 coop missions you can play as well. Scenarios - Multiplayer There are a lot of Servers online, which offer a lot of different scenarios and modifications. I'll cover just a few (popular) of them: Domination: Basically "King of the Hill" where you need to capture cities. Usually you can use whatever gear you want and choose your function (Engineer, Medic, Commander, ...). Every function has its own abilities, which you can benefit from. Most servers also support side missions, where you can get new vehicles, choppers or jets. Domination's my personal favourite. Wasteland: It's a team deathmatch mode where you can join multiple groups or play on your own. You usually start with a pistol and need to find/buy weapons and supplies (water, food, ..) to survive. If you earned enough money you can build your personal fort. There are vehicles and choppers on the map, but most of them are broken and you need to repair/refuel them. But you can also get special vehicles for your team by doing side missions which appear every few minutes. Certainly, the other teams try to do the same thing. Altis Life: One of the most popular game modes. It's basically a "cops and robbers"/"roleplay" simulation. There are police forces which are other players controlling the cities. As long as you don't do anything illegal, such as killing someone or carry weed with you, they won't do anything to you. It's a fun mode if you want to play Arma without shooting someone all the time. Microphone is recommended! Scenarios - Do it yourself! You certainly can host your own server. There are a lot of scenarios which you can download and modify. Arma 3 also offers you an Editor which you can use to build your own scenario from scratch. It's quite hard if you don't know anything about scripting or never used the Arma editor before, but there are a lot of tutorials on youtube and on forums which you can check out. Kart DLC There's not much I can tell about the DLC, but you can drive Karts, Yay! Known issues A lot of people are not able to play Arma 3 on a stable framerate, despite their superior machine. If you have any performance issues, check out the online tutorials on how to fix it. There are a lot of possible ways to increase your performance. But worth the money? Imho, definitely! It's been over a year and the devs still add content. Check out videos on youtube or try the game on free weekends if you're interested but don't know if it's something for you. It takes some time to learn the basics, don't be frustrated if you die every minute on your first try ;-)
Disodium;-;Brilliant Military Sim sandbox. Like simulators? Like Military Shooters? Like Sanbox games that encourage mods and community content? If yes, you should already own this.
Furzo Partio;-;arma is the best worst game ever or is it the worst best game ever? i don't know but it's a huge pile of  and it's the most fun i've ever had
Amuff1n;-;No one says you have to fight a war with your pants on.
Lizburn;-;Hell yes I recommend this game. Tired of the average FPS, tired of seeing soldiers of bare twenty years of age running through bullets like they're nothing? Play ARMA. Feel the real aspects of war, as close as a simulator can get it. Not only are there thousands of choices of weaponry and ways to combine all of it, you get a sincere feeling of teamwork and self-accomplishment when conquering the battlefield, or when completeing an objective. This game rewards the good thinkers, the smart players. The gameplay, mechanics, campaign, all of it has blown me away. ARMA is a game I'd recommend to anyone looking for a healthy change to the average FPS.
Pontus Overlord;-;We tied up a kid who wanted to join our gang and used him for target practice. 10/10
HappyHouseGnome;-;Successfully ruined my life. 10/10 Edit : But in all honesty this is a great game, I recommend it to all my friends... Just make sure your rig can handle it
Beleth;-;I don't even have this game, why is it allowing me to write a review? EDIT: And as of 5/8/15, I now own the game.
a pillowcase full of [vacation];-;only realistic military sim where you don't have to wear pants 11/10 would be pantsless again
Owsen;-;With 70 hours, I can safely say this game is definetly worth the money. It caters to all types of players. Casual players can usually find themselves playing custom missions such as Wasteland and King of the Hill. Roleplaying players have Stratis and Altis life, and tactical players can find servers with Coop and Team vs Team missions as well as tactical groups that play the game in a very realistic manner. Besides the vanilla content there is a variety of realism and fun mods both in the workshop and from outside resources. Feel free to do your own research, check out the Zeus game mode, as well as some tactical gameplay videos that can usually be found https://www.youtube.com/user/Dslyecxi. tl;dr Game is awesome, very moddable, hours of gameplay. Edit: Just to update the review, now with a lot more hours and proper tactical gaming experience behind me, I can say I rediscovered arma completely. In my first mission I didn't even fire the gun and it was more fun than most of the stuff I have played before. Now, this type of "tactical" gameplay might not suit everyone so if you feel like it, give it a shot, if not, go back to the rest of the fun stuff.
LukeO;-;Me and a friend ran up to a house because we seen a chemlight and was curious. A guy screamed "Allahu Akbar" really loud, we got scared we ran. 10/10
Dyzalonius;-;For all the haters out there; Arma 3 does not have glitches or bugs, they are called features and we love them. OCCURRENCE Glitch Bug Feature Killed by a wall Falling through stairs Pistolsniped by AI Swimming through the air Helicopter explodes when tilts Rocks launch you into the air Advanced flight model for helicopters
alan (bday in 5 days);-;It has turtles. wow/10
Officer Friendly;-;Does CoD allow you to be pinned down for 6 straight hours in a house while you cry hearing screaming and dieing? Men Play Arma
[SG] SilentGuns;-;I ran a marathon without leaving my chair. 11/10
Seabass (Developer);-;Started game Set the game to ultra settings Had a gtx 660 so I changed the settings down to medium 15-40 fps, crap Buys a gtx 970 so I changed the settings to ultra 15-60 fps, crap turns settings down to lowest 15-120 fps, crap 11/10, would spends hundreds of dollars again
Malika;-;I feel bad for anyone who doesn't own this game. 10/10, can ride gokarts and make meth.
Baklava;-;This game changed my life i now am able to get all the females
-NexOwner's;-;The first few hours of play, long, can be painful and away most people. Arma 3 is hard to understand, is not for everyone and I'm sure it's not even that the Bohemia Interactive searches. But if you stop to study mechanics, shooting techniques, positioning, Azimuth, applied physics ... studying really hard, you fall in love! The maps are really great, forcing you to use a vehicle to move around, the Audio is impressive ... Scares the hell out of anyone who plays for the first time, don't optimization is good I confess! But if you think of buying this game ... buy without fear!
Sage;-;I bought this game when it was in alpha... I didn't know it would take my life. I told my stepdad how many hours I had in this game and he was disappointed. Bohemia Interactive, can I please have my life back? 11/10 would sell life again
LoyaL;-;Crashes by the number Glitches by the score Everyday you love me less Each day I love you more Yes, I've got crashes by the number A game that I can't play But the day that I stop playing That's the day my world will end
Dejection;-;While the animations, graphics, lighting, and vehicle handling are better in this installment into the ARMA series, I miss the ARMA 2's setting, units, and mods. ARMA 3's "future-istic" setting doesn't make sense, and some of the gear used just looks flat out odd. While I appreciate the new vehicles such as the MRAP "Hunter" or the newly updated "Ghosthawk" (Blackhawk), or any of that sort of updated feel. I'm not saying change is a bad thing, I'm just saying sometimes too much change isn't. A great addition to the ARMA series, was the much requested "stances" available to you during the game. Whether it's leaning from standing, crouching, or even laying on your side in the prone position, it offers a wide variety of heights and angles to tackle those pesky rocks, windows, and walls that you're either too short or too tall for. There are 3 standing stances, 3 crouching stances, a sitting position, and a prone position. Every stance except for sitting, allows you to step out to the side, or lean around cover. From the prone, you can peak a corner, or lay on your side. This vastly improves over ARMA 2's restricted movement. It would be nice to see the ability to vault over short walls, or help your buddy boost over a larger one as well, but that's just wishful thinking. Another thing I noticed, is the sound of the weapons. A lot of the weapons have similar sounds, which makes it hard to distinguish which side of the battle you're getting into. While some of the sounds such as explosions, vehicles, and other small ambient additions are nice, I feel like I'm often confused and lost with the sounds. Hopefully, a good soundmod will fix this later down the road. AI. . . AI. . .AI. . . One thing the ARMA series hasn't been able to nail down, is the AI's movement, pathing, communication, and skills. I realize that it's really difficult in such a complex and vast game such as this, where the player has free will on which direction to get to an objective, or how, but often you'll either find your allies falling behind, running out of formation for a second, or asking "Where are you" after you run over a hill even though other soldiers under your command are still coming of the hill themselves. It would be nice to see AI being able to figure out things based on other AI, and not almost strictly from you. Combat awareness. Something I noticed in ARMA, is that no matter what situation, the AI in combat are lacking, whether an enemy soldier, or a friendly, you'll notice them not finding cover, running into the middle of a street, or from behind cover out into the open. On one of my first "showcase" missions, I was instructed by my AI squad leader to move behind a wrecked tank as cover. "Neat" I thought. He then gave me an area to suppress, as I was an automatic rifleman. I began laying fire down from my position, my own squad leader walked next to me, and as he gave an order, ran right in front of me, bushing me back, and causing a bullet to hit him in the head, resulting in a mission failed and having to restart the whole thing. Note, the time it took for him to stand next to me and rush in front of me was almost 1 second, leaving me no time to react. Their aim isn't that great either. You could be standing across a room and they won't be able to hit you, or they'll be firing from a fortified position catching you and your allies of-guard yet, not hiting any of you as you sprint to cover or dash towards it. Now, this goes both ways. To combat them being "too easy", you could set the dificulty to Expert of Veteran. The problem with this, is that the change is too extreme. Setting your game to the highest difficulty, results in enemy soldiers being able to spot you easily. You could be concealed at night in a bush, and taking you out. That, or you'll witness getting shot in the head from across the valley. My advice? Find some friends or a group to join, disable AI teammates for the mission, and only play with a team made up of human players, 9 times out of 10, you'll be able to accurately cover teammates, move together in a more realistic and effective way, and it will increase your expierence 10-fold. Here's an example of the Helo AI in this game. http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=203646487 Another weird problem you may notice, is the problem with framerates while playing any form of multiplayer. You may or many not have issues, and to top it off, it's really sporatic and without a known cause. In singleplayer however, this is not the case, and the game runs a lot smoother. and it is quite confusing, and frustrating when trying to set your settings. Here's an example. You go to singleplayer, and you set your game to just the right settings after a while of tinkering. The game looks great, and you're real happy with it. Now your friend hops on, or you want to go play on a server. You select one with the best player/ping ratio, and join it. You notice right away your frames are a lot worse, and you sit the tinkering with your settings again, mostly lowering everything so that you can run the game. Not only does this make the game look worse in one of the most important features of the game, but when you join back to singleplayer, the game looks worse, and you either have to deal with the settings again, or get stuck with lower graphics. Now, changing the settings in multiplayer may not always fix the problem either, so you could be messing with them for awhile before giving up in frustration. Overall: If you're a fan of the ARMA series, or any realistic shooter, I'd go for ARMA 3. While I still play ARMA 2 more, ARMA 3 offers enough change when I get tired of the former. Improved graphics and lighting, vehicle handling, weapon handling, and the use of different combat "stances", really improves over ARMA 2's static and prohibited movement. While you won't be in the deserts of Takistan, or going through the dense city of Zargabad, the Islands of Stratis and Altis, are sure to give you the variety and fun you'd want. While the AI isn't improved much, some of the futuristic units, and factions don't fit well, and the sounds can tend to be confusing, ARMA 3 is definitely a step in the right direction, and a giant leap towards success.
august_nox;-;My go-kart hit a bunny and went supersonic. This is a hardcore military simulator.
burns;-;Hard not to be overly fanboiish or hateful on this iteration of the game. My best advice: Dont believe the pictures. Read up on the game first. And its not a casual shooter.
Aquila;-;You can run through the battlefield in just your underwear. 10/10
Joller;-;Gameplay = 10/10 - This is why Arma 3 is my favorite game of all times. The gameplay is unique and realistic. You can actually feel the realism when you play, especially mixed with the awesome community. AI = 4/10 - Sometimes the Ai is completely ed up and this is something the devs need to work on. Graphics = 8/10 - Good graphics, though watch out for FPS drops! Details = 6/10 - No furniture in buildings and other stuff, which makes the game feel empty. But the outdoors (which you mostly play in) has alot of rocks and bushes that can actually save your life in some really hard situations. Though mission makers can add stuff in the Scenario Editor. Replayability = 9/10 - There's alot of things to do, from diving onto land and then sneaking around a guerilla camp to using advanced high-tech mortars togheter with armored vehicles assaulting a largely fortified base. If you combine these things (Combined Arms) you can create some really epic missions. Music = 9/10 - Also I love the soundtrack, it's just pure epicness. Sound = 8/10 - Since the Marksmen platform update got released the sound got a huge upgrade. The gunfire does different echoes/sounds depending on environment and distance and the guns also sound more realistic. Glitchfree = 5/10 - The game has alot of glitches and stuff like that, but sometimes it's just hilarious and doesn't affect gameplay that much. Community = 10/10 - AMAZING COMMUNITY, even the russians stick to their own servers. Though there are some veerry rare occasions of hackers. Also a huge amount of community-mods to use! Developers = 8/10 - At the start of Arma 3 alot of people were saying it was unfinished and they only added expensive DLC (But it looks like they forgo the free platform update!!). Back in Arma 2 the DLC was very worth it and rich of new stuff to play with. Recently, the developers announced their secret project which is a whole new terrain located at an Island in South America! There's alot of new features such as Jetskis and Airplanes which I'm very looking forward to! :D Story = 5/10 - Very basic story, just like Call of Duty. Though there are some mysteries the community must uncover! Length = Long - I think the campaign is about 20 hours long... Optimization = 9/10 - There is alot of optimization, you can even switch colors of the teams. DLC = Medium - There are 3 DLCs at the moment, some people think it's way to expensive (13.99  for 2 Helicopters!?), but they always put ALOT of detail and work into them, and a platform update also gets released. Fair Price = Yes ---------- FINAL RESULT = 97/100
mortichro;-;I broke up with my girlfriend because of Arma. t-thanks b-bohemia..
Chamonix (Elusive Fox);-;Do ya want a game that can give you PTSD?
Humanista Secular Ateu.;-;Arma 3 - The greatest mod platform for MilSim and Roleplaying. And I'm not even lying about the header. Features: +++ Best mod platform on ArmA series so far. +++ Community Driven DLCs and MODs. ++ Good all-around game focused on infantry shooting. ++ Devs update the game constantly based on feedback. - Few old ArmA bugs. Arma 3, from Bohemia Interactive developer of Armed Assault, Arma 2, Operation Flashpoint and Dayz, has arguably the best gaming experience I have on steam. Apart from default content which is being developed with the community since the alpha versions and still being guided by those who buy the game, the community itself is self sustaining, with mods, missions, scripts, addons, full conversions and whatever your imagination can bring to you. For Military Simulation. Arma 3 veteran fanbase is hardcore on Milsim, which carries on from the first armed assault game, a sort of military simulation, but a game, not fully realistic. What the community brings is exactly how much realism you want. Want to simulate injuries and pain during a firefight? Want to simulate fatigue and vehicles in a war? Want to test your strategy and communication skills? Everything is provided by the community. For Role Players. The mod community has some of the best roleplaying missions and addons I've seen so far, from petty smugglers to prestigious governors, roleplaying and surviving are definely the new possibilities that Arma 3 offers as far as fun goes, interacting with other players while excercising your creativity and your inner actor/actress is a powerful tool for all ages and minds. Ever wanted to be a cop? Would you abuse of your power? What about being a criminal and causing havoc among citizens? These are but few among the roads you can take in your path of roleplaying. Strategic Action. Zeus in Arma 3 is another feature of innovation by Bohemia Interactive. As a game master, you are able to create missions and objectives on-the-go for your fellow teammates. Guide them to victory or challenge their skills. Create training missions edit whatever feature you would like in the game world. For an immortal being, creation and destruction are but just another day in the office.
MVP Jekob;-;Fun Fact: 1 in 3 soldiers goes to war without packing any pants.
Joewsh;-;Where the Battlefield series should have naturally progressed to; a huge multi-faceted, vehicle crammed blood bath with a fantastic community (for the most part). Thankfully this beat Battlefield to it so we don't have to deal with EA to play!
Horseoats;-;For beta neckbeards too fat to join the real army. 10/10
Ghost;-;So..you're here to possibly buy Arma 3..I was in that position before, I just bought it when it was 50% off. Here's a checklist for you: Do you like Call of Duty? Can you 360 no scope in CoD? Do you like 9 year olds screaming on the mic? If you answered yes to those then this game is NOT for you. Do you like CS:GO? Are you a pro AWPer in CS:GO? Well if you answered yes this game will rip you apart and you will be a  sniper. Do you like simulators? Do you like military games? Are you up for the challenge? Do you want an alternative to joining the military in real life? Do you have at least $30? If so, then you are ready for this challenge. -------------- Pros: MASSIVE REALISTIC COMBAT servers with 100+ people Few 'squeakers' on mics Steam Workshop Many players still today. Single player Modes Tutorials, and all kinds of training for practice. --------------------- Cons: $60 pricey, but worth more than any call of duty game.  AI - It's ok, playable. Lag - This game is apparently heavily dependent on CPU in huge multiplayer games your fps can drop from over 9000 to 20 in a matter of seconds. Glitches Bugs When people shoot from far away it sounds like BB guns. Trolls in multiplayer - they can steal your helicopters and  you buy or just be a pilot and kamikazi with you in it. Doesn't come with cookies.
Demkon;-;Great military sim/shooter, tons of mods and unlimited possibilities for different types of fun.
bradn0;-;nothing beats popping a tire on a road sign and having to walk 10km to the nearest repair kit 10/10 i only really play this when i have a whole afternoon of nothing to do
Dwarfism;-;Stop commenting on my review. EDIT: Get a life.
Covertbus | Trading;-;I hit a tree with a tank then it became a flying projectile 11/10 best tank simulation
Dwarden;-;our great openworld moddable tactical sim-a-like military game ... and we want to make it even better and more awesome ;)
_DDD;-;This game ruined my life
Omni;-;Arma 3 is an ambitious title with a style of gameplay that will polarize players. The many complexities and amount of controls to master can be a daunting task for any newcomer to the series, while seasoned vets will feel right at home (for better or worse). There is a great deal to learn about playing Arma in a way that is enjoyable. The default campaign mode is passable, with all the tropes you'd expect to find in a military shooter, with a few surprises here and there. Missions vary in length and scope, ranging from short range patrols to full on combined operations assaults. However, where the real meat is in the multiplayer experience and the many mods available. Hopping on to a co-op server with 60+ players who actually want to work together as a unit is nothing short of amazing in a world of "le epic trelling". Being able to request evac, mortar, medical assistance, etc is wonderous on it's own, but having those assets being controlled by actual players gives you a sense of connection and being part of a team. Even if realistic military games aren't your particular style, there are plenty of other game modes available that you can download right from the server browser and enjoy. These include standouts like Altis Life (kind of like a more advanced Cops and Robbers), Wasteland (a survival mod focused on factions), and Breaking Point ( A Day-Z style mod). Mods will breath all sorts of new life into your game, adding new vehicles, uniforms, maps and much much more, giving you almost limitless scenarios and tools to use in creating custom missions. you can check out the large database of mods at : http://www.armaholic.com That said, Arma is not without it's fair number of faults and missteps, the game is not optimized well for multiplayer, and you'll encounter many bugs along the way (most of which are hilarious as opposed to annoying). The learning curve can be fairly steep, and you'll have to be patient to get the most fun out of this title... that said, it's well worth it, especially if you have some friends willing to do the same.
Tinter~;-;The editor is ok I guess.
Simply Jesus;-;in ze begin of campaign guy tells you not to kill goats with your car, but you're like nope die goats, and the guy is like noooo are you crazy. LOL'd out loud 10/10 would drive over goats again.
spicy;-;What a fantastic game. Well worth the money, buying this is like buying 10 games in one. So much fun to be had and so many mods and different modes to try out. This game looks great and is so fun to play.
A roaming CHEEKI BREEKI;-;9.5/10, Like Skyrim but with REGROUP.
Angarvin;-;A great platform for user-created content. The best military simulator up to date. A game that will only become better and larger with time. Home for one of the most active gaming communities there are. ArmA 3.
McDeuce;-;Pros: Engaging and challenging campaign; Almost endless replayability via user generated content or multiplayer; Relatively easy to get in to; Diverse multiplayer community; New user generated content (maps, guns, vehicles, overhaul mods, missions, etc.); All in one game (FPS, RPG, RTS, etc. modes available); Pleasing to the eye; Gives you the possibility to brag about knowing how to clear buildings, stay in formation and etc.; Training given by military personell who play this game can help you in real life (incl. paintball and airsoft); Cons: Can be buggy at times (especially when new patches come out); Spotty AI performance (from full derp to terminator); Semi-steep learning curve for basic gameplay (attachments, maps, weapon sway etc.); Very steep learning curve for expert gameplay (formations, chain of command, team synergy, etc.); Taxing on your gaming rig (lack of good hardware can limit your tactical possibilities in-game); People will probably hate you at how good at firefights you will become (in games and real life); In general: Your creativity and acting is the only limit in this game. With an active modding community, zeus gameplay, RP-oriented clans, PvP servers, survival, orientation and other scenarios, this single game can cover quite a few of your demands for digital entertainment. Irrelevant if you are a hardcore military fan or a casual player, you can find something that tickles your fancy.
[GT14]FrontRUSSIAN;-;-Joined King of the hill server -Spawned -Saw a helicopter -Went in the helicopter -Helicopter got to the LZ -Someone shot rocket at the helicopter -Everybody in the helicopter died
Odd Bandit;-;Downloaded Arma, and then opened it. Proceeded to do a horrible tutorial, but after that, it was just beautiful. Opened an RPG server, and ran 2 miles to get to an atm, and ran 2 miles to a shady car salesman. Bought a car, spent the next half hour trying to figure out how to actually get into it. After I finally managed to glitch into it, I underestimated it's ability to travel at light speed, which in turn caused me to crash into a wall. After that, my car was a smoking mess, with a top speed that a sloth could outdo. 10/10 would crash again
Rhino;-;Destroys Battlefield 4 and Call of Duty on authenticity.
Ryokyon!;-;The best army men only wear casual clothes and bike helmets.
Cii Juice;-;Get the  off Side!
Someguywhoplaysgames;-;No one said you have to fight a war with pants on. 10/10
Skell*;-;I'm almost entirely sure the sole purpose of this game is to obtain a helicopter and suicide dive into another's.
DIEHARD;-;Arma 3 is an amazing game if you play solo, but it truly comes to life when you play it with your friends. Definitely reccomended.
AsunRaise;-;Well , i bought this game on the first Alpha Days , when it was 32.99$. I Really like Strategy (hope i wrote it right) and Simulator games & FPS games. This game Contains many objects and many ways to play , the vanilla has no many weapons nor cars and aircrafts , BUT , there is A BIG BUT , you can use the Workshop on steam to use Maps \ Missions \ other mods to make your playing much more funny and realistic. if you consider spend around 40 - 50$ when it's on sale , do that , on this game of course.
Jimothy;-;Would quite gladly sleep with this game...
Little shanie~Sleeping;-;Great game if you are looking for a MilSim game, also arma3 has one of the better modding scenes such as AltisLife, which is a RPing mod for arma3. Really worth a buy, just make sure you have a mid to high spec PC, due to it's a little resource intensive.
Duchy- Deluxe edition;-;Good, realistic.... f**k it, its ARMA 3-the best game ever 11/10
The Ech'd One;-;The only thing in the known universe more addictive than heroin.
Mikasa Su Casa;-;when you begin: you will get rekt. you will forget what keys to use. you will try to quickscope. you will try to kill teammates. you will create a character with outfits that make absolutely no sense but you won't even know it. you will try to spot enemies. you will try to charge on your own. you will try to change the buttons but you will most likely fail. you will get banned for no reason. but remember, it will be worth it because you're gonna turn into a fine warrior.
GuidaGuida;-;A great simulator of my home country, Alpacastan. I appreciate the correct modelling of Alpacastanians, and there wonderful law-enforced attire of blue striped shirts, hats, tan shorts, and sandals. I also love the fact that you can recreate traditional Alpacastanian picnics within this great simulator. It always brings tears to my eyes to remember the death of my grandfather, Backwards Cap Guy- he was hit by a car, and then shot by a spy during the Great Cleansing of Stan. RIP, he will be missed. 11 frolicks out of 10.
no;-;Someone tried to rob me when i was filling up my truck with gas, he died of dehydration and i stole his pistol and got away. 10/10
Error 404;-;Awesome game, great content, brilliant graphics! Would highly recommend this to anyone.
Devul;-;If you want to play the best military simulator experience, Arma 3 is your best bet. It has the combat, vehicles, weapons, it has it all. I have played Arma 3 for around 300 hours and it is still fun. There are a variety of different game modes that you can play: such as Wasteland, which is less serious than others; Life servers are for the ones who probably played a lot of DarkRP in Garry's Mod; Insurgency and Domination, they are also good tactically played gamemodes which are sometimes taken a lot seriously. Lovely game, 10/10.
Cutlash;-;Its ok
blur;-;"The best sandbox war game of the year" Arma 3 is a continuation to the Arma series by Bohemia Interactive, taken to the next level. With increased player control/movement, enhanced mechanics for vehicles, weapon systems (if you buy it), flight models (if you buy it -_-), and much more! The control in tight spaces should be worked on, this is no call of duty, the controls are clunky, but are a vast improvement over the previous installment (arma 2). Another of the top complaints of this game is the NETCODE. It is terrible under load, but again, is much better than arma 2. This game is mostly open source, Meaning that players are able to change almost every aspect of the game from the amount of fog to adding dinosuars into the game. The things you can do are endless and that is it's selling point. Bohemia Interactive leaves the imagining to you and the community to come up with your own story or missions. This game is heavily supported by the modding community and for good reason. The scripting language for ARMA 3 is .sqf, Based off the C++ coding language, but it seems like a little of everything works. (there is alot of things you can do to make somehting work) I have based 4 years of my life modding and playing arma 2 and arma 3, making this my most played game, by a long shot. The best way to play this game is modded and with friends. By it's self, arma is fun, but somewhat bland, but that seems like that was part of the plan... BI (Bohemia Interactive) made the game as basic as possible to allow you and it's users to change it the way they like it! Do I recommend this game? YES! This game has supplied my friends and I countless hours of playtime with new and exciting missions and firefights, and with a few basic mods it has become 400% better than before. 9.2/10
Commissar MissingNo.;-;THANKS ARMA 3 FOR TEACHING ME ABOUT THE METRIC SYSTEM.
SwitchBlade;-;I HIGHLY recommend this game for any wanting to see the closest thing to real life combat without actually joining the army. Not only does this simulate real military tactics but provides an excellent window of opportunity for clans to really feel like they are in the middle of a war! Friends can get together and act like the Special Forces team that they all wanted when they were little kids! You can even have roleplaying games and custom games such as Cops and Robbers! This is by far my favorite military game of all time! Sure it takes a while to learn about the dangers of not going prone when an enemy comes by or getting major fatigue in the middle of a firefight but it is a SIMULATOR and by far the best one for military standards. I DO NOT recommend this game for the Call of Duty & Battlefield lovers because there is just no simple "respawn" or "run and gun it" situation this is not built for Deathmatches! It is built to be a simulator that simulates real time combat for the hardcore people! There are no killstreaks/CoD type loadouts or MLG scoreboard. If anyone gets mad because this game is just a simulator I only have one thing to say. THIS GAME IS NOT FOR YOU!
monk1junk1;-;I spent 400 hours playing dress up. 10/10
LerG;-;This is the best Golf simulator out there. You really can feel the swing in ur whole upper body as you go on killing people with your towed zamak beneath ur transport bird on wasteland sa-matra. And the crowd (victims) goes wild in the global chat 1/2 times you manage to score. This keeps you going for hours and hours. The occasional aa missile hitting you in the side makes for an even more interesting golf course as you will need to "get out of the rough" and repair/re fuel the heli to get back on the fairway 12/10 will golf again
--||  ||--;-;It's the dead of night on the CSAT-occupied island of Stratis, and the peaceful darkness is about to explode into chaos. I'm leading one of two spec-ops teams on a mission to liberate the leader of a local guerrilla faction and return him to the much larger island of Altis. A British squad is in charge of the actual rescue. Our job is to cause as much trouble across the island as possible to distract the CSAT forces and give the British the opening they need. Over the next hour, that's precisely what I do. Inserting by boat from the northwest coast, I head south and raid an ammo dump before cutting across to the eastern shore to destroy a heliport. Then my squad suppresses an enemy encampment from a hillside near the centre of the island as I swoop in from the west to flank them. Yet before we can regroup, my entire team is killed by reinforcements descending from the north, and the British still need more time to complete their mission. Alone, I rush to the southernmost tip of the island, where I blow up a fortified anti-air position before escaping by riding a quad bike back through the swarming enemy forces to the extraction point, where the boat takes me home. Arguably the biggest complaint about Bohemia Interactive's post-Flashpoint games is that their campaigns haven't used the magnificent landscapes they create to their full potential. The first Arma's campaign was a hastily cobbled-together disappointment, while it took a certain zombie-survival mod to harness the austere and foreboding power of Arma 2's Chernarus. That Arma 3 uses half an island for just one of its twenty-odd missions is indicative of Bohemia's effort to resolve this ongoing issue. Indeed, taken as a whole, Arma 3 strives to make this deep and impenetrable military simulator series a more comprehensive, more engaging and more user-friendly experience. It isn't completely successful, but I had an awful lot of fun watching it try. While Arma 3 was officially released back in September, the campaign has been portioned out in three substantial chunks over the last six months. Each chapter is a self-contained entity with its own story arc and theme; combined, they tell the tale of the excitingly named Corporal Ben Kerry and his role in the war over the fictional Mediterranean island archipelago of Altis and Stratis, waged between four different factions. The first part, Survive, is geared towards introducing players to Arma. It takes place entirely on the smaller of Arma 3's two islands, Stratis, and sees Kerry banding up with a group of NATO survivors after the local Altian Armed Forces, backed by NATO's eastern equivalent CSAT, rise up against the local US garrison. For the most part, missions are small-scale skirmishes that keep you firmly in the "follower" category while teaching you the basics of minimising your daily lead intake. Rescuing a downed helicopter crew instructs you on establishing a defensive position, while a midnight liaison with local militia explains how to flank and clear buildings. It's hardly the campaign's most spectacular stage. Story-wise, it's let down by voice acting that ranges from passable to cringeworthy and a script that understands military radio chatter but not how human beings interact with one another. Even here, though, Bohemia's approach to maximising the assets it has built is apparent. Missions are nearly always multi-staged, with objectives being added and changed as events rarely go according to plan. While it smoulders rather than sparks, Survive concludes strongly and the momentum is carried over into Adapt, definitely the best of the three chapters. This introduces Altis, a masterwork of environmental design. I could write another 1000 words on its remarkable sights and sounds: its misty dawns, crimson dusks and streetlight-speckled nights. But what's most important is how the detail that's gone into mapping the landscape's undulations - the lumps and bumps, hills and valleys - plays into the game's combat. A little rise in the ground might be the difference between life and death as you throw yourself down in evasion of the fiendishly accurate enemy AI. When they stop to reload, you'll rush to locate a better vantage point, order your men to "find cover" (an extremely handy new command) and plant half a dozen bullets in your opponent's surprisingly tough body. Tactics are vital in Arma 3, but it's terrain that really makes the difference between success and failure. It's crucial to learn this before Adapt begins, because the difficulty suddenly ramps up. The first mission sees you alone, unarmed and with a city full of enemy soldiers between you and any kind of safety. At this point, setting saves to unlimited using Arma's highly customisable difficulty levels becomes a necessity. Fittingly, after Survive, you will die many, many times. That said, it's important to note that combat is more satisfying than before thanks to improved animations, smoother weapon handling and better optics - meaning the challenge stems from your opponents rather than clumsy controls and slow-to-aim weapons. Adapt also changes the way you play. It gives you a squad to control, which is a mixed blessing. AI units tend to be much more perceptive of enemy locations than you are and are especially useful when facing down tanks and APCs, but they also require a fair amount of babysitting to keep them alive, and the lack of changes to Arma's squad commands means this can be a chore. Especially problematic is AI ammo management; your teammates go through bullets like a swarm of locusts through a corn crop, and resupplying them in the field is a nightmare in Arma 3's clumsy interface. Alongside its story missions, which include the brilliant raid on Stratis described above, Adapt also introduces an open-world component. From your base you can go out on "Patrol" and complete multiple optional objectives, from clearing enemy checkpoints to smoking out a sniper hidden inside a labyrinthine industrial complex, all while collecting weapons, ammo and equipment to use during the main missions - though the clunkiness of Arma's inventory management means this is less enjoyable than it should be. If you want to bring stuff back to base, you need to find a vehicle and load it item-by-item from your own inventory, while before each mission the game defaults to a standard equipment loadout and items you previously had can be lost in this process. After the meatiness of Adapt, the final chapter Win feels fleeting by comparison, with only six missions to its name. But they're also the most spectacular, displaying vast, combined-arms battles that cover sweeping areas of Altis. It's strongly reminiscent of the opening of Operation Flashpoint, but with you in control rather than being led by an AI squad leader. In these closing stages you can call in devastating artillery strikes and helicopter assaults, simultaneously demonstrating the sheer destructive power of modern warfare and your own insignificance in the scale of things. Story-wise, it's also the most interesting segment, making unsettling use of its near-future setting and offering a branching conclusion that is fascinating, whichever direction you take. Arma 3's campaign is a big, powerful, deeply engrossing thing, but there is one disappointment: its lack of vehicular missions. Since the story focuses on one not particularly interesting character who is ultimately a grunt, there are no tank missions, no helicopter missions and no jet missions. I can understand why, to a point: Arma's vehicles, especially its airborne offering, take time and effort to learn to control. Moreover, in these kinds of games infantry combat tends to be more enjoyable anyway. On the other hand, Flashpoint offered plenty of vehicle engagements during its campaign without any issue, and it's frustrating that, 13 years on, Arma's campaigns still lag behind it in terms of breadth of experience.
The Fresh Priest of Bel Air;-;wow much realism it is kill has game gone2far? good time to be doge many soldier pls buy this game wow
Lankercool;-;This game features a lot more than it may seem. It's got lots of gamemodes and different experiences even if you do play the same gamemode over and over. Everytime you play will be a different experience, may it be your role, the difficulty, or the ai. It's all different every time. You can find a lot of funny moments where the game will glitch out on you a bit but it's not really game-breaking, it's just a moment you can laugh about. Plus the amount of customization in the game is unbelievable, There's so much different changes you can do to the game, from changing your character's voice or face, up to making a whole addon and even more. Im not gonna say the game's completely perfect though. The main problem may be the community, but from time to time you'll not meet with that problem; some people will be nice to you and help you if you're a newbie to the game, and some will just go hard on you and troll you but those guys are rare, as people dont appreciate them on the servers. The gameplay; Now that is one hard question to answer. The gameplay mostly matters about you, and the gamemode, how you want to play, will still be valid, but you are restricted to thinking a lot about your actions or you'll get shot by some guy from 800 meters while he's only using a simple rifle with no scope. As you would guess, another problem is the AI, sometimes it may act rediculous and sometimes it's just the best AI you can find in a game. now, im not gonna go over the gamemodes here as it's better to find out yourselves, but i'll just say that King Of The Hill, Wasteland(mostly fun with friends), and Zeus(you'll be most likely to spend days on this one) are the ones i recommend. The community: The community has an endless array of addons you could use to change your game and/or experience. I'm not gonna say much about it except this but there's alot you can say about the community. The Engine: this game requires a beefy pc(currently at its state) but the engine is brilliant, It can run alot of data without having to give you frame drops or hard CPU usage. The engine is mostly dependant rather more on the RAM than the CPU, i recommend atleast 6-12 RAM for this game if you're gonna play it alot. Overall: The game's worth a shot for people who like to plan their moves and think about what they do it before they do it, altough you will find mostly funny moments and non-serious moments in multiplayer but less than serious moments that are mostly enjoyable. Certain people refer to this as a "Walking Simulator" but the point is that ArmA III is mainly focused on infantry and combined arms, you WILL find yourself walking and running alot to objectives, but that's how it is in real life too. The game is focused on reality and will be a hard challenge for people who arent used to this type of gaming. You can find alot to do in this like commanding AI and/or players, which is always hard at the start, and participating in large assaults on towns such as Kavala. In my opinion, ArmA III is worth a shot. -Lankercool, Commander and Soldier, also regular Zeus player in the ArmA III Community.
SHOT(by)GUN;-;Pros: - Most wide maps of any shooting game that I have played. - Mods really make arma - Modding community is really good - Powerful map editor and scripting language Cons: - Really badly implemented multi-threading resulting in horrible performance - Inconsistent and buggy scripting language with many flaws. - Netcode is still not very stable - Game and mods require approximately 100GB hard disk space - Modding community is scattered, so compability is a issue - Arma with many mods is generally hugely instable that there is saying "arma happened" when you crash or die for unknown reason - Game is only 32-bit so it will use your PAGEFILE AS RAM EXTENSION ! - Game can only use 25% of CPU or GPU, because the mainthread is full of bottlenecs crippeling the performance This game makes me feel very controversial as I love the game and the concept of the game, but the game engine is based on technology from 19th century, thus making the game unplayable.
Atlantis1732;-;Best War Simulator ever but the frame drop...
Sparksy - M4A4 King;-;11/10 started flying in a tank.
ValkyrieM;-;I haven't met any Russians in this game yet 10/10
TrenchNinja;-;THE GOOD -------------------- This game is actually the 4th installment of the Arma series and I've been playing since the start. The developers of this game have taken a rare approach to updating their game. They keep the mechanics and feel of the game pretty much the same while making the graphics shine by just updating their custom Real Virtuality engine rather than replacing it, as well as adding new campaigns, missions, vehicles, weapons, and game modes. The part where this game REALLY shines, however, is the community driven mods. The game was built for modding and the developers have done everything in their power to make it easy for the community to make ANYTHING they want out of this game. It may look like a hardcore military simulator from the store page, but I've seen games in this series turned into a civil war sims, "grand theft auto" like games (Arma Life), hardcore zombie games (DayZ), a StarGate tribute which had working, animated stargates and all your favorite characters from the show, ww2 sims (Invasion 1944), Jurassic Park tributes, and so much more. These mods take a lot of work to create, sure, but there are also things you can do very easily without any knowledge of 3d editing or texturing. Simply open the mission editor on the map that you like best and place a few soldiers down. Now add some waypoints for them to attack a town. Add some soldiers inside the town. That's it! If you make yourself a civilian character in the town you can watch a fantastic battle ensue between the two groups of soldiers, using proper flanking maneuvers and yelling back and forth to one another when they see an enemy. This all would take at most about 2 minutes in the editor to have a full battle going on. Want to do more? Read the plethora of information out there on advanced editing and scripting in the game and before you know it you'll have the ability to make suicide bombers, "battle busses" (essentially a civilian bus with artillery and machine guns on top of it), nuclear bombs, and really ANYTHING you can imagine. If you have any issues, someone will be willing to help you out either on reddit.com/r/armadev or on the official Bohemia Interactive forums. I hope you'll choose to join me on my favorite game and play some cool missions together that you or I just freshly made in the editor! Even if you don't like making your own content, there are fun mods already out there such as the popular Battle Royale mod where you're forced to parachute out of a crashing plane with 28 or so of your fellow players and fight to the death while scavenging for the best gear. Just look around and you'll find endless entertainment in this game! THE BAD --------------- I mentioned that the engine is updated with each iteration instead of replaced. This does sometimes mean that glitches that were in the first couple games reappear in later games, but with the increased popularity of the series lately the devs have been doing their best to squash all those nasty bugs. Another warning I would give would-be buyers is that the game is very demanding for your PC. People who have rigs that they THINK are powerful because they can play Battlefield 4 at full settings without much frame drop are in for a nasty surprise: Arma 3 truly stresses your hardware and the devs are still working on optimizations to take full advantage of your hardware. At the moment it seems like most people are having a smooth experience but some peoples' hardware, even when pretty impressive, just doesn't get along with the game that well at the moment.
Dominic;-;EDIT: Bohemia has been releasing constant updates and stability patches. The game is getting better (especially with the Marksman DLC - Deployable bipods and weapon resting make combat so much better) - but my previous comment stands. I can not justify to anyone who has not played it before at this price. This is a game to pick up on a steam sale & its DLC. My recommendation - do not purchase it until then, unless you are desperately in need of this game. EDIT2: As fair warning - I will be deleting posts that personally attack anyone. This is for talking about ArmA3, not how stupid people are. I will delete your post if it is just an emotional response. Thank you. After 1752 hours of gameplay, 3 created mods, and thousands of written code, I can safely say that ArmA 3 is an incomplete game in its vanilla state. I am speaking from a standpoint of someone who has been with the ArmA series for a long time. I expected more from ArmA 3 and I am dissapointed by its current state. The Bohemia team is fantastic at post-launch support and I am glad to see that they are still loving this baby. There are several things that still dissapoint me about the ArmA series that I was hoping to have improved in ArmA 3. When ArmA clicks, it is an amazing experience that you can NOT get anywhere else. However, this does not mean I am blind to its downfalls - and what I was hoping to see improved upon in this series. 1)Confusing/Complicated interactions Now. I am not saying you can't learn these over time. ArmA has a difficult learning curve that is a little unncessary. The interface is just awful. "Want to look through your rifle scope? Click the right mouse button. No. Click it. Dont hold it. That makes your view zoom in and youll hold your breath. Oh, damn. Did you control-click earlier? Yup. That swapped your scope to the little red dot sight on top. Right click to get back to the regular view. Now you can control-click to move the view youll bring up from the dot sight to the scope. Yes, I know theres no way for you to know what view youll bring up before you right click." - http://www.quartertothree.com/fp/2013/09/25/arma-iii-pushes-boundaries-combined-arms-warfare-patience/ 2) AI performance. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=zRfhW-g7-zs The AI are almost brain dead at times. I don't expect anything near perfection - but why do AI have to have hack shotting skills to present a challenge? AI still lack basic abilities to effectively communicate and move properly. The AI also are way more costly on CPU then they need to be - While looking at the AI's code ( I can post pictures if you'd like ) a good chunk of their FSM's have been deactivated for quite some time. When is this going to be fixed? In a recent patch, Bohemia added AI supression. IN A RECENT PATCH. This is ArmA 3. A Military Simulator. Where suppression did not exist until recently. Even with supression AI will only look for cover if it is in within 10 meters. Otherwise they will just lay down in an open field and either 1) Shoot you directly in the face or 2) Wait to die. AI do not work well in teams and do not coordinate well in combined arms situations. APCs/helicopters/infantry can look cool when they work together but it is usually a scripted event or a random chance event. (AI will not call artillery to help them, helicopters will spot enemies but not report it to friendly AI so they can be aware of an ambush, and etc) The AI is the bare minimum and leaves more to be desired. =================================== I could only recommend this game if it was ~25-30 dollars. The game is missing a lot of promised features - but it's okay, you can get a fraction of them by paying ANOTHER 15 dollars to get the DLC they released. The DLC which has a whopping 2 helicopters. Yay. This games success is built by the community and I view ArmA 3 as nothing but a platform in which to create things - like lego. The AI is terrible. The lack of content is terrible. The developers woud rather release "new V3S's" for DayZ. ArmA 3 has a better engine than ArmA 2 - but lacks everything else. The DLC is helping out with the content problems...but only if you're willing to pay for what SHOULD HAVE been there. I honestly don't know what more to say...If you're on the fence about purchasing ArmA 3 and don't have a group to play with - I would not purchase this game until it goes on sale. tldr: When this game goes on sale for 10 dollars, buy it and it's dlc. Click link below. https://dl.dropboxusercontent.com/u/38334795/BIAI.gif
the fakest maalen, ever;-;i don't even own this game why can i review it 10/10 it's meh
Tails' Cash Explosion;-;So real I thought I was going to die irl.
Aporia326;-;Within 24 hours of buying this game, I have played 14.2 hours. I'm pretty sure it's good
Eli;-;Game requires several gigabytes of modding to be playable. Gun sway is obnoxious, optical glare is like looking through an instagram beer glass and although in real life soldiers can carry up to 40kg in a firefight, the characters lose stamina and said gun sway worsens to musket-levels of pinpoint accuracy. Not to mention there is actually no stamina bar or notification, you simply hear him moan incessently. The game is expensive and some of the vehicles and equipment in the game is classed as separate DLC's which you need to buy to pilot or use. Despite the hefty price of Arma 3, you can expect the ratio price of the DLC's to be roughly 20 percent of Arma 3's original cost. The helicopter DLC, for instance, contains only two helicopters and a "realism" mode which worsens your ability to fly for your viewing pleasure. They, the creators of a military simulator, also randomly brought in a DLC that lets you race around in a go-kart. No, I don't know why either. You can indeed exchange attachments on weapons except bipods and front-grips - no one really knows why they discriminated. Not to mention said bipods serve absolutely no purpose and without a mod you cannot deploy your weapon on any environment be it bipod, edge of a window or bonnet of a car. The body armour does indeed seem to affect your lethality but again there is no indication anywhere what is more armoured and what is less armoured., what weighs more, what weighs less. Many of the "futuristic" weapons on Arma 3 are actually cancelled weapons systems deemed inferior in real life (AH-99 Blackfoot) or don't actually exist (such as T-100 Varsuk) making the game incredibly peculiar. It's also extremely difficult to host a server for your friends to play and will require third-party software such as a server host plus hamachi or equivelant software. The experience is stunningly frustrating and can easily consume three hours of your time learning the game's scripting language simply to run the game or create a respawn point. Queue irritating slurring youtube tutorials by semi-conscious d1ckh3ads who can't get to the fuc king point. Buildings are only superficially destructible, they won't crumble but they will undergo scripted morphing turning magically into ruins.Tanks can also be defeated by a farmer's three foot stonewall. Yes. And collisions cause the game physics to dart you away hundreds of metres even in a tank sometimes. Overrall I would rate this game as being lower than the temperature of outer space. Arma 2 including its DLC'S have major flaws but the replayability is immense and covers actual modern weapons. And whilst Arma 3 experienced the longest most buggy alpha-staging in Earth's entire gaming history, Bohemia's employees were arrested for espionage because they thought it would be smart to send two work employees on tourist visas for a little bromance "coincidently" where they were basing Altis on and started taking pictures of actual military bases there. What the fu ck were they thinking? Ridiculous, ludicrous. Don't buy this game. The Iranian soldiers also look like bugmen or bumble-bees.
Fiddles;-;A man robbed me for the keys to my quadbike, he then proceeded to drive my quad into a fence, causing the quad to explode. 10/10 Justice was served by an inanimate object
Simple (offline for 2+ months);-;Very Addictive I would highly recommend this game to anyone looking for an in-depth military sandbox shooter. This game does a great job overall of satisfying the thirst for using tactics in combat. Before I get any farther into this review, I would like to point out that this game is nothing like COD or Battlefield. That doesn't necessarily mean it can't be fast paced, but the learning curve for this game can be kind of deep for some. I'm going to focus primarily on general gameplay, rather than go in-depth with mods. Overall Gameplay 9/10 This game is often called a walking simulator, however this game is so much more than that. Once you play long enough, you just look at walking as another method of travel. You start weighing your options as you come into contact with objectives/other players. Do you want to risk driving to a location, only to get blown up by AT (anti-tank) or would you rather take the longer, but mostly safer method of walking. Once you get yourself in this mindset you really stop caring about how much you have to walk. That being said you can see how decisions can ultimately lead to success or failure. This is perhaps one of favorite things about this game. Want to stealthily insert from the sea SEAL style? Would you rather set up on a hill 1.5km away and pick off the enemy? Or would you rather roll with a battalion of tanks and annihilate everything in your path. The decision is ultimately yours. You may find that a lot of this isn't in the vanilla game, but thankfully the modding community has done an amazing job shaping this game into so much more. Combat 8/10 : Combat is great, but it has its problems (some very frustrating problems at that). PvP combat is always amazing and most of the time it comes down to who has the better tactics. However... The AI is ridiculous. It has gotten better overtime, but the AI is completely unpredictable. Sometimes you can drive up to them and kill all of them without them even getting a shot off, or you can be 1km off sitting on a hill with your sniper and start picking them off, only to be obliterated by them with ridiculous aim. Don't let that ruin your experience though. Some of my favorite moments in this game have to do with the AI doing something completely hilarious (EX: taking you on a tour of a town in a small hatchback for no apparent reason). Mechanics 9/10: falls 2 feet to the ground, dies... To be fair combat mechanics in Arma 3 are much better IMO than that of previous Arma titles. Bullet penetration is verrryyyy well done. It can easily give you an advantage especially if you have a weapon like the .50 cal Lynx that can kill enemies in armored vehicles. Bullet spread/drop seems realistic enough. If your one of those people like me who wanted sniper mechanics to be real you'll be mostly dissappointed, but ranging and bullet drop can be compensate a little. There are lots of options for movement and stances (they can actually benefit you greatly in combat). I HIGHLY recommend staying away from rocks. I have no idea why, but rocks can instakill/trap you if your not careful. Not all rocks are like this, mostly just large ones... stay away... Visuals 9/10: When first playing this game on ultra it can be breath taking. For the full experience I would highly suggest wearing some nice headphones and turn up the volume. The immersion is very enjoyable. If you can't run the game on ultra dont feel left out. It still looks great, and can often times give you an unfair advantage over players online (being able to see through foilage/fog). There's probably a lot I could add to this review, but a lot of the enjoyment comes from mods. There are too many good ones to list. I may sound a little biased because I love this game so much, but if the above that I described sounds remotely like something your interested in then I highly recommend it.
Composition;-;While this game is still one of the best MILSIMS on the market it still suffers from a majority of issues from ARMA 2. In addition to bugs, graphical issues and my all time favorite, the legendary FPS bugs. This game has a lot of cool features that weren't in ARMA 2 like changing clothing, weapon attatchments, better movement and better CQB combat however due to BIS inability to fix the excrutiatingly painful FPS issues you will be lucky to be getting out 30 fps. Now if you think you have the best PC and think im joking go check out the ARMA 3 community disscusions and see for yourself how unplayable the game is. I myself am greatful for at least getting 40 frames however I have to deal with graphics that look worse than ARMA 2 and a 1200 view distance which all ARMA 2 veterans know is complete . Multiplayer is worse for me considering I'm only getting 15 fps because of the crap optimization. If you do happen to get this game make sure you have a powerful CPU because ARMA 3 will only use 40% of any GPU. $60 for a game anyone can hardly run seems pointless in my books. In addition you WILL NEED MODS TO ENJOY THIS GAME. I'm not joking. Thankfully the game can handle a large amount of mods. You will need mods to play with a majority of the units (clans) on Arma 3. I have about 30+ mods on ARMA 3 and it still dosen't add up to the content In ARMA 2
3kliksphilip;-;The most comprehensive military sim out there, setting you loose on a massive island with all of the weapons, vehicles and scenarios you could possibly wish for. The game itself has remained almost unchanged since the original Operation Flashpoint, released over 10 years ago. However, of all the iterations, Arma 3 is the one that has improved things the most. These aren't big changes, but merely small gameplay tweaks that make it feel more polished and smooth. Graphically, it's convincing. It isn't always beautiful but it gets the atmosphere of a real place just right and the large view distances are key to making it feel ALIVE. You can tell that the developers did their homework when researching the island that this game is based on (Yup, it is a real place). If you don't know anything about this game, the best word to sum it up with would be 'realistic'. You are a single soldier in a large, real-time conflict. You can die from a single bullet or stray shell and alone you have limited influence over how the battle will go. Expect to be crawling through muddy fields or cowardly hiding behind cover as bullets whiz overhead. Don't expect to behave like Rambo and to survive. I wouldn't consider this game 'complete' just yet- for months they have been rolling out updates and patches and at the time of writing, the main campaign is only 1/3 released. That being said, it's the community that really supports this game. Mods like Dayz show how flexible and open-ended the game can be. Really, Arma 3 can be seen as offering an island and great multiplayer support, letting the community come up with the best content. Personally, I haven't spent much time in the large-scale multiplayer side of things. I prefer playing missions with a friend and those experiences have been enjoyable and memorable. Expect a single objective to take a while and for it to get rather frustrating as you die through seemingly no fault of your own. I've also spent a lot of time simply exploring the large island. Yup, on my own, with no NPCs or other players. I love the sights and sounds. I love exploring over the next mountain, or lounging about on a beach, soaking up the digital rays. I don't expect other people to find that fun and neither does the game- the fantastic mission editor simply opens up countless opportunities for you and I chose one of the most dull and mundane simply to see how much enjoyment I could extract from it. The community is what makes this product what it is. They're serious but loyal and will likely be playing this game for years to come. You'll make good friends if you behave in a sensible and team-worthy fashion and thanks to the Steam workshop support there are thousands of mods and maps to download to boost the number of scenarios the game has to offer. Buying this game is an investment. The developers and community have pledged their loyalty to build it into a must-have title, though it could take several years to reach that stage. Don't expect gameplay that's easy to jump in to, nor should you expect a fun standalone experience. But this game is no COD. By default it's not a mainstream game, but the possibilities it offers you are almost endless.
Rhaonoa;-;ArmA III ArmA III is like chess. Out of all the table games, ArmA is the most sofisticated and "Fancy" war game there is. I've had over 2,000 hours of Battlefield, and of Call of Duty. Few hours in Insurgency and many other games. But ArmA, I've never heard of ArmA III until one of my friends told me about it, in ArmA, the systems are extremely advanced, the system is so realistic that it gets up to a point in which it turns plain annoying. You break your leg, you can't breath, you fall, you trip, you die, you drown, everything happens in this game. Theres everything that a war game needs to have. This is not even a war game, it's a war simulator which makes it even better. The campaign is hours of fun and entertainment, and if you dare, you can even learn how to code in ArmA and make your own missions, making missions to be rated, for your own fun, to screw around. You can do anything you could imagine in few hours, and those few hours will grant you limitless fun, hours and hours of gameplay. Hours and hours of designing and meeting new people. Hours and hours of COOP, PVP, TDM, AVA, and everything that a war simulator needs. Cars, tanks, planes, boats, submarines, civilian cars, trucks, convoys, war helicopter, transport, ambulances. Huge maps, huge buildings, huge cities, beautiful physics and beautiful enviroments. The map is huge and it would probably take you hours to go across it, both Stratis and Altis. I haven't played this game for a "really" long time, but, with the very few hours I played, I can pretty much say that it's way better than anything else I've ever tried. Bohemia Interactive might not be the best company out there, but still, they made this one beautiful game that no other company have, or ever will, do better. You'll need a team, you'll need to cooperate, and think about what cards to play while being in the front of the battle, you'll need to set up your equipment and gear, and know, know how to use it, and how to react to all possible situations. This game has no boundaries, and I have great expectations for it, I am waiting for it to grow even more, and for it, to be even, more enjoyable. This game, this game is unique. This is the best game I've ever played.
shocktroop3012;-;Sad, What was once a great simulation has turned into a big middle finger to loyal followers. DLCs that should have been released with the original game because let's face it, Even on release, it was still a beta. I have followed Bohemia since operation flashpoint and I loved their games and their attention to realism.....Arma 3 could have been so much but releasing half dlcs instead of the old good hardy dlcs you use to get with Arma 2 and still not fixing glitches, I can no longer support this game. Heck, even all the arma clans that switched to arma 3 is suffering membership loss due to the unplayability of this game on multiplayer and that's where this game really shined at one point. It's a sad day.
GS96|ArthurK73;-;It's a good game
#Larryx7 (Tyrese TJ Tyrone);-;1300 hrs speaks for itself.
Drift_Fosewell;-;I bought the game a day before it went on sale :|
kylania;-;Best milsim out there. Years of gameplay.
Chris(BCS);-;For players who have never played arma and go into this game with no expectations, it's okay. The game works for that. But, for people with expectations for this game, (for example, arma 2 fans) it is completely unacceptable. The game completely dwarfs all previous arma games in many aspects. The graphics and engine are much better. It has a great core, with great potential. But that, sadly, is all it has. The game itself has to have been rushed. On the official release day, it was in the state of an alpha game, and still feels like a beta for most people. The game had an actual alpha and beta on steam, but from the player's point of view, not much changed between alpha and release day except for a few new assets and the main map being released. It never should have left the alpha, and the problem is that bohemia doesn't seem to have admitted to even themselves that their game came out unfinished. From release day, they have been treating it like a final product, with only a few small polishes and fixes needed. This is beyond the exact opposite of how it actually is. On release day, it was laughably broken. It had the most bugs I have ever seen in a game, and felt like a joke. Now, after 1.5 years, many obvious bugs have been ironed out. I can say that the very surface game experience is acceptable. The problem today is that while they fixed some of the basic gameplay issues, about 40% of the features feel unfinished, but that is coming from someone with 1000 hours of experience. As I said, the surface experience is acceptable, but if you REALLY start playing, you will notice inexcusable holes in the experience. Along with all of this, the game is set in 2035, so none of the objects in the game are real, and at best partially resemble real things. The NATO and AAF factions are okay, but the CSAT faction, the only opfor faction available, looks terrible. The CSAT people literally look like aliens, and I get depressed every time I see one of them. What was bohemia thinking? Why would you put space aliens in a military simulator, especially ARMA? Atleast put terrorists, or north koreans, or normal russians, but space aliens? This is very controversial, especially for a military simulator, in particular arma. Currently, the helicopters DLC costs 15$. The game shipped with only a few helicopters, so it was good to hear that they were addressing this. It was sad to hear they were charging 15$ for something that should have been included with the game, but I could live with that. What really set me off is that for 15$ you get only TWO helicopters. Yes, 2 helicopters that you should already have for 15 dollars. With the arma 2 OA expansion, we literally got more assets than arma 3 will probably ever have for 20 dollars. Now we pay 15 dollars for 2 helicopters. Currently, from what I can see, Arma 3 is doomed. They are going to continue charging money for each baby step towards a finished game, and with that, only make a few baby steps, and then run off with the money. The only DLC remaining will be a DLC called marksmen which adds 7 weapons, all of which I've played with, and most of which look like laser guns, almost as bad as the CSAT faction. Bohemia also has a interesting DLC model which makes the DLC more like updates with certain assets you can't play with unless you buy the DLC. This will mean marksmen comes with an upgraded weapon system and 3 vests all of which everyone gets, but ingame the core DLC items are unusable without paying. There may also be an expansion way after the marksmen dlc comes out, but nothing has been confirmed about it. TLDR: Arma 3 is a dissapointment for real arma fans because holes in the general experience, not enough stuff and weird art style not appropriate for military simulators.
lavbo0321;-;When you see that I have 'played' this game for like 800 hours you would think I must love this game, so then why am I not recommending it. Well firstly, this isn't a game... About me: Marine Corps veteran. Have been playing video games since 1989. Love military simulation games. PROS: Beautiful graphics. Check out my screenshots. Sandbox. Value. Moding community. The only real reason I am still playing, and they are doing it for free, and do a better job than the company I paid for this game. CONS: BUGS/GLITCHES/CRASHES NIGHTLY!!! In the editor, never merge sp missions. They will never work. Graphics don't mean much. Look at Minecraft, ROBLOX.... Sandbox don't mean much when the tools you are given to enjoy it don't work, i.e. the 'mission' editor. Having to spend 50 hours of scripting and mission making in order to enjoy an hour of carnage. Sound. Horribly done. Ballistics unreal. Yes I have actually been shot at and shot back and yes this game is NOT realistic!!! Unit command and control blows hard!!! The absolute worst. AI is the worst I have ever seen. They put zero effort into it. Multiplayer is a disaster. Having to learn a computer language to do what Bohemian should be doing. Campaign can't compare to BF, or MoH etc. Why even try to compete with those???? Completely unrealistic and immature approach to war... I honestly think these guys are pacifists So why have I been playing it for over 20 hours a week??? Firstly, there is nothing else out there. BI actually may wake up one day and give us the tools to make this game epic. Or at least create a tool for us guys who HATE scripting!!!! Make it 100% GUI. Look at the F-18 mod. Amazing!!!!!!! Easy to use, smooth and fast. Nothing like the mission editor we are forced to use. Conclusion: This is not a video game. It is a watered down military "TRAINING SIMULATOR" At that training simulator is Virtual Battlefield 2! http://en.wikipedia.org/wiki/VBS2 Yes. We have been falsely advertised to for years. Aside from the graphics, there is has been zero upgrade to the basic mechanics of Operation Flashpoint, AKA Arma, Arma 2, and Arma 3. Why? Well, I can only guess that BI makes most of its money from VB2, not the games. There focus is on the guy who buys the software the military uses and the guy who builds the training blocks, scripting each training evolution for the unique team experience. The guys who use VB2 have not need to script, just the one guy lucky enough to play with VB2 all day. So when you look at why this game is terrible it makes sense. The AI sucks because VB2 isnt designed to be against an AI opponent. The unit training plays against a game master or Zeus if you will. Which leaves guys like me who want to play a GAME left in the dust. Solo missions and campaign suck because VB2 is only used for short training periods not a full mission or campaign. I have been playing military simulator for far longer than I care to think. And this isnt one. It has no brain to even compare to the legendary Sims of the past. M1 Tank Platoon 2, GUNSHIP, Falcon 3.0. The mission editor is not user friendly because there is a guy in some cubicle somewhere in some military unit learning code to script the training missions. Hench why make it easy, when you can charge some government huge amounts of cash to train an administrator. Sounds like Microsoft!!! So, this is why ARMA in all of its buggy existence is not a game. It was never meant to be a game. It was meant to sell to a group of Guiney pigs and use them to help make VB2 better. So enjoy making all of those mods and scripting code, while BI makes a killing off all of your hard free work!!!
SonixApache;-;Military sandbox. Fun. Niche. Terrible game, though. 10 year old engine doesn't do it any good. Would fail immediately if there was any competition.
Wackbatt;-;Positive I've had this game for nearly a year now and I have enjoyed every minute, whether it has been on Altis Life, Zeus Mode, Sandbox or king of the hill. The Possibilities are endless for this game because of the unlimited modding capabilities Bohemia has provided us with, creating missions for your friends and you to enjoy is awesome, although the mission editor is a bit hard to use at first... This game is for people of all gaming backgrounds as it provides intense infantry game play, explosive vehicle game play and the tactical commands (that know one knows how to use). The use of the third and first person views offer an increased FOV and different play style. To add also the HUD and the menus are very easy to navigate and are user friendly. Negative The game by design is full of glitches that can be annoying and frustrating, the vehicles don't handle as well as you would think with your mouse and keyboard (depends what you think) Also if you have a less than good Computer then you may have a hard time running this game above 20 fps. Over All I Strongly recommend getting this game to anyone that has a good PC and enjoys the likes of battlefield and maybe Call of Duty and anyone that has previously owned a AmrA Game Hope this review has been useful and meaningful
{W} PRESS {#} {W};-;Got out of my boat to do a sunken treasure in wasteland, flew 50 feet into the air and got hit by a jet. 10/10 would play again
Jrewt;-;I played Altis Life and a cop arrested me because I said I was black. 10/10 so realistic.
H.Drescher;-;I shot a chicken with a 50 cal sniper rifle and it imploded 10/10
DrVrej (   );-;Cod = Kids Battlefield = Big boiiz ARMA = MEN
Wahburger;-;i want to love it so so much, but the fact remains that i get over 120 FPS on single player and only 25-35 FPS for multiplayer. i know it's not my fault because my computer is a sexy devil. i know some of it depends on the server. that is a fact yes... but another fact would be "unless your running your own server or playing on a server VERY close to your location, you can't achieve 60 Constant or better, FPS. and i just can't deal with that in 2015. im sure alot of others feel the same way as i do and thats why i cannot recommend ARMA:3 to anybody wanting to server hop around. i would say this game is stricly for single player OR playing a private server with a few of your friends whom live close to you. ^ i will clearify that this is only MY case, so if the above doesnt apply to you , don't rage at me instantly, be happy. because you play servers that you connect to very well. and for that im straight up jelious, if i had one wish it would be to have this game, but with as good as frame rates as arma 2 or even dayz standalone. it literally hurts my feelings that this game is such a letdown. thus all said, if you LOVE arma:3 as much as i do, play some COOP with your friends or play singleplayer. you still get amazing FPS if you have a good computer. however i do not think this game is worth $60, perhaps wait for a massive steam sale. this is my reveiw and i most certainly not recommend ARMA:3 without love for singleplayer/small private servers.
Dmitriy;-;Arma III is a good game with a good concept of what it is trying to do. They have started to roll out the campaign, finally after a few months after realese. What helped Arma II was the modding scene and even just the mission files for multiplayer which will further improve the life of this game, as this seems to be the direction that Arma III is going and that for one thing is excellent. This could spur some very interesting gameplay and I am hoping it would catch on with groups such as ShacTac or LSG just like in Arma II. Graphicly the game has improved alot from its predecessor, implimenting modern lighting and just looking far superior which may not matter for most people but it is a nice addition for the game. Now for the downfall. Not everyone has this but many people do. The game has severe problems with performance and not knowing how to utilise CPU and GPU properly. (http://i.imgur.com/pkwvj34h.jpg http://i.imgur.com/RQog0QF.jpg) These two screenshots show the utilisation of the game and it is quite clearly awful. Playing the game at 10-25 FPS is not possible. You are at hinderance when playing with this sort of preformance. The BiS developers seem like they are trying to avoid this problem, moving threads to less noticable places is one of the ways basically just outright trying to get rid of the people complaining. This feels like bad practice for the company acting this way towards their paying customers. When it comes to problems such as this they seem to respond very badly. A similar problem a while ago caused them to reply and they said it is "too hard and we are not willing" (SOURCE:http://steamcommunity.com/app/107410/discussions/0/864961722019263834/ ). Really I do not think they should be developing games if things are going to be to hard for them. They are letting down customers and it is a real big shame because this game is really promising. Finally PROS: Excellent Multi-Roll Military Sim Beautiful Graphics IMO Way Smoother than Arma II ex. shooting,aiming Altis and Stratis being very versitile and can make for interesting gameplay Improved physics with bullets and vehicles The ragdolls! CONS: Severe performance issues and utilisation The sound assets could be better (That is nothing mods cannot sort) Game feels incomplete having only a select few vehicles/weapons The campaign only just being rolled out again feeling incomplete Thanks for reading! **Edit So, I upgraded my PC and have been playing a feck ton of Arma recently. The sad thing is though my FPS never stays above 60fps and I still sometimes even drop below 30fps with such a good PC. It is really, really depressing that this game is so awfully optimised. When I jumping in the editor and Get 60+fps I see what the game could be. They have also now finished the campaign and on the plus side JSRS studios are developing a new version of JSRS. That is going to be a must have mod in Arma III for me. I am still going to leave this unrecommended on the fact that it does not even seem to have changed despite spending alot of money on a new PC and even buying a watercooler for the CPU so I could overclock it, just to find out that I still get bad FPS. I am playing the game yes. I am also enjoying the game but underlying all of that is still disappointment. I guess if you like Arma II and you think your PC would be up to it, go for it. Otherwise don't bother. Again, thanks for reading!
Jigs;-;Much better than the running simulator.
Jexla;-;It's like 30 games in one. The mods and scenarios etc are amazing thanks to a great community!
EmpireHitSquad;-;1.Purchase Arma 3 2.Install Breaking Poind Mod 3.Delete Dayz Standalone from your system. 4.Uninstall ALL Survival Games 5.Play Breaking Point
Oooo Ukropy Privyet;-;This game had a whole lot of potential based on the early screenshots, but then Bohemia squandered it when they completely changed everything about it. You can find screenshots jam packed with weapons, attachments, camos, characters, and factions that just do not exist in the game solely because Bohemia wanted to go another course halfway through development. That might have been an accpetable option, except Bohemia didn't fully commit. Because of this, a lot of the game is just copy-pasted nonsesne. Almost all vehicles use the same HMGs, GMGs, and auto-cannons with the only difference being the hull of the vehicle. All static weapons such as the mortar, GPMG, and anti-tank/anti-air missile launcher are the same in different camos for the different factions. There's maybe a total of 15 unique weapons in the game, all of which are divided into classes and inside these classes there is no variety. An example of this is the MX and Katiba. These each have their respective variants in the CQB, regular, grenadier, and DMR roles, but each one of them is the exact same. They have the same ballistics, same damage, same recoil, same magazine capacity (even though the MX has a much longer, thicker mag than the Katiba,) and hell, even the same round! Take a look back at ArmA II, you'll notice that each faction has their own ups and downs as far as weapons and vehicles go, but in ArmA III everything feels the exact same and in MANY cases it IS the exact same. They couldn't add a different auto-cannon for each faction, but they sure could add six different fedoras and civilian outfits for you to wear! Another moronic decision on the part of the devs was to place the game in the future WITHOUT actually adding any futuristic content. Any and all futuristic content was scrapped early on in the development process and then they started adding things that "look futuristic." The Merkava replaces the M1A2 Abrams tank in the least sensible move since Jimmy Carter running for a second term, the Bradley is replaced by the Namer, another Israeli tank, and come to think of it, this entire game is a showcase for Israel. This doesn't make any sense at all in the current iteration of the game where it's spread out amongst all factions, but it made a lot of sense in the original story when Israel was annexed by CSAT and CSAT started using Israeli made weapons and vehicles to supplement their Soviet-made equipment from yester-year. This is a great example why they should've committed to the original story rather than stray away from the original path and create this jumbled mess of a game. When you get down to the core of it all, all that matters is the gameplay. Unfortunately, that is horrendous, too. The game feels like they watched Rambo on repeat for six weeks straight because instead of combat being fast paced and short lived like it was in in ArmA II, combat is now based on who is a bigger bullet sponge. Players can routinely take six or seven shots before dying, even two shots to the head sometimes does not kill! Full auto is now glorified and not using it is almost a sin because if you don't you're going to be the one in a body-bag. Seriously, they took a simulator game and turned it into Call of Duty. The encumberance system is another horrible mess. Seriously, your character is not fit for military shape because he can't sprint for more than 20 seconds in full combat load without needing a five minute break, and good luck hitting anything once the enemy has fired a shot in the opposite direction, because your guy is apparently in his first firefight and is already reaching for his entrenching tool to dig all the way to China and is shaking harder than Michael J. Fox with a cold. Another noticable feature of this game is how poorly optimized it is. Seriously, even with a good gaming rig your online experience will be riddled with framerate drops and, at times, outright freeze-framing. All in all, I would not recommend this game to anyone who is a fan of the ArmA series, because what you will find is far and away from the usual experience.
Whiterabbit-uk;-;ArmA 3 was highly anticipated by me when it was first announced and I pounced on the beta as soon as it was released. Now that its on general release I'm totally wrapped by it. I've already played around 250 hours and just can't get enough of it. There's 114 pages of custom made missions available for free via Steam and the Armaholic web site,( singleplayer, coop and multiplayer missions): http://www.armaholic.com/ Most that I've played have been excellent. The in game editor enables you to create missions fairly easily with little experience. The whole package is well worth full price. There's more big updates coming soon adding to the campaign mode.. The only downside I've found is the lack of an armoury. All previous ArmA games have included an armoury, where you are able to try out all weapons and vehicles, plus play as any character in game (including animals) The game has amazing graphics, an open world stretching for many kilometers in all directions and smooth gameplay; all of which make ArmA a pleasure to play. IMO far better than any other shooter around (incluing Battlefield 4,Call of Duty & Op Flashpoint) . (Love Battlefied and the Op Flashpoint games as well) edit - April 13th 2015: The game has come a long way since I wrote my review, though due to a massive back log of unplayed games that I own, I've not had much opportunity to play the game recently. That said, the developers have added a lot more to the game since last played it, such as the single player campaign, plus of course there are many more missions and modifications added since I mentioned it previously; in fact far more than i'll ever be able to get through.
Fiery;-;This game may have amazing gameplay however, Bohemia Interactive thinks it's okay to release a game with system requirements that don't even run the game at above 30 fps in a multiplayer environment. I have an I7 and a gtx 970 and this game still wants to run at around 15 - 60 fps in a multiplayer match with above 30 players. WOULD NOT RECOMMEND IT IF YOUR PC CAN NOT HANDLE IT. EDIT: To clarify I'd like to mention custom gamemodes, which are the biggest factor for the low fps I am experiencing. Gamemodes like Altis Life, Stratis Life, King of The Hill where a lot of players are doing a lot of things will contribute to your client side fps. However, It doesn't matter if you are alone on one side of the map and 60 other players are at the other side, the way the engine handles players is the reason why the lag occurs. The way multiplayer works in this game is if players are doing things like walking, talking in local chat, shooting a gun, or whatever they're doing the server has to keep on processing their behavior in almost real time; for whatever reason certain gamemodes with a certain amount of players creates HORRIBLE lag issues on the server which then affects the user's pc to an extreme extent. So no this might not happen in standard Arma 3, but that still doesn't fix the issues this game has in multiplayer with optimization.
Microsoft PowerPoint;-;This game is like Gravy flavoured Ice Cream, some like it, others love it. If you hate it, go and force feed it to yourself until you're in one of those categories. But seriously, go and try some Gravy flavoured Ice Cream.
Riggs;-;I put Yes because there is no alternative to the series. Been playnig since June 2001 - Operation Flashpoint. And I like the devs keep it this way. But have to admit - AI is still very very raw. So single player missions not playable but MP is more than awesome!
JulmisX;-;Its like skyrim with cops 10/ign
Arctes;-;Played many different FPS over the years. This is by far the best one. Keep in mind if you are used to Battlefield or other FPS this may take a little time to get used to and get the hang of but be patient its well worth it. I bought Arma 3 for the helicopters and ended up liking the FPS aspect just as much as the flying. Also Be sure to try all the differnt game types before you stick to one thing. I played Sector Control for months before trying something else like Sandbox or wasteland servers which i enjoyed even more so.
MichuDoee;-;Arma III Altis First Experiance. -Joined a session. -Figured out how to spawn in. -Spawned in. -Walked around for aproximatly 17 seconds. -Car came. -Car went. -Walked around for a further 12 seconds. -Another car came! -Three guys stepped out. -Fully geared. -I was their . -I got into the car. -Cried. -Cried a little more. -Thought about my life a little bit. -Pressed space bar twice. -Died. GG M8 I R8 8/8
bewaretheclaw;-;Ok...so i buy the game for $60 and the game was trash when i got it,so many bugs and glitches it was hardly playable,now after so many updates you can still barley tell anything has improved. But instead of fixing all the bugs you guys are trying to throw DLC'S out there like the game is ready for everyone to play!!! What is wrong with your company?!?! And the you make the dlc content available to select on the editor but when you try to get in it,it ask's you to pay for the dlc?! What kind of scam is this?!!? Instead of taking people's money for the dlc,fix the damn game first!! Its not finished!!! I am very disapointed in you guys!
Necrosplatter [ITA];-;I'm a huge fan of the series (since the good old operation flashpoint), but now i'm hugely disappointed by what public multiplayer has already become! Arma was a Military Simulator aimed for those who like the genre, 90% of public servers today are RPG. For me Altis Life is the plague of ArmA... There needs to be a forced filter to remove them from the server browser. To get that real 'Arma' experiance nowadays you need to play with friends or join a group/clan... No way to get the real Arma experience on public servers. (Sorry for my poor English)
Nomad;-;It's difficult to compare Arma to another game since it's so unique. The gameplay is not your typical shooter as it incorporates strategic elements and doesn't play like a traditional FPS. Console gamers will have no issues with this game's controls even as their first shooter on a PC. Arma has a slight learning curve, it may be a little confusing at first until you learn how things work and learn to take cover. Arma has a lot of little details to gameplay that you can improve upon to give yourself and edge such as the stance adjustment controls. But they aren't vital for successful gameplay. Arma is only as complex as you want it to be. Even though it is a simulation game, it feels much more natural to play than other simulations. Singleplayer - The story is actually pretty good, some of the scenarios definitely have a challenging OP:Flashpoint feel to it which I'm a fan of. It's divided into 3 episodes with their own chapters, each episode giving a new perspective to the conflict and upping the scales of battle. There's also a Bootcamp mini-campaign which will help new players a lot. Multiplayer and Community - Arma is a great game to play alone, it's even better together. There's lots of public servers with a variety of gamemodes that you can just jump into. Lots of awesome custom scenarios too such as the Co-Op scenario Invade and Annex, as well as the PvP scenarios such as KoTH and Wasteland. But the best experience is playing with an organized group. There are casual co-op groups, PvP clans as well as hardcore roleplaying "milsim units". You can feel around for what's right for you. Editor - Arma has always had a very powerful Mission Editor tool and has open support for custom scripts. This alone is all we needed to make missions. Then BI gave us Zeus - an in-game editor, look up some videos - this alone will entertain you for hours by yourself. Now BI has also promised a 3D Mission Editor to cover even finer details. Mods - The game is advertised as a military simulator and it does a great job of that just as-is. But really it's whatever you want it to be and you can deepen the simulation aspects with user content. The community is actively pumping out amazing mods for this game and BI has always been highly supportive of community content (even to the point of cash giveaways from the Make Arma Not War competition). If you can think of something cool to add to Arma, it's probably already got a download link. Criticism - Although the game engine gets some flak for being "unoptimized" (BI has been improving on the game's performance significantly) when you think about it, how many game engines have this kind of attention to detail in such a wide scope of gameplay? You can be infantry (even fight underwater with certain assault rifles), skydive/HALO jump, pilot a transport chopper, fly a jet, drive a tank, use artillery, anything. Not to mention the detail of the environment even to the starmap. What other game can you think of tracks the temperature the ground depending on time of day and when last it rained therefore affecting your thermal optics? Yea, thought so. DLC - Arma 3's DLC is optional, and you can just get modded content which are not affected. Even if you don't buy the DLCs you'll get the improvements to the game and still be able to play with anyone who has/doesn't have DLC. Just wanted to clear up the myths of Arma 3's DLC. I've been playing since the Alpha/Beta with 1,000+ online hrs and I'm still not bored. Arma 3 and Arma overall as a series has come a long way and has improved tremendously and BI listens and improves from community feedback. Arma games have a long lifespan and there are a lot of people just buying it now. It's been almost 2 years since the Alpha was released, and expect Arma 3 to be active for at least another 3-5 years, probably more. Think about it, why buy a bunch of other games when Arma can be all of them for one price? Definitely the most well-spent money I've ever spent on a game for the enjoyment I've gotten so far and will continue to have. No doubt about it. I'm glad I could support such an awesome studio, keep up the great work BI.
Rikugun;-;Here's a story just to tell you what kind of game this is. Lemme start by telling you this game is definitely more of a template than it is a full game solely based on its modding capability alone. So I have a Vietnam Mod for this game, adds new maps, units, weapons, etc. Our platoon lands in the jungles at LZ Fiona, a clearing in the jungle in the hills. We spread out and head into the jungles. A shot rings out and the LT. takes one in the chest. V.C. Ambush. I hit the ground and ready my M16A1 I have no clue where the rounds are coming from but they're coming. As I'm lying in the brush three figures run by, but they don't look friendly. Startled I swerve quickly back into their direction and let loose a full auto barrage from my 20 round magazine, I see blood flying out of the figures and then they drop. I got three of them. I look back ahead of me and start letting out one-round bursts trying to suppress the enemies on the opposite hillside. Ammo's getting low and the bullets keep coming. I climb through the muck and grunge of the jungle floor to a nearby friendly, he's hit but no time to mourn now. I pilfer through his gear and find what I needed, sweet sweet ammo, ~30 bullets left. I reload, and the hell begins anew.
andrew #ayylmao;-;Epic! This game is just AMAZING! Played while it was free in weekend, and i stiil want more! Can't wait until next sale! Ended whole first act, I thought this game will be like second part "Arma 2" so i wasn't expecting much changes, except graphics. What I've got was Epic, military missions in a native of Battlefield, epically made system of walking, crouching, sneaking, peaking, even AIMING was great. While I was walking down the valley with my gun directed towards the village, I felt like a real soldier on a field. Even when my soldier was exhausted and he was breathing so hard and my gun was moving like a freak I've had so much fun, in previous part of game it was made so badly, gun was jumping from pixel to pixel, now it's smooth and lovely. In those few years Bohemia made a freaking epic battlefield simulator, you can customise your character, add loadout, customize guns, change helmets, backpacks, even shades! It wasn't in prevous part, and it's great experience, you finally have full control over your character. But it's not game for everyone, it's a simulator, so it's hard to get controls at the first time playing. + You can do briefing in many many hours, and fight overall will be like 5 minutes or shorter. Altough, it's fantastic game, and surely it will be on my desk. Bohemia Interactive knows how to make comeback, I hope that we'll see more epic, more fantastic game (Arma 4 of course). I also hope it will be on summer sale! + Real sandbox + Perfect physics + Fights with high momentum + Many gamemodes in multiplayer + Epic singleplayer (and multiplayer scenarios) - Not for everyone - Hard for beginners - Doesn't forgive mistakes 9+/10
Nikout;-;Made an enemy outpost as Zeus when my friends were riding along the road. They did not suspect a thing. God bless America.
Dana;-;Great military simulation. Definitely proves me that I don't belong in the military because of my poor eyesight and bad map reading. 9/10
luv^;-;waited ~30 minutes for a battleroyale server to open, plane crashed before we could even jump out. 11/10 would wait again
Fragdog;-;If you like taking screenshots, this is the game for you!
Ballbag;-;The sheer number of Mods and missions available for this game is unbelievable. Great fun on the techie side too can be had hosting a server from GamingDeluxe
pax;-;A really nice game. If you want to play a realistic tactic shooter, Arma 3 is the way to go. Do missions or just have fun in some modes. I would recommend to play this game with at least one friend !
blAkeMusic * LOGITECH;-;Great game. I use the editor for DayZ cinematics. Actually I don't really know how the game is. If I ever play it, I play Altis Life. But I know a  load about the editor. 9/10
Yamzee;-;shot my friend in the  after saluting and singing the american anthem in a drunken manner god bless murica
Strelok;-;Watching friends fly helicopters for the first time. 10/10.
Editionblack;-;I don't even own this game but i can review it 10/10 EDIT: Now i do own the game, and i would say it is a fun and realistic shooter, with a great modding community Still 10/10
Jimmy!;-;Where do i start. This game in all its glory has touched my heart . Ill be honest it's not smooth not for the faint of heart. The animations are smoother then ArmA 2. This game has so many opurtunities. The modding is a bit tricky but once you get the hang of it. THE GAME IS AMAZING.
Illadelph042;-;Just don't buy this game, horrible ui, horrible optimization, lack of post processing, commanding troops is a huge pain they dont think for themselves you have to micro manage everything if you can even get them to follow your commands at all. Once they are under attack they refuse to move quickly, usually the down fall of my squad. They get shot at then just lay down and i scream at them to get for cover and they will go, just reaaaaally slowly making there way there, standing up then laying down again. Its riddle with bugs. Please don't support bohemia, they dont even care to fix there . They have been using the same engine for a decade, literally, Even with a beast of a computer arma will not utilize i properly ending. Good luck getting on a servre cause they are way laggier then just single player. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vDMdzwanxnY Just please, don't buy this game. Just don't.
the fault in our ebola (xicro);-;Smashed into a sign with a military truck, broke everything 11/10 Would eat nachos with.
Sgt. Master Bates;-;Im an ARMA fan, but ARMA 3 is one of the best looking games i've played. The size of the maps and the variety of what you can do is amazing. Recomended the game is just f*!@#$% awesome!!!
TheSneak;-;If you are an Arma fan, this game will change all that. When you spen 60$ and your computer can't run it, It will be because your computer is crappy. When you are disappointed in the complete lack of content compared to other Arma games, you will be called spoiled. When there is nothing to do offline, no point or story it's because it's still in the works even though it's a full release. When you can't eek out better than 10FPS no matter what your specs, it's because you didn't tweak enough. When you can't find a server to play on it's because you don't know the right clan. When you do get on a server and it lags, greifs and glitches, it's because you play on crappy servers. When you don't think it's realistic, it's not a sim. When you cant have any shoot'em up fun like BF it's because it is a sim. When all your other games run like a champ and are fun but not Arma3, it's not fair to compare. When you voice any of the above views here or the BI Forums you are a liar. http://forums.bistudio.com/showthread.php?163875-I-am-a-player-of-BI-games-from-OFP-CWC-Heres-what-I-think
Yukari;-;Welcome to the future, where 30 years from now current weapons and equipment such as the MATV,Fennik,IWI Tavor and Negev,Cheytac .408,M14 EBR,Merkava battle tank and littlebird will still be in use with different names and no real world upcoming technologies such as power armor,airburst launchers, VTOL aircraft, and infantry HUD will have any presence on the battlefield what so ever. Also weapons cancelled years ago such as the Commanche helicopter will be readopted generations later and renamed to avoid copyright issues. Enjoy a convulted control set up where in the heat of battle you will enter the steam control panel,trying to set a machinegun to auto fire will reset to semi when entering a truck or changing weapons or enjoy running over a chicken wire fence with a multi-ton truck will disable it to a halt. Also enjoy advertisements in game to buy over priced DLC if you move near some of the helicopters that cost 16 USD when the devs got drunk and thought they were devs programing pay content for World of Tanks or Warthunder. Don't buy unless you want to play the userbase made game modes suxh as Wasteland,King of the Hill, or Breaking point, the only thing worth playing with this software.
BornToHula;-;Arma is a series that has always had my intense fascination. I cut my teeth on the early Tom Clancy games, Rainbow 6 and Ghost Recon, so I was no stranger to the concept of a hard infantry sim. I've followed Arma since its inception as Operation Flashpoint, and I have grown to love the series like no other. There are portions of Arma 3 that are more boring than watching grass grow, as you sit in vehicles or tromp around on foot for endless minutes. The real meat of the game though, lies in what can turn into thirty seconds to five minutes of pure chaos. Firefights don't have the corridor of meat puppets that games like CoD or other mainstream shooters have to offer. There are no meticulously rendered setpieces. Instead, everything outside of radio chatter might as well be freeform. You draw attention from a chopper while infiltrating a base, they radio out to a mechanized squad that sends an infantry fighting vehicle armed with a 40mm machinegun. The ground churns around you and your own team as fire and shrapnel turn a stealth mission into a desperate fight for survival. These are things that happen in this utterly unforgiving, but satisfying game. This isn't a series for the squeamish, and this surely isn't a series where you expect instant health regeneration while you duck down out of the way from canned enemy fire. You will learn to fear the sound of a faint crack in the distance or the recognizable drone of a gunship approaching. Enemy man, 100m, bearing 045 Ready to fire
WinterborneTE;-;Arma 3 is a lot of fun. I say this as someone who enjoys the following elements in games that I devote a lot of time to: Extensive, detailed cooperative play, and realism/immersion. If you're going to Arma looking to play the next Counterstrike or whatever, you're going to walk away disappointed. Arma is more of a simulator than a casual shooter, and yes, there is Wasteland which is basically a worldwide deathmatch sandbox, and Arma 2 had DayZ (Which let's face it, is also a boring deathmatch sandbox with the inclusion of zombies), but to get the most out of an Arma game, you need to approach it for its strengths - the simulation aspect. You can play solo as a member of a squad (Depending on the mission - finding good missions can be a little tricky), or command AI using some non-traditional, but with some practice, easy to understand commands and play it like more of a strategy game. In multiplayer, COOP is king in my opinion, but you can have large scale team-vs-team PVP which is a lot of fun as well. I admin a server that runs a large-scale coop mission 24/7 and it never fails to impress and challenge because the AI is smart enough in Arma games to allow for emergent gameplay - they'll flank, they'll fall back, they'll improvise, and it's different every time and you have to think. The engine takes some getting used to compared to the average shooter, but Arma 3 specifically is far less buggy than other Bohemia games have been. Being different isn't a reason in and of itself to dismiss it though. If you're used to other games or approach it like a shooter, you might be annoyed with it, but if you give it time and learn it (and I can't stress enough how important it is to play a good mission in a coop setting to get the most out of it), it's hard to put down. Some of the best gaming experiences I've had have been a product of this game engine in coop with dozens of other people, and you owe it to yourself to give it a shot. Treat it like a strategy game or simulation that has shooting involved, not like a CounterStrike-Of-Dutyfield alike. Also steam sale so why the hell not?
cam;-;Take Arma 2, fix the bugs, give it some of the best graphics in gaming, and you get Arma 3, once more modders get stuck into this game it will be a must have for sure.
Frak;-;Cannot and will not stop playing. Logged over 850 hours and still going strong. The game never had a lot going on for a while but with all the fine tweeking Bohemia have done and are still doing which in turn is allowing some really fantastic mods to either port over form Arma 2 or Ones that are completely new come onto the scene. With all the current DLC and the Marksman DLC on its way plus the winners of Make Arma Not War announced there has never been a better time to get on and get stuck in. Whether its life you're into, base building on Wasteland/Epoch or just blowing and shooting the hell out of stuff on King Of The Hill, If zombies is your thing try Breaking Point (These being the most popular) , If you cannot find something you like then you are doing it wrong. But i will not sugar coat it too much but it can be a steep learning curve for those new to the game and yes there are performance issues for some and it can be a challenge for some rigs but the game is still good at 30fps or dare i say it even 25(from personal experience). There are many forums with tips, tweeks and setups that can help you get the most from your Arma experience. It may take a little bit of time but it is worth it.
Robert;-;I remember playing this game after getting a taste of Arma 2 and i was so disappointed. I joined a Invade and anex server and got killed over and over by the super op aim hack AI. I was just about to rage quit, when one of the server group members asked me if i wanted to join their squad to play with them. They told me what to do and after an hour i got the sweet taste of Arma team play. I joined the group after a while and started playing user made missions with mods and holy . It has been the best year of gaming i have ever had. If you like millitary tactics and teamplay, Arma is right up your alley. It is not like any of the big fps's out there, you don't feel like a action movie super soldier. You feel just as vulnerable as the other guy on the receiving end of your barrel. If you are ever going to play this for the milsim part of the game, get yourself a group to play with. Nr. one advice. I watch this every time I wonder why i play arma and I just want more: http://youtu.be/y8oPEskvSAo
Varanon;-;This is a game with unlimited opportunities, and the only limit is your imagination. It's a one-of-its-kind game that has no equal. If you are able to forgive it's flaws (which do become less with each patch, and there has been a lot of development going on), you will get a game that will keep you hooked for years.
MuscularYoda;-;Thank you Bohemia Interactive for confirming my beliefs that you have lost it. I am not paying $15 for helicopters. Get ed.
Drakeziel;-;Arma 3 is everything that I have ever wanted within a simulation shooter. I purchased it in Alpha and I was completely unaware of the amount of gameplay possibilites! You can go all out and re-create a real life scenario with the simplified editor layout, you could role-play on one of many open world servers, or you could just jump on a CO-OP server and use teamwork to destroy your enemy.. I had never played an Arma game until now and I have no regrets whatsoever for purchasing Arma 3 in Alpha and watching the game progress as it has. You would be a fool to not buy this game during any type of sale!!! The reason I really love this game is because it incorporates three of my favorite games from "years ago". Those games being "Choplifter", Arma 3 has an AMAZING 3D Version with so many more options and settings and you can carry actual players and fuel/damage/ammo...ah, so good. The first game I played, some guy was screaming at me to get in the chopper, and as we arrived to the LZ I heard the pilot say, "Good Luck guys", and I was completely blown away!! I thought that it was an AI pilot! The second, "Black Hawk Down" for pc from like 99', the PVP is so much similar but way better. Last but not least, "Battlezone2", that was my favorite game of all time as a kid with custom base building and defending your base. I recommend finding a community as soon as you get into Arma 3, you will instantly become immersed into the game with a full community of people from all around the world. Arma 3 is a great action packed shooter with lot of simulation aspects, a ton of different gamplay styles and gametypes, and a great place to make friends that will take you to a new level in the Steam community. More friends more fun..... WIN WIN! And the Mods! End of Story..... See you in the battle soldiers! Be sure to get it before 2015 rolls around, "Make Arma Not War" is going to add so much and I have high hopes for the future of Arma 3.
VPPGamingNetwork.com#SICK;-;I like it, wish it was more popular
Le Toucan;-;Install Mods Incinerate Bosnia Remove Kebab Praise Vojislav eelj Get put on the NSA Watchlist. best game of my life
* eQuiitox aka BELLiiZ;-;Buy this game and download Breaking point mod. So fu*king epic!! Just love it!
Stevie;-;Undoubtedly a vast improvement from Arma 2 in terms of the new engine, animations and such. It's just a shame this game is set in the near future which isn't exactly my cup of tea, but nevertheless the game is constantly getting frequent updates and is a solid Military Sim that I would highly recommend.
Erotic Bunny;-;Game cost much, but that hard and interesting game. Good for you if you got nice pc, here better play with hight or ultra graphic. Problems: I have play mission, got auto save..then exit from game..come to game next day and game said: your save was fail lalala or don't save don't working with new game version.. (Some time game have much updates) And next: new dlc for 13 eur with two helicopters :D It's funny :D
:RN: RazerHyper;-;This is a review
Krumpetzki;-;There's bugs and glitches everywhere. You will fall through stairs and break your legs, you will crash your car into invisible walls and kill your squad, you will get instantly killed by NPC's from a mile away. You will try to give ammo to your teammate but loose all your items. You will get a monster new PC with the best hardware, but still only get 20 FPS. You will rage and loose all your nerves. But you will love it. Because arma will offer you experiences unlike any other game. You will siege an occupied village in an intense firefight. You will cower behind a tiny rock when your artillery drops bombs too close to your position. You will fight with your fireteam in a deep forest. Your patrol will get ambushed and you will use an old low stone wall for life-saving cover while waiting for reinforcements, hearing bullets crack above your head. And the next day you will fly over that low stone wall in a helicopter and it will be just a tiny speck on the giant arma world, just another memory of a seemingly insignificantly small place. And you will get hooked on it. You will join a team and spend countless nights awake playing with them. You will get mods and tweak. You will learn to code, and you will love every moment of it. Arma... Owning this game is like owning a 2 year old child, its really annoying for a lot of the time but if someone tried to take it away from you youd kill them.
Sammy;-;Very interesting game, but performance doesn't match the price.
Quinten [BE];-;Best game ever, thx BI Studios! King of the hill is epic!
Offline;-;Probably one of the best games I have ever played. It is community-driven and has a LOT of content and a LOT of content-creator tools if you like that like I do. Workshop integration is amazing and besides the amazing mod "DayZ Breaking Point which is BIG step up from the Arma 2 mod, trust me it is the best thing since glazed donuts, get it if you like shooters, get it if you like games!
kickkill;-;*looks at hours played* need i say more?
Dirk Dickbutt;-;Got 15 FPS to listen to two people scream at new players while we made a tactical blob of human bodies and drowned the enemy in our own corpses. 10/10 best Napoleanic war simulator.
Cuddles;-;I've had this game since the first day of Alpha, and I can confidentally say that nothing comes close to Arma 3 in potential except maybe Arma 2 and minecraft. It's a fantastic sandbox military simulator where you can do anything you could imagine, no matter how dumb. It's a game where content is developed by the community, for the community. There are no set game modes or official servers, there aren' even any official game modes you can even download on their website. It's a completely player created game. Feel like invading either the islands of Altis and Stratis one minute and then role-playing as a drug dealer the next? Sure, why not. It's completely possible in Arma 3. Pros:  Almost limitless potential.  Close to an unlimited number of gamemodes created by the community.  Hundreds of community made campaigns and mods both avaliable on the workshop and on Armaholic (the go-to place for Arma mods).  Massive maps with none of those dumb loading screens every other game with maps on these scales seem to have. (Stratis is ~15-20km2, Altis is 270km2).  Large maps load very well and are very stable.  The ability to have infantry, armor, naval, and air battles at the exact same time on a much larger scale than you could imagine in another game such as Battlefield.  A wide variety of weapons, vehicles, and clothing. Cons:  Vehicles tend to explode a bit easier than they should.  Possibility of desync occuring on servers if they are overloaded.  Hit markers and boxes can be a bit buggy and glitchy.  Possibility of some pretty big lag. (Adding too many items/vehicles/AI/players to the game's already massive maps). As you can see, the pros easily outweight the cons. This game is fantastic. Even if you don't want to pay the full price for it, it goes on sale often enough and I promise, you won't regret it. 9/10.
Munchkin;-;Bullets actually hurt you. 10/10
Ed Wuncler;-;This game made me ejaculate so violently and explosively that I blacked out, waking up two weeks later with my house being robbed and my body being stripped down completely bare. The only thing the robbers didn't take was my computer, so I dragged my crusty, naked body over to my desk and started playing Arma 3 again. 11/10
Bill Cosby;-;Got killed in the Bootcamp prolouge. 11/10 Game of the Year.
MassiveAssMan;-;Much better than Call of Duty and Battlefield. This game does a very great job in immersing you into the environment. Your team A.I. can get killed leaving you the only one left in the squad. The bullets snap and whiz around you. There are many choices of vehicles to choose from all with different roles and abilities. Kinda wish there were more guns that's just my opinion but the fewer choices bring simplicity in the game. The underwater subs and scuba suits are also very awesome, totally wished they had sharks that would bring some thrills. Also the graphics over all are sexy all over, pleasing your eyes with ic glee.
Fat Pussy;-;Successfully vaulted my way up a big rock. Shortly after I slid down the rock and fell to my death. 10/10 realistic rock physics.
FozzyBear/Balanque;-;This is one of the best games i ever bought. -You have various mode to participate in: ~Altis Life/Stratis Life ( Roleplaying be a civilian and turn into a rebel, fight off the cops etc. ) ~Breaking Point ( Zombie Surival with an insane amount of custom features! ) ~Wasteland ( Having some fun to release your anger with your OP tank/gun(s) ~Battle Royale ( Hungergames lookalike ) The game has a lot of bugs so be carefull if you want to do something fancy because it might get you angry because the game is being glitchy again. The graphics are nice. Arma 3 crashes sometimes i have no clue what the issue is with that but nevertheless the game is a +1 and you should definitely buy it no matter what holds you back! 8 / 10 Due Bugs/Glitches.
Crik;-;Gonna start off by saying the game itself is great. The series is moving in the right direction. Or so i thought. Developers, not just BIS, are only out for money these days. I started to love ARMA 3 then i see the ridiculous dlc attached to this game. Who in the  thought it would be a good idea to create a couple of helicopters and some sniper rifles and ing pawn them off to the community. Are we gonna get to a point where games companies create a shell of a game and ing sell the sky as dlc? or each individual vehicle THAT SHOULD HAVE BEEN IN THE GAME FROM THE START!!! Are we already there?
Justabit_Ginger;-;Played free weekend, Good game . if you are after a easy play war game then this isn't it. Played Arma 2 and this is a huge improvement! A very simulation based war game , you can even learn a thing or too ! I enjoyed the game and I do recommend ! 9/10 Would shoot a Rabbit again .
M.N.I.S;-;This game is buy far the best game i have played in awhile it is so much fun and has so many different options that have been so much fun toplay
merlanthous;-;Amazing Game, you all need to pick this up if you like realistic combat. Harsh for any new player to master but when you get the the feel of the game and master the controls it's great fun!
Vomit Chef;-;This game is horribly unoptimized for AMD processors. Get ready for your $2000 PC to be able to run this at 25 fps! Unless they optimize this game, it is not worth it for all those with AMD build. Untill then, it's a no for me.
Fin Soldier;-;ArmA III, the fourth game in the ArmA series, if we include the original Operation Flashpoint as well. Many mainstream 'FPS gamers' complain about ArmA's style, because it's unique? That's exactly why I love this game. You really have to find patience and a learning curve to this game. But once you have control over the game, you'll find tons of enjoyable content. You'll find yourself playing around with the editor, campaign with great storyline, 2 beautiful islands to explore, customizable gear, multiplayer fun as well as serious gameplay. What else do you want? Yeah it might have some bugs and lag. But, if you look back at ArmA 2, not many complained about it though ArmA 3 is highly improved from the previous title. ArmA is a huge game that you will be playing for years to come. You'll always find ways to emerge into ArmA's gameplay. It's ultimately up to you to be creative. Because of Bohemia Interactive's hard work on unique warfare gameplay, and immersive experience, I'd give it 9/10 :)
Schorcher;-;Any arma 2 player will enjoy the engine updates but as of now it is lacking content compared to arma 2 but it is slowly getting there. Great mods and great updates.
Mr_Adams;-;Horrible. Constant crashing, game breaking bugs, years of promise and nothing yet again on a SIXTY DOLLAR, FULL RELEASE GAME?? Pathetic. With the money they are making from Arma 2 still, AND DayZ, there's NO excuse. I'll be sure to never purchase another game from them without proper patches years later. I'm tired of the game crashing every time I join a multiplayer match. I'm tired of the game automatically deleting battle royale. I'm tired of the game constantly changing around the UI and forcing us to a new one.  you, bohemia.
[~~]SuperChicken;-;This game is awsome. Luv the graphics and with the right team work game is fun.
BIG PAPI;-;This game offers a lot. And I mean A LOT. You can download endless missions made from the community workshop and play with strategy with your friends or run around half naked and dance around. Or you could roleplay and buy an ATM from all the drug money you earned in Altis Life. Or have races with friends in Karts. This game is an Army Simulator, but it's great for modding which let's you do more things. Now, this game isn't something like COD or Battlefield, it takes strategy and tactics and patience. If you come from these games it will be harder to get into fast. Although if you play through the campaign it will help you get used to the game. Please don't think the warfare in this game is just pew pew pew, die, respawn, repeat. It takes skill. Altis is a very big map, you can drive around for what seems like forever in this beautiful map. There is forestry, a lot of ocean, desert, grassland, etc. There is also Stratis, a smaller, more wastelandish and deserty than Altis. You need a good PC to run this game. I usually get around 45 fps on online servers, around 60 on single player or games with small amounts of people in it. Overall, this game has a ton of things to do and you can't get bored of it. I give it a 9.5/10
Sweet- Tea;-;Children play CoD, boys play Battlefield, Men play ARMA.
Shrub;-;listen me plese i dont like evry game about war like cod or battelfeld or counter strike BUT I LIKE TIS GAME VARY ALOT vary realsim game vary nice map SUPER SIZE XXXXTRA LARGE AREA FOR DO A WAR i like also dayz but this is mor serios game for persons to do a simulate of real war
No1dArEs;-;Very good game won't regret buying it. So many good mods, currently most time played on this game out of all my steam games.
crisb the csathdfw;-;BESTEST GAME EVER SINCE BATTLEFIELD2! yes, I said it =) If you played BF2 and you loved it, but hated all its successors... Arma3 is the deal. This game is what should`ve followed BF2, it`s pure, awesome, tough and unforgiving warfare. It`s NOT made for easy (or rather noobish) play, you can`t run for a mile and expect to be able to shoot straight the instance you stop running; you can`t either fly your AttackHelicopter slamming into trees and buildings along the way and expect to be alive... ArmA does not do that, you die, you get hurt, in any case, you do stupid stuff... you will pay for it. It`s a Mil-Sim, not an Arcade-Shooter like all the other "tripleA" titles out there: you want a challenge? - get ArmA3! you want realistic movement? - get ArmA3! you want realistic weaponshandling? - get ArmA3! you want honest (!) and hard working developers? - get ArmA3! you want a game with HUNDREDS (or more) mods to chose from as you like? - get ArmA3! you want your own skill to be the baseline on how your play has influence on the battle/game? - get ArmA3! By all the good stuff mentioned, it`s only fair to tell about bad/unfortunate things Arma3 offers: This game needs a good CPU, not an ok one, a good CPU... and a fair amount of tweaking to get it run somewhat smoothly. And for MultiPlayer: Client`s performance is dependant on Server`s performance, you can have a beast computer, but if the server you play on sucks, your fps will suck aswell. You`ll have to learn this game before you can be really good at it... and then when you`re good, Arma3 is deeply satisfying. Just for personal comparison: I now have more hours of Arma3 playtime (1500h+), than ALL hours of ALL Battlefields I`ve played over the years combined! Thats the message, yes =) AND IT DOESNT GET BORING YET!!!
JayP_M;-;Haven't played much of the base game, but Altis life is addictive as hell and well worth the money.
[59th] Kraxous |;-;After playing many hours on ArmA III , from a realistic perspective and a fun one; it is a great experience for anyone who loves military simulators [en.wikipedia.org] . The game is divded into several categories if you will: Infantry, Airborne, Waterborne, Artillery, Armoured, Mechanized and HQ - it covers all of the basics (plus advanced) on the battlefield allowing for a varied approach to the game itself. Personally, I prefer being behind a console managing UAVs/UGVs! The successor of ArmA II has certainly taken on the role of "NEXTGEN" and demolished competition such as America's Army and DCS World. The RV4 Engine [arma3.com] is used for DayZ Standalone and ArmA 3 thus far. Though DayZ developers have recently announced the change of their [heavily] modified engine, it really brings the ambience and full graphical effect of ArmA III to life. The detail of graphical texturing is one thing that appealed to me the most. In the majority of games I have experienced during my past, graphical texturing has always been a problem in games such as Call of Duty, (some) Battlefield games and even ArmA II. The level of immersion when experiencing the fidelity of ArmA III is insanely good. Pros:  Detailed, well researched factions which integrate with some fictional factors: CSAT, NATO, FIA, Guerillas and even civilians.  Realistic sound effects for particular weapons, majority of them being rifles and pistols.  Ability to perform one of many roles: armour, infantry, etcetera.  Well established storyline for the campaign: even split into acts for more development time.  Realistic factors such as the attention to detail on the IFV-6c Panther - when moving over rough terrain, there are flaps on the side of the tracks that raise as it would interact with the physics in the world. Excellent detail!  Generally great game to play.  ...Many, many more. Cons:  Ladders are extremely buggy. Climbing thin air is a thing once at the top of the ladder.  Artificial Intelligence needs a rework. Their reactions are not quick enough and are heavily delayed when reacting. Earlier today I told my men to hold fire yet they continued, even when disengaged.  No built-in immersive radios. External mods required: Task Force Arrowhead Radio, ACRE, etcetera.  Although one of the factions are based on NATO, it is all American equipment and characters - voice acting is American for example.  Editing a custom mission is impossible unless you have external modifications.  Animations in general could do with a bit of a rework. Overall, I would rate the game about 8/10 simply based on my hours within ArmA III. I played the alpha and the beta and it has come a long way since. It was great to be a part of that development process and I am glad I bought the game early. Really excellent game!
OakieDokie;-;Slowly slowly getting in this game. Its got a little steeper learning curve to it if you played any arma 2 games. I heard today that a arma 3 epoch server is coming up soon. Really looking forward to. espically to play a new map altis which looks really rich and eventful. i would look at picking this up in the steam sale if you liked arma 2 or dayz mod's.
Madziosz <3;-;Could be probably the best tactical first person shooter ever. But it won't, because developers keep on ignoring community regarding the frames per second issue.  you Bohemia and your stupid DLC's.
meancreek movie :);-;So I'm in a wedged formation with my team, moving through the woods in the middle of a sunny day. I'm caring a heavy load of gear. I pant and gasp as I struggle to wade quickly through the grass, as I carry many grenades on my back. That's not the most of my worries, though. My team and I are planning to back up a team to attack and control Gina, a village just up the forest. My CO talks urgently through his radio. "Jackson...Jackson, do you read? What's your location?" The team leader panics, and exclaims we push on with the mission even though the second team will not respond. We pull around a corner and find ourselves trapped between two ridgelines. A collection of friendly bodies lay infront of us. "Damnit, Jackson's down! Doc, go check on him, the rest of you, covering fire!" It's a scenario that is frequently played out in many shooters, although in this scenario, it was different. We had the disadvantage, we were trapped, and the enemy was hundreds of meters away from us. We could not tell where the bullets where coming from, and we had to stay down low and hope we weren't hit. This is realistic combat; probably the best I've played. Even in a game that seems like a buggy, glitchy and poorly made simulator, I felt far more immersed then every other war game I've played. The graphics, for such a large scale in this game, are stunning. Compared to Arma 2, the movement, lighting, and weapons systems are all vastly improved. The sheer amount of content such as mods and other tools and missions in this game are vast, and I feel like it was perfectly worth the 60 dollars I dumped on it. This game is possibly the best war based video game I've played.
Fapplet;-;Arma 3 is a great game but isn't as good as Arma 2 (In my opinon) This game has lot's of bugs and glitches. Arma 3 looks good but it needs a great PC to run smoothly. Sa-matras wasteland is amazing and I'd recommend it
Asherion;-;I've never encountered a better military simulation game. It goes beyond "shooter" when played with a good realism cooperative group, with some good missions. Excellent title.
Cersei_Lannister;-;-If the game ran higher than 10-15 fps I would be able to rate it properly, its true. Arma 3 declares war on that graphics card you spent so much on.
TigazZz*;-;ARMA 3 definitely brought a lot of improvements from the previous installment of the series, the visual element is the best example, if you have a good enough computer, you can admire the beautiful scenery of Altis & Stratis. The map is even bigger than before, the single player campaign is interesting enough, it keep me entertained although it was difficult until i learned the controls and the stamina conditioning. The cons are still the same for me, too many controls to learn and master as i believe that the game would benefit from way simpler controls and the confusing + somewhat buggy squad of bots that you must control on the single player mode. I know this doesnt bother the multiplayer aspect, but it did bother on the campaign as they didnt obey certains which all more difficult. But i most certainly recommend ARMA 3 because its a great military simulation for those interested in such and it also can be whatever you want, just download the mod that suits you best. 7/10
Bastion;-;Takes some practice to be good at this, and a lot more practice to work tactically as a team, But nothing is more rewarding than moving fluidly as a unit and getting things done without losing a single teammate. Once you get the tactics down you will then be able to fully enjoy this game. 8/10
Valtros;-;After building on their signature game engine Bohemia has truly put forward a simulation gem with Arma 3 that no other game franchise has even come close to matching. This is where you hit the dirt, and find that bullets aren't all warning shots, and that the blood on your face can't be waited out, but that bullets will kill you, and that you'll have to wipe that blood off yourself. While it still isn't the most stable engine a game has run on, it's the most advanced one I know of, with all the trimmings of environment that effect the battle and without all the crashes of Battlefield 4. Bohemia has brought the Arma series to it's highest point ever, and it's playability has been increased 200%. I can't reccomend this game to everyone, but there's one great lesson learned in my time with Arma; I've ended missions in other games seemingly covered in blood, wearing a bandana and sporting no shirt but instead a big sculpted chest and a BFG in each hand... And yet, I'd rather I could just make it home with a mission well done and all of my team safe and sound... This is what Arma is... It's fighting a real fight, where you have to pace yourself and hold your breath, where a bullet in the face can kill a man regardless of whether he's controlled by a player or an AI. It's using your map, intel and wits to determine the best angle of attack on an enemy position, and sighing in relief when you find out later that you picked a good entry point. It's being truly tense, when you lie hiding in the bushes, hoping the MRAP with a GMG turret didn't spot you when it's lights passed over you, and hoping that you can get everyone home safe at the end of the day. Hundreds of hours into this game, I have yet to be bored even on the most patiently conducted sniper missions. There's a satisfying reward in every mission in this game, and maybe that's because you really have to work to make it out alive. Seriously, put on your boots because as far as a game goes, this is as close as it gets. This is Arma, and there is nothing else like it. ~Valtros
Davi;-;11/10 raided an AAF base in my undies
eojhet;-;Glitchy. Its been out for a long time and I finally got it but I'm not into it at all. Love flying helicopters but maybe 20 minutes or so in, the flight stick is suddenly unrecognized and I have to restart. Its infuriating. Added to a whole other mess of glitches and lackluster multiplayer (for me anyway) and frustrating single player. I'll rate it a meh. I'll be hated for it, but that's okay.
+Viper;-;Download enough mods and it starts to get good again.
Blargenshmur;-;When I first got it, I was disappointed. But after discovering the vast amount of mods and customization with the editor, I haven't stopped playing. 9.5/10
ShadowWolfDelta;-;I've never played any ARMA before ARMA 3. I really didn't know what to expect. I was somewhat, bewildered, you could say. This game is a pretty difficult one to learn. Even as i'm still learning the game, there is a never a moment I regret buying this title. 100% worth it, good quality, good community(modding community as well), and excellent gameplay. What are you waiting for?? Buy this game, and be amazed by its wonders.
[KENNEX];-;One of the best simulation Game great ambient so immersive & the other Mod just special i recomanded Battle Royal , you need absolutly try this mod incredible experiences..
Clavus;-;The ultimate military simulator that you can actually afford. Highly customizable but comes with a learning curve. Has a lively public community in the forms of Altis Life roleplay or instant-action King of the Hill, but for the real experience you should find a clan or community to play missions with.
Snake2512;-;operators and operating accessorites
[7-75] Sim;-;I picked this game up when it first came out and have spent tons of time playing it since then. As with all the previous Arma series it has its problems (most of which I believe, should have been fixed before being sold to the public), but even with its faults it is still the closest thing to a real infantry simulator that a non-military person can purchase. With mods the game gets even better and more playable, and less 'sci-fi' like. Also, I've never played any of the single player stuff that comes with the game, I only do multiplayer with my group and I really enjoy it. Things to watch out for; you need a fast processor for this game - DO NOT buy it if your CPU isn't over 3.5 M. All of the Arma games are CPU intensive and this one is the worst for it. Don't expect it to be easy - this isn't Call of Duty or some other 'fps' that has the AI standing around waiting for you. They'll hide, shoot at distance and even chase you around. Use real-world tactics, if you're with friends, and see how well they work (they do), think 'stay alert' and you'll survive longer. There's loads of stuff I could say about this game, but really I play it for about 20 hours or so a week and really enjoy it.
Mossarelli;-;Where do I begin? At the obvious point that A3 supports less active objects in a game than A2? (Protip: Rocket is the main developer and inventor of DayZ. This is his post on Reddit from way back in 2012) http://i.imgur.com/snbxf8i.png Or that the game at it's point when it released should have been Alpha? http://dev.arma3.com/sitrep-00035 Or all the bug fixes they do after the "full game" released that should have been fixed in Beta? http://forums.bistudio.com/showthread.php?149636-Development-Branch-Changelog/page14 Or how you can't put glasses in crates but you can put them on the ground? http://feedback.arma3.com/view.php?id=2301 Or the part where they falsly advertised 8 factions that never got put into the game? http://www.battlefield.in/wp-content/uploads/2013/09/1355413881_731_FT0_arma3natointernational.jpg Just because Medal of Honor Warfighter released: http://www.offdutygamers.com/wp-content/uploads/2012/10/Medal-of-Honor-Warfighter-banner.jpg Or that thing about almost all vehicles having Israel as country of origin, for both Allied forces and Opposing forces. http://forums.bistudio.com/showthread.php?163264-Reality-Check How about the one jet for only the independent faction when they advertised F35s and MV-22s? http://media.pcgamer.com/files/2011/06/b2cfcc91-43879.jpg http://h5.abload.de/img/290412_223952534318151sjul.jpg Or the obvious fact that you need a monster machine to run this game at decent fps? http://www.youtube.com/watch?v=o_4eI_2MPls What you get when you pay for this unfinished product are: * The largest island in Arma Universe so far. Largest, not most optimized so expect fps drops. * A gear customization system that exceeds that of previous games. * Weapon Addons. Mostly  3D zoom optics that looks plastic. * Scuba diving. Wow, such invention, great detail. * Mods for everything. Mods, mods, mods, mods. Can't find your vehicle? Add it with a mod. Can't find the mod? Create the mod. * A totally split up community of players with an unknown ratio of butthurt fans in denial and realists that has been betrayed by their favorite studio. * Refunds? Nope. While waiting for Arma 3 to be released as a full product, you can also wait for BIS's other projects: * DayZ 2 * Take on Mars * VBS * Arma Tactics And to top it all off, when I made a thread to complain about all these promised things that they never put in the game on their official forum, they edited it heavily and left me looking like a fool: http://forums.bistudio.com/showthread.php?167844-Thanks-to-Bohemia-Interactive-Studio Original post: https://dl.dropboxusercontent.com/u/28058839/BIS%20Forum%20Thread.txt They obviously know that they lack content but they aren't really good at damage control. Here's their 500'000 competition of who can make content to Arma 3: http://makearmanotwar.com/ Twitter: #MakeArma Expect this game to be fully loaded with content sometime at Q4 of 2014. If you have the patience to download all the mods through PlayWithSix. Thanks for the 8 fedoras s.
Pvt. Lindeborg [2RB];-;A game that has so much variety and so much fun packed into it, if you like some medium/slow realistic firefights with vehicles and choppers flying around this is the game for you. make shure you have the pc that can handle it before you buy it, takes a pritty good cpu
Calsious;-;iz gud game m8 i give it 8/8 out of 8 m8
MightyMuffin;-;best game i have ever played. BEST AND WORST GAME THO. your pc will take a hit from this game in the fps range but over all my fav game
Victor 1138;-;Excellent military sim engine with a huge pool of mods to create just about any mission or situation you can imagine.
#The_T1mon;-;The game is good . A great simulator of hostilities . Lots of possibilities. Good graphics . Good dynamics of the game. Sounds for 10 points. A kind of atmosphere is present when you play multiplayer with friends.
Reddy;-;It's good. 10/10 IGN?
Tomany |;-;Great game, but why are the DLC's so expensive for almost no content? Compared to Arma 2, where a 20 dollar DLC was a whole new campaign, and the helicopter one for A3 is what... 2 helicopters, 1 mission, 4 training modules? what is this  bohemia? I thought you were better than this. Until you fix your  DLC prices, I can't justly reccomend this game to anyone, especially when you pay $60 for a game that has a $20 paywall for crappy amounts of content.
kony;-;ArmA2 has much more content and is far more realistic (only medic can heal and it takes a while, weapons acting as real life counterparts, in ArmA3 everything is 'balanced' and you can self-heal in 3 seconds by clicking a proper button). ArmA2 has also more vehicles, more weapons, more everything... really, there is nothing to go for ArmA3 except a bit better graphic, but this is hardly anything important, especially because ArmA2 looks not much worse. Moreover it's been over three months since the release date and the game still has unfinished campaign and terrible AI bugs. You don't have to take my word for it, watch a video: http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=178199064
DennyS;-;Very good game. 9/10 overall. Would recommend. Pros: -Good single player first and second parts. (Comes out in 3 parts all free) -Excellent multiplayer modes. eg, 50 person king of the hill, wasteland, altis life, breaking point etc. -Excellent high textures and visuals. -Excellent sandbox mission creator and steamworks content. You will be sure to never run out of content to play. -Regular Updates -Zeus Mode Coming Soon. -Not like COD/BF. Cons: -Could be optimised a little better. -Requires a good gaming pc for it to work on high settings. -Very CPU intensive.
Huff2994;-;If you love Arma II you're going to love Arma III. They improve on a lot of the functionality of the game. Very smooth experience and multiplayer is very fun and challenging.
Waffle SS.;-;Updated engine with a hell of a lot of potential. Buy it as a long term investment.
BobbieTheDamned;-;Such an amazing game. Definitely without a doubt the premier modern era FPS. Some amazing clans/communities as well.
|  |;-;Good game, a lot more realistic than that Call of Duty crap. Unfortunately, parents still allow their 6 year old brats to own microphones and play this game, just like in Call of Duty. For the sake of gaming, we need to enact laws against these kids from owning mics and ruining good games such as these. Be forewarned, however, that apparently running over cops and hijacking a police helicopter just to do a kamikaze suicide on the police HQ is not tolerated on most RP servers and will get you banned. They banned me from their servers; I banned them from breathing.
iTz Mojo;-;Easily my favourite game right now. While there is less content than ARMA 2 right now, BIS is continually adding more. This game is definitely not for your typical CoD kiddy as it takes patience and strategy which all adds into the experience. The biggest thing for me is that this is a community game. BIS has simply provided a platform where the community makes limitless mods and missions for the user to enjoy. Speaking of mods, THEY ARE AWESOME! Anything from radio mods, to sound mods, to vehicle and weapon additions, and even entire new maps and game mods (there's even a mech warrior mod). The immersion in this game is great and I would highly reccomend taking the time to join a community. Doing this, you'll gain access to the real ARMA experience and not Atlis Life/Wastelands. Community events are great and there's basically one out there that would suit any player. Lastly, this game supports multiple control inputs which is a HUGE plus for me. For example I have essentially 5 control inputs: keyboard, mouse, Track IR, joystick/hotas, and steering wheel/pedals. They all work seemlessly together and allow for some really awesome configurations. For example, the pedals are tri-purpose. I use them for the obvious brake and gas while driving but I additionally use them for analogue leaning as infantry and rudder pedals while flying.
Silenzio546;-;Complex but fun especially if you have friends to play with. - I didnt like it in the beginning I found it rigid and complex, mainly because I was comparing it to the other FPS games in the market + Very good gameplay + Fancy graphics and physics are good + huge community contribution - You will walk a lot and you will be lost in the beginning I recommend it :)
Scoots Boots;-;A great military sim that keeps you engaged both in its story and its warfare. Its a perfect slow and fast paced game and allows for multiple playable areas whether you are deploying and picking up troops, running a covert mission with your nightvision, traveling by sea to support ground troops, or fighting on the ground in armor such as tanks or battling on foot. It includes even more areas of battle such as close air support (CAS) to diving underwater and traveling off shore to the area of opperation (AO). I highly recomend this game to anybody looking for a fun first or third person shooter that is very flexable with its battle.
Cyberrante2;-;Have a decent PC? BUY IT! Have a PC that can only run Minecraft at low settings? Just don't... or you'll have a real bad time.
Mad Monkey;-;*HIGHLY RECOMMENDED* This is one of the best Strategy Action Simulators i have played since ArmA II. Looks beautiful if you have top range PC. One Downside is that it is highly intensive on your CPU and I cannot recommend this for low end computers/laptops. You never run out of things to do, due to the Steam Workshop and Level Editor where mahy people create great game types and areas for combat. I give a 9/10
famuin06;-;Metascore doesn't do this justice. If you're wired to get involved with a simulator/game like ARMA3, you're in for some good stuff... Be prepared for hours of mission creation editing for minutes of 'Damn that was cool'. When you start scripting and remotely enjoy it...now you're !@#$ cause you're hooked for more hours of editing for minutes of 'Damn that actually worked...Awesome!' Once you start Subscribing and playing missions created by other seasoned ameture/Big League Arma editors, then you're like 'That was !@#$ Insane' and you realize you don't know !@#$ about editing yet. You might as well tack on another few hours, cause you're back to the drawing board enhancing and creating more missions. Great Game Gents! 11/10
Conz;-;Played a game in a game ~11/10
OztinCloud;-;Not for the soft people. This game is unforgiving. It will not lower it's difficulty for your tastes. Join a milsim community and get the full immersion of the potential the Arma series has.
BoltSauce;-;Lets put it this way. The game is exelent. The only thing i dont like is the fact that it takes about 3 bullets in the brain to kill someone.
Arcmor\Sam;-;Good fun, lots of mods ( including Dayz-Epoch which has a great community) for almost unlimited fun. You can also play a Zeus mode with friends.. and kill them with lighting.. you can't hate on that. Well Recommended. :)
LtUlrich;-;Never finished, never worked right, now trying to sell DLC. I used to be a huge supporter of BI Studios, an outspoken fan, recommending Arma to everyone. I cannot support them after today. By now it is clear that they do not intend to finish Arma III.
Adi Biti;-;Great Game, not much content as in ArmA II but i hope there will be updates and mods to play :) 9/10
Abradolf Lincler;-;A squeaker bought me this game.
BlueAce87;-;Great game just please keep adding more vehicles :D <3 <3
Aeon;-;Recommending this game is a no-brainer. If you are even marginally into shooters with a nag for realism Arma 3 is inevitable. The game won't let you in easily; it has a steep learning curve, and starting out can be quite frustrating. Also, you are less likely to find good public servers; it hardly is hop-on and play like CoD or Battlefield. The best way to experience it is in a clan or community group. Bottom line, go get it. It's unique, in every aspect.
Lunaril;-;Early into the game, I noticed a few problems. The graphics are a little dated, but hold up overall. The big problem I see, is with the constant fadeout to FMV. This seems to occur so frequently throughout the Prologue, I began wondering what the point of the game actually was. I get it, that this was a tutorial phase; However, I could do with less fadeaway's and more actual gameplay. With the Con's out of the way, I like the realistic feel to the game, from the weaponry and equipment, to the military jargon, it has an air of authenticity, which makes these types of games appealing to many. Arma 3, may have it's flaws, but overall it isn't a bad game. If I were in charge, I would have modernized the graphics a bit, and put a greater emphasis on the smaller details such as battlefield damage to structures and the environment, the movement of the weeds, grass and tree's in the wind, and other little things to enhance the immersion experience. Still a recommendable game for those interested in Army Warfare Sims.
MaxDoomslayer;-;arma bin laden blew up and got boogie till it opened the door, got on the floor and everyone did the dinosaur
m0bius;-;10/10 Because Battlefield, Halo, and Call of duty are for hipsters and children, ARMA is for Adults, Adults who can think, plan, and execute their missions even under unthinkable and impossible odds. oh and the mods now that ACE 3 is out along with many others, if you want a true military simulator that will give you a nice little reality check. this game is for you.
[sF]TimmyDope;-;Just look at home many hours I have spent in this game... NUFF SAID!
MC_Combz;-;better than dayz
s0beit;-;It's ARMA with a facelift. Honestly, I wish there was more to the game. I know it's alpha and more will be added -- but it's the stuff I've already seen which are bothersome. Physics engine still totally broken, still using that god-awful proprietary SQF scripting language which makes me want to kill myself (I know there's supposed to be some Java integration in the future, but that's not exactly a step up, and it most likely won't replace the SQF but will rather become an addition to it). There is some really cool stuff though. The helicopters are really fun to operate and you have a ton of (new) stances you can use to your advantage to find a sweet spot while taking fire. It's worth buying for the price for sure, but I'm a little sad they haven't improved the core more, nor does it look like they will in the beta or final release.
Efrafa;-;There is a notion of this game i can't figure out. This game is an all around mess and an all around success in all aspects. Many call it a finished product and a BLAST to play and some call it an unplayable mess which involves complete "hyper realistic fails". So who is right? Well, this game appeals to both an arcade style audience willing to get action and combat at extreme levels and also to the hardened clan fighting veteran focused on mods which improve gameplay and add features to the game to improve and keep game experiences fresh. In this game however, having played it for solid hours on end, these moments which I had did not come naturally. For a game to acheive its scale and realism to levels as in ARMA 3 is by no means accepted to all in this generation. Not trying to put my old man cap on here but to play games like DayZ and ARMA you can't expect double kills and planes and cars to appear at the spawn. The PMC's of advanced warfare didn't appear in the army for just being strong and chosen. To play ARMA, it is the same as DayZ (although not as boring) and all "running simulators". And I don't mean to scare you by saying to have to run to Pygros from Kavala with broken legs. What I mean is the same principle that you DON'T start as a badass, and if that is your playstyle just don't play it or convince yourself that you can take the heat. Stories have to be made with extreme disiplinary acts in this game. And how do you get those? Well here are the steps. 1. THIS GAME TAKES SOME ING BALLS TO GET WHERE YOU NEED TO GO. This can always be avoided (LOL not really) some way or another through the vast expanse of gamemodes like wasteland, and joining a realsim unit is all acceptable for even the hardest MLG sniper to learn what this game is about. But this part cannot be let go. In parts where the game is about serious progression, you CAN'T be the one crying for someone to give you a chance because you are being a little  cat. To be the general, you gotta go through West Point first. 2. THIS GAME WILL BRING YOU DOWN TO YOUR ING KNEES AND WILL ALWAYS  WITH YOU. So, how do not let this happen? Well you really ING can't. It all happens in a matter where if you are in the right place at the right time which perfectly demonstrates how this game IS SUPPOSED TO BE. This is why you need to be with a team of people who know what they are doing and know exactly WHAT THE HELL is going on, or be daring and be alone, being a target, and dying. Just like in an animal world. So treat it like that. Hunt or be hunted, kill or be killed, the strong only survive. Because this is no FPS that you have ever seen and before buying this, you have to know what is coming for your soul. Oh, but I have decided to roast your  again by saying that this game is amazing fun. "Oh, but you said it took a long time and was boring." 3. SHUT THE HELL UP AND LISTEN TO ME. Because if you don't you will die. This game, has changed my perspective on what it is. Well, what is this game? What does it offer? What are you in for? To be honest, this game is really a test of mentality. This game is really to see what you do in dire situations of disaster, catastrophe, military occupation, and survival. This can tie in to thinking of this game as an animal world like I said before. To live, you have to be familiar with your surroundings, familiar with the weapons, and all around just knowing WHAT THE  YOU ARE DOING. Because this game is never merciful and is always working against you as said in my other steps above. So how can you alter this? You can't. You can't change the future. You can't CHANGE your actions in this game. Because it defeats the whole purpose.
Birdy;-;Before you decide to downvote this review because its a negative recommendation, Please read. There are positive things about this game if you take your time to read this and/or the comments Ive posted below. Bohemia have gone down hill, even if their game has enhanced somewhat, its not worth anywhere near the price they sell it at and the fact that you have to pay for small updates they call DLC's is disgusting, I completley regret buying this game, we've payed a bunch of greedy frauds. The modding community could do better and their downloads are free. This is both disrespectfull to the average player and the modding community. Its like a "Go  yourself" outlook on the whole consumer market of ARMA titles. Whilst I used to be a follower of ARMA titles, I refuse to accept the fact that bohemia are too ignorant to pay some kind of respect to the community, its beginging to look like a move EA would pull. -Youve brought our game for a overly-expensive amount of money and now that we release content that should have been present in the ALPHA version is now being released late so we can rip you off even more then we did before. This has completley ruined the positive vibes that I once had for Bohemia. Disgracefull.
Claw-;-;At first I was very skeptical about Arma III. Playing Arma II was not such a pleasant experience, and I was very happy that I haven't wasted my money on this when the Day Z mod came out, So I bought Arma III expecting something as bad as the previous Arma. But I was surprised. The graphics, movement, squad management, driving and many other features were massively improved. I`m not even talking about shooting. Recoil and gun damage is so realistic. But the inventory system probably is the most improved thing since Arma II. Now you can easily see whats on the ground, or in the vehicle, or simply add attachments for your gun ( which are awesome! ). There`s no more arrow clicking and usual inventory lag. The only things that needs fixing are glitches and AI. Glitches should be fixed in future patches, but the AI need some work done. The AI could be both very easy to take down and extremely punishing at the same time. Sometimes AI just stands there for couple of seconds and then starts shooting, or instantly spots you and shoots you down in a few shots. I think Bohemia Interactive should really focus on this problem, because its not so serious as it is irritating, All in all, if you want some new experience of shooting game that requests some planing, patience and cooperation instead of "being your own little Rambo", you definitely should check out Arma III.
Ampersand;-;Military sandbox a la Garry's Mod. Many many ways to play including: Invade & Annex and Insurgency for quick co-op action; King of the Hill, Tactical Battlefield, and Battle Royale for brutal PvP; Breaking Point; the superior Dayzesque game, and variations on the theme Wasteland and Epoch; MMORPG mode with Altis Life; custom missions and mods fill in everything in between and well beyond into every niche.
CaVe_DoVah;-;I tried to enjoy this game, but I could not. I have several aspects I'd like to point out to make clear why I don't recommend buying this game: 1 - A totally unoptimized engine The graphics in this game are great, no doubt about that. But the engine and the FPS I am getting definetely are not. My PC has up-to-date-components which do meet the recommend requirements, except for my graphics card. It is a GTX 760, recommended one is a GTX 680 though. I accept that I cant get the best amount of FPS with this card in a a game like Arma 3 - but only 27 FPS Max in a multiplayer match with ~ 10 people online and the graphics settings at low, view distance set to 1000 and with shadows deactivated? This is not a fault of my 760, it is because the engine of this game is totally unoptimized. 2 - An AI which is dumb as f*** I expect, that the AI in a game that is based so heavily on teamwork is atleast ACCEPTABLE. But this is not the case in Arma 3, no! The AI of the comrades you will lead during several singleplayer missions is so bad, that I would need to look for a word to describe it. They resist to follow your orders instantly, for example when you tell them to enter a car. They will walk around like a headless chicken before finally remembering that there is a car they should enter. And if you're unlucky, they won't enter the car at all. This is just one exmaple, but there are many cases where the AI would have to be improved. Maybe in Arma 4, which I certainly won't buy if they keep their attitude towards the game and the players like in Arma 3. 3 - Terrible mission design There are several missions which do just have terrible design. For example a mission where you have to make your way through a destroyed town with tons of enemies, vehicles (which I couldn't use for some reason) and barely any supplies. But this is not the only case. There are several other missions with a bad design, where you maybe have to walk for several minutes, or run to keep up with your mate and then encounter an enemy squad but you can't hit any of them because your level of fatigue is too high so that your hands shake and can't aim as you would need too. Sure, it might be realistic, but here it is just GAMEBREAKING. Luckily there is a way to skip a mission: Hold down Shift and - on your numpad and then type "endmission" (you can release Shift and - while typing). And I am thankful for this option because I was stuck forever with this one particular mission, but let's move on. 4 - (Small) Things that could have been better There are some small things aside from the big ones that coould have been better if the developers would have taken more time to improve the game. For example the body armor in the singleplayer. Depending on what pieces of armor you're wearing, you get an armor rating (which you can't see anywhere), and the amount of shots you can tolerate before dying depends on that rating. Sometimes I would just die from one shot (and no, it wasn't the .408 CT or the 99x108mm (.50) that hit me) and wonder why I died although I was wearing armor (note that I am talking of the singleplayer) and the enemy did take like 4 shots to kill! Seems like my armor rating was not high enough. But how should I know? See, the problem is that you can't know, because nowhere is written how good that armor is. It would've been nice if they would have given every piece of armor a value, like "0" for no protection, "40"-"70" for decent protection and "100" for high protection. They should have also provided checkpoints for campaign levels. Well, you can save manually, bu if you forgot to and die, well you will be kinda annoyed when you have to do the whole mission again and let me tell you that the missions are not short ones. But there are also good things about the game. The graphics are beautiful and if you have a high amount of FPS I'm sure that the multiplayer provides alot of fun. Thee are also so many vehicles from tanks to submarines, artillery, jets, choppers, attack boats... There is also an option to make time passing by faster. Press the key to the left of "Backspace" to increase time's speed, and the button left to this one to decrease time's speed. Especially useful when you have to walk forever again.And another aspect I like are the realistic ballistics of the guns depending on their ammunition type. "But CaVe_DoVah, you wrote that u don't like it when u die from one shot. Seems like u have no idea and are not trustworthy!" No, wait. I wrote that I did not like the system with the armor rating. But the ballistics should stay like they are, because what would a military simulator be without realistic ballistics? I think that everyone should decide on their own whether they buy this game or not. I just tried to help you (and hope I succeeded) with this choice by writing about the negative aspects, since there are enough reviews already which cover the good ones enough. I personally regret to have bought this game, mostly because of the FPS I am getting although I am close to the recomended requirements, but hey, that's just my opinion.
arik_saito;-;Graphically great game, the arma3 universe blows though, and really not a lot of diversity in units or weapons, and it really is lacking in the vehicle aspect and civilian units. Bottom line I wouldve just paid for an arma2 ported to the A3 engine.
SNDWV;-;nice game, nice graphics ....acceptable gameplay with ai, good gameplay in pvp, could be lots of fun but there is only one reason i cannot recommend this game to someone ...if it happens you to be banned from BattlEye, you will get 0 (zero) support plus you will be banned from all games that uses BattlEye; Arma2, Day-Z etc ...i bought the game in the first day it came out, supporter editon 70euros ...just that i did not find the same support i was hopping to get if i have a problem ...i still love the game but no, no one has ever replied to me a damn thing to all my mails sent appart from the automated one ...so NO ...DO NOT BUY THIS GAME! at least till BattlEye goes out of the picture ...Good Luck!
the tee;-;Dissapointing. The game feels like it's still in Beta stage.
A.Akis;-;Probably the closest thing that us, the general population, has towards a realistic military simulator/game. I suggest that you do not buy this if you are expecting a linear fast paced action game like CoD or Battlefield, this is much more in-depth then that. This is not simply, running around 360 no scoping people. Squad Managment and effective communication is necessary. There is also something that you can't experience in the said titles above, which is long-range combat. (An example of this is preforming an assault on a base/camp with armor, artillery and other assests from varying distances from your own base. However, this is still a game and should be taken lightly from time to time. I suggest learning how to do tricks in the littlebird (MH9-Hummingbird) and exploiting the terrible physics. This game has multiple different gamemodes and tasks that could be simulated. So you'll never have the same experience twice. Pros: -Very Realistic. -Great Graphics (If you can run them). -Interactive Environment. -Realisitc Vehicals (Most of the time). ------------------------------------------------------------------------ Cons: -Physics (You will hear "Arma Physics" referred to multiple times). -Muliplayer Optimization. -Very steep learning curve but you will appreciate it over time. (More of a learn as you play) -Occasional Crashing. -Controls will more than likely conflict your normal keyboard setup, I suggest using the Arma 2 setup. Overall 10/10 Even if you don't think this is for you, trust me, the teamwork involved in this game is beyond amazing, the amount of co-op I've played counts for 95% of my game time. I've met tons of new people from this and they're like family to me.
Nickolas the Clown;-;Much better than the others Feels like you are the soldier rather than just controlling some robot Pros - Great gunplay - Awesome graphics - AI will  you up - PvP is a blast when it is only players and no AI Cons - Bad singleplayer - No good PvP servers - Playing online will drop your frames (Horriable for PvE) - Some guns feel lacking P.S There is a DayZ mod for this game called breaking point which is fun and has great optimization
Locutus of Borg;-;This game has turned from something with potential in a big bag of festering feces, but the worthless immature underage scum that represents the customers doesn't even know better, of course. Like all ArmA games it is a Military Sim. Unlike Arma 2 or the great Operation Flashpoint 1 where most features (Infantry/Vehicle/Air vehicle) worked pretty well, here you have a bit from everything but nothing is polished or smooth. To be honest, the only difference from the Beta that we Preorderers had access to (ages ago) are some new vehicles and weapons. Not even that many that it would matter. The animations stutter and the vehicle driving and physics at all are a joke which is all due to poor coding. The only thing that is good is the singleplayer campaign but after all this is a Military sim which is meant to be played in Multiplayer. I don't want to play against the AI, first of all because the ArmA AI has and always will be horrible and secondly because I want to play against other players and not placeholders. The multiplayer is pretty much unplayable as well and its not getting better. 70-90% of all populated servers are Roleplay servers running the Life mod. The other 10-30% are a tiny bit of survival-sandbox-deathmatch Wasteland servers and some foreign community servers running tons of mods. I also don't want to download 10 gigabytes of unneccesary third party community mods and try installing them for 4 hours because I neither want to garbage my computer up nor do I find unneccessary and poorly made mods needed to play the game.  the steam workshop. I find it ridiculous how they praise their "revolutionairy new" game mode called ZEUS and then don't even make official servers with that game mode (or others) for the players available. What I preordered a year (?) ago? Some overhyped successor game of Arma 2 that pretended to have every feature "work in progress" and to be something completely new once the features are done. What I got after all features are supposedly done? Arma 2 poorly converted into a new engine with new animations, a (ridiculously bad) physics engine and unfinished, unpolished features. I feel ripped off and am very angry at the devs. I will not buy a game from those lying, lazy and greedy a-holes again. If anyone related to the dev team reads this, I hope you feel proud contribooting to the cancer that is killing the video game industry.
Sadseal;-;Adolf Hitler (German: [adlf htl]; 20 April 1889  30 April 1945) was an Austrian-born German politician and the leader of the Nazi Party (German: Nationalsozialistische Deutsche Arbeiterpartei (NSDAP); National Socialist German Workers Party). He was chancellor of Germany from 1933 to 1945 and dictator of Nazi Germany (as Fhrer und Reichskanzler) from 1934 to 1945. Hitler was at the centre of Nazi Germany, World War II in Europe, and the Holocaust. Hitler was a decorated veteran of World War I. He joined the German Workers' Party (precursor of the NSDAP) in 1919, and became leader of the NSDAP in 1921. In 1923, he attempted a coup in Munich to seize power. The failed coup resulted in Hitler's imprisonment, during which time he wrote his memoir, Mein Kampf (My Struggle). After his release in 1924, Hitler gained popular support by attacking the Treaty of Versailles and promoting Pan-Germanism, antisemitism, and anti-communism with charismatic oratory and Nazi propaganda. Hitler frequently denounced international capitalism and communism as being part of a Jewish conspiracy. Hitler's Nazi Party became the largest elected party in the German Reichstag, leading to his appointment as chancellor in 1933. Following fresh elections won by his coalition, the Reichstag passed the Enabling Act, which began the process of transforming the Weimar Republic into the Third Reich, a single-party dictatorship based on the totalitarian and autocratic ideology of National Socialism. Hitler aimed to eliminate Jews from Germany and establish a New Order to counter what he saw as the injustice of the post-World War I international order dominated by Britain and France. His first six years in power resulted in rapid economic recovery from the Great Depression, the denunciation of restrictions imposed on Germany after World War I, and the annexation of territories that were home to millions of ethnic Germans, actions which gave him significant popular support. Hitler actively sought Lebensraum ("living space") for the German people. His aggressive foreign policy is considered to be the primary cause of the outbreak of World War II in Europe. He directed large-scale rearmament and on 1 September 1939 invaded Poland, resulting in British and French declarations of war on Germany. In June 1941, Hitler ordered an invasion of the Soviet Union. By the end of 1941 German forces and their European allies occupied most of Europe and North Africa. Failure to defeat the Soviets and the entry of the United States into the war forced Germany onto the defensive and it suffered a series of escalating defeats. In the final days of the war, during the Battle of Berlin in 1945, Hitler married his long-time lover, Eva Braun. On 30 April 1945, less than two days later, the two committed suicide to avoid capture by the Red Army, and their corpses were burned. Under Hitler's leadership and racially motivated ideology, the regime was responsible for the genocide of at least 5.5 million Jews, and millions of other victims whom he and his followers deemed racially inferior.
MisterAxeMan;-;So I played this game when it was free for 3 days and I only played it for a little while. First of all the game was not very well optimized and I found it to be pretty laggy especially in multilipayer with around 50 people playing and bullets and missles going everywhere. I thought that this was a really releastic game becuase of just how many people there are in a game and how its like a big fire fight. I would have to say for people who have lots of money to spend on games, go ahead and buy it if you have a gaming machiene that can handle this game and get playable frame rates. (Recommend an $1000 PC Minimum) But if you play free games like me and don't have an extreme PC build I don't really recommend the game that much.
TopBaller123;-;Got the game recently (having never played an Arma game) and although i had heard that the controls were difficult i was willing to spend the time learning them, what got me is that as soon as you enter the multiplayer, you hit walls upon walls of text that the game doesn't tell you anything about.I understand most of it is user-created content but that doesn't stop it from being incredibly confusing joining a server and being told little to nothing about what is going on, you just know its either "Altis Life" or "King Of The Hill" etc. It kinda makes you think they could've done with a few tutorial servers with different game modes so new players aren't extremely confused from the off. Well the first time i went in to a multiplayer game (in a server about 2/3rds full) the chat channels were completely dead, all i heard was what presumably was a fellow noob constantly saying "Hello" (There was someone else talking occasionally but the sound quality was so grainy i couldnt make out anything he was saying) . I figure everyone is on the teamspeak server as from what I'd heard "everyone uses ts on Arma" but nowhere in game did it say where the name/address of the ts server and when i asked in the sidechat the other lobby members told me to stop using sidechat. Similar experiences occurred on the few other servers i tried going on as well. The game shows a complete lack of effort to help anyone who has never played an ARMA game before, how to play the online, and the people playing it seem antisocial and uninterested in helping either. Judging from some of the reviews. the campaign isn't very good either but at least its playable, I'll probably end up on that for a bit in the hope that one day, if i ever manage to get my head around the multiplayer, i won't get constantly mowed down and showed up for the complete noob i am at this game! Overall probably a good game for those new to the Arma series if you have a spare 20 odd hours you are willing to put in to figure out the what is going on in the online game modes, what addons and mods you will need for the game, what ts servers you need to be in, what the controls are, then you will probably reach a stage where you can enjoy the game. But if you don't have that amount of spare time to search the internet for help guides, tutorials, and server info, then you will probably find the game very frustrating. Not at all noob friendly.
taurus;-;Too many lies.
Dragonborn Operative;-;Pros: 1: Fun - Sometimes. 2: Good graphics 3: Pretty 4: Different 5: Lots of Gear 6: Mods make this game Cons 1: Overhyped 2: Still Clunky 3: Laggy 4: Overuse of blurry Lighting, Effects. 5: Features / such as limited stamina hinder gameplay. 6: Sound engine still poor, Release date had terrible sounds, they changed, still poor results. 7: Static buildings, feel like a solid blocks with invisible HP bar. with progressive damage breaking immersion. 8: Physics still lacking. 9: Expensive DLC's that should have come with the game in the first place. 10: Multiplayer laggy, broken, and Frustrating. ( when many users are playing at once ). 11: Gun sway and stamina effects / Gunshot wound blur effect / Running effect is a Hinderance to gameplay rather than giving into immersion. 12: Walking up rocks is worse than arma 2 / It can get you killed. 13: Almost all gamemodes are unsatisfactory with lag being the biggest culprit. Game is a Frustrating mess. [ Company Promised to give a new physics system that would allow objects to react according to real life environment. Bohemia Interactive and its specific representatives made a video showing off how they added new physics to the game and how they will be improving the physics engine ]. Sadly all of the ABOVE DOES NOT EXIST IN ARMA 3 ... ANYWHERE.
SKINZ;-;Lazy Open ports to play with a friend. Dlc which should of been in the game already, its bare bones and was planned from the start. Unoptimized multiplayer. Forum moderator moves all bad comments about the game to trash bin, even the polite ones. Thanks to the DayZ mod half the servers are "Life" games with screaming little kids. Is it a good game? Apart from these issues, Yes. Will i support any of there future titles? HELL NO
Hugh Jass;-;I really, really wanted to love arma 3. But i just can't deal with it anymore. 80+ hours I've spent in the game and it just feels like wasted time. Yes, the graphics are vastly improved, but that comes with a lot of sacrifices. Firstly, you have to have about fourteen gtx titans to run this game properly. I have a pretty decent pc (most games at high/max settings) yet Arma just does not want to play smoothly. I get about 30fps in arma 3 and although that's perfectly playable, the framerate drops and it is a pain to play. "I'll just ignore the framerate drops", i said to myself. "So what if it drops, it's a great game" but the game consistenly crashes. It just happened to me in wasteland, right behind someone with top gear and bam. Arma3.exe has stopped working. It's not like this is an occasional thing either, it happens at least once every time I play. And don't even get me started on the driving, its like trying to wade a kite through custard, seriously. Also, the fact theres about 3 (ok maybe more) guns really annoys me. There's about 3/4 assault rifles and they all perform pretty much the same, there's no quirks with each, they're all just.. bland. That goes the same for pretty much every weapon class. That's without me mentioning the fact none of them are liscensed or have official names. I know its a "futuristic" world, but I much prefered the ak47's, Pkms, m4's etc of arma 2. Have i mentioned the fact only one campaign episode has been released? It's not like arma fans have been waiting for this for years or anything and bohemia take MONTHS to release not the campaign, but a campaign episode. Seriously? In my opinion arma 2 is a mechanically better, smoother and more fun game. My advice, play arma 2 for another year or so and wait for Bohemia to sort their BS out. Arma 3? Me no gusta.
Randy Marsh;-;DO NOT BUY IT! the CPU and GPU issues are so bad you will get 17fps slideshow in multiplayer on LOW/MED/NORM/HIGH/VHIGH/ULTRA settings, It's a shame this game had a lot of potential, singleplayer is great but don'r expect anything more then that. It will never be optimized for high end gaming rigs. Bohemia are uselss and don't even care about the issues!
Valkyr;-;I can not in all honesty recommend this game to anyone, and here's why - Its 32-bit - in the most simplest terms this means the game can only use a maximum of 2GB of RAM, there are other restrictions to this but this is the one that hurts performance the most. - Multi-Threading- This should have been a priority during development but instead it almost seems like Bohemia forgot about this, it is poor, and extremely bottlenecked, resulting in low performance. -Realism - A lot of people go on and on about the realism... In vanilla there is only a basic (and I mean basic) "bullet drop" system no realistic ballistics whatsoever without the use of mods, you could literally be in one of the biggest thunderstorms the game could throw at you with gales, rain and all the other lovely things and you will still be able to drop a target at close to a mile away with a precise headshot, simply by pointing up a bit..... There are quite literally dozens of examples of how this game is not realistic, here's just a few. - Vehicle behaviour - is a joke, choppers have been updated in the choppers DLC to be more realistic but even then that means you have 2 completely different flight models for vanilla choppers vs. vanilla jets, obviously they are different one is a chopper the other is a fixed wing jet but here's what I mean, choppers now take into account wind speed, direction, variable gusts, as well as reaction forces, mostly to do with real world physics and all manner of other things whereas the jets simply don't, they feel like they are on rails there is no real skill involded (unless dogfighting) in flying them. Ground vehicles are just as bad there was a more 'realistic' driving model in the original grand theft auto. And that is the nicest thing I could say about it. - Low res vs. high res players - This admittedly is a multiplayer pvp issue so wont affect pve or sp gameplay but ill try to explain it, In pvp (if you play pvp) you will notice your getting sniped even though your behind a bush or shot through a fence or something similar, this is because 'low res' players cant see these details because it is too far away and not yet 'drawn' for them, but they can see you, This is because the draw distance for a character is permanent and un-changeable (it does change but cant be changed by the player, without mods) whereas the detail draw can be changed through changing settings this is in case you wish to improve performance, but this inherently means if you play pvp you have to play with everything turned down just to be on a level playing field. Not very realistic is it? - 3rd vs 1st person in pvp multiplayer, 3rd person players can see around corners, over walls etc, whereas 1st person players cant making 1st person in pvp pointless, nothing more to say. - Player animation - This is the thing that really bugs me to the point I have rage quit in the past, in what possible universe would a person have to stand still in a firefight just to change weapons? There are other animations I detest but that one gets me the most. Note - this can be fixed with mods. - AI behaviour - The AI in this game is a joke, and not a funny one, they are like headless chickens running around with guns shooting at sounds, for example I was playing a game with friends the other night when our pilot was one shotted at over 300m (altitude) from an AI enemy with a bog standard Katiba (which is based on a Khaybar) with its skill setting turned down to 45/100, not only was this ridiculous it is also unrealistic, I have fired assault weapons IRL (not a Khaybar ... Unfortunately) but I can tell you now there is no way in the entirety of the road to hell could you possibly one shot a pilot in a chopper in the sky flying over 300m at over 80mph with any kind of assault weapon, only with a powerful rifle would you even have a chance and even then the shot must be spectacular and ideally head on to the chopper, what have I learned from this... There is no ballistic shielding simulated in vanilla choppers either in its hull (which would be around the cockpit and gunner positions) or in the cockpit glass and if it is, it is in desperate need of an update. I simply refuse to mention AI pilots because they are dead, I killed them all for their incompetence. OK I know by now your sick of me bashing this beloved game, but that's the thing I LOVE this game and like many others I have had hours upon hours of fun playing this, but I cannot get past the fact that this game is so unpolished and so poorly optimised it really does feel like a badly made console port and i genuinely feel the same anger i had with GTA IV way back when the PC version was first released, the random lag or crashing in the middle of the action because the game cant cope with what's going on and just cries in the corner while all the other games just point and laugh at it, the reason i portray it that way is because it feels like Bohemia is dragging its heels and then when it finally has something to give us it overprices it in what is an apparent need for funds which lets be honest makes them look a bit needy - i can understand that though, they need money to pay the staff, but what i don't understand is why they give us so little for our money compared to the like of the arma 2 dlc's in which we got factions, vehicles, soldiers, weapons and missions all in one DLC package i know the price was higher, but for an example Arma 3: Helicopters DLC you pay now 08/05/2015 is 10.99 GBP or $16.95 USD i think.... Anyway what your paying for is the privileged honour of being able to pilot 2 helicopters, that's it, you get everything else for free in an update including the ability to travel in the helicopters, well i suppose that's good right? Wrong basically they tried to tell us this was some kind of great thing they did for us but in actual fact it was so that it didn't split the playerbase, basically covering themselves from flaming on that aspect but i suppose that means most of the people that bought it are going to be decent pilots, not all but most, yes? Well yes actually, most of the pilots i have flown with flying the dlc choppers are good probably about 70% of time, but that means all the really bad pilots vive had in the past all got better at flying? Or does this mean only the people who bought the DLC were the really good pilots with a few people with spare cash thrown in, but if this is the case then Bohemia managed to miss out on a massive cash injection by not putting more choppers into the pack maybe even a custom air force faction for NATO and CSAT its only retexturing some uniforms and some code, its hardly rocket science it takes time sure but still 2 choppers? Its an insult, i just downloaded a mod which gave me 4 choppers and 7 planes with a custom faction, uniforms, soldiers, equipment etc, it took all of 40 seconds to download and hey guess what i didn't spend a penny. Ok this got way too long way too fast so here, conclusion is this i want to recommend this game because i have had a lot of good memories with it and im sure others will like it as well but at the same time i cannot recommend this game for all its flaws, If your willing to put serious time into modding this game then yes buy it, but as i said i cant recommend this because of it flaws and because of the company behind it, i have lost faith in it and cant recommend you buy this. To settle confusion, my pc. - AMD FX 8350 Black Edition 8 Core Socket AM3+, 4.0GHz, 16MB - 4GB XFX Radeon R9 290X DD, 28nm, 5000MHz GDDR5, GPU 1000MHz, 2816 Streams - MSI 970 GAMING, AMD970+SB950, Socket AM3+ - 12 GB Corsair Vengeance RAM - 850W Corsair PSU - 6x 120mm Aerocool Shark 15 Blade
Streaks;-;I really hate to say this, but you should wait to get this game until BIS gets it finished, assuming that happens. The reader should realize that I have almost 2000hrs in ArmA2. The 600 or so listed on my profile here is just since it got added to Steam and doesn't count the time pre-Steam. So, as someone who plays exclusively with friends on listen servers, not on big public servers. As someone who plays mostly CTI maps (remember those BIS?), and as someone who spent most of those almost 2000hrs flying CAS in a jet (remember those BIS?), .......I can honestly say that I'm rather let down by ArmA 3 and it makes me very sad. The interface has always been clunky from way back in OFP and before. The new backpack system seems to me to just be a reskin of the same thing. It does indeed make it a bit easier to use being able to drag and drop stuff (novel!!), and while I appreciate the work here.....I'd rather have seen the time spent on other things. To be fair, two of the devs DID spend time locked up in Greece for a stupid reason. I think it was 11 months? This is something that is strictly forbidden to speak of on their forums for some odd reason. But, I understand this had a huuuuuuge impact on their development cycle as it was their two LEAD devs as I understand it. I get the feeling that they got back, and shoved development through in order to compete with the (then) new BF and CoD releases. I personally feel this was a huge, quivering pile of mistake. Because......they aren't really in competition with those games!!! It'd be like saying that chess competes with checkers and monopoly. All board games sure but vastly different. Same here! ArmA II was all about trying to make the game more of a military simulator. Though I think they had to admit some limitations here and there with the tech of the day without making the engine only playable on super computers. ArmA III seems to go away from this and I think it's trying to compete even more now with those other games in some ways.....maybe I'm wrong? It just doesn't feel like the team is as worried about realisim any longer. For me, the fact that it's set in 2035 is a HHHHUUUUUUUGE turn-off and almost a game breaker right there. That, and there's ONE jet in the game thus far.....one AND it's some old trainer POS to boot.....nice.....well guess this confirms my hunch I've had for a while now. BIS seems to hate fixed wing like Blizzard hates melee! It's all about rotary wing! Which is fine and dandy unless you need an A10 or a Spooky. By 2035 we assume naturally that these have been phased out, so where are their replacements? Hell, at this point I'd be happy with an F15 that I can just fly and do stand-off attacks with from miles away.....oh right that's what the choppers are for! Am I ranting a bit there? Um, yes sorry, but I was just looking SO foward to this game!!! Heck I even did the pre-order on the delux version!! NOW? Ya I'm kinda not happy about that. I fire the game up now and then after I see an update downloading. Just to mess around with the undrivable pickups and do target practice with the assault rifles that have recoil like a .45-110 every shot......it's like going to the playboy mansion only nobody's there. So, I'd say to wait on this game. I'm still playing ArmAII where I can fly fixed wings even in the base game. Oh yes I know...mods mods mods....ya *hangs head*
[Mhkek] Mikke;-;If you want to play a heavy realistic and enyoing game, then i clearly recommend you to play this! The gameplay itself has it's own spirit that makes the Arma franchise unique. The in-game controls may be a little but confusing but you get used to it. Clearly recommended to play this with friends, and the gamemodes are awesome. There is "Altis Life" Wich is a roleplaying gamemode, Wasteland wich is like DayZ with no zombies innit. And ofcourse there is tons of mods in the internet so i suggest you give Arma 3 a try. :)
Vodki is of SUKA!;-;FEKIN SWAG M8 , ILL HOOK ALL OF YOU IN THE GUBBAH
OMGItZ-wLoSkI twitch.tv/wloski_b;-;Great game, bad optimization so if you have a low spec pc this game may run slow and have low fps. The gameplay is great, the vehicles and aircraft are great fun and are easy to drive / handle. But there is not many guns and vechicles within this game. The guns handle well and realistic, they also look great and the game has nice animation. The new stances are amazing and really allow you to take cover not matter what the object is you are taking cover behind. Over all fun game, lots of gamemodes online to play, single player is ok, but do not recommend getting this game for single player. There is also some mods online which change the game quite a bit. I do recommend getting this game.
Capwell | DG;-;Great game. Nothing beats this in the Military Simulator Genre.
drunreal;-;Arma 3 has increased my sexual life ten fold and given me a new perspective on our lord and savior Wilford Brimley. 10/10
FerrusPugnum;-;Multiplayer is really the best. You can have fun solo but the interaction with others in a fun and in a semi strict quasi-military group is where to be. Lots of mods and new missions out there so there is no reason to get bored!! Grab a rifle and march on..
DarkMellie;-;If you've looked at this on the Steam shelf and even been slightly interested, buy it. Apart from the gorgeous graphics and highly detailed soldiers, weapons, vehicles and environments, it gives you an experience like no other shooter. Best of all, it uses the Steam workshop which means you can very easily download (in-game) scenarios that other players have made. This offers an eternal level of replayability.
TJkiwi;-;this gave me accute PTSD
caLypzo;-;AMAZING GAME #RUNSLIKEA great times had on free trail
Kozzy420;-;Fantastic game already! Everything I wanted improved from ARMA and ARMA2 is improved in ARMA3 Alpha. The controls, animations and movement is sooo much better now, not clunky and meh like previous games in the series. Yet it still keeps that great realism that we love the series for. It is in great shape so far for an alpha version. Cannot wait to see what the full version offers! How did they get it to run better and look better than ARMA2? Pretty impressive! Get it now, maybe see ya online!
[TNC] Lupus;-;Scouted the map as a seagull. 10/10, would scout again.
Meister;-;So realistic my mom had to call me for dinner
Little Whispers;-;Much arma3, To Shooting, So Killer, Very Doge
UncleGlenn;-;4 reasons to buy ArmA III. 1. I looked at the horizon and saw a Hemmt going to space, I had to double-check if I wasn't playing any space related games. 2. A guy hitted the brakes and got thrown out of his car. 3. A medic was driving on the mainroad, I heard his sirenes and suddenly BOOM and an offroad flew through the sky. 4. Freaking people using Go-Karts as rocket proppelant. 100/10 Altis Space Program
Simpl3x;-;This review is for a badge but this is still a GREAT GAME!
The Sound of Legends;-;Poor edition to the Armaverse. Tons and tons of potential that is being sadly wasted. The game has nice graphics and lighting albeit not Dx11. The main island Altis, looks quite impressive indeed but has a very empty feeling and doesnt feel alive like other arma maps did. The ragdoll which is one of the new features feels half finished, like the rest of this game if I'm honest. An example of this is all static 50cals have the same model and this situation you will see through out the game, the latest content added were reskined with slight model change BAF helicopter and vehicle which is unacceptable in book if you already payed for that content if you bought BAF for arma 2. The sound leaves very little to be desired, with clipping audio and samples so loud that they actually break up (tank main guns). ArmA and ArmA2 have infinitely better programmed sound engines. ArmA3 is currently a dead duck in my opinion, anything that is positive about this game is quickly over shadowed by lack of content, bugs, inconsistances in code and I hate to say it but, bordom. I never thought I'd hear myself saying it but yes, this game is boring. With the pace of the games meaningful development slower than a snail I'd venture to say dont expect much soon. Maybe if the game still lives in 2015 it could be great, but right now it is certainly not that. Only time will tell if BIS take advantage of this games potentials. My feeling is that it will fall by the wayside because of lost potential and lack of real core code bug fixes.
[SG] J.Pledge;-;Fantastic game that still required a little rounding around the edges. One of, if not the best gaming communities who I hope will remain healthy and keep providing solid material.
GeneralDoubleD 0.8K Youtube!;-;If your computer can play it on at least normal settings with 30+ fps, must buy! 11/10.
Mr_Camdo;-;Don't...even...bother... not picking up this game! This game has changed my life completely. I'm now sober (6 months! I know, still keeping my fingers crossed, because of my relapse last year), and I'm also off Heroin. Last year was a difficult year for me, I was diagnosed with testicular cancer, something about the way I rest my laptop on my left testicle that managed to cause internal bleeding. Ever since I picked up Arma 3 6 months ago, I've stopped resting my laptop on my testicles, instead I've been resting my testicles on my laptop. I thank the developers of this game for creating a masterpiece, and creating a beacon of hope for when I needed it the most.
Cpt Ender;-;The greatest mil sim, possibly FPS of all time I've been playing ArmA since Operation: Flashpoint (Renamed Armed Assault [ArmA]: Cold War Conflict]. I've always loved the concept of a sandbox game. Do whatever you want, your game play is literally limited to your imagination. We all know BIS has this aspect of the ArmA series in spades, but the military realism and breath of immersion with A3 is unreal. You step in the game and you actually FEEL yourself move within the environment. Thanks to the PysX engine, when you drive a vehicle the tactile feeling of traversing the terrain is like no other game out there. Weapons don't just aim themselves, if you miss your target down range (which you will!) it's your own fault. Working in squads and managing situation awareness is crucial to your survival, and you'll find plenty of players who want that next level realsim. The lush graphics and visuals are by far the most advanced of all current FPSs. Finally the best improvement, IMO, is the modified stance system. No longer do you have to clumsily stick to a wall to have cover, or just choose between getting shot or going prone and not being able to shoot. With this new mechanic, you can adjust your position in very specific ways to have sights down range over any variety of cover. By and large this is the greatest experience I've had in video games in a long time. ArmA 3 is only still in beta right now and It's still the most compelling, and in depth video game I've ever played. 10.00/10.00
hPALLY #LF> EXP ArtWorker !;-;The first couple days, can be really painful for most of the people, "ArmA 3" is kinda hard to understand, it's not for everyone especially not for "BF/COD lovers", the maps are really great, graphics are awesome same as the audio, this game is made really good, not as ArmA 2. ArmA 2 is lagging a lot, has a lot of fps drops, playing ArmA 2 on 1920x1080 Mid/Low and i have only 30-60 FPS, ArmA 3 on 1920x1080 Ultra High/High 80 FPS +++, half of ArmA 3 players can't kill a standing player, so the combat is pretty easy i'd say, the game is pretty expensive but it's definitely worth the money, 10/10.
Ashy;-;This game is the god of all Military games. you can not have a better military game, with as much realism as this. the graphics are also amazing. once your done with singleplayer you can explore the vast amount of gamemodes in multiplayer from Zombies mods too Sandboxes and even bonus campaigns. this game truly has it all.
A Shadow;-;Absolutely love this game. Best simulation game I have played in a long time. So happy I found it!
Wuppis;-;Alright is this a good game or not.Well if you ask me its kind of hard the controls are wierd (exept walking shhoting and spriting) and they are hard to remeber.But this game offers alot and by alot i really mean alot.Good looking graphix and textures intense heartbeating combat looting military wastelands mode custom mods that i dont know how to install Windows 8 Skin :(.CO-OP and campaing are pretty good but i wish some of my other friends would ow this game but it costs a lot and its no worth of that amount of money like 25,50 euros are good price in my opinion But then it offers alot of game modes.I think this is a good game,But you should just buy it from a tf2 outpost dealer.But i got this cheaper caus of the alpha release. But overall 4/5
Niipaa;-;Oh ArmA. ArmA, ArmA, ArmA. The abusive relationship we have shared over the past 4 games has become more abusive, and less fun, and all it took was one title. One title full of empty promises, and most likely just a tech demo to fix the engine up for DayZ 2. Let me elaborate on my disdain for what used to be one of my favorite game series, and the company that I used to respect above every other. The quick and dirty, would I recommend ArmA 3? Not by a mile. Sub-30 price tag, sure, you'll get your monies worth. But even for all the modders trying to save it, this is not a complete game. You should not have to pay 60 dollars to go and download a number of COMMUNITY created additions to feel like you actually have a full fledged product. If some of that money went to those modders, then I'd say support THEM, not BI. But it doesn't. Imagine buying a car, but having to go out and purchase the doors and steering wheel separately. Sure the car runs, but just how useable is it? A quick glance at my steam page would reveal that I highly praised BI's adventurous approach to ArmA 2, and OA. I loved ArmA with a blazing passion, even though it's considered the  of the series. OFP shared a warm place in my heart as the birth of one of my favorite mil-sims. Sure, since OFP, the series has had its caveats and nuances, but you quickly learned to take them with the massive amount of fun the games provided. So where did ArmA 3 go wrong? What could one title do to tear my respect for 3 other games (+ 2 Expansions & DLC)? Well, lets start with the company and work our way up. You see, riding on the heels of the massive success that DayZ was thanks to word of mouth and LPs, BI somewhere seems to have got it in their head that the same business practices most AAA companies do (Incomplete Games for Full Price, DLC strategies), could be done to their small communities. And you know what? They were right. We all bought into it. BI slowly came to realize that they could do less work, and still make more money, because their communities could turn nowhere else. What amazes me most about DayZ, besides the fact that it is still in Alpha after almost 2 years, and that it's lead creator left, is that all it really did was show what ArmA 2 was already capable of. Massive, persistent worlds with Mil-Sim themes. Just, with zombies. But, this is not a review of DayZ, this a review of ArmA 3. Any ArmA community member worth his or her grain of salt will remember all the broken promises that now lay at ArmA 3's feet. Disguising as the enemy? Gone. The Railgun tank, one of the coolest features at E3, and the only one making the future worth giving a damn about? Poof. All the underwater showcases, hinting at perhaps real naval gameplay? Nope. Planes? We got 3. Funny thing is, all you Deluxe Edition owners should open up that Tactics, Techniques, and Procedures manual it comes with sometime, and view all the planes we should have had. The reskinned C-130 and F-35? Fugetta about it. That's right, we couldn't even get recycled content. Now, let me be fair, ArmA 3's engine is a massive improvement over previous series entries. And OFP/ArmA has always been one of those games where the community really takes it the final step with endless content. But Vanilla, the games were usually very playable, and very enjoyable. This is where ArmA 3 comes up the shortest. While the engine is great, and getting better with each patch, not only are we still denied even a basic amount of content, but the underlying issues since OFP are still there. 2013/2014, we still have an action menu. BI, please. Not to mention that AI has somehow found a way to get worse with all these improvements, rather than better. You know, some people actually say ArmA 2 people were spoiled because we had OFP and ArmA 1's content all rolled into one. I find it hard to give sympathy to the people whose job it is to create content and games. Who get paid for it. In closing I will say this. ArmA 3, as a game, is complete and total BS. ArmA 3, as a platform, for people to show their skills in modeling, texturing, and coding, fantastic. If you want ArmA 3, do it to support people who make great content. Just don't expect a full fledged game, for the full fledged price.
pfendler4;-;Keeps Crashing broke
Lazar;-;I have my rig beyond the reccomended specifications, but as this was made by the one and only Bohemia, the game isn't well optimized for some computers. The game itself is nice and can be enjoyed by many, but various bugs and optimization issues make the game unplayable for me.
Jappleack;-;Its a Good game, the Test on the weekend was Great
Sapato[TRADE]{SFM Posters};-;This game had everything to be a good military simulation,everything to be a good experience,but both the devs and the community screwed it up.lets see some cons and pros. Pros: -A few good servers,like king of the hill,and capture the island -Good graphics -Mods -There are a few more,but im just too lazy to list them Cons: -Stupid community;WHY THE  WOULD YOU BUY A ING MILITARY SIMULATOR TO PLAY THAT  AND KIDDY ALTIS LIFE,SANDOX,RPG's, AND ETC ? -Too overpriced. -So many bugs and lag;I commonly get stuck under a rock or inside a wall while playing,and that really pisses me off -Stupid,incompetent and apelative AI;Why the hell in the infantry showcase my whole team dies as soon as they step near that dead guy ?like,it seems that my team's AI is just some down syndrome guys who got in the army,and the enemy AI is like super soldiers,that can hit me in the head with lots of fatigue at 3.5 km away from me,and does it really need a ing rpg to kill 1 ING INFANTRY,RUNNING ALONE AND SCARED AND INJURED ?COME ON -Stupid optimization;why the hell do i get 10-20 fps with med settings WITH A ING I7 -2600 CP-ING-U,A DAMN GTX 760 AND ING 16 GB OF RAM ?WHY THE  ?SO LOW SETTINGS FOR A SO GOOD MACHINE, YOU -Devs milking all the money they can with unnecessary DLC's;Really ?do i have to pay i dont know how much bucks FOR ING STUPID KARTS IN A MILITARY SIMULATOR ? YOU,AND THE GAME LACKS VEHICLES,VEHICLES THAT THE PLAYERS DESERVED FOR THE ING 44,90 BUCKS THEY PAID FOR IT,THE GAMES HAS LIKE,4 DIFFERENT TYPES OF EACH VEHICLE,DO I NEED TO PAY FOR A ING BUNCH OF HELICOPTERS THAT SHOULD BE INCLUDED IN-GAME ? -Poor sounds;when i shoot my gun,it sounds like im slaming my slipper in the ground(not really,but you guys get it) -No interactivity;The only times i hear my characters talk is when they are severely harmed,or when they give orders,and its always the same sound. -Bad instructions;trust me,you will spend more hours trying to learn to give commands,make tactics etc etc than playing the actual game,they just throw you at the game and dont teach you how to play it. -Poor environment;It isnt something actually necessary,but its cool and lots of new games have recently,like i mean,islands like altis and stratis would have tons of different and cool animals,not just animals,but the game world itself,i mean,all you can change in the world is destroy a few houses,and pretty much nothing else. -poor variety of vehicles and weapons. -Horrendous campaign and lack of mission;i mean,there are always user made missions,but none of them are as good as the game devs ones. -stupid fatigue system;damn,it seems people get heart attacks and Parkinson after running 20 meters -Overwhelmingly bad controls -Cars are made out of plastic;I never saw a car break after it hit a barbed fence,but incredibly in arma 3,the barbed fence DISINTEGRATES THE DAMN WHEELS AND AFTER THAT U HAVE 2 OPTIONS:DIE IN THE MIDDLE OF NOWHERE AND RESPAWN,'CAUSE NONE OF THE SELFISH AND NON-TEAM-WORKING  TEAMMATES ARE GOING TO HELP YOU,OR WALK HUNDREDS OF KILOMETERS TO REACH THE DAMN OBJECTIVE AND DIE AS SOON AS YOU STEP THERE. Well,there was much more i wanted to say about this horrible game,but im 2 lazy for it. if you dont wanna read the whole reviews,here's a resume:dont buy it
-SR-Tallamy;-;Been playing since the beginning of the Alpha, and this game has stayed so unique. This game is a genre on it's own, nothing else out there like it. The community surrounding this game makes it all that much better, and the modding community is so big. This game is heavily moddable, which gives the community the tools they need to create anything, there is no limits. This is also one of the more hardcore FPS games out there, it's easy to get used to, but hard to get good at, and you can't do anything without a good team. All this game requires is patience, and the ability to work with other people. In order for me to fully explain how awesome this game is, I'd be sitting here all day typing this review out. 10/10, will never quit playing.
Viper123_SWE;-;ARMA 3 makes me feel like i'm actually a soldier, carrying out objectives and operations like a soldier too instead of this hyper-active nonsensual chaos that is Call of Duty and Battlefield. If you're a fan of ARMA or just hardcore games in general i seriously recommend this. Bohemia once again succeeds at delivering, improved AI and voice acting, stunning graphics and whole new arsenal of semi-futuristic guns, gadgets and vehicles that are sure to impress. Step into a world where one shot is all that is needed, where teamwork truly is important...
HeyManChill;-;This game is so much fun. Dont buy if you have below a dual core though, you wont be able to run it well at all. I have a dual core and play it fine though, no lag or anything. This game is as close as it gets to real life and actually required skill, planning, and patience unlike any other FPS on the market. If you are looking for the best FPS/military simulator look no further. You've found it. Its Arma 3. 11/10 great game
[REF]autumn;-;I have spent over 200 hours now in the alpha and beta alone on a 20-odd square kilometer Island. What's it going to be like on the full 270km2 Island when it's released?! Tactical possibilities are near limitless.
KarelMoricky;-;This is war!
ElensAnima, the Rogue;-;A very nice game, the atmosphere (Im not talking about mods, Im talking about the vanilla game) is almost the same as in ArmA 2. At first the game feels dull, almost boring. Youre bored as to why nothing happens and everything seems so slow, but once you get fired upon, or get targeted by enemy artillery fire and see several squadmates around you bite the dust as you barely survived an artillery shell that injured your legs to a point where you cant run anymore - the game becomes extremely intense. Your squad has been hit by artillery and you are among one of the few who kind of survived that attack, but your legs are injured and the next medic is 1 kilometer away from the AO. So you try to stay alive and slowly walk or crawl back to the military outpost in hopes of getting back to the EVAC zone in time (before the transport chopper flys off or the enemy decides to run a couple of bullets through the rest of your body). So you hump back towards the military outpost that you and your team used to advance from, because you know youre going to survive once you get there as there are many teammates and the EVAC zone is also back there. As you slowly make your way through the open field trying to stay as low as you can, crawling behind bushes - you suddenly hear shots from the distance and know that the enemies are advancing towards the EVAC zone and therefore towards you... You try to make your way as fast as possible, when you read your teamchat talking about the EVAC chopper that is already on its way and almost there and youre still 650 meters away. And as if that wasnt enough of an issue, the enemies have spotted and are now starting to fire at you as well. And as you keep crawling towards the EVAC zone and notice more and more shots hitting the ground very close to you, you know that youre probably not going to make it. And suddenly you hear a sniper firing from the EVAC zone down towards your position. He shoots one enemy rifleman after another and suddenly the teamchat indicates that the EVAC area is clear and that the pilot is going to wait for you... you stand up and try to not make your teammates wait too long for you while feeling happy about having survived such a counterattack without having to click on Respawn. This actually happened to me once. 10/10 would buy again
jansre16 - DEAGLE SPAMMER;-;Consider getting the new 1000 Intel CPU.
theebu [CWL];-;Arma 3 is one of the most versatile mil-sim games out there. The support from the developers alone puts this game at the top of any mil-sim list. The vanilla AI are pretty over-powered for what they do. They can get non-stop headshots from 600m away. But a couple AI mods and they react much more realistically. Coming from Arma2, this is game a huge improvement. The addition of PhysX adds a lot to gameplay. Overall, I'm very impressed with the game. Add the developer modding support, and this game is the top of my list.
PCToast;-;Hey guys and girls :) Okey..lets get started: 1.Should i buy this game? -> Well it depends: First of all, let my say some positive aspects of ARMA 3. Arma 3 is an amazing game with amazing graphics, and gameplay. There are 2 real maps, a big one and a ULTRA big one (dude, so big you wont belive it. You have to walk about 2h [real time] to get from the W-N to S-E..Not joking), 3 campaigns, an editor mode where you can built your own mission and the fantastic multiplayer. But listen up: If you are a cod fan his game is not for you. This game is not about hit and run or just Shoot shoot and shoot..like almost every cod. No no no, this game is about teamplay, it is a war simulator! It makes more fun to do some patrol than the combat itself. You can play it only with 100 pleople and with vehicles like tanks, jets, choppers, submarines and so on. It is a game that never gets bored while playing with friends and always gives you the real combat feeling. But now to the negative: OMG, if you dont have a really really good computer, that means a over 700 dollar pc, you probably wont be able to play arma 3, please note, without lagging and properly.trust me. I have an i7, 12 GB ram and a GTX nvidia 560 and i almost manage it to play it with no lagging at 70 FPS (on standart settings!!!), on high, nozt joking, at 40, but it feels laggy You will have a huge FPS drop (-30) in multiplayer and this is eats away your frames! So, on overall..is it worth to buy this game? -> I can tell you, yes it is! Good job to the developers! Really nice game! I always fancy playing it and it is a unique game! my ration 8/10 -2 only due to the fps issues
Microsoft Powerpoint;-;Arma 3 is a great game. The ArmA community is very good at creating mods and custom missions.
Sash5034;-;If you even manage to get one kill, you will feel like the greatest soldier on the planet. That is, until the rest of the enemy army finds you and kills you from a mile away.
Bschmidt111;-;This game is by far one of the best games that I have ever played. I payed 60.00 for it and have not regretted it since! I love this game to death but I play the mods like Battle Royal and Altis. I recommend this game because it brings you to a new state of gaming. Not only are you able to enjoy 1v1 combat or 2v2 combat u can have wars with eachother if you get the right set of people. I have enjoyed this game more than any other just because I caan basically do whatever I want to do and either evade police to get away with it or be kind and help whoever comes along! If you're loooking for a solid multiplayer game this is the one that will capture your attention more than any other. Not only will you devore 300 hours of gameplay you will begin to shape your personality of gaming to become a Rebel, Cop, or Savior. Love live the X-Generation!
Billetjes;-;This game is just wow. One of the best experiences I've ever had in any game. I really recommend this game! Just make sure your computer can handle it. 10/10
SniperAssasino;-;For those that don't know if they should buy the game or not: This is not Call of Duty or Battlefield.... this is a military simulator! You have acess not only to over 30 weapons but also alot of vehicles, tanks, APC's, IFV's, choppers, jets, boats, anything that real warfare uses. And the vanilla game is not that interesting, thats why we have the workshop that improves your experience on Arma 3! And you can also create your own cenarios with the editor with an interface easy to understand. This video will show you guys why Arma 3 is diferent from all the other military games! https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=ph1mm2KKSv0
girlgamer leithal :c '#Killslef;-;0/10, in' blitzkrieging isn't even effective. like i ran a helicopter into a fagot and he didn't even die. 0/in' 10
Mr. Moonshine;-;Let me start by saying that I have had fun with this game, as you can see by my playtime. But that playtime has been plagued by bugs, glitches, low FPS, and a constant feeling of "Why didn't they...?" in the back of my mind. I never got into ArmA 2 because of its FPS problems, netcode, clunky and unintuitive controls, and just bad game design. ArmA 3 has fixed NONE of these problems. - First off, the performance. The Real Virtuality engine is an engine from the ing 18th century being held together with duct tape and . Server performance still affects client performance. This is a joke. If the server gets overloaded, you are going to be looking at a framerate in the low 20s. This is why performance is so inconsistent. - The player controller is the same one from ArmA 2. This  controller cannot play more than two animations at once, on the legs and the torso. Full body animations like switching weapons require the player to stop moving because of this. Again, this is a joke. Animations are also very stiff and crappy looking. - Same old bugs and glitches from ArmA 2 that were never fixed. You can lean into walls and see through them, much worse if you're using 3rd person. Grass pops in right in front of your eyes. Objects like rocks are incredibly glitchy and can randomly kill you. Vehicle physics are almost non-existent and you will explode from the smallest crash. VOIP is incredibly laggy and sounds like it's coming out of a 90s phone. - Game is supposed to use DX11 when in reality it still uses mostly DX9, one example is shadows. ArmA 3 still uses  stencil shadows instead of soft shadows, even on max settings. Aside from that, visually the game is nothing special. It has nice sunsets and a decent draw distance but up close it's quite ugly. Low res textures are a problem. - The game is billed as a "military sandbox" by Bohemia and a "military simulation" by PC Gamer but ing NOBODY plays it as one. 99% of servers are gamemodes like Wasteland, Epoch, and Altis Life; gamemodes more suited to Grand Theft Auto than a game with as much potential as ArmA 3. Worse still Bohemia has done nothing to prevent this aside from adding that useless End Game gamemode that nobody plays. I was lucky enough to find a server that plays the game as the combined arms game it's supposed to be, and I played a lot on that server, but the FPS was so bad (~25) that I eventually stopped playing. - Stemming from the issue above, tactical PvP just isn't a thing. There is some tactical PvE which I have enjoyed playing, but if you ever wanted to shoot at another player instead of those Terminator bots that can snipe you between the eyes from 2km away with a .45, you're out of luck. - 3rd person. Everyone uses it, or rather abuses it. It's impossible to get the drop on someone in CQC because he's looking at you from around the corner using 3rd person. "Don't play it", you might say. That's impossible, because I have never seen a public server with it disabled. "Don't use it", you might say. Again impossible, because that guy looking over the wall at me will shoot me when I come around the corner unless I use 3rd person to look over the wall too. - Updates are a farce. Game's been out for 2 years and only NOW we're getting bipods, really? The DLC is another joke, 30 euro for two helicopters and a couple of guns, wow Bohemia what a ing deal. - "Never half- two things. Whole- one thing." - Ron Swanson. Driving physics are completely broken if you go anywhere that isn't a flat surface. Plane mechanics are pick-up-and-play. Guns sound like crap and basic stuff like keeping a round chambered doesn't happen. The only saving grace is the combined arms aspect, but alone they're terrible to play. I'm going to stop here because I could go on all day about how  this game is and what it could have been if the devs cared at all. I never write long reviews, but how much I love the concept of this game and how awful the execution is made me. This game is NOT worth 50 euro, maybe 20 at best. The only good things here are the insanely huge maps and moddability of the game. The only reason this game is popular is because there is no other game like it.
Perseus;-;REALISM? REALLY? (this review pertains to the campaign) -Enemies you hit jump three feet in the air (pop! just to let you know you hit them) wtf? -A running simulator often enough, but you are winded after running for 20-30 seconds. Really? Am I a soldier in this game or a lazy  gamer? Don't remind me I am the latter please. -An interface so clunky (and barely explained in the prologue) you will find yourself googling how tos again and again. You really will feel like a lazy  gamer who ended up in a military situation, well done. -Gunfire sounds seem to come from the spot where the bullets landed, NOT where they were fired from. -Passing enemy helicopters never seem to see you/call in a squad to engage you. -AI squadmates run off without you to engage the enemy despite having no ammo, while you are trying to loot bodies for anything useful. -AI squadmates often get tired if you haven't killed an enemy and grenade his  from quite a distance. Which is nice, but after it happens a few times you realize you aren't learning anything. -The impromptu basecamp in the campaign mentioned it had an armory. Nice! Except command for some reason placed the armory outside of camp, on a table, like some peddler, and not inside the base where such assets would be actually safe. I guess that was my problem, I expected realism. To boot, the game has been around since June 25, 2013, and yet the campaign they developed goes from boring to running simulator to incredibly difficult, and is over very quickly. It stands to reason I suppose, since from release they game has felt more like a massive modding toolset than a game released for playing. At least the old operation flashpoint shooters (though buggy, largely unmoddable and hard as hell) had a semblance of a campaign, and the ability to issue orders to your squadmates. Here you are along for the ride, frustrating in most cases, laughable for the rest.
[TMM] pigear6;-;This game is a HUGE improvement over ARMA 2 in terms of the engine and its looks, graphically. The game works much better than the second installment of the series, and is much easier to use. But, the game's setting has completely ruined it for me, I really dont appreciate what bohemia did moving the setting to 2034/2035. I really loved the setting of 1990-early 2000s ARMA 2 provided, and i dont feel that ARMA 3 provides a very immersive feel (For me, anyways) I'm sure there are mods to change the game for the more cold war "feel". But i havnt found many that are what i want.
TheVortex22;-;Before I purchased ArmA 3 I played ArmA 2 and ArmA 2 OA and before that ArmA cold war assault, I did'nt really want to switch to ArmA 3 becuase I heard a lot of bad things about it, but that was when it was in alpha and a little bit after it was out of alpha. I finally caved in and bought it, which I don't regret, sure its ArmA so there is a few glitches and a wierd physics engine, but ArmA is prabably the best military infantry simulator I have played. Now my really only problem with ArmA 3 is that the vanilla game only has futuristic weapons, (like everything thats a prototype or still in development know is in ArmA), but just having a few mods can correct that like RHS, ALIVE, and allinarma. So I do highly recommend this game to anyone that likes milsims, or just likes the ArmA series in general.
syianzi;-;This is the worst optimised game I have ever seen in my entire life. Not only does the frame rate stick around 25 and BELOW, but even when I put the graphics on LOW, Windowed 1024 x 768, it stays the same. Around 25 FPS. I have a great gaming rig and I just can not enjoy this game. Sometimes I joined a game and it stuck around 10fps. Don't waste your money
Deepcuts;-;To be on point: Before purchasing Arma 3 I read about it on forums and on Steam reviews. Indeed, many said that at the moment Arma 3 is just not finished and it is not worth buying and playing as it is. I really liked the game idea and thought that it can't be that bad, so I purchased it. Boy I was in for a big surprise. And I am not talking only about the poor optimization of the game. The whole game feels weird, laggy and just plain wrong. The controls are a mess. For example, to fly with a joystick you have to set all the actions manually. At least in my case. Graphics wise, I might get older but the whole image seems to be blurry and out of sync. Maybe the biggest grief is with super human AI enemies. Somehow they can see you even in the darkest and deepest forest, while there is NO way you can see them, yet alone shoot them. I am sory to say, I regret the purchase and would not advise anyone to try the game in the current state. I would say in a year or so maybe, but not now. In case you want to help out the developer and support the game, by all means, purchase the game now. Play it later :) Do not get me wrong, the idea is super, the complexity is there, visual apeal is there, but it needs a lot of polish to be playable. I would like to state, for the record, that I couldn't get myself to play it for more than one hour. Maybe if I would have spent more time (I guess a lot more) in the game, I would have liked it more. Just for reference: I7 2600k @ 4.4 ghz nVidia GTX 580 1.5 GB RAM 16 GB RAM @ 1600 Mhz CAS 8 Samsung Evo SSD = 40-50 FPS in SP This is just my personal opinion and experience of the game. Take it with a grain of salt. Over and out.
Skipper;-;This is sandox taken to a new scale. This is the tropical beach that makes other would be "sandbox" games seem like a pile of dirt in a schoolyard.
Fraggingfox;-;Hella fun and more immersive than a run n' gun like call of duty, I have found that if you want something that requires a bit more thought than most games, as well as a powerful enough pc, then arma is the game for you
KaosMarine;-;If you like playing arma 2 you will love this game. Better weaponary, better vehicles (tanks, planes, helis and UAV's). The game comes with its own editor so you can try you hand at making up new mission. With a wide variety for downloadable content (more added every day) you will not be disappointed. New DLC's are also being released making this one hot game to own.
Adamski;-;The most accessible game in the series, this is Bohemia Interactive's magnus opus and my favourite instalment since the days of Operation Flashpoint (now ARMA: CWC) and it's incredible addons, the technological leap is huge and the possibilities for the end user are limitless, catering to any taste with a very active modding community to boot, potentially taking it far beyond a mil-sim. I have owned this game since the alpha phase and has been worth every penny, it's never been perfect but the development team are constantly striving to make it so. One of the greatest titles I've had the pleasure of owning on the PC for many years.
Cody Izzo;-;When you've got Alphas to roll with, you dont have a need for those ing Beta s that sit in your thread and act all macho, you ARE the macho and you ARE the number one. In direct contrast to the cheap chinese knockoff LEGA III, ARMA III brings the war to you, redefining your keyboard layout with such quirky lines as "oh  I just hit G, I thought it was gear!!!!!" - (You, famous last words 2013) There are also intuitive minigames that allow you to strip down with your fellow soldiers after a hard day on the field. When times are tough, sometimes you gotta get close and personal with a brand new BATTLE BUDDY. Just wait, soon we'll have our own dedicated section on http://fanfiction.net for ARMA~ The future is here, and it's really ing gay.
Tempifyed;-;Various gamemodes to play! very fun. Try altis life as being a cop! hahah its soo fun! I LOVE IT
L0cK;-;For everyone that loves military simulations, best game ever, this is like Battlefield and Ghost Reacon in one game :)
4./JG26_Kraut!;-;I cannot say enough about this game, it is my current favorite shooter/combine arms game. Graphics and scale of the maps are just insane! This is one of the last games around that is built FOR modders and the quality and quantity of community made missions, assets, and features is mind blowing. My only complaint are the performance issues of running the game, but it's OK for the most part. Give it a try, you will love it!
Devilskills;-;...a wonderful game, to loose yourself in it for hours. It has a kinda big learning curve, but its acctually worth going threw it. I enjoy myself in the Multiplayer a lot and love the challange of battleing other gamers while doing Missions. Addons such as the TFR, JSRS or the Nato-Speznas weapons make it to a real nice Warfare simulation. It requires a good CPU and GPU, but all in all its a nice game to play and i am happy i purchased it ;)
Adamski;-;The most accessible game in the series, this is Bohemia Interactive's magnus opus and my favourite instalment since the days of Operation Flashpoint (now ARMA: CWC) and it's incredible addons, the technological leap is huge and the possibilities for the end user are limitless, catering to any taste with a very active modding community to boot, potentially taking it far beyond a mil-sim. I have owned this game since the alpha phase and has been worth every penny, it's never been perfect but the development team are constantly striving to make it so. One of the greatest titles I've had the pleasure of owning on the PC for many years.
Nirvana;-;Arma 3 is hands down the pinnacle of MILSIM. With real world physics, amazing textures, and a community that just doesn't stop, you will be hard pressed to not enjoy this amazing title. If you have the time and money to invest into this, you will not regret it. Don't let the military simulation aspect of this title scare you away! Yes, that is the engine's intent. However, there is a massive community that plays non-military things in this amazing engine. Endless hours of fun await you, friends. I hope to see you on the battlefield. HOO-AH!
Sensei Rio;-;Went to a weed field to gather some cannabis and got arrested by undercover cops. 10/10 would sell weed again.
ProfessorShanks;-;Honest Review Review is based on current state of game. Game Pros Open World  Mod Support  Multiplayer  Realistic Mechanics  Vehicles (Air and Ground)  Day/Night Cycle  Weather System  Frequent updates Game Cons FPS is spotty (Depending on server and your computer specs)  Server list has trouble loading sometimes Relateable Games N/A Conclusion ArmA III is a fantastic and realistic war simulation game. With a ton of mod support and game modes, you will surely get a ton of hours of enjoyment in this game. (If you found this review helpful, consider giving it a thumbs up!)
hooficure;-;Great graphics, gameplay is pretty realistic. That being said. This is 1 of the worst games I have ever played. The training teaches less than half of the controls. Trying to find out how to do things like healing are frustrating, and while dying due to ignorance, you have to start over on a mission every time you die due to " you, telling you basic game controls is for ." The game would be awesome if the programmers thought training had it's uses.
penzzy;-;I've got to say, this game is truly great in most ways.I've played for how long i do not know but i did play a lot, the problem is you play for hours and hours with doing almost nothing to just get killed by someone who has all the stuff...
Whiit;-;I would definitly recommend people that love the military or just strategic shooters in general to buy this, and if you are not happy with in game content you have a rich amount of mods and modder that will keep the game interesting for years :) All in All ArmA is a Mil-Sim Sanbox that is very fun to play.
The Unpredictable Jack;-;Alright. I play ArmA 2 : Complete Edition and i want to compare these as this is supposed to be a great sequel. To start off, the first look at this game for me was something amazing. The game is stunning, it is, and the maps are totally gorgeous! "BUT" When i got more into the game, i found out that there is extreme lack of more content. The game gives you just "basic" weapons and vehicles, just small ammounts of them, and allows you to spend another 20 dollars on DLCs that add just a bit of content, not like ArmA 2 that gave you A LOT of items etc. right away for an awesome price. Alright, its not a major problem, lets ignore it for a second. Now, the gameplay itself. The game is definitely much easier to orient in AND the new loadout system is really awesome. There is a problem trought. The game itself suffers from some bugs even after the release, and the ragdolls dont make any sence. The game itself is NOT WORTH the money you can pay for it, and bohemia doesent seem to try and develop it more, they just release more DLCs The A.I. improved, it did, but not a lot considering its already 7 years from ArmA 2 release, and ArmA 2 has pretty ok A.I Now the campaing. I did got a bit into it but i dont feel like its actually worth it playing it if you are here for the reason ArmA series is so popular - Army simulator - The game is no longer a great simulator, as bohemia decided to make this game in future. Now for the "future thing" There is actually not a lot of "futuristic" content as most vehicles and weapons are used in the army right now! The game cannot be called a simulator if it has "futuristic" stuff in it. Now models etc. The game does look great, and has excellent textures. The problem is that OFFOR looks like some aliens! What the hell is that bohemia? If you compare some of the vehicles of all factions together, you will find out that they most of the time just have another textures. Bohemia, you are being lazy here :/ Maps Maps are the best thing along with graphics in this game (maybe the only 2 good things) They look awesome, are high res, and really excellent. No problem here whatever :-) Graphics The game looks stunning, no problem with that. The game is O.K optimized but it uses only max 2 CPU Cores. If you have a lot of units it will lag horribly. GPU optimization is ok. DLCs Horrible. The DLCs have just a few things and they cost A LOT! Not a good thing Physics The ragdolls, dont make any sense, when you shoot someone in the head with a .50 sniper rifle, it should knock him back a bit. Nope, he just falls dont like you would hit him with a arrow... The car physics are ok, but the tanks have some problems. You can make tanks fly if you crash 2 of them together. Final verdict I expected A LOT from this game. I did not get what i payed for AT ALL. There is NOT ENOUGHT of content, the whole futuristic idea is bad, and the DLCs are horrible. The game looks great, but doesent run well. The game was a horrible mess in alpha. They fixed the biggest bugs. The game feels like a unfinished development concept. I hope if ever ArmA 4 comes out, its going to be back in this time, not in future. I recommend you ArmA 2 Complete edition if you want a great army simulator. This is not one. If i would look at this game in the perspective from a guy that never played ArmA game i would say its 8/10 But i played ArmA already. I am going to give it 6.5/10 I DO NOT Recommend this to anyone that wants a realistic war game. I RECCOMEND this game to anyone that wants to see something new apart from classic FPS games So, thank you for reading this LONG review, i hope you agree with me. Tell me if anything is wrong, i will fix it :-) Have a nice day!
GroundForcez;-;The big floppy ballsucker banned me Well a hacker did along with 14 others off the alpha papa gaming community and then the big floppy  wont unban any of us saying we need to buy a new copy of the ing  as bum fluff game it was a good game until u realise that the anti hack got hacked So yeh the IRONY well they can go shove there game up there  and i hope the battleye Developer dies of Herpes,Aids,A Hemroid, Prostate cancer,Testicular Cancer and Radiation poison to cold hearted Chicken wing and i hope they get run over by a bus full of black school children cos that wud be funny the ing white  every1 hates battleeye off the alpha papa gamign community and Battleeye are just another cumstain on a tea towel urs sincerely the entire alpha papa gamign community :)
[HSF] JayRaptor;-;Buy It.
JoeViiZaa;-;Own a computer with better than the recommended specs 20 fps on medium 10/10 would lie again
Terflium;-;Although the game itself is beautiful and realistic, it isn't something I like. It is a bit too complicated and serious, but I didn't know what to expect and I guess this is a realistic war simulator. For people who like more guided games, this isn't for you, but for the free roam war simulator type? This is all yours.
dPl3x CSGOFAST.COM;-;So why is this still $59.99 USD? Stop being money hungry Bohemia Interactive please..
Madhat;-;They sold DLC to make the tripods work that came out on release day... I need to pay extra to fix broken a game? I made a huge mistake buying DayZ and ARMA, I will not support Bohemia Interactive anymore.
Kraven;-;This game is brilliant, as all the other reviews will most-likely say too. It's very simular to Arma 2 of course but with even more added features, improved UI's and stunning graphics. The campaign is a little tricky but that's part of the fun and the online multiplayer is extremely enjoyable. It kind of reminded me of Battlefield mixed with Planetside? - Either way, some of the most enjoyable PC gaming can easily be had playing this work-of-art game! Anything bad to say? No. Although many have most-likely listed a full article on all the flaws and glitches. Honestly, I didn't notice anything bad whilst playing neither will you unless you're a straight-out critic.
DeShooter142;-;Best 20 fps you could ever ask for.
(Insert Meme Here);-;Got this game 3 days ago goes half off today 11/10 would waste $30 extra dollars again
COOOOLTHARD;-;They keep releasing 15 dollar DLC when the game STILL HAS THE SAME BUGS AS ARMA 2. I cannot reccomend a game that the developers don't want to optimize or bugfix. Do not buy this game the developers do not care about releasing content or bug fixing issues (for free) that have existed since the game was in early access Alpha. THE GAME IS STILL UNFINISHED, it runs at 30 FPS on GTX 970 with and I7 processor. You phase through walls and your character gets stuck on EVERYTHING. I have 980 hours on ArmA 2 go check for yourself, this game can go  off.
Brutallica;-;If you like games with crappy controls, bad gameplay, and no incentive to do anything then this is the game for you. I played for a few hours and 50% of my time was spent walking around the woods getting blown up by random mines that I could not find or avoid. It seemed like any direction I walked in I would just explode. And when i managed to get past that AI that were out of my guns range just took potshots at me till i died. And to top it all off the game mechanics are only briefly explained, and not very well. I will never play this game again. I play games to relax and have fun, not to die 50 times just to walk to an objective. Bottom line is if you want to play a fun entertaining game this is not for you, but if your really into playing for 5 hours to just to walk to meet up with people by all means this game will be in your top 10.
Replika;-;Most horribly unoptimised thing i have put onto my PC, plays just great in single player but if you want to play online and see more than 20 frames per second you better have the best PC mony can buy! as in 8 cores, 4 GPUs, solid state hard drive the works! and forget the fixes you found on youtube they dont work either nothing does! behemia are the worst developers on earth and you will never find a game that falls on it's face as hard as this game does online you have been warned!
Dordan;-;Terrible game, developers highly ignored optimizing and fixing bugs in the game. Almost unplayable on multiplayer because of the lack of hit detection, sky rocketing desync, and minimal power usage resulting in less than 20 fps at times. Keep in mind I have a $1200 rig. Now for the good: The concept and basic features of the game are wonderful. If the developers worked out the kinks involved with the networking/performance aspect of the game it would be a five star game. That is the only reason I do not recommend it. Fix the bugs and it's a wonderful game. As of right now it is unplayable.
Remove emotion;-;Despite many warnings from the community, bohemia decided to do the right thing and shove their thumb up their butts and not work off of a decent engine, again. Thus resulting in 90 FPS in single player, down to 10 - 15 in multiplayer, servers can't even handle all the scripts that their idiotic owners apply to said server, resulting in massive jam to be applied on your end of the game. Instead of fixing the AI, glitches and trying to optimize the game, bohemia has decided to pump out new content that adds to the previous issues stated above. What's that? You want single player? Oh well you'll have to wait for them to finish pumping out those SP episodes, why yes they are free, as they should be, as you have just paid for a $60 dollar alpha. Oh and the only thing people play in this "realistic army sim" is a god damn RPG average civi game type where you role play YOUR ACTUAL BORING LIFE.
Blitz Mk4;-;Went in to the game based on the reviews, the only good part of it is the team capture mode which makes the game sort of like a real life war. Everything else is a waste of your time/life, game is infested with little boys who haven't even hit puberty and will bad mouth you all day, half the servers are terribly laggy and the game is still very buggy. i.e. moving next to a wall and getting ported through, walking through a glass window and getting stuck, etc. etc. Personally I feel the game was a complete waste of my money as there are many other games in this genre that do it much better and are much more worth your time, since more then half the game you will legit spend driving to nowhere land just to get a gun/money only to come back and get hit once and die. I do not recommend this game to anyone as it should be free, because that is all it is worth.
IceSpartan20;-;Amazing game but terrible at the same time i played a good 210hrs of the game just to get on the next day and see i was banned i tried contacting them and they did nothing but i researched it and i dont have it the worst people have played for 5hrs and been banned for nothing dont recommend this game at all.
Spankster;-;This could have been a great game, the problem is the developers of the engine are stuck in the 1990s and made an engine that dont take advantage of your GPU. With an i7 2600 and GTX 780 i have between 20-30 FPS, and i have that on absolutely maxed out settings as well as the lowest possible. There is only one reason to even consider this game, and its for the great mod community. But overall, this company does not deserve any of your money.
Jannick;-;One of the best games i have ever played
Tess Ticles;-;Played this game for a bit, its a little fun.
Dummy Cook;-;Ok time for me to get around to this. At first, Coming from ARMA 2 vet, it was quite confusing to play seeing how control are tad bit different. However I quickly learned it was for good. You no longer need to scroll and select action menu. For simple item, you can just enter boxes, open door, pick up item just one click away. For complicated stuff, action menu is there for you. But remmeber, do use mousewheel select or you'll shoot instead. Haha. Also Gears are now Inventory. So thats I not G because G will drop a nade and kill you. Now for the game. I personally disliked the future theme it had going on. However, Thankful for Armaholic and super easy new mod system. I was able to mod the game back to current year. Not 2035. I recommend getting a faction addon such as Canadian Force or Us Infantry with NATO - Spetsnaz Weapon Pack. They will make the game MORE better. Now I am making scenario like madman and playing it. Love how you can customize weapon, love how you can select gears and helmet to use. (Grass Helmet for the win) Vanilla 4/10 with Mods 20/10 Also you dont need to wear pant or condom to play this.
Fuxsas;-;This game best of first person shooting.If you play it with friends, you really enjoy it !! 10/10
Braedot;-;This game is amazing. Not only can you get just about any mod you want for it- you can get Breaking Point- DayZ in Arma. You can play Altis Life- make money and act a civilian or go do illegal things. You can play King Of The Hill- Get some PVP in. This is the best Multiplayer simulator and is definitely an amazing purchase that I've made and I'll never regret.
(-_- ) <UGA> King Yack Henry;-;A3 is a great tactical army sim, has so much to do it is very hard to get bored. great community (in places) and great mods available via ArmAholic. Granted it has its bugs (like the rest) but they are slowly but surely fixing it. 9/10. Would recommend to anyone
Lymanity;-;If you are considering buying Arma 3 for the multiplayer there are a few things you should know... About the multiplayer: There are several modes of multiplayer. There's Life, which is like an role playing type scenario. There's Wasteland, which is like DayZ but without zombies. There's also the several military combat oriented multiplayer modes. Multiplayer can be rewarding, but the Arma community is extremely diverse in the way people play their game. There are some casual players, but you will also encounter real military simulation enthusists. If you like to have fun, I suggest you approach the latter group with some degree of caution. They're not all bad, but I have run into some that have Units (Arma's term for clans) that do uniform inspections, boring training and, in one case, would not admit women to their unit because it wasn't "realistic". Just remember, if you're not having fun then it isn't worth your time and you should immediately ditch those people that are being such a drag. Other then that, the multiplayer can get quite laggy, but you can usually find another server to play on if that's the case. And bring a book because you can expect a lot of downtime in some modes of multiplayer. The game itself is a bit buggy. It can break your immersion at times, but when it really counts (in firefights) it rarely glitches out on me. This is a CPU intensive game. If you have a so-so processor but a good video card you may have to do some tweeks to make the game run in a satisfactory manner. Overall, I enjoy it a bunch. There's a lot to learn and I'm quite happy with the game.
PlasticArmyThug;-;best. game. ever. If you like battlefield but hate it for the things, you'll absolutely enjoy this game!
sn0w;-;Highly Recommended Great Graphics, Epic Gameplay, endless options for Multiplayer modes (Though CTI and TDM are my favorite!) I fell in love with this game, it simply rocks, though one should be aware this is nothing like the BF series etc, you either love or hate Arma, as simple as that. If you like games like AA3 and Red Orchestra etc. chances are you will absolutley love Arma. All in all give it a try if its on a Steam Sale or if once of your friends already got it.
Acesential;-;The ARMA series has always been more of a simulator than a video game. As such, it is not easy to get into. There are tons of keybinds, the movement systems feels wonky due to being so tied to the animation system, and confrontations seem more a test of patience rather than reflex, engagements usually at 100 meters or more. It also doesnt help that the AI can be incredibly incredibly stupid. Despite this, the series has garnered a strong following that has created a community of serious players that is hard to find anywhere else. Now, comes ARMA 3 ARMA 3 is not a fundamentally different game, but the developers have learned from the past, and they have given this iteration a sense of polish that makes it refreshing to this jaded ARMA fan, and very enticing to those curious about the series, but otherwise intimidated by ARMA 2 and 1. First off, ARMA 3 looks stunning. The island is modeled after a real Mediterranean island, and it shows- there is a strong sense of authenticity as you walk, run, fly, and fight through the landscape. It is worth plopping down a unit in the editor and just walking around, absorbing the sights. The vastly improved lighting engine really adds to the entire experience. Lighthouses illuminate the world convincingly, and fires cast an impressive glow. What makes the game feel so much better is the improved controls. No longer do you move like a "drunken mudcrab" as one of my friends so succinctly said. Indeed- the past games always made movement a struggle, with its reverse mouse acceleration, clumsy walking and running, and strange deadzone/free aim mechanic (which a lot of ARMA fans swear by, but I personally detest). Now with ARMA3, the mouse is no longer hampered by that pesky reverse acceleration, movement is more fluid (with some nice little touches such as tactical pace), and it introduces a fantastic modifier system that lets you pop up and down, left and right, for each stance. Its a simple addition, but adds so much to the combat, especially in a world where no cover is a perfect chest high wall. The game also comes with a powerful editor. While it is extremely daunting, even the most passing user can make some interesting scenarios, and for those who really want to learn, there are tools that will let you decompile other peoples missions to see how they do things. Its very much worth exploring, especially if you enjoy thinking of tactical what if situations. What is most impressive is that my experiences with ARMA 3 so far have only been in alpha. Despite this, it runs and plays great, and things can only get better from here. Already, with the second update, performance and stability has increased tremendously. As an alpha, I am already recommending this game highly. Honestly, if you are tired of the constant closed quarter combat corridor shooters like Call of Duty, and if Battlefield 3 just doesnt seem real enough for you, check out ARMA 3. It just might scratch that itch of yours.
Science Kid;-;9/10 A fantastic game from Bohemia Interactive, honestly the only thing lacking is some real weaponry used today. It seems a tiny bit too fictional but mods can sort that :)
Ace is a sleepy motherfucker;-;So. This is one of my Favourite games of all times, since ArmA 1 and CnC Commanders was released. People are complaining about the missing campaigns, being impatient and just douching all over the place because its not a CoD. This game is just like the best MIlSimulator ive ever played, right after ArmA 2 OA. Bohemnia interactive did a very fine job. It has bullet penetration. The soldiers are highly customizable and damn... it is even supporting Mods and encouraging people to create stuff. If you want a real multi-player and FPS capable game, please buy this. Its just amazing. Graphics and Gameplay is O-U-T-S-T-A-N-D-I-N-G. ArmA 2 Needed an additional mod, called ACE, this game here, does not even need any more realism mods, because it IS Realism itself! Worth the money. Fun to play. 9.5/10 -Acekiller.
Doozey;-;Overall, the game is pretty good. I myself can say that I am somewhat pleased with it, the Map is HUGE and very fun to explore it's just with a 200 square kilometer map you would have more then just 14 air vehicles, maybe more planes and helicopter. They did mention they will be releasing new DLC for the game thank god I bought this when it was in Alpha. Otherwise I wouldn't be buying all that DLC. Bohemia in my opinion needs to step up their game and realise there is more to please then just the general European public. :)
KaZumaKat;-;If Call of Duty is a Hollywood "military porn" movie, and Battlefield is the docudrama on military subjects, Arma is the trip down to the local military base, spending time on the range and on the obstacle course, and learning the real deal from the real people. Its about as close as you can get without signing up. Arma 3 is a sandbox infantry simulator with a focus on authenticity, set in a near-future ficticious scenario of 2035, wherein NATO is but a shadow of its former (aka: current-day) self, and a new enemy of Iranian origin begins a localized takeover of a small collection of islands in the Agean Sea, leading to a potential "flashpoint" of a wider war between NATO-allied nations near the Medittereanean and the Iranian-led "CSAT" forces, with Greek-based freedom fighters and the Greek army caught inbetween. There is a large focus (stemming from 4 games prior, not including expansions) on realism, and not the Hollywood "realism" that Call of Duty or Battlefield would throw at you. This game has proper modelling of terminal ballistics (range, ballistics drop, penetration, deflection, windage), proper modelling of the kilometers of distances you'll oftentimes have to travel, proper weapons, vehicles, and equipment modelling and mechanics, and proper tactics and strategy implementation. How proper? Well the seminal game of the series, let alone this infantry simulator genre, was the penultimate "Operation Flashpoint" of 2001 (now named Arma: Cold War Assault), which led to the development of the Virtual Battlespace 1 and 2 interactive training simulator aids that are currently being used by world militaries around the world, alongside the next games in the series (with the new name), Armed Assault (or Arma). Whilst there is a singleplayer campaign of due note (and one that is highly recommendable to newcomers to the series as the campaign since Arma 1 has always been structured to deliver a solid singleplayer experience at the same time introduce and teach the fundamental mechanics of the game), the real focus of the game is in its sandbox nature, allowing a very fanatic and vibrant community to create missions of all kinds, oftentimes with a multiplayer bent, for the game. Many of these missions are in the Steam Workshop, a first for the series. The multiplayer aspect of this game is extensive and ranges from straight-up "hardcore" simulation fanatics, exercising proper military procedures, tactics, and actions, to GTA-like -Life servers, Wasteland (read: DayZ in Arma), and everything in between (Insurgency, and Domination/Invade&Annex). In fact, many of the aformentioned gameplay types are all community-born, with the different communities that play Arma oftentimes having vastly different variants of each type, with many having a lot of bleed-over into each other, or being a singular experience on their own. One's multiplayer experiences are oftentimes directly tied to the quality of the people that share the same experience with you, and Arma's many communities are a notch above the expected grade, with all kinds from laid-back to straight-up, oftentimes with people who are former and even current serving military. You wont feel alone if you look around, and the people you will find are of all kinds, many for the better. This game is highly recommended to those who feel that Battlefield is not a solid enough experience and want to get deeper into the mindset of a soldier in a more authentic worldspace, and want to see how and why military tactics of today work they way they work, from close-quarters battle (CQB) in room clearing, to urban MOUT combat and open areas, to infantry - mechanized - armor - air interplay and supports.
Broken Wings Social Movements;-;A-Must-Have-Game!
Kovacs.;-;Some Epic mods on this game. Breaking Point, Wasteland and King of The Hill being my favourite. Worth buying for any of those mods on thier own!
Dunny Bowl;-;High quality vegetation simulator with plenty of things to do
Trapista.Sweaty;-;so....many....buttons!
Cpt. Poontang Soap MacTavish;-;https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rdl1jaby9xU *EDIT* also after all the updates and optimization, im proud to say the game runs well on my amd FX 8320 and GTX 660
Taco [13BW];-;Drove really fast in a tank and flipped it 10 outta 10 for best tanks.
HawkEye [161st V-SOAR];-;It may have it's flaws, but it is a fantastic military sim, especially when played on multiplayer.
Rick (Feral Circus);-;If you love to simulate and experience LARGE scale combat (of any type) then you should own this right NOW... The ability to create literally any scenario that your mind can imagine using the mission editor, which is like Photoshop but for creating vile horrific wars instead of pretty pictures :-) Don't try to compare ARMA to any other FPS! This isn't just a game, it is a lesson... It will teach you how to understand ballistics and engage targets at long range using scopes correctly. You will learn how to read a topographical map & compass properly. It will make you understand the importance of team work. BUT MOST IMPORTANTLY you will get to experience shooting the living fu@k out of all your friends :-) With TrackIR (head tracking) + a good sound mod this really is the ultimate MILSIM I've been waiting for a game like this ever since I used to play Blitz on my Commodore VIC-20 lol Just gets better and better EVERYONE NEEDS THIS...
STEELERS0820;-;This game is like no other you can not compair it to any other game exsept is prier vesions of the game love it #sawg http://www.anzuswargames.info/
1stLtG Ahmed;-;This is great
wiccan;-;cool
Tom-oh;-;Good game with a constant flow of mods. Bohemia definatley needs to sort out the extreme CPU loads causing crappy FPS!!
Parasite, VACation Back in 7days;-;worth 40 not much else to say.
ReS (doing some upgrades);-;Perfect for OPERERATING OPERATIONALLY IN AN OPERATIONAL OPERATION.
Paladin-UK;-;Very good game: it has good realistic combat scenarios packed with a very powerful editor which can be used for countless hours of fun! Worth getting, especially on sale.
Arkhir;-;I had to add some more things to this review, as I started to appreciate it even more after some time spent in the game, both playing and creating content. I tend to get rambly, so this is going to be a TL;DR version for you if you don't like reading textwalls: It's just awesome. Very immersive and deep, rewarding, satisfying, milsim experience. 1st episode of campaign took me 4 hours of gameplay on its own. Both multiplayer and singleplayer are great, along with the community-made content available via workshop. Looks beautiful on graphics cranked up to ultra ;) I was even able to set my sampling to 150% without any performance loss after the recent updates and I have to say - the graphics are phenomenal. Second and third episodes of campaign were good as well, added up towards a complete story which gave me some backup on game's plot and situation on Altis in 2035. Zeus is very exciting, but it takes some practice and experience to provide players with fun time. Fatigue & weapon inertia updates added a lot of depth to shooting. Now there is rotorLib to come along with shooting from vehicles, and that's going to change helo flying entirely. See what I'm doing here? I'm proving you the devs constantly make this game better, it evolves within your eyes, and every day you play it you find something new about it, for example - recently I found out the angular size of the moon is actually correct, the night sky mapping is accurate and you can navigate using the northern star, and measure the distance using your compass and mils on it, like in real life. Enough of this rambling. I have to say it's breathtakingly good. The possibilities it offers, the dev team which continues to add deepness to it... Some people don't like the recent updates, but for me these updates just build up more realism and add to overall greatness. And the team takes feedback into account, having really good policies both on DLCs and on new content put into the game. Things you can do modding it are pretty crazy. I'll give you an example for better understanding: - The game itself, in vanilla version, features pretty complex ballistic mechanics. It also features exhaust pipe particle effect of hot air. What has one to do with another you might ask? Well, a mod author took the first one, added much more deepness to create accurate ballistic simulation, and even used the particle effect I've mentioned earlier to simulate bullet trace effect in high-power optics... Yup, you can do anything you want with this game.
Schmee;-;Arma 3 beautifully continues the legacy of the Arma franchise. At no point in this game did I not stop to take in where I was. Altis and Stratis, the two maps, are stunning. The main map, Altis is very large and just that perspective alone is astounding. If you are playing Arma for the first time, I HIGHLY recommend playing around with the editor and single player before delving in online. This is not a pick up and play type of game. There are aspects that take some time to get accustomed to and you will not get it your first time playing. I cannot wait to see what modders have to offer in the coming months and years to make this game even better.
McGuinness (  );-;V good this game is very good becuase i think it's 100% gagster and it's very good. You can play many games on the game and it's very good becuase of this. I would add this game stands out for not being too arcade and this attributes to it's very goodness and some of my friends play they say it's very good I would recommend this to those looking for a very good game and a very good time especially if you have a very good group of friends to play some good organised very good games. There's many good roles to play some more good than others and some are the most good. Thank.
RenderSilent;-;Arma 3 like all the rest of the series, will only offer what you put into it - after all its not really a game is it. Try the editor and learn what you are capable of doing in arma, then apply that knowledge according to what you want to see - for me - personally, i'd preffer life like realism.. and my reward - is what i've learned not to do in a real situation - how will you play arma? - Dont let my arma online XP fool you, i have been scripting in arma since moby  was a minnow - i still dont know what its capable of - remember.. a simple quotation mark, being misplaced can make you frusterated and trying for minutes or even hours to end the script you knew only a few months ago - 8)) - i've been there - Example: !alive nearestObject [obj1, "House"]; <--- this took me 25 min to figure out that i was not putting an exclamation mark in beginning - it tells weather or not the obj is alive or not - in this case it was not and i needed to represent that - you see - simple, but it can cause discreppancy with the whole scipt not understanding what you want - so read over it always - and yes.. i felt stupid when i finally got it right, but that is how it works. welcome to arma logic ;) i recommend arma 3 and all the rest, to anyone bored with cod or battlefield or counterstrike or what ever you need a break from - peace out - - RenderSilent -
Pizzaready;-;ACE when?/10
McGuinness (  );-;V good this game is very good becuase i think it's 100% gagster and it's very good. You can play many games on the game and it's very good becuase of this. I would add this game stands out for not being too arcade and this attributes to it's very goodness and some of my friends play they say it's very good I would recommend this to those looking for a very good game and a very good time especially if you have a very good group of friends to play some good organised very good games. There's many good roles to play some more good than others and some are the most good. Thank.
Hard Bass Addict;-;The best MILSIM shooter out there. It can be as realistic and immersive as you want with the addition of the community mods that are available. The single-player campaigns are great and the recent addition of a bootcamp will give new players a way to get familiar with the game and it's controls.
Skylar;-;This a MAJOR improvement of the last Arma game. Graphics are better and the physics. I wish the damage system was a bit updated but no matter, Its so much fun with 2 massive islands to explore :D Don't waste $$$ on MW or BF... get ARMA. Lasting Appeal - 8.5 Graphics - 9.5 Sound - 10 Gameplay - 10
Parasite, VACation Back in 7days;-;worth 40 not much else to say.
ReS (doing some upgrades);-;Perfect for OPERERATING OPERATIONALLY IN AN OPERATIONAL OPERATION.
Paladin-UK;-;Very good game: it has good realistic combat scenarios packed with a very powerful editor which can be used for countless hours of fun! Worth getting, especially on sale.
Arkhir;-;I had to add some more things to this review, as I started to appreciate it even more after some time spent in the game, both playing and creating content. I tend to get rambly, so this is going to be a TL;DR version for you if you don't like reading textwalls: It's just awesome. Very immersive and deep, rewarding, satisfying, milsim experience. 1st episode of campaign took me 4 hours of gameplay on its own. Both multiplayer and singleplayer are great, along with the community-made content available via workshop. Looks beautiful on graphics cranked up to ultra ;) I was even able to set my sampling to 150% without any performance loss after the recent updates and I have to say - the graphics are phenomenal. Second and third episodes of campaign were good as well, added up towards a complete story which gave me some backup on game's plot and situation on Altis in 2035. Zeus is very exciting, but it takes some practice and experience to provide players with fun time. Fatigue & weapon inertia updates added a lot of depth to shooting. Now there is rotorLib to come along with shooting from vehicles, and that's going to change helo flying entirely. See what I'm doing here? I'm proving you the devs constantly make this game better, it evolves within your eyes, and every day you play it you find something new about it, for example - recently I found out the angular size of the moon is actually correct, the night sky mapping is accurate and you can navigate using the northern star, and measure the distance using your compass and mils on it, like in real life. Enough of this rambling. I have to say it's breathtakingly good. The possibilities it offers, the dev team which continues to add deepness to it... Some people don't like the recent updates, but for me these updates just build up more realism and add to overall greatness. And the team takes feedback into account, having really good policies both on DLCs and on new content put into the game. Things you can do modding it are pretty crazy. I'll give you an example for better understanding: - The game itself, in vanilla version, features pretty complex ballistic mechanics. It also features exhaust pipe particle effect of hot air. What has one to do with another you might ask? Well, a mod author took the first one, added much more deepness to create accurate ballistic simulation, and even used the particle effect I've mentioned earlier to simulate bullet trace effect in high-power optics... Yup, you can do anything you want with this game.
maionaze;-;A very distinct game from the mainstream FPS out there. Its built in editor allows players to create custom missions for both SP and MP which extends the game life beyond it's packaged content . For the best experience find yourself a group to play with on MP.
a pyro;-;it is much more fun than watching paint dry!!!
Cpt. Poontang Soap MacTavish;-;https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=rdl1jaby9xU *EDIT* also after all the updates and optimization, im proud to say the game runs well on my amd FX 8320 and GTX 660
Traeyu;-;This is a great game, very in-depth shooter.
Mr. Skelebones;-;Bean Bag Buccaneers is a two player children's game, the object of which is to pick up your treasure chest on the central island and sail back safely. Each player has a giant sailing ship as their main game piece. Each ship has a removable sail, two trigger-action side panels, and a huge spring-driven cannon. Players take turns moving forward along a prescribed track and shooting bean bags at their opponent's ship. A hit on one of the side panels will force it to pop off and give the player a free shot at the other side; a hit forcing the sail off becalms the ship for a turn. To add to the pirate flavor, each player also has an eye patch. Wearing these will slightly affect depth perception and add a marginal bit of sport to the shooting. This game retailed for the somewhat impressive sum of $16 back in 1962. With its huge plastic ships (close to a foot long), giant vinyl play mat, and the eye patches, it may well stand as one of the more overproduced games of the early 1960s. Bean Bag Buccaneers. 10/10 goty
Robin;-;Best combat simulator of all types to this day with a varied selection of add-ons via the Steam workshop
[Volk]Gunslinger1127;-;Awesome grahpics and really realistic! The most realistic game out there!! Right now its in alpha but its really good for its state!! Theres gonna be way more in the offical game though but what it is right now is a good start!!
Don Don Donuts;-;you can get the attack gunship at the start, so there's no reason to get killstreaks this isn't a very good game unless you like halo
Jameson Locke;-;This game is awesome, but sometimes when you play this game, some serious drama and sad things happen. Just like a movie.
PsychoWolf;-;pretty good game and is fun even though it's a simulator
Hard Bass Addict;-;The best MILSIM shooter out there. It can be as realistic and immersive as you want with the addition of the community mods that are available. The single-player campaigns are great and the recent addition of a bootcamp will give new players a way to get familiar with the game and it's controls.
Why You Kill John Madden;-;Picture yourself standing in the middle of ing nowhere then having to run 60 miles to get home, you picturing that? Well the game should really be called Arma 3 the real jogging simulator or dream smasher because let me tell ya you run for that long and get some cool gear, you're probably gonna get killed
Pop ayy;-;extremely good game, its very open in what you can do
Bot_268;-;One of the better games i have played. It has a few bugs but when played with a few mods a good group of people the game shows what it s about and just how good it is. 10/10
Science Kid;-;9/10 A fantastic game from Bohemia Interactive, honestly the only thing lacking is some real weaponry used today. It seems a tiny bit too fictional but mods can sort that :)
Ace is a sleepy motherfucker;-;So. This is one of my Favourite games of all times, since ArmA 1 and CnC Commanders was released. People are complaining about the missing campaigns, being impatient and just douching all over the place because its not a CoD. This game is just like the best MIlSimulator ive ever played, right after ArmA 2 OA. Bohemnia interactive did a very fine job. It has bullet penetration. The soldiers are highly customizable and damn... it is even supporting Mods and encouraging people to create stuff. If you want a real multi-player and FPS capable game, please buy this. Its just amazing. Graphics and Gameplay is O-U-T-S-T-A-N-D-I-N-G. ArmA 2 Needed an additional mod, called ACE, this game here, does not even need any more realism mods, because it IS Realism itself! Worth the money. Fun to play. 9.5/10 -Acekiller.
[Volk]Gunslinger1127;-;Awesome grahpics and really realistic! The most realistic game out there!! Right now its in alpha but its really good for its state!! Theres gonna be way more in the offical game though but what it is right now is a good start!!
Jameson Locke;-;This game is awesome, but sometimes when you play this game, some serious drama and sad things happen. Just like a movie.
Braedot;-;This game is amazing. Not only can you get just about any mod you want for it- you can get Breaking Point- DayZ in Arma. You can play Altis Life- make money and act a civilian or go do illegal things. You can play King Of The Hill- Get some PVP in. This is the best Multiplayer simulator and is definitely an amazing purchase that I've made and I'll never regret.
(-_- ) <UGA> King Yack Henry;-;A3 is a great tactical army sim, has so much to do it is very hard to get bored. great community (in places) and great mods available via ArmAholic. Granted it has its bugs (like the rest) but they are slowly but surely fixing it. 9/10. Would recommend to anyone
Daxx;-;Even if its not on sale, probably one of the best games on the market. Infinite replay value. Must have.
Taco [13BW];-;Drove really fast in a tank and flipped it 10 outta 10 for best tanks.
ChipFlexes -S- ICA;-;I've not been playing much, BUT It's an awesome game. For sure. :)
-SR-Buz;-;As you can see from this review, I have almost 500 hours in the game, so if you're looking for someone who knows it, trust me. Arma 3 is a Military Simulator, which means that you aren't getting the constant grinding, free-for-all match ups you find in FPS games like Call of Duty or Battlefield. It also doesn't get much more realistic than this. But in terms of the actual game, there are a plethora of things to do. There are Altis Life RPG servers, which allow you to play the way you want, within certain constraints of course. There are wasteland servers as well, which is essentially a giant battlefield for you to play in. Also, if you get a group of people, you can run some pretty awesome missions, not to mention have a blast with the Zeus mode, which allows a player to become a game master and run a mission dynamically. Yes, there are bugs. Driving full force with a truck into a tank probably wouldn't cause it to blow up, for example. Rocks, walls, and even chicken-wire fences can disable plenty of vehicles, and sometimes the actual mechanics are pretty slow. But the major bugs that you find are usually because of some faulty coding in a server you play on, such as dropping a truck from a helicopter, only to have it disappear the next instant, or fling back up and blow you out of the sky. Regardless of these, the actual content of Arma 3 is massive, and the situations you can create get to be incredibly intense. The $59.99 price tag on this game shouldn't stop you from buying it, because it is worth every penny. If you want to find some examples of people who play this game and have a great time, you can find a ton of videos on YouTube that may help you in your decision to buy it. Lastly, I mentioned before that this is not a Call of Duty or Battlefield game. They are all there own, and you may think that this game is too slow-paced if you are looking for that run-and-gun format of a game. But whileplaying this game, you find yourself in many different situations. Whether it be sneaking up to a compound while trying to avoid any contact, laser-designating a target for air-support to pulverize, or peaking around and pieing corners in a CQB scenario, you will find thousands of these unique situations, which make this game worthwhile to nearly every fan of FPS's and MILSIM's alike.
[FL] Burnett;-;BEST GAME 2013
Mirelurk;-;Robbed a guy for $1. 10/10
MeatShield;-;Whole lot of fun. Have yet to play the vanilla game, or the SP... the mods are amazingly cool. Wasteland is killer, and Breaking Point= DayZ for ARMA3. Graphically awesome, performance is stellar. Ballistics seem to be pretty much on point too. Vehicle control kinda sucks, but this isn't FORZA so...
I'm the cook.;-;Had firefight of epic proportions. Died falling down stairs. 10/10
SoulMasterOpus;-;this is realy a good game there are enough modde't server to play on you will find something you like
Flexii;-;Very tactical team based game!
Element Finland;-;Extremely awesome and getting better all the time. :)
FatChris [PT];-;Arma 3 is jam-packed with many things to do. Although the campaign is quite slow, the multiplayer is what makes up for it. With tons of gamemodes to accomodate your own style, any type of FPS/Military fan is welcome to join the fun.
King.Mash;-;Handcuffed by 3 men. Took my shirt and my pants off. They took deep breaths into the mic. All three stole a bags worth of blood from me. Hit me once with their fist each. Left me to die. Broke out. Found a crowbar. Killed one. Ran away. Crawled into a house almost dead. Had a friend come save me. I wasnt gonna be able to make it i thought. We went into another city looking for a blood bag. Upon entering the hospital we were greated by one of the men that almost killed me. The blasted my friends brains on me. I ran out as fast as the game would let me. I ran to a town. Shot after shot was fired at me. I kept yelling into the mic "You suck at shooting!" Nearing at the town i was hit once. I crawled up to the top floor and used my only rag to stop bleeding. By this point i knew I was gone. Tears were streaming down my face as I wished it didnt have to happen like this. I could hear him running along the floor below me looking for me. He came out of the doorway from the stairs and i scream "WAIT!"... He pointed his gone at me. I closed my eyes and braced myself. nothing happened..... I looked him in the eyes as he looked at mine. I told him the bad things i did. I told him about my family. My friend that he killed. I told him how what they did to me i had deserved it. I could see tears streaming down his face. He looked at me and told me something. He told me how he knew i killed one of his friends. He told me how the other was shot in a shoot out. His face soaked with tears he pointed the gun at me. I said "no need. we have both lost something." He put the gun down. "We can end this together. No need for anymore violence. We dropped our stuff and walked to the edge. I looked to my right and he looked to his left. we both said "Thank you.." at the exact same time. We both jumped off the edge and died right next to each other. i felt my soul leave my body. Then i respawned
Neon4D;-;Arma 3 Is a Huge Step-up from Arma 2. It features VASTLY Improved Graphics. New Futuristic Weaponry, Vehicles and More. I would reccomend this game for everyone!
Rileey;-;Arma 3 is an AMAZING game highly recomend it
| Geng;-;$35 for Arma 3 - time to buy up you Jerks this is the sale you have been waiting for! See you in Altis Life, or Zeus or any of the other brilliant mods probably just around the corner. Battle Royale! etc etc.. Get your fricking pants on a PURCHASE!
Stoli;-;It's kind of like dust II but different.
Marv;-;Recommended to anyone who cant stand CoD. Please stay away if you believe that DayZ made ARMA III possible. Anyone else - go get it!
Keeway;-;Arma 3 is awesome, even the fact this game isnt so intense like all these these cods and battlefields. At this point we don't have to wait for more tanks and jets, you can get them from armaholic! The movements of the characters are just more than good. Fortunately BIS said goodbye to Arma 2 physics and introduced more realistic engine. I would recommend this game for all who want to feel more reality than in battlefield or call of duty series. Everything you need its ing beast computer.
Bamanboi;-;I witnessed someone driving a pickup truck, then crashing into a rock and exploding into a fiery hell. 10/10
Formerly Known as NaziFool;-;This game has a ton of potential. I'm a fan of the of the Arma series, and Bohemia Interactive as a compnany. I bought Arma 3 back when it was in early access as an alpha. Back then, Bohemia was releasing regular updates that included in game content. I've become very skeptical of Steam Early Acess titles, but I trusted Bohemia Interactive as a company I have bought from before and have been happy with my purchases and received many hours of enjoyment from their previous titles. (Arma 2 and Carrier Command to name a few) Arma 3 Eventually hit Beta, and later final release. After the "Finalized" product was increased in price the in game content soon stopped flowing. Then the Karts DLC was released. I thought "Oh this is just some fun thing the devs made some weekend." I passed on it as it had a kind of high price tag for just a mini-game calibre addon. Now the Helicopter DLC came out. It costs around 16 bucks. With these helicopters came new game mechanics. You can now tow vehicles via one of the DLC helicopters. Keep in mind, Arma is a game that has an active community of modders, scripters, programmers, mappers and artists creating new content every week. That's not to say Arma 2 didn't have its share of DLC. However, for comparable prices you got a new singleplayer campaign, a few scenarios, and an array of vehicles opposed to just two. This is the direction I don't like to see Arma go. When I bought the PMC DLC for Arma2, it felt worth it. I got more hours of gameplay by myself and singleplayer and many more options for transport and weaponry in multiplayer. The Arma3 DLC seems unfair. The two combined are offered for a reduced price, with both DLCs (around 25 dollars) You get three vehicles, (A kart and two helicopters.), a few outfits, and a starter pistol. On top of that, this game requires pretty fancy hardware to run above a steady 30 frames. I've found that this a very processor intensive game. I recently went from an I3 processor to and I7 and now make 40 frames pretty steadily on very high or ultra. However, when flying or otherwise moving fast, I still experience some heavy frame drops. These don't make the game unplayable by any means, but they do happen somewhat frequently (usually when flying over large villages with lots of models, namely Kavala.) For CAS pilots, you're almost always flying very low to the ground, and very fast. The added frame drops increase the challenge of flying CAS in urban areas. Now for people who are using lower end processors, you'll find looking at a village, even not directly (through terrain or a building) will drop your frames by atleast five. For people controlling Zeus you'll find that lag increases very quickly for your players the more things you put onto the battlefield. It becomes apparant a lot sooner than you'd expect for a game on the scale of Arma 3. Speaking of scale, a word often used when describing the main map, Altis. Altis has a huge perfomance difference comparatively to other maps. Now, obviously, the bigger something is, the more intensive it is to render. I NEVER noticed differences in performances from Chernarus to Takistan, to Namalsk, to Zargabad, to Utes on Arma 2. Granted, Altis is a lot more urban than Takistan for instance, and to be honest, I'd rather play Takistan if I can go anywhere on it. I've been on Insurgency servers where going to Kavala is against the rules because spawning AI in there increases lag to a huge degree. Being a finished game, Arma 3 feels a bit empty on the side of vehicles and weapons. There are TONS of outfits, but I'm pretty sure there's less than 20 guns (not counting variants) For a game as large as Arma, you'd think there would be a large array of weapons, similar to Arma2. Aside from that, being injured and out of breath REALLY kills your aim, it doesn't really feel right to me but I can live with it. Also, using scroll wheel as an action menu is still awkward as hell, but you get used to it. Again. I can live with it. That's my gripe with Arma 3 right now. Here's what I like: Otherwise, Arma 3 has great potential. The Zeus gamemode is innovation I've been looking for in gaming for a long time. It allows someone to take the role of a Dungeon Master and create the story of the mission as it proceeds. With that it is tricky to be/find a good Zeus. Once you can make a challenging, but not impossible mission for your friends, it is a blast for everyone. It's even fun to mess around by yourself as Zeus. You can create your own missions, and since the AI is good it's still challenging. I love Zeus and hope to see similar concepts in other games in the future. Flying is very tight. Flying is as near perfect as it gets for me. I am very happy with the flying system in this game, I have not tried the advanced flying mode yet, but I imagine Bohemia put the same care and attention into it as the now standard, default mode. The land vehicles turning radiuses seem huge, but they are military vehicles. The singleplayer story is a lot more intuitive and better paced than Arma 2. I have not beat it yet, but there have been many moments I have enjoyed. It is set up in a three part act, much like a movie, the middle being climax/dilema. The first act is rather short. Other than that, so far the campaign is much more engaging than Arma2. The community for Arma, if you're not aware is terrific. I love being able browse for addons other users created. This allows units to personalize their gear and vehicles to better suit their playstyle (Navy, Marines, Airforce, ETC) There are tons of mods that make the game so much more involving and immersive. If you get this game, I'd say it's a must to download a few mods. I know I said the scale is too big above, but if there's some things Arma does right, one of them is scale. When your on Altis, or Chernarus if you want something that runs better, You feel like you're in huge area, and there could be fighting ten kilometers from where you're fighting. Because of this, everything takes time. Getting a tank to a battlefield to tip the balance of the fight is a hard choice to make, because that fight could be lost by the time the tank gets there. Gunplay and movement are silky smooth, however, balistics seems a bit off. Some enemies seem to just absorb bullets sometimes. Bohemia included modified stances so you don't have to download a mod. The modified movements are very useful. ~~~~ Some things I don't like that aren't Bohemia's fault: Servers feel pretty empty at the time I'm gaming, and takes a while to find a good operation. You can no longer host a forward private server for your friends, due to the Gamespy closing, Steam took over, I don't know if they'll bring it back, but that was definitely part of the reason I got into Arma. It was very easy to pick up and do a mission with a couple of buds. Too many Altis Life servers. ~~~~ All in all, I think Arma 3's path will change. The community got pretty upset over the helicopter DLC, and with good reasons. I like this game. I still play it today. Is it worth fifty or sixty dollars? Probably not right now. However, this game isn't by any means bad, and if you enjoy a more simulator feel when playing a first person shooter, I would say that this would be a pretty good game to get. Bohemia, I hope you gain my trust back. (Sorry for any typos, wrote this late at night)
Theangrytoot;-;This an amazing military simulator with so many things to do! You can make your own battles on the editor, play the story line, or get mods and other missions that the ArmA III Community made! I wasn't sure about buying at first but now I'm glad I bought it!
[880MBN] Adomas;-;ARMA Best MilSim Series ever made. Even if you don't want sim you can have a lot of fun!
Teddy Baggins;-;OMG Awesome game a must have if you love First/Third person shooters realistic and EPIC
orangaaaaaaa;-;Altis life, Wasteland, King of the Hill, Co op missions and much more for Arma 3. Best game played so far.
Vindi "Ruski Ambassador" Banga;-;Realistic drug dealing experience. It's all about the hustlin. Can't never escape the Stratis ghetto. Packn' gats. Rollin past da police at 110. "Drop the dollahs and nobody gets shot, run we break your legs." No squealing. Here are some quotes to help you on your spirutal journey on your herb dealing. "Get rich or die tryin" - Mr Curtis James "FIDDY" Jackson III "Cause the police always got somethin' stupid to say They put out my picture with silence Cause my identity by itself causes violence" -Eazy E "Never get high on your own supply" -The Crack Commandments Subsection 4 When you smoke the herb, it reveals you to yourself. - Robert Nesta ", it's the cops. Gats ready boys." - Harry Truman "Go hard or go home!" - Tim "Tha Big Dawg" Westwood
Dillon;-;by far my favorite game!! very cpu intensive though.
Jayro;-;Best military simulator Countless amounts of game changing mods. 10/10
HOGZY;-;Its a game you can get lost in for hours, their is a game mode for everyones different playstyles. 100% happy i got it. Five star game.
wafels45;-;I love the Arma Series to death, I have logged well over 1000 hours on Arma 2, but it does have some drawbacks and bugs that can get very annoying. Pros: Combined Operations Warfare (Tanks/Air/Infantry) Great community with lots of servers. (RPG Life/Sector Control/Domination) Amazing mods made by the community In-Game Mission Editor Huge maps Great gun mechanics Firing from helicopters Sling loading cargo with helicopters A good amount of weapons and vehicles to choose from The developers update a lot Cons: Vehicles randomly blow up sometimes Physics can be very dodgy The Engine is pretty old (13 Years I think?) Very poorly optomized, I usually run at about 18 FPS and I can run most games on high settings. If you don't have at least a high-mid range gaming computer don't bother trying to run this. All in all, for everything thats broken with this game, it makes up for it with amazing gameplay especially if you join a group. I play with a realism infantry unit that does operations every week and even though I lag I still have an amazing time. Never have I fealt as immersed in a game as I do when I play ARMA.
gg;-;This game offers the experience of realism in combat of modern war. There are several different types of game play you can do. Like all miltiplayers, this game escalates in fun with more people you cooperate with. The community overall is very friendly and willing to help you out if you are lost or stuck in a situation. The graphics can look really great if your machine can run it. It is both a first person and a third person shooter, helis, jets, to all sorts of ground vehicles are available for use. Each vehicle comes with their own challenges on operating them. I would recommend this game to those who are seeking a real time, realistic simulation of what it would be like to fight in the battlefied in modern times. Many variety of guns are available for use and the maps are gigantic so repetition of landscape is not an issue. Personally I'm not the biggest arma 3 fan but this game is a solid 8/10 in my book.
Kyrillios;-;Great game with infinite possibilites due to a sandbox world, if you plan on buying this game, you should also consider getting a high end cpu if you want to play on large multiplayer server.
boss7654;-;Comparable to minecraft in its diversity and modability while maintaining a smooth and beautiful mechanic and graphic theme. Endless options for modding but also includes a campaign and scenarios for people uninterested in mods. Once you've played Arma 3, all First Person Shooters seem to be lacking depth. I highly recommend this game.
DutchProjectz;-;This game is amazing. The graphics are stunning and the gameplay is just great. Finally I get to play a massive war game. 10/10 1 Word: Amazing
necrosand;-;Such graphics Much fun Many guns Can your computer run?
Megalonyx;-;Come join the serious fun with ArmA 3. The newest installment in the series is not yet complete, but you can help with the development testing. Multiplayer is very functional. The modding community is vigorous!
Darihon;-;I was planning on buying this game for an huge ammount of time, when it was in sale last week I bought it. I mostly bought it for Altis Life, but then I met the amazing modding community of Arma 3. I bought Arma 2 for DayZ and I felt really sad when there wasn't a DayZ mod for Arma 3 (except Breaking Point). After some time playing I saw that my friend bought the game too and we played a lot together. It's really fun when you're with friends. The game is great and it is worth it's money.
KzuW;-;Better than Arma 2 110% if you can run it
Tess Ticles;-;Played this game for a bit, its a little fun.
ChipFlexes -S- ICA;-;I've not been playing much, BUT It's an awesome game. For sure. :)
Dillon;-;by far my favorite game!! very cpu intensive though.
Jayro;-;Best military simulator Countless amounts of game changing mods. 10/10
HOGZY;-;Its a game you can get lost in for hours, their is a game mode for everyones different playstyles. 100% happy i got it. Five star game.
Vinz;-;Great game.
Wittmann;-;Arma 3 is the greatest game ever made. I did a 500m crawl to an abandoned radio tower on the top of a hill overlooking a village. Once my spotter and I got there he began calling out targets as he glassed the town with his binoculars searching for our target, a war criminal wearing a black beret and aviators, known as "The Jackal". Once we found our mark we compared him to our notes and the descriptions matched. I noted his location and then marked a right triangle on our map, finding that I was 320m North and 340m west of his position, the hypotenuse of the triangle was 467m (our distance). Then accounting for a 160m height differential between the target and I, our actual distance was 493m. Due to a slight Northern wind of about 5kph I adjusted my shot slightly to the right, I took the shot, striking the target in the right shoulder, killing him instantly. I had to use geometry and trig to play a video game. I approve 100%
[ACMECorp.]Simi;-;This a great game if you liked Arma 2 you will. Love this game
GrinFlame (Gozmit);-;A really nice game. If you want to play a realistic tactic shooter, Arma 3 is the way to go. The best thing about Arma 3 is creating your mission and almost create any sore of gamemode to be played by yourself or with someone else of maybe even a server. One of the best gamemodes everyone shuold try if you get the game is Atlis Life which is a roleplay gamemode. I played over 1000 hours plus of it and that show how much i love this game, most of the time i would be playing with my mates or people i meet in game. I would recommend to play this game with at least one friend!
SpicyNachoz;-;With the new update i get PTSD from getting shot at. i was at a party and some kid dropped a plate and i nearly  my self
Daniels813;-;One of the best games ever got alot of hours on it
[LEB]Sgt.Aar;-;I saw a rabbit followed by a civilian followed by a private followed by a colonel hunted by a sniper getting shot by an armored truck locked by a jet ...... Only the rabbit survived :P
GrinFlame (Gozmit);-;A really nice game. If you want to play a realistic tactic shooter, Arma 3 is the way to go. The best thing about Arma 3 is creating your mission and almost create any sore of gamemode to be played by yourself or with someone else of maybe even a server. One of the best gamemodes everyone shuold try if you get the game is Atlis Life which is a roleplay gamemode. I played over 1000 hours plus of it and that show how much i love this game, most of the time i would be playing with my mates or people i meet in game. I would recommend to play this game with at least one friend!
Ugo;-;One of the most astonishingly open-ended games I have ever played. The sheer scope, diversity and flexibility of content packed in this game is completely and utterly mindblowing. This game and its predecessors stand and laugh at all those other games calling themselves 'realistic', and shows them how to get it done. Twitch reflexes don't win here, player cunning and coordination does.
DopeyZero9;-;This game is DOPE!
Hash_Cookie;-;Initially, i bought this game because i wanted to play wasteland or something coming from arma 2. This was back in alpha. it sucked , and i left the game to collect dust for a long time, then one day when it finally got released, a whole new gaming experience overwhelmed me! Completely swept me off my feet with the mechanics that this game has to offer, and due to one of the latest updates being "Zeus" it has made gaming to a whole new level. Since becomming a fan of the arma 3 i now own 2 servers for a community named STDelta. Its the most fun you could have with a war simulator you could ever have your hands on. Would definately reccomend this game to any gamers looking for a challenge in their gaming. Live long and drop the the floor and do the dinosaur. ~Hash
[ACMECorp.]Simi;-;This a great game if you liked Arma 2 you will. Love this game
Xilandro;-;One of the best FPS/TPS games i've ever played. If u like tactics, simulation and hardcore - try ArmA III
The DoomReaper;-;One of the best games
LORIKKER;-;Best Multiplayer game i own. Always fun playing with friends and it never gets boring. If you dont have friends its still fun. Awesome graphics and nice sounds. Unique gameplay that you never get bored of. For extra fun buy the Karts DLC or the DLC Bundle, totally worth it!
Koalasz;-;This is the most buggy, broken game i have ever played. Yet i can't stop playing it... You Win BiS
Chop;-;Installed the game. Started tutorial. Went on the field. Started shooting - was disappointed. I shot a rabbit for fun, didn't die.......... after 5 seconds the rabbit slammed on the ground. 10/10 best game ever
King Pootis;-;My first game on A3 brought me the most horrific experience I've ever had in any game, ever. We're on our way to the objective, a small dump east of a town occupied by enemy forces. I'm leading a team of 4 men. We come to a crossroad and I sprint across, telling my men to hold back. I cross a few more times, trying to get a response from any snipers. Nothing. I run, my LMG gunner runs, my medic runs. But I kept my Marksman on the other side to make sure we'd make it across. Anybody seen Full Metal Jacket all the way through? Remember the sniper scene? The marksman takes a round in the leg as we're running and goes down. He then takes two more in the chest. The kid who was playing had some mad acting skills, he played it up to 11 here. He screams as he's being shot. Crawling, drenched in his own blood. "SARGE? YOU AIN'T LEAVING ME OUT HERE LIKE THIS, RIGHT? I-I WANNA GO WITH YOU GUYS! C'MON SARGE, H-HELP ME! C'MON! PLEASE DON'T LEAVE ME!" he died after that. I cried and he respawned. 11/10, would recommend getting.
Peace;-;This is not a game for people who want fast action movie style gaming, this is a game for people who appreciate the finer things. Having done both military service and picked up MILSIM airsoft as a hobby this game is the closest you will get to what goes on in reality. There are experiences you will have in ARMA 3 that can not be had in COD or BF, experiences that will have you shaking from the adrenaline release. One that comes to mind was a mission to destroy an enemy comms tower, I was squad leader of 8 or so AI:s. As we approached the Comms tower and I told my men to go stealth, no firing unless fired upon. We moved slowly taking advantage of terrain, keeping an watchful eye for enemy patrols. Once the tower was in visual range pace slowed even more and I spent the better part of 30 minutes just looking for enemy patrols and advancing to about 200 meters from the tower. There I positioned my men to cover a wide firing arc as I had spotted quite a few patrols moving in and about the tower. I considered opening fire and probably being able to drop a good portion of the enemy before they could zero in on our position. But a firefight is always a risk, and these AI had been around for a few missions and I had started to anthropomorphize them a bit and secondly I might get hit and killed. As I considered how I would start the engagement a sudden hole opened up in the patrol pattern, I realised the tower is unguarded and I had an opportunity to do something I had not considered. I got up and ran as fast as I could towards the tower, all the time expecting the bullets to start cracking above my head. I kept scanning as I ran whizzling through bushes trying to pick a path that the least visibility to any patrols. After what seemed like far too long I reached the tower and threw out a satchel charge and another for good measure, if one would not bring the tower down it would sure attract attention. I turned around and made my way back, as I closed on my men I started ordering them to fall back, hope growing that I might get out of this alive. Falling back to about 400 meters I finally detonated the satchel charges and the tower fell, from there it was just a short run to the truck and back to Command. I had done it. I had pulled off the perfect mission, not a shot fired and all under my command back alive. That is what this game is about.
[13th] Danius;-;Oh man. Where to even begin with this one. It would be an extreme disservice to simply call Arma 3 a shooter, as it is so, so much more than that. Arma 3 is a military simulator. This is a distinction that its developers hold sacred and are proud of, and one to which I can attest is completely accurate and deserved. But its even more than that. Arma 3 is a gaming platform, upon which so much has already been and will continue to be built for years to come. At its core though, Arma 3 in a supremely excellent military sim. The graphics are stunning, the gameplay is excellent, the mechanics are solid, and Bohemia Interactive has done an absolutely amazing job packaging this all together. New comers to the Arma series (as I was) may initially be overwhelmed by the games complex mechanics and decidedly different pace from your typical FPS/shooter. Enemy engagements happen at much greater distance than is typical in the genre and are often brief, brutal, and more times than not will conclude with your demise. There is no handholding here. No mini-maps, no enemy UI icons/indicators, no hit markers, no health bars. If you get shot a couple of times, you will find yourself unceremoniously dispatched. While this creates a high barrier for entry and a steep learning curve for new players, it provides a unique and distinctive play style. Situational awareness, cover, teamwork, suppressive fire, and generally moving purposefully and as if your  depended on knowing what was behind the next ridge or hiding in the bushes are paramount to your success. Add to these infantry mechanics the amazingly rendered vehicles, armor, helicopters, and planes, each with their own realistic mechanics to learn and master, and you end up with a truly amazing military simulation experience. Out of the box, Arma comes with a great single player campaign comprised of 3 separate acts, each containing ~12-15 missions. The campaign focuses on a well crafted story of a military conflict that has erupted over Arma 3s two HUGE islands of Stratis and Altis. You play the part of a NATO soldier who finds himself stuck in the middle of a complex engagement. The campaign is rewarding, and challenging. (I have yet to complete it as Im stuck on one mission that I simply cant seem to complete.) However the single-player campaign is FAR from the end of this title. The mission editing tools have allowed this amazing community to develop some absolutely awesome single player missions, all of which can be downloaded free of charge from the Steam workshop and numerous other sites around the interwebs. I would also recommend you check out the supremely excellent full game conversion single player mods Whole Lotta Altis and Dynamic Universal War System which will provide countless additional single player hours and could be completely stand alone titles in themselves. Oh and the multiplayer, oh god the multiplayer. Wasteland, King of the Hill, Invade and Annex, Battle Royale, Breaking Point, so many Co-Op opportunities, the amazing looking upcoming Epoch (currently in closed Alpha). Im sure there are so many others that I havent even discovered yet. Each of these represent COMPLETELY USER GENERATED and totally disparate ways to play Multiplayer within the Arma 3 platform. By purchasing Arma 3, you immediately have access to each of these completely gratis and each could essentially be considered totally separate game. In wrapping up this lengthy review, Arma 3 is an amazing experience and a true accomplishment in game development. It is the only game in recent memory that I can say with confidence that I never get bored with playing. Bohemia Interactive has made it clear that they plan to support this game for years to come, and they have built something amazing on which the possibilities are truly endless. Purchase this game. Purchase it now. Thank me later. (IF YOU DO NOT FIND MY REVIEW HELPFUL, please leave a comment as to why. I welcome the constructive feedback.)
ArtificialApple;-;This is quite possibly the most emotional shooter I've ever played, and it's not because of the campaign. Crowd around, children, it's story time. One day, not so long ago, my squad had just destroyed an anti-air battery. Our pilot landed, and the rest of the squad boarded one by one. I was about to get in when the rockets started flying. The chopper lifted off, with my pilot saying that he would return in a few minutes. Unwilling to die before then, I rushed to the nearest cover, a small house by a narrow road. I entered to find a ten year-old player who had also been left behind. He explained that he was a sniper and invited me to join his "clan". I politely declined, explaining that my own squad was inbound. As I finished, a Ghost Hawk flew over the horizon. My squad had arrived. This noble child soldier and I were sprinting to the helicopter when the bullets started hitting. The sniper screamed as a 6.5 mm cartridge entered his leg. His shrieks for help were cut short by one final burst of carbine fire as I climbed in the transport. My new friend was dead. 10/10, would experience survivor guilt again.
Sir Quad Kill aka Sir Charlie;-;If you have friends, this is a great game to play with them. If you don't have any friends, this is a great game to play alone. If you don't have the game to play, get the money for it. If you don't have the money for it, get a job. If you don't have a job, rob the bank. If you get arrested robbing the bank, at least you tried.
theconjuring;-;Children play Call of Duty Boys play Battlefield Men play ARMA
Durga;-;After some 1,400 hours on the game, I can say with FULL VALIDITY this game has ruined my life. If you like realistic physics, teamwork, and every form of warfare, this game is for you. 10/10
Runekn;-;Can't tell you if you should buy it or not, but I can tell you this. You will find annoying bugs, highly requested features that isn't there and lack of content if you're not satisfied with what you have. But when you really get down to it, and experience some of the awesome scenarios you can get in multiplayer and custom sp mission, it's something magical you just can't find in any other game. Arma is not a game which you pick up at launch, play the campaign and a bit of mp, and then trow away. You buy it, love it or hate it, and then play it forever or trow it away immediatly. Arma is a game which you can never called finished. There will always be added to it, be it user or official content, fixes, features or optimizations. Hope I expressed myself correctly and that you learned something from it :) If you like realistic shooters and organized large scale multiplayer warfare, this will be your gem! I'll give it a 9/10, simply because: screw bugs, I've used hundreds of hours on Arma 3 that I would never take back. READ: I will not accept random friend requests! If you have a question, please post it in the comments.
Solly: Panparam;-;It's not a good 'game' for newbies. No, it's not... I use to sit at a place and watch the sunset. I have no idea how to actually shoot, drive and complete missions. It's like my personal sunset simulator. And it's damn beautiful. 10/10
Mr. Bong;-;I have owned this game for a number of weeks now and I have been completely hooked. Great game for the more serious war gamer, not for those who prefer the fast paced combat that you get from Call of Duty series which I consider more for the younger gamers anyway. Arma 3 moves a lot slower and is more squad based than other war games, similar to Battlefield series only slower than that when playing online and you may find yourself on 10 minute helicopter rides just to get into the battlefield and you will be highly satisfied with each kill you make as you know a single round landed by your enemy could be fatal regardless of the weapon they are using. You will have to make good use of any cover you can find and hit the dirt as soon as you hear a bullet crack over your head and then very carefully survey the surrouding area and work out where you are taking fire from as it will usually not be obvious where the fire is coming from and you will find yourself having to hold up for 10-20 minutes in a single location (sometimes longer, I personally have gotten pinned in one location for over an hour) because you are either pinned by enemy fire or it is too dangerous to move forward. You will need to buffer up on your mic communication skills as most players use proper phonetics etc when relaying information to each other on the battlefield such as coordinates and other reconaissance. You can not respawn as quickly as you can in CoD if you are taken down by enemy fire so staying alive is more crucial than any other war game you have played and you wanna hope you are moving up with a squad that has a medic. The graphics are great, the game is a little glitchy at times and the controls take a little getting used to. I recommend buying this game to any serious war game enthusiasts who want to get as close to war as possible (unless doing paintballing or airgunning), and if you do buy the game - I recommend completing the whole VR Tutorial before actually joining a server or playing the Campaign as you will need to really learn all those different keys that may make the difference in a hairy situation in game.
Roy Orbison;-;I gave this a shot over the free weekend and here's what I learned: 1. You need an incredibly modern and powerful gaming PC to run attractive graphics with this. My system is 5 years old, 570 GTX can barely run this at the lowest graphics settings possible, and that's barely getting 30 fps. 2. The amount of key mapping you need to do to make this even somewhat manageable as a "game" is insane. Basically, you need one of those 7 or 9 button gaming Mice, because you won't have enough sensible keyboard key locations to cover all of the crap. 3. For a game where voice communication is extremely necessary, the voice comm functionality in this game is quite limited, but that's not really an issue because everyone is going to be using TS3 anyway... 4. Good luck finding a decent server to play on. Most of them are run by fascist bronys. Others are run by incompetent admins and you can count on getting spawnkilled by your own team over and over until you leave and find a different server. No, I'm not kidding. 5. The game isn't worth 60 dollars. The rest of the game (that's right, you don't actually get the whole game for 60 dollars, you need all of the DLC too because the only good weapons are locked) is going to run you even more. So it's over $100 game that isn't worth playing unless you have a $2,500 computer and a $120 mouse. 6. It seems like, if you met all of the requirements above, the game *could* be enjoyable. Just know what you are really getting yourself into...
x M1ST1CAL MAKKA;-;now i really want to thumbs up this game but i just cant unless u have an amazing pc most game modes especially king of the hill will run at 10-20 fps i dont have a bad computer it rund far cry 4 on ultra at 40-50 fps but this game will only frustrate u if u dont have a really expensive pc ....... i loved it personaly with its team based tatics and damage model yet whn ur in the war zone it lags so much so thts y i dont thumbs up this game
ciB^O;-;This game eating my life wawawawaawawa
Grumpy Mittens;-;This is my very first game on PC/Steam. I really enjoy this game alot, after joining a arma 3 commuity they helped alot to show me to play this game and made the exp that much more fun.
Proactive;-;"My game crashed" - Everyone
Mittens;-;It's like ARMA 2 but it looks better, feels smoother and unlike its predecessor the most overpowered enemy is no longer the menus. I mean jesus christ, the menus in ARMA 2 fought more than the NPCs. But yeah get ARMA 3.
TinyTinyDwarf;-;Okay. Arma 3, it's a good game.. It brings some fun content, i bought the deluxe edition, which was a  mistake. some of the weapons exist in real life, however they are sadly not named after their real life counterparts, which is understandable because Bohemia Interactive would have too pay for license, but still.. Tank gameplay is fine, ai like always can be a bit , but hey, it's AI.. Jets is adequate, it's not a flight sim, it has the basic flight characteristics so that it works, but calling it a 100% flight sim would be incorrect. and Joystick is almost a must for the jets. Helo's, they are modelled alot better, and i like 'em. and unlike the jets they can be fine without a joystick and pedals, however you would of course be better with it. Online play? well, we all know the history of Arma to be horribly optimised, which i agree to in some extent, but it's also a massive game, and putting that in a multiplayer enviorment where not only you, but other players and several scripts are all rendered in. Very very few can play this game on 100% graphics settings when on a multiplayer server. most put it down to medium or low. Over-all it's a good game, with mods it gets even better. if you like FPS that have a bit larger realism to it, get this. or Insurgency, but insurgency doesn't have tanks and helo's now does it? :)
Jihadi Mike;-;10/10- would explode again pros- can drive by milsim members in a humvee blasting jihadist music. cons- the milsim members get mad at you
Qfux;-;When I first read the title of this game I must have been drunk cause I read it as "boner". When I fianally got to play the game I was pleasantly surprised because I did infact have a boner. This game literally has everything, wanna  some  up on go carts? It's got it. Wanna channel your inner hot  from the Hunger Games? Battle Roayale is your . You can even grow weed and 420 blaze it up in this circle jerk of a game. Imagine if you injected Grand Theft Auto 5 with testosterone and maybe a hint of estrogen, wanna know what you would get? Arma 3 aka a 12.5/13
EddieFly;-;10/10 Best military simulator I have tried and although it takes some getting used to its worth the money 100%
Gihman;-;If you are creative and enjoying creating your own missions and playing with your friends you will like this game. The community has made some great mods for this game also.
UnknownCobra;-;Best military simulation game out here. 10/10
- Aweiiy;-;Good game, good graphics. ArmA3=best war simulator.
Kaiu;-;This game shows a life of a soldier. It invites a new enviornmental gameplay for players that play COD or BF. ArmA 3 is a military simulator game is fatigue is a thing, carrying too much gear can lack you falling behind your squad. Jumping isn't a thing in ArmA 3 making it better because you can't really jump with mass of gear your carrying on you. The gun sounds are beautiful and blasts my ears on my astro a40s just lovely. The whole campaign was immersive and intense.I highly recommend this game to people who like amazing beautiful geographic graphics, people who know to use strategy and are paitent.
Hostail;-;I love this game, spent many hours into various kinds of game modes from Alpha to release. I have played many singleplayer maps which I have gotten from the Workshop, some I have spent countless of hours restarting over and over again, just to enjoy it a little bit more. and some I have played with my friends in various fun co-op missions. I have played various multiplayer modes from Wasteland, King of the hill, to Altis Life. I have had my moments of rage, and I have had my crazy ammount of laughter. If you like a good FPS game with a great ammount of depth and lots of replayability, then this is a game for you. If you like to sit on a hill far away from the combat sniping down on the unknown enemy soldiers, then this is a game for you. If you enjoy commandering a group of troops, hell, even a whole army in battle, then this is a game for you. Or if you just want to do illegal drug business while avoiding cops in Altis Life, then this is a game for you. I feel repetive now, but I really enjoy this game, and hope you do so too. Sorry if there is any grammatic errors in the text, english is not my native language.
The Chubgger#RoadToSilver;-;Fantastic game. If you loved Arma 2 you'll love this more. Now with ragdoll and improved first person, you can't go wrong. Wasterland is very fun especially when you have friends on. The AI is improved aswell as the stunning graphics. I would definently buy this for $60.
I'm Not Gay But $5 is $5;-;This game is amazing! It might not be as complete as ArmA 2 but it is nonetheless fun and fixes some problems ArmA 2 had problems with. Over all, it's a brilliant game that will become more and more complete over time :D
Batman;-;Great game worth every penny one of my favorites games of all time
PhattyStack;-;I like Arma 2 some didnt cause it was made back when and the graphics wern't all that hot. Well this game is a total upgrade from 2 I strongly suggest it. Oh I got mine on sale I suggest that ;)
A$AP $OFTIE;-;The latest installment for the military simulation franchise which has been around for eons is a very nice step in the right direction in general. Arma 3 Features two new maps called Stratis (which can be compared to Utes of Arma 2) and Altis, which is a mammoth sized map that stretches roughly 27 kilometers in East to West length. The Arma series has been prone to a multitude of bugs and poor optimization, which is still evident in the latest insatllment, yet the optimization has been FAR improved in this version of Bohemia Interactive's spotlight franchise. The graphics in this game are very improved and look beautiful on Ultra settings (that is, if you can run it). This game is still prone to glitches, bugs and sudden extreme drops of framerate without warning. Some of the bugs are eveident in player movent, which has been vastly improved upon the last installment, allowing you to take on 9 tactical positions when shooting. The movement is far less clunky and works much smoother than Arma 2. Some of the movement bugs can mean that you accidentally can get stuck in a rock or wall and end up dying from being squashed. The vehicles have been greatly improved offering far more realistic physics (however the physics are not on the par of games like Forza 5) with realistic vehicle speeds. The vehicles on the other hand are painstakingly delicate and fragile than before making vehicle operating quite frustrating at times. The weapon mechanics have been totally overhauled since the previous Arma game with new damage mechanics and far more realistic recoil effects. Arma 3 also has added a new dimension to its already diverse playability, adding a more in depth (no pun intended) maritime experience. This allows you to dive to the depths of th eocean and use submarises as well. Some of the things I want to see in Arma 3 are missing such as the ability to take cover behind doors of a vehicle whilst riding in it to avoid being shot easlliy (for example, if you are driving or in the passenger seat of a car you can hold a button to allow you character to switch into 1st person view and duck behind the dashboard and door of the car). Another missing feature is the ability to shoot in vehicles with you character's weapons allowing for military simmulation dirve-bys. My final verdict of Arma 3 is a very solid 8.5 out of 10. Arma 3 offers a very vast and expansive game that has a nearly infinite replayability, yet some of its bugs and optimization hold back Bohemia Interactive's flagship series back once more. If these glitches were to be fixed Arma 3 could be a very famous game that could be a serious threat to games like the Call of Duty franchise or Battlefield franchise as well. Buying this game is a choice you will not regret and with a little time and patience, you can have a blast on this game.
HardXcorE;-;Wasteland 4 life!
trkh // CSGOReactor.com;-;ing get me this game someone pl,ease Edit: I got the game, it is a wonderful game. Realistic, fun and you can do anything your mind pleases. for new players I recommend Wasteland, King of the Hill, and Battle Royale
volture #worstplayer;-;Accidently shot some civilians in a village so i cried because it was so realistic. Then i donated 2 euros to some charity to make it even. 10/10
BitBurner;-;This is by far the best game I have. It is so versatile it can be so many different things. The environment is huge and rivals most any other game in the genre. This is literally a war simulator complete with a mission editor. This game has given me the most fun with my friends for the dollar (besides Minecraft)
Trojan;-;10/10 would buy again
moms;-;got arrested for using an atm broke out of jail thanks to a random band of brothers get disconnected due to server crash log back in back in jail 10/10
Soli;-;Great game. just hard to find "your" thing to do.
Abstract_Enigma;-;Good single player, great coop multiplayer...when it works. The servers are rather sketchy, they don't run very well and there are hackers waiting to ruin your experience. Just this past week one of the servers was hacked 3 times! But, it is fun and when you get on a server that is good it is worth all the trouble. But, the most annoying thing to me is this has only been out for a year or so and the coop servers are already kinda dead and this is dissapointing. Most people only play Altis Life, the role playing section of the game, which I'd rather just play GTA online. If this is on sale, buy it. Wouldn't shell out the full $60 on it though. If you love tactical games such as Ghost Recon and Rainbow Six, this is your game. All in all 8/10.
GeeFamous92 Twitch.TV;-;Dont think about, it just buy it!
King Pootis;-;My first game on A3 brought me the most horrific experience I've ever had in any game, ever. We're on our way to the objective, a small dump east of a town occupied by enemy forces. I'm leading a team of 4 men. We come to a crossroad and I sprint across, telling my men to hold back. I cross a few more times, trying to get a response from any snipers. Nothing. I run, my LMG gunner runs, my medic runs. But I kept my Marksman on the other side to make sure we'd make it across. Anybody seen Full Metal Jacket all the way through? Remember the sniper scene? The marksman takes a round in the leg as we're running and goes down. He then takes two more in the chest. The kid who was playing had some mad acting skills, he played it up to 11 here. He screams as he's being shot. Crawling, drenched in his own blood. "SARGE? YOU AIN'T LEAVING ME OUT HERE LIKE THIS, RIGHT? I-I WANNA GO WITH YOU GUYS! C'MON SARGE, H-HELP ME! C'MON! PLEASE DON'T LEAVE ME!" he died after that. I cried and he respawned. 11/10, would recommend getting.
Peace;-;This is not a game for people who want fast action movie style gaming, this is a game for people who appreciate the finer things. Having done both military service and picked up MILSIM airsoft as a hobby this game is the closest you will get to what goes on in reality. There are experiences you will have in ARMA 3 that can not be had in COD or BF, experiences that will have you shaking from the adrenaline release. One that comes to mind was a mission to destroy an enemy comms tower, I was squad leader of 8 or so AI:s. As we approached the Comms tower and I told my men to go stealth, no firing unless fired upon. We moved slowly taking advantage of terrain, keeping an watchful eye for enemy patrols. Once the tower was in visual range pace slowed even more and I spent the better part of 30 minutes just looking for enemy patrols and advancing to about 200 meters from the tower. There I positioned my men to cover a wide firing arc as I had spotted quite a few patrols moving in and about the tower. I considered opening fire and probably being able to drop a good portion of the enemy before they could zero in on our position. But a firefight is always a risk, and these AI had been around for a few missions and I had started to anthropomorphize them a bit and secondly I might get hit and killed. As I considered how I would start the engagement a sudden hole opened up in the patrol pattern, I realised the tower is unguarded and I had an opportunity to do something I had not considered. I got up and ran as fast as I could towards the tower, all the time expecting the bullets to start cracking above my head. I kept scanning as I ran whizzling through bushes trying to pick a path that the least visibility to any patrols. After what seemed like far too long I reached the tower and threw out a satchel charge and another for good measure, if one would not bring the tower down it would sure attract attention. I turned around and made my way back, as I closed on my men I started ordering them to fall back, hope growing that I might get out of this alive. Falling back to about 400 meters I finally detonated the satchel charges and the tower fell, from there it was just a short run to the truck and back to Command. I had done it. I had pulled off the perfect mission, not a shot fired and all under my command back alive. That is what this game is about.
[13th] Danius;-;Oh man. Where to even begin with this one. It would be an extreme disservice to simply call Arma 3 a shooter, as it is so, so much more than that. Arma 3 is a military simulator. This is a distinction that its developers hold sacred and are proud of, and one to which I can attest is completely accurate and deserved. But its even more than that. Arma 3 is a gaming platform, upon which so much has already been and will continue to be built for years to come. At its core though, Arma 3 in a supremely excellent military sim. The graphics are stunning, the gameplay is excellent, the mechanics are solid, and Bohemia Interactive has done an absolutely amazing job packaging this all together. New comers to the Arma series (as I was) may initially be overwhelmed by the games complex mechanics and decidedly different pace from your typical FPS/shooter. Enemy engagements happen at much greater distance than is typical in the genre and are often brief, brutal, and more times than not will conclude with your demise. There is no handholding here. No mini-maps, no enemy UI icons/indicators, no hit markers, no health bars. If you get shot a couple of times, you will find yourself unceremoniously dispatched. While this creates a high barrier for entry and a steep learning curve for new players, it provides a unique and distinctive play style. Situational awareness, cover, teamwork, suppressive fire, and generally moving purposefully and as if your  depended on knowing what was behind the next ridge or hiding in the bushes are paramount to your success. Add to these infantry mechanics the amazingly rendered vehicles, armor, helicopters, and planes, each with their own realistic mechanics to learn and master, and you end up with a truly amazing military simulation experience. Out of the box, Arma comes with a great single player campaign comprised of 3 separate acts, each containing ~12-15 missions. The campaign focuses on a well crafted story of a military conflict that has erupted over Arma 3s two HUGE islands of Stratis and Altis. You play the part of a NATO soldier who finds himself stuck in the middle of a complex engagement. The campaign is rewarding, and challenging. (I have yet to complete it as Im stuck on one mission that I simply cant seem to complete.) However the single-player campaign is FAR from the end of this title. The mission editing tools have allowed this amazing community to develop some absolutely awesome single player missions, all of which can be downloaded free of charge from the Steam workshop and numerous other sites around the interwebs. I would also recommend you check out the supremely excellent full game conversion single player mods Whole Lotta Altis and Dynamic Universal War System which will provide countless additional single player hours and could be completely stand alone titles in themselves. Oh and the multiplayer, oh god the multiplayer. Wasteland, King of the Hill, Invade and Annex, Battle Royale, Breaking Point, so many Co-Op opportunities, the amazing looking upcoming Epoch (currently in closed Alpha). Im sure there are so many others that I havent even discovered yet. Each of these represent COMPLETELY USER GENERATED and totally disparate ways to play Multiplayer within the Arma 3 platform. By purchasing Arma 3, you immediately have access to each of these completely gratis and each could essentially be considered totally separate game. In wrapping up this lengthy review, Arma 3 is an amazing experience and a true accomplishment in game development. It is the only game in recent memory that I can say with confidence that I never get bored with playing. Bohemia Interactive has made it clear that they plan to support this game for years to come, and they have built something amazing on which the possibilities are truly endless. Purchase this game. Purchase it now. Thank me later. (IF YOU DO NOT FIND MY REVIEW HELPFUL, please leave a comment as to why. I welcome the constructive feedback.)
ArtificialApple;-;This is quite possibly the most emotional shooter I've ever played, and it's not because of the campaign. Crowd around, children, it's story time. One day, not so long ago, my squad had just destroyed an anti-air battery. Our pilot landed, and the rest of the squad boarded one by one. I was about to get in when the rockets started flying. The chopper lifted off, with my pilot saying that he would return in a few minutes. Unwilling to die before then, I rushed to the nearest cover, a small house by a narrow road. I entered to find a ten year-old player who had also been left behind. He explained that he was a sniper and invited me to join his "clan". I politely declined, explaining that my own squad was inbound. As I finished, a Ghost Hawk flew over the horizon. My squad had arrived. This noble child soldier and I were sprinting to the helicopter when the bullets started hitting. The sniper screamed as a 6.5 mm cartridge entered his leg. His shrieks for help were cut short by one final burst of carbine fire as I climbed in the transport. My new friend was dead. 10/10, would experience survivor guilt again.
Sir Quad Kill aka Sir Charlie;-;If you have friends, this is a great game to play with them. If you don't have any friends, this is a great game to play alone. If you don't have the game to play, get the money for it. If you don't have the money for it, get a job. If you don't have a job, rob the bank. If you get arrested robbing the bank, at least you tried.
theconjuring;-;Children play Call of Duty Boys play Battlefield Men play ARMA
Durga;-;After some 1,400 hours on the game, I can say with FULL VALIDITY this game has ruined my life. If you like realistic physics, teamwork, and every form of warfare, this game is for you. 10/10
Runekn;-;Can't tell you if you should buy it or not, but I can tell you this. You will find annoying bugs, highly requested features that isn't there and lack of content if you're not satisfied with what you have. But when you really get down to it, and experience some of the awesome scenarios you can get in multiplayer and custom sp mission, it's something magical you just can't find in any other game. Arma is not a game which you pick up at launch, play the campaign and a bit of mp, and then trow away. You buy it, love it or hate it, and then play it forever or trow it away immediatly. Arma is a game which you can never called finished. There will always be added to it, be it user or official content, fixes, features or optimizations. Hope I expressed myself correctly and that you learned something from it :) If you like realistic shooters and organized large scale multiplayer warfare, this will be your gem! I'll give it a 9/10, simply because: screw bugs, I've used hundreds of hours on Arma 3 that I would never take back. READ: I will not accept random friend requests! If you have a question, please post it in the comments.
Solly: Panparam;-;It's not a good 'game' for newbies. No, it's not... I use to sit at a place and watch the sunset. I have no idea how to actually shoot, drive and complete missions. It's like my personal sunset simulator. And it's damn beautiful. 10/10
Mr. Bong;-;I have owned this game for a number of weeks now and I have been completely hooked. Great game for the more serious war gamer, not for those who prefer the fast paced combat that you get from Call of Duty series which I consider more for the younger gamers anyway. Arma 3 moves a lot slower and is more squad based than other war games, similar to Battlefield series only slower than that when playing online and you may find yourself on 10 minute helicopter rides just to get into the battlefield and you will be highly satisfied with each kill you make as you know a single round landed by your enemy could be fatal regardless of the weapon they are using. You will have to make good use of any cover you can find and hit the dirt as soon as you hear a bullet crack over your head and then very carefully survey the surrouding area and work out where you are taking fire from as it will usually not be obvious where the fire is coming from and you will find yourself having to hold up for 10-20 minutes in a single location (sometimes longer, I personally have gotten pinned in one location for over an hour) because you are either pinned by enemy fire or it is too dangerous to move forward. You will need to buffer up on your mic communication skills as most players use proper phonetics etc when relaying information to each other on the battlefield such as coordinates and other reconaissance. You can not respawn as quickly as you can in CoD if you are taken down by enemy fire so staying alive is more crucial than any other war game you have played and you wanna hope you are moving up with a squad that has a medic. The graphics are great, the game is a little glitchy at times and the controls take a little getting used to. I recommend buying this game to any serious war game enthusiasts who want to get as close to war as possible (unless doing paintballing or airgunning), and if you do buy the game - I recommend completing the whole VR Tutorial before actually joining a server or playing the Campaign as you will need to really learn all those different keys that may make the difference in a hairy situation in game.
StickyGamez;-;Literally every comment i see on a Arma 3 youtube video - can i run diz g8me me m8'z? i hAZ GTX TITAN 4X ULTRA EDITONUTNN I HAVE 4 OF DEM SO YE I ALSO HAS 69 GB OF WAM AND I HAZ A TOP KEK CPO IF U KNOW WUT I MEN? YE DO?? YE U DO BUTT CAN I RUN DIS G8ME AT ATLESAT 69 FPS? But seriously this game is a great amount of fun. Really good and dramatic gameplay. Get it when you can
fluffeN *endzoneesports.com;-;It somehow has an atmosphere. You really feel like you're in Altis/ Stratis and no where else when playing this game if that makes sense. It is a great joy to learn the in's and out's of this game and it's combined 350 square meters of terrain (approximately). A player that has done his homework and hasn't come straight from cod is easy to distinguish from one that has. This game is one of the least action packed first person shooters in the world no doubt... but it somehow manages to have the most suspension. Incredible game. 10/10
Stormbird 1104;-;A realistic Military Simulator, this game is worth a buy. With the ability to create your own missions with the amazing editor and to play others with the in-built workshop support, you can have endless hours of enjoyment with this game. It's quite realistic, but still lacks many features of military warfare that could be put into the game. The graphics ain't so good on my computer but that's because my computer is 8 years old and I will be upgrading soon so I will be able to see this game at it's full potential. This was my first game in the Arma series, followed by Arma 2 (We don't speak of Cold War Assualt). From my experience with Arma 2 this game doen't differ enormously, bar graphics of course. However, it does have some features that are not present in Arma 2, and I frequently notice these features missing when playing Arma 2. If you are new to the Arma series get this game but if you are a long time veteran then maybe wait a little untill you get bored of all the mods on Arma 2. This is a perfect game for any person who enjoys military combat games or would like a realistic simulation of military combat and life. Worth a buy in my opinion. 8/10 P.S. I haven't played a lot of this game at the current time because it doesn't run so well on my computer and I can only spawn a few units without intense framerate drops.
-O.N.- Zagger;-;Played Wasteland. Pulled up beside a man who wanted a ride. He shot our car then ran. Got out and pretended to shoot at him. Friend shoots him in the head. Fake Admin comes up and cusses at us. We show him what he did to our car. Begin to fix car. Fake Admin blows car up and kills us. Go back and acidentally pick up fake admins gun. Admin shoots me. Get other gear and fight Blufor divers. Fake admin shoots me in the back saying 'Get out of my way mate!' Respawn. Teammate has killed you, you can punish or forgive him: Click Forgive. I made a mistake...
Papa Hedge;-;I've had this game for quite a long time but never really found what to do with it.,..until I found Altis Life! WOW! It's so much fun roleplaying as a civ trying to find his way on Altis Island. If you like roleplaying and are open to all sorts of avenues that appear in front of you, then this is definitely the game for you! Top Drawer!!
Shini;-;Alright time for a short review, had this game since Alpha and well it has really just become worth it. If you can overcome the terrible controls, minor glitches and general baffling mechanics at times (falling to your death at short heights). Then you may enjoy this game. I've mainly played the Wasteland mod, Battle Royale, some Altis Life and some minor CO-OP mods. I can say this game is worth it just for Wasteland, it is basically DayZ without the  running for 4 hours, no dumb zombies, no crying about 'friendly killing' and a proper group system. The mods in general are just getting better and better. However it does take a while for you to find a good Altis Life server without a power abusing admin, I just gave up on that. Plus role play just makes things long. But yeah, Arma 3 takes some getting used to. The really terrible controls add to the tension and in many cases the extended controls is needed to give you very advanced movement. but there are annoying things like dying by falling from a 5 foot drop, or trying to open a door to run away but you end up healing youself in the doorway...unable to move GG. Very unintuitave controls. But with that said most players in this game 50 year old dads with no time to play games that much. And are thus awful and easy to kill. If you're quite adept at games and enjoy wrecking teams of 10 or more old guys playing, then this is the game for you.
BIGJAVLINMATE;-;HEY YOU, YES YOU! DO YOU WANT TO BE OPERATOR AS  LIKE MARSOC, NAVY SEALS AND SAS, well maybe dont buy this game unless you are prepared to heavily mod it. Don't take this the wrong way as ArmA 3 is a great game with the custimation or charcters, weapons and more but my biggest problem (and others) it that it lacks the conventional warfare that most ArmA fans were looking for. This was all found in ArmA, weapons you have heard of and excist but if you want these in ArmA 3 you need to mod them in. Another problem is that the map vareity is terrible, 2 maps...really? Plus the PVP is worse than ArmA 2 (somehow???). But this game has outstanding graphics and alot more features than the previous games. Pros: -Good Graphics -Extra customization -Underwater yay! -CAN be operator as  (but needs mods) -Better character movement and vehicle control -Better campaign (If you want to play it) Cons: (Some are my own opinion) -Lacks realisic warfare -Needs mods to have half the weapons, factions and vehicles of ArmA 2 -Again 2 maps really?! ArmA 2 had 4 on release... -Damage models are screwed in PVP which is worse than ArmA 2 somehow?? -Getting shot makes you character do a ing disco dance move which makes no sense at all -Good Graphics: I expand, you need a good system to even run this game on Low-Medium as I found out before I upgraded, even now with my new system (runs GTA 5, Far Cry4 etc on Max above 60fps+) this game runs like a dying dog, ArmA 2 i could max it and get 50+fps all the time, sometimes on ArmA 3 i struggle to get 30+fps. But remember this review is MY opinion so take from it you will. (Just buy ArmA 2 it better :P) Thats all folks!
heh lol;-;10/10 like Skyrim with guns Also I can't see .
16bit;-;Really boring.. Not engaging, very glitchy, doesnt feel like a proper FPS game to me. Action is 2/10, due to all the action being from far range, online 3/10, dont buy this game, not worth paying for. Even Call Of Duty is better...
GinTonic/R.Fox;-;Do not get me wrong, this... game? is amazing. I hesitate to call it a game, but it really depends on your playstyle. You can go on Roleplay servers, or you can PVP. The usual hardcore users of this product however usually use it as a base for massive coop operations, including vehicle platoons, artillery support (manned and operated in a realistic manner by players) and infantry squads. You want to realistically call in a fire mission for the artillery? This is your game. You want to call in close air support for a strike on a sniper/tank/building? This is your game. You want to indulge yourself in close quarter combat with your squad? This is your game. You want to hunt down IEDs and the insurgents who placed them? This is your game. Ok now, these massive coop operations are made possible and realistic by the modding community. This is a fact, the base game is (to the best of my knowledge) not ever used when it comes to any serious servers or communities. The modding community supplies the realistic radio communications, the real word weapons, the medical simulation, better sounds, better graphics in some cases, better AI (!!!) and all kinds of maps, so YOUR platoon can deploy anywhere from Alaska to Zimbabwe. AND it brought you bipods (seriously Bohemia, how did it take you so long to implement freakin bipods in the game...).... This modding community made the game more realistic and created the fanbase it has today. Arguably the most attention Arma got in years came from the Zombie mod (not a fan btw, but still). And now Bohemia comes along and wants to charge you for DLC. Alright you might say, what is the DLC? The DLC includes things as long range capable rifles and tools to be more accurate. It also includes things like new helicopters and slingloading vehicles/objects. These are argueably some of the main features for the marksmen and helicopter DLC respectivly. Now, these features where added by the modding community YEARS ago. In arma 2 already. For absolutely free. They still exist in Arma 3 too. I do not see the need for the publisher to charge this amount of money for features the community pretty much figured out on its own. I would rather donate that money to a beatiful website called ARMAHOLICS and to certain mod developers on there. And arma 3 is a triple A game with a triple A price. As others pointed out already: People who preordered, played in the alpha etc. paid MORE money than people who waited for the steamsales to kick in. I can get the whole game cheaper and including DLCs than the chaps who where loyal to bohemia and this franchise in the first place.... what the  .... seriosuly. That is , even from a marketing perspective. Here is my advice: If you are looking for the real arma experience (large-scale coop, usually vs. AI with differing amounts of military realism) buy the base game. Then find a appropriate server or group to play with. They will teach you how to mod the  out of this game and you will never need the lame DLCs.
Zoma * Kinguin;-;The enormity of the map is the foundation for the experiences that distinguish Bohemia Interactive's flagship franchise. It's what makes radios, topographical maps, binoculars, and compasses practical equipment in an FPS. It's what allows for kilometer long headshots and coordinated convoy raids. It's what makes using your eyes to spot hints of enemies muzzle flashes, tracers, gunsmoke as valuable as being a crack shot. The scale of Arma 3 dwarfs everything in the genre, including Arma 2 . Altis , a keyhole portion of which is seen in these screenshots, is a Mediterranean island-nation assembled from ruins, airports, coastal villages, solar power plants, military outposts, salt flats, and tank friendly scrubland. It's a variegated backyard for you to play war in, but what's more significant is that Arma's landscape finally has the technology it deserves. Arma 3 represents an aesthetic overhaul of the series. Unbelievable dynamic lighting, a volumetric cloud system, genuine vehicle physics, 3D weapon optics, ragdoll, noticeably improved weapon audio, and other grainy, eye level details await scrutiny inside Arma 3's macro elegance. The best improvement is the merciful cutting of Arma 2's rigid, Tin Man without oil combat animations, which makes infantry combat more responsive in your hands. A half year in paid pre-release has given Arma 3 time to gestate, but the final build is far from being a comprehensive reinvention of the series, and some long-standing blemishes that arise from its nature as a gargantuan simulation linger. Even on highend hardware, my framerate dips under the spectacle of some multiplayer missions. Friendly AI units, though marginally better-behaved, still depend on the player to be their brains, an issue that's circumvented by playing Arma the way God intended it: cooperatively.
branden1213fog2;-;great game takes a lot of power so if you dont have a powerful computer or laptop i would not recommend because it takes alot of power to truly experience
ComradeWinston;-;[Fatigue update] This has ruined the game. I'm not even exagerating. Unless you only use vehicles 24/7 this update will have ruined the game for you, making you aim like a drunkard after jogging about all of 10m and forcing you to walk at a snails pace after a whole 20m. That's some ing wonderful realism, isn't it guys. ----------------------------------- If I had to compare Arma 3 to another game, I'd say its the grandchild of Battlefield and Skyrim. With massive-scale combat, maps that dwarf any other shooter without question, and a variety of user-made game modes along with the vanilla series of Zeus game modes there is no shortage of content. In the recently added Zeus modes you can even turn this first-person shooter into an RTS game. The game mechanics are mostly solid however some minor things such as falling damage, parachute mechanics, and cars/trucks turning to useless wrecks after a realtively minor bump into anything leave plenty of room for improvement. Bugs are also still a signifigant issue, even to the point of causing some destroyed buildings to randomly shoot someone into the air and have them fall to their death. And in general, the engine feels stiff. Much like Skyrimissues asside, if you find the right game mode for you, almost anyone should be able to find some enjoyment out of Arma 3. Whether you're some hardcore-roleplaying type, want to fight for survival all over an island, or simply want to vie for control over a city; there is plenty to do.
BlackJack;-;This game is great. This game has so much content, and BI are bringing more! If you haven't played Arma 2, you will be blown away at the map sizes, of Altis and Stratis. Heaps of weapons and vehicles, and plenty of things to do. There is also a big modding community, and with Arma 3 being very easy to mod, it is a game expanding quite fast. There are heaps of servers that bring you different game types. Also it has full steam workshop support! This game is great to play with friends. Don't expect a Call of Duty. Worth the money, every dollar.
ACA632 Will;-;Awesome game I hope they improve on it more though
Iced_Eagle;-;Fantastic game. The single player content, showcases and training are good. The real meat of the game is in its multiplayer though. Admittedly, it can be a bit confusing at first if you're a new player, as some servers require you to download mods before you can join the server. There doesn't tend to be a whole lot of "vanilla" servers out there. However, the mods are fantastic and worth the effort, especially if you play them with a group of people. My favorite experience thus far was when we were playing the "Insurgency" mod (military vs terrorists). There's a mod called Task Force Radio, which in a nut shell provides much more realistic radios to use. Each faction has their own encrypted radio, various channels you can switch to and various ranges of radio (long range and short range). As the military, we were attempting to locate intel that was known to exist in a village. A squad was unfortunately KIA, and for the next two hours, the military was getting picked off constantly. I even deployed with a buddy deep into a mountain with full camo, let my team know that where I was and I had good sights on the village, and not 2 minutes later I got sniped even though I was hardly exposed and never took a shot. Later, it turns out they stole a radio off a dead squadmate and were listening to our radio chatter and our positions for 2 hours and we all had a good laugh as the terrorists won. 10/10
Caressmysoul;-;This game makes my pineal gland vibrate with pleasure!
Shaantitus;-;Only bought this because i could not get battlefield 4 through steam, remembered fondly the days of operation flashpoint and decided to give it a go. Most impressed, this is truly a game that is what you make of it, the available mods are fantastic, wasteland burns huge ammounts of time. The editor, once you figure it out is also a fine piece of kit. Buy this game,you won't regret it. Provided of course you have the attention span to get into it properly. I meant this when i wrote it in january. It has only gotten better since then. The hours this game burns is insane.
in;-;One of the best / my current favorite game. The amount of mods/online modes available is ridiculous. If you're into the realism & being strategic/tactical then this game is definitely for you. It's not your average run & gun FPS like COD & BF, so be warned. It takes a while to get the hang of the game mechanics & learn how to use everything properly because it IS a simulator.
RyeThatGuy;-;I played this game back when it was the free game for the weekend. I never purchased it afterwards, and you'll probably figure out why from both my review and those of others. So, as anyone could reasonably expect, I was pretty excited for this game to be free for the weekend, as I've had my eye on it for almost a year! As an avid ARMA II fan, I had always been a little dissapointed with the lack of more modern military tech in an otherwise great game. I thought ARMA 3 would whisk all my problems away and carry me into ARMA heaven. It didn't quite work out like that though... So upon launch the first thing that struck me as odd was the lack of info. Sure, the menus are much more appealing to the eye, but the tutorials were some weird lovechild of a campaign and a quest-system. It was very strange, so much so that I neglected to finish the first one. "Oh well," I thought. "I've played enough ARMA II to figure out how to handle myself." And for the most part I was right. I jumped into the campaign and it was fun! So why the negative review? Well, the campaign was fun for a little bit, but after that 'new game smell' wore off, it wasn't much to brag about. I moved on, and played some tank match which I can't remember too many details about, other than a few key things. First off, everything was insanely grey. Now I understand the use of dynamic lighting and warzone fog and stuff like that, but this was just rediculous. So, as I was cruising around with my platoon of Slammers, we encountered some enemies! Great! Let's see how this works! So to sum that up, there's unique and dynamic damaged/dead unit models depending on their style of demise, the radio chatter no longer sounds like a panicking android but a much cleaner soldier, and vehicle control is no longer a reinactment of the mountain scene in Tokyo Drift. But, what I couldn't get over was the lack of diversity. Oh look, Slammers. Hey, more slammers. Oh, a Wolverine (I think). And OMG another slammer. What I'm getting at is that, unlike its predicessor, ARMA 3 has no vast, game-changing DLCs (other than Karts, but that isn't even military.) So what you end up with is this massive tropical island turned warzone, and you get the same handful of units over and over, which might not matter for AIs, but for myself I prefer a diverse choice in my vehicles and other wartime equipment. Sure, it's modable, but so was ARMA II, and I already know the cool mods for that, which totally redefine the feel of the game. So, over all: +Better lighting and physics +Better voices and immersion +Diverse factions +Newer tech to toy around with -Low diversity of units -Poor tutorials for those who want to start at the top -Modernized EVERYTHING, even when unnecessary (e.g. Hummingbirds. It's such a pointles change, just give me my Little Bird!!) -Virtually no DLCs that expand the battle experience, and the ones that exist aren't worth the cost for the amount of units recieved -Essentially a more stabil version of a modded ARMA II client Overall, I would just reccomend saving the money for other stuff, there's plenty of games on steam, but none of them, not even ARMA 3, can match the charm and pure flexibility of ARMA II.
Banditoz hates Chrome;-;Led a small detatchment from the Stratis Island, trying to escape the exploding red people. We crashed on Altis, trying to avoid the Close Air Support jets in the air aswell as, you guessed it, more exploding red people. We escaped from the island with boats. 10/10 would die from exploding red people again
LoL LTU;-;Good -Realistic (compared to cod or bf) -Fun with friends -Tons of gamemodes -Good graphics -Plenty of mods Bad -Overpriced DLC -Low fps (aka the game is not optimised) -Probably too difficult for new players to understand how to play
iconic;-;could not stop dancing and doing tae kwon do. 8/10
jakey1995abc;-;Nothing beats playing multiplayer to see a giant exloding rocket peniz flying around in the air.
[LONE WOLF];-;the best military game
Ricode;-;I started this game up because a friend and I watched Frankie play Altis Life. Two weeks later my friend is the biggest drug lord on the server and leader of the rebels and i am his main enforcer. We are millionaires and raiding cities for fun while the cops chase us. It started with me shooting two cops, in a diving suit, in the middle of a weed field and ended with the server naming a gun shop after me due to the mass murder I committed over the subsequent months. Me: "Can I shoot him" Friend: "No" Me: "But I really want to" *BANG* Me: "I shot him" Friend: "RICODE! WHAT THE HELL!" Drug Lords 1, Civilians 0 10/10 Would execute civilians frivolously again.
Techgamerboy;-;if you love playing go kart then buy this game
police brutality simulator;-;no one should have to pay 60 dollars for this game
Veryhonorabru2;-;i love the game but i had to get a new computter and when i downloaded t to the new one it says " GAME LAUNCH ERROR GAME EXECUTEABLE NOT FOUND. PLEASE RPAIR THE GAME THROUGH THE STEAM CLIENT." i have done everything i could find and nothing works...this is BS and a wast of my money.....
Dave2407;-;The Singleplayer CAN be fun. The graphics Options are pretty good, if you have a bad PC you can edit it very well. But Multiplayer is Very bad, i got the game for Multiplayer and its a Disaster, i cant even connect and when i join it says: Mission failed... I might be a noob. But i dont recommend the game.
Muckery;-;Campaign is awful. I understand that only giving you one user save per mission makes you rely on being smart about how you approach certain objectives, but when your ally AI are dumber than rocks, it makes things really difficult, and almost impossible in some instances. I understand they might not be programmed to know how to clear a room, or use bounding to move up, but it would be nice if when I order them to move 100m front to cover they would do that as opposed to moving backwards 300m and laying in the prone. Also, when you are assaulting an objective 200m in front of you, and you give them specific targets to shoot, they instead choose to engage the two guys on the opposite mountain 500m away. Lets also not forget what I'm assuming is a bug where even after clearing an area, they refuse to move in anything other than a low crawl (makes it difficult when your next objective is 500m away) I wanted a game where the idea wasn't you have to do everything by yourself, but obviously thats not the case. In addition to crappy AI, there are other bugs that make the game absolutely miserable. When attacking a lookout tower you can shoot the guy in the head a couple times, toss 3 grenades into it, and yet if you get within 10m of it, an enemy laying in the prone up there will phase his gun through the floor and kill you before you even try to move into it and clear it. If those bugs were fixed, it would actually be an enjoyable game, but having to restart from the last checkpoint where you have to walk 15 min to the next area only to get killed by a glitch gets really old really fast.
Medical Officer;-;What in the name of all that is holy,is wrong with this game. Well I will tell you. Aside from some new wepons,this is the exact same game as arma 2. The "new" invantory system is just as terrible as the old one,and requires a 3 day class in order to understand how it operates. The way that cars trucks and tanks function is just as horrid and un-predictable as it was in arma 2. I can still do a loop-d-loop in most aircraft at under 100 yards altattude. the campain is luaghable with a bad story,bad vice acting, and filled with stupid bugs. In order to play the game you have to attend basic training,not on combat tactics or proper map reading mind you,no you need basic traning on how the heck to move,access invantory or piont your gun. 90% of the time I spend fighting the engine and bad mechanics that make the game hard to play. 10% i spend having fun shooting bad guys or working with a team compleate a great COMUNITY CREATED mod. And that brings Me to My last piont how the hell did arma get such a great comunity? They release an unfinished game,the cumminity buys it,and then finishes it for them. The only fun modes are the ones supplied by the comunity. This game is one of the worst repersentations of the FPS and tactical shooter genras. The only reason this game is fun,is becuase the cammunity creates awesome mods,and fixes all the terrible bugs. I rate this game 2/10
Termin8rSmurf;-;In the same theme as Carlsberg Lager being Probably the best lager in the world.... Arma 3. Probably the best Mil Sim in the world. Superb in game graphics, excellent replayability, user creation mode is fantastic. More than enough mods are available, workshop for the user created missions, if you can't design your own. One major drawback to it... It requires high-spec machinery to run satisfactory. If you really want this though, sort your machine out, then spend a little cash on this game. It's the most realistic military simulator ever. So damned good, it makes my balls tingle!
McTwisticle;-;This game always crashes. I don't like it. Buy it now.
Jack5868;-;Carrying on from the genre-defining MilSim that was Arma 2, Arma 3 is a rock solid sequel that lives up to the expectations in place for the Arma series, even managing to go a bit beyond in certain aspects. As a great fan of Arma 2, I love Arma 3 and the improvements BI have managed to implement into the game. As well as showing off near-future battlefield tech in the game to help accurately represent the game's time period, BI have also managed to develop great maps, interesting gamemodes (Wasteland) for online play, and still manage to maintain and improve upon the fun level of realism that made Arma 2 so popular with MilSim players. The modding scene is also very active, with mods such as ACE and ACRE out there for added realism and more 'serious' MilSim players which allows the game to be expanded upon a lot. Be warned however, the game isn't shy on performance and requires a decent rig to run properly even on mid-range settings. My only major whine about the game itself is the developer's choice to release the campaign in a series of 'episodes', drip-feeding us content and missions. But as each episode is released, this negative becomes less and less of a factor. I'm giving Arma 3 a 9/10, and deffinitely recommend this game.
Filk;-;Absolutely worth buying. I wouldn't trust the relatively low metascore since this game lives from the content the community provides. At the point the reviews were done, there only were very few user created missions and mods. This game is very complex and deep. You will either hate it or love it, but you should definitely give it a try for at least a few hours before you judge.
JG500;-;Ah, Arma 3. Many people might not enjoy this game as this game unlike most Fast FPS's or Tactical shooters, arma lets you play on a 270km squared terrain. You may approach an objective how you want it, if the mission scenario allows it, when you want it (HVT convoy passing through, gotta be on time.) and with what you want it. Overall the optimization is "okay" as the game recieves constant updates with the biggest one is a FREE Zeus gamemode DLC being released on dev branch. Fixes pour through constantly as well as new features or updates, arma 3 like all the previous arma games provides a simple to use editor which can be used to create a simple firefight, or an all out war with dynamic units and performance scripts. The graphics are really good which helps the immersion, thes a weather setting so you can be having a nice vacation in greece or be infiltrating an enemy base in the stormy seas of Altis, (Altis is the 270km squared island, Stratis is smaller, yet enjoyable) under the cover of fog, as you disembark you grab your gear from the boat, armed with SMG's with flashlights in the night and with the help of moonlight you make your way through the forest, you get to a road. A CSAT convoy passes by, not noticing you. You carry on... This can be the begining of a mission very easily. This is what makes Arma unique, you can script a whole event to make it a michael bay movie or let the players make a critical decision of wether retreating or holding ground. Arma ofcourse features realistic bullet drop, recoil and STANCE ADJUSTMENTS, remember those old fashioned "Stand, crouch, prone" type stances? Well no more! You can now adjust yourself into a variety of stances such as high crouch, low crouch, high stand and many others. You can peek round walls or shove a part of your body out and spray at the enemy. This gives you a whole lot more freedom than many other games, not to mention 90% buildings are enterable, yet without furniture just at the moment. Let's speak a bit about AI, they are currently undergoing changes and they can be very accurate, not accurate, smart or just dumb. As each unit has a skill bar and the games has difficulty levels such as Recruit, Regular or Veteran+Higher which can all be adjusted to multiple points such as HUD, waypoints, friendly skill, enemy skill and much more. They can still provide a very authentic experience. Now, the game is called a finished game, but not all agree. Features pour in and so do fixes. The amount of content compared to previous titles is smaller, but not everything is finished. CSAT+NATO jets are coming in a few weeks as an example. The great thing is that the community is devoted, helping and of all. Active. Mods are rolling out hot from the oven every day, hell. Some people are making a dinosaur mod! And from what I know, official Arma 3 mod tools are not even released. If it's re-skins or dinosaurs, or perhaps Arma 2 content, it is all there and more baking each day. The developers are active and listen to the community and that helps them make a quality game, even better. Yet I do understand alot of people dont like it if they have come from older series such as Arma 2 for "lack of content" or glitches, then they ofcourse dont remember what was Arma 2's launch like :) The game is gradually getting better, and yes I agree arma 2 has "more" content and is more modern combined with the Operation Arrowhead expansion, but Arma 3 is a great game too. Or great modules lacking such as the medic module (A revive like module, for wounded people.) Or great mods such as Advanced Combat Environment or Invasion 1944, most mods are coming over to Arma 3, yet there is a waiting barrier of course. But if you are still confused if you want to buy the game.... Arma 3 cars have working mirrors. I would rate the game at the current state 7.5/10.
Sverker;-;If you liked to play soldier in the woods when you were a child with no friends and still has a sick perversion for it this might be a game for you, BUT WAIT IT GETS BETTER... with no enemy contact in 4 hours and when you think you have found some enemies on that one hill you see all the time, you get so  excited you step on a mine and then die a horrible death and you realise "Those werent enemies on that hill it was just ing posts standing there for no reason!" , Now to the ratings! If "LIK OMG U CNT EVEN DO FUKN NOSCOPE 360 FROM 5 KILOMETERS? WHAT FGGOT GEJM IS TIS?" is a 10 and "This game is a very realistic game, with realistic weapons and tanks" is a 0 I would give this game a: go  yourself im no reviewer Would recommend to my worst enemy!
Alex;-;ARMA 3 Beta, a beautiful place on the island of stratis, filled with wild life and plants, oh yeah, and did i tell you the place is a  battlefield filled with the monstrosities of war? The full release wont offer much unless bohemia has something up their sleeve, the game is going to lack jets, which is one of the main parts of an arma game, bohemia needs to step up and make more stuff, or get embarresed by mod makers, that doesnt mean the game will be horrible, the game will be very good, beautiful and dangerous at the same time, the AI was horrible, but was then made more battle effecient in the beta. If you didnt buy it during alpha, then you will be spending some stacks on the beta or full release, its going to be about 50 to 60 dollars, but from what i can tell, its worth it!
Brando1;-;This is a pretty cool games to play with friends and do some roleplay and coop
Yay I Lost;-;Make Arma, Not War.
BRT Cobra;-;they added bipods and upnp how can it not get a thumbs up now
RED RAPTER 30;-;Arma 3= Making drug runs Arma 3= Killing turtles because they are worth a lot of money Arma 3= Getting mugged by people with guns because you dont want to die Arma 3= Ai seeing you from a mile away and shooting you Arma 3= Killing your friends Arma 3= PLANES Arma 3=HELICOPTERS Arma 3= $60 well spent Arma 3= BY THE GAME
VR6X;-;(update: posted before gta 5 for pc came out) Is this the best complete, realistic, beautiful, smart game ever created? possibly yes.
BrainDaWGs;-;The main reason why I bought Arma3 was for the Wasteland mod. I played Arma 2 pretty heavily and I can say for sure that Arma3/Wasteland is far superior than DayZ in every respect except for survival/foraging. I played quite a bit of Arma2 Dayz and I feel that the mod is extremely overrated compared to the other MP experiences Arma has to offer. This review may be more helpful to those who are thinking about the decision to move to Arma3 from Arma2. Arma 3 improves upon Arma 2 in many ways. First it reduces the amount of clutter on the keyboard. Now there isn't (what feels like) fifty keys dedicated to command/radio and now there is more of a streamlined feel to the game. That being said, it's extremely necessary to play with voice, as calling out targets/orders is something that is required in this game, unless you are a lone wolf or you are in a rather large group where the need for such things is lessened. Also, a major update in graphics, which I must say are stunning compared to A2. This doesn't make Arma, but it helps you stay immersed. Needless to say, Arma will always be unoptimized, so please, learn simple optimization tricks before giving up after seeing you have <30 frames. It's worth it. The amount of customizations in this game is extremely helpful/useful. Be warned though, it may take some time before you get the hang of it as Arma, being buggy, has a tendency to make things hard. Plus there's the fact that sometimes a player can get their hands on a fantastic sniper rifle, minus the scope (I'm pointing at you wasteland). So be warned of these situations before you find yourself in one that isn't to your liking. After all of this I would suggest that people with lower end computers don't buy this game or be prepared to run it on low settings. But the low settings are nothing to be mad about, as they are still pretty damn good, and graphics are not something that you come to Arma for in the first place. Now for those who haven't experienced the Military Sim feels (you know what I'm talking about)... Arma. Delivers. When played right, it delivers a deep comradery that cannot be gotten from most other games on the market. When you achieve something with your friends, who you sometimes have to place 100% trust in, it can be awe inspiring and can lead to many ecstatic shouts over the radio for doing something seemingly insignificant if seen through eyes of a standard FPS player. Now about gameplay; Arma requires an extreme amount of patience. Normally you have one or two rounds of fire to get things right or you will be sent to the death screen. Bullets hurt. Really bad. Normally getting hit with one is life threatening if it's normal caliber, but any more than that and you could be facing a bit of a journey back. This normally means 10-20 minutes to regroup and find another battle worth fighting. But don't worry, many of my fondest memories of Arma are from moments that are just random and unexpected, and they don't even require the slightest trace of enemy presence. ( http://i.imgur.com/GgapTFX.jpg ) <- From Arma2 TL;DR Arma 3 is a much improved upon Arma 2, nothing extremely new here but there's still quite a bit more which makes it worth getting if your computer can handle the game and you can handle the buggyness/playstyle of Arma. It is one of my favorite games and is the leader of its genre, and rightfully so. For those wondering approximately 300 hours of game time logged on Arma2.
King Pootis;-;My first game on A3 brought me the most horrific experience I've ever had in any game, ever. We're on our way to the objective, a small dump east of a town occupied by enemy forces. I'm leading a team of 4 men. We come to a crossroad and I sprint across, telling my men to hold back. I cross a few more times, trying to get a response from any snipers. Nothing. I run, my LMG gunner runs, my medic runs. But I kept my Marksman on the other side to make sure we'd make it across. Anybody seen Full Metal Jacket all the way through? Remember the sniper scene? The marksman takes a round in the leg as we're running and goes down. He then takes two more in the chest. The kid who was playing had some mad acting skills, he played it up to 11 here. He screams as he's being shot. Crawling, drenched in his own blood. "SARGE? YOU AIN'T LEAVING ME OUT HERE LIKE THIS, RIGHT? I-I WANNA GO WITH YOU GUYS! C'MON SARGE, H-HELP ME! C'MON! PLEASE DON'T LEAVE ME!" he died after that. I cried and he respawned. 11/10, would recommend getting.
Peace;-;This is not a game for people who want fast action movie style gaming, this is a game for people who appreciate the finer things. Having done both military service and picked up MILSIM airsoft as a hobby this game is the closest you will get to what goes on in reality. There are experiences you will have in ARMA 3 that can not be had in COD or BF, experiences that will have you shaking from the adrenaline release. One that comes to mind was a mission to destroy an enemy comms tower, I was squad leader of 8 or so AI:s. As we approached the Comms tower and I told my men to go stealth, no firing unless fired upon. We moved slowly taking advantage of terrain, keeping an watchful eye for enemy patrols. Once the tower was in visual range pace slowed even more and I spent the better part of 30 minutes just looking for enemy patrols and advancing to about 200 meters from the tower. There I positioned my men to cover a wide firing arc as I had spotted quite a few patrols moving in and about the tower. I considered opening fire and probably being able to drop a good portion of the enemy before they could zero in on our position. But a firefight is always a risk, and these AI had been around for a few missions and I had started to anthropomorphize them a bit and secondly I might get hit and killed. As I considered how I would start the engagement a sudden hole opened up in the patrol pattern, I realised the tower is unguarded and I had an opportunity to do something I had not considered. I got up and ran as fast as I could towards the tower, all the time expecting the bullets to start cracking above my head. I kept scanning as I ran whizzling through bushes trying to pick a path that the least visibility to any patrols. After what seemed like far too long I reached the tower and threw out a satchel charge and another for good measure, if one would not bring the tower down it would sure attract attention. I turned around and made my way back, as I closed on my men I started ordering them to fall back, hope growing that I might get out of this alive. Falling back to about 400 meters I finally detonated the satchel charges and the tower fell, from there it was just a short run to the truck and back to Command. I had done it. I had pulled off the perfect mission, not a shot fired and all under my command back alive. That is what this game is about.
[13th] Danius;-;Oh man. Where to even begin with this one. It would be an extreme disservice to simply call Arma 3 a shooter, as it is so, so much more than that. Arma 3 is a military simulator. This is a distinction that its developers hold sacred and are proud of, and one to which I can attest is completely accurate and deserved. But its even more than that. Arma 3 is a gaming platform, upon which so much has already been and will continue to be built for years to come. At its core though, Arma 3 in a supremely excellent military sim. The graphics are stunning, the gameplay is excellent, the mechanics are solid, and Bohemia Interactive has done an absolutely amazing job packaging this all together. New comers to the Arma series (as I was) may initially be overwhelmed by the games complex mechanics and decidedly different pace from your typical FPS/shooter. Enemy engagements happen at much greater distance than is typical in the genre and are often brief, brutal, and more times than not will conclude with your demise. There is no handholding here. No mini-maps, no enemy UI icons/indicators, no hit markers, no health bars. If you get shot a couple of times, you will find yourself unceremoniously dispatched. While this creates a high barrier for entry and a steep learning curve for new players, it provides a unique and distinctive play style. Situational awareness, cover, teamwork, suppressive fire, and generally moving purposefully and as if your  depended on knowing what was behind the next ridge or hiding in the bushes are paramount to your success. Add to these infantry mechanics the amazingly rendered vehicles, armor, helicopters, and planes, each with their own realistic mechanics to learn and master, and you end up with a truly amazing military simulation experience. Out of the box, Arma comes with a great single player campaign comprised of 3 separate acts, each containing ~12-15 missions. The campaign focuses on a well crafted story of a military conflict that has erupted over Arma 3s two HUGE islands of Stratis and Altis. You play the part of a NATO soldier who finds himself stuck in the middle of a complex engagement. The campaign is rewarding, and challenging. (I have yet to complete it as Im stuck on one mission that I simply cant seem to complete.) However the single-player campaign is FAR from the end of this title. The mission editing tools have allowed this amazing community to develop some absolutely awesome single player missions, all of which can be downloaded free of charge from the Steam workshop and numerous other sites around the interwebs. I would also recommend you check out the supremely excellent full game conversion single player mods Whole Lotta Altis and Dynamic Universal War System which will provide countless additional single player hours and could be completely stand alone titles in themselves. Oh and the multiplayer, oh god the multiplayer. Wasteland, King of the Hill, Invade and Annex, Battle Royale, Breaking Point, so many Co-Op opportunities, the amazing looking upcoming Epoch (currently in closed Alpha). Im sure there are so many others that I havent even discovered yet. Each of these represent COMPLETELY USER GENERATED and totally disparate ways to play Multiplayer within the Arma 3 platform. By purchasing Arma 3, you immediately have access to each of these completely gratis and each could essentially be considered totally separate game. In wrapping up this lengthy review, Arma 3 is an amazing experience and a true accomplishment in game development. It is the only game in recent memory that I can say with confidence that I never get bored with playing. Bohemia Interactive has made it clear that they plan to support this game for years to come, and they have built something amazing on which the possibilities are truly endless. Purchase this game. Purchase it now. Thank me later. (IF YOU DO NOT FIND MY REVIEW HELPFUL, please leave a comment as to why. I welcome the constructive feedback.)
ArtificialApple;-;This is quite possibly the most emotional shooter I've ever played, and it's not because of the campaign. Crowd around, children, it's story time. One day, not so long ago, my squad had just destroyed an anti-air battery. Our pilot landed, and the rest of the squad boarded one by one. I was about to get in when the rockets started flying. The chopper lifted off, with my pilot saying that he would return in a few minutes. Unwilling to die before then, I rushed to the nearest cover, a small house by a narrow road. I entered to find a ten year-old player who had also been left behind. He explained that he was a sniper and invited me to join his "clan". I politely declined, explaining that my own squad was inbound. As I finished, a Ghost Hawk flew over the horizon. My squad had arrived. This noble child soldier and I were sprinting to the helicopter when the bullets started hitting. The sniper screamed as a 6.5 mm cartridge entered his leg. His shrieks for help were cut short by one final burst of carbine fire as I climbed in the transport. My new friend was dead. 10/10, would experience survivor guilt again.
Sir Quad Kill aka Sir Charlie;-;If you have friends, this is a great game to play with them. If you don't have any friends, this is a great game to play alone. If you don't have the game to play, get the money for it. If you don't have the money for it, get a job. If you don't have a job, rob the bank. If you get arrested robbing the bank, at least you tried.
theconjuring;-;Children play Call of Duty Boys play Battlefield Men play ARMA
Durga;-;After some 1,400 hours on the game, I can say with FULL VALIDITY this game has ruined my life. If you like realistic physics, teamwork, and every form of warfare, this game is for you. 10/10
Runekn;-;Can't tell you if you should buy it or not, but I can tell you this. You will find annoying bugs, highly requested features that isn't there and lack of content if you're not satisfied with what you have. But when you really get down to it, and experience some of the awesome scenarios you can get in multiplayer and custom sp mission, it's something magical you just can't find in any other game. Arma is not a game which you pick up at launch, play the campaign and a bit of mp, and then trow away. You buy it, love it or hate it, and then play it forever or trow it away immediatly. Arma is a game which you can never called finished. There will always be added to it, be it user or official content, fixes, features or optimizations. Hope I expressed myself correctly and that you learned something from it :) If you like realistic shooters and organized large scale multiplayer warfare, this will be your gem! I'll give it a 9/10, simply because: screw bugs, I've used hundreds of hours on Arma 3 that I would never take back. READ: I will not accept random friend requests! If you have a question, please post it in the comments.
Solly: Panparam;-;It's not a good 'game' for newbies. No, it's not... I use to sit at a place and watch the sunset. I have no idea how to actually shoot, drive and complete missions. It's like my personal sunset simulator. And it's damn beautiful. 10/10
Mr. Bong;-;I have owned this game for a number of weeks now and I have been completely hooked. Great game for the more serious war gamer, not for those who prefer the fast paced combat that you get from Call of Duty series which I consider more for the younger gamers anyway. Arma 3 moves a lot slower and is more squad based than other war games, similar to Battlefield series only slower than that when playing online and you may find yourself on 10 minute helicopter rides just to get into the battlefield and you will be highly satisfied with each kill you make as you know a single round landed by your enemy could be fatal regardless of the weapon they are using. You will have to make good use of any cover you can find and hit the dirt as soon as you hear a bullet crack over your head and then very carefully survey the surrouding area and work out where you are taking fire from as it will usually not be obvious where the fire is coming from and you will find yourself having to hold up for 10-20 minutes in a single location (sometimes longer, I personally have gotten pinned in one location for over an hour) because you are either pinned by enemy fire or it is too dangerous to move forward. You will need to buffer up on your mic communication skills as most players use proper phonetics etc when relaying information to each other on the battlefield such as coordinates and other reconaissance. You can not respawn as quickly as you can in CoD if you are taken down by enemy fire so staying alive is more crucial than any other war game you have played and you wanna hope you are moving up with a squad that has a medic. The graphics are great, the game is a little glitchy at times and the controls take a little getting used to. I recommend buying this game to any serious war game enthusiasts who want to get as close to war as possible (unless doing paintballing or airgunning), and if you do buy the game - I recommend completing the whole VR Tutorial before actually joining a server or playing the Campaign as you will need to really learn all those different keys that may make the difference in a hairy situation in game.
7;-;this is ing nice game !
[HKK] TheProphetOmega;-;This is the definitive military experience, sure it might be rough around the edges and maybe it can be a bit unforgiving at times, but no other military shooter out there comes even close to what ARMA 3 offers, unlimited replayability, thousands of campaigns and scenarios, mods, coop, vehicles, exploration, and above all a sense of total inmersion. With the upcoming free dlc, and a huge community behind it, Bohemia interactive have again struck gold, having played their games since Operation Flashpoint, it has been an awesome surprise to see how far they have taken the genre forward, although, be advised, Call of Warfare fans will be in for a shock as nothing they have learnt there will have much use in here! The graphics are amazing, the movement and controls are the best in the series, but be advised, you will have to take time to learn the ins and outs of the game, as it is sometimes unforgiving of even the slightest mistakes, eventually you get the hang of it and this game really shines! Must buy! Get your gun soldier and hit the dirt!
REQUIEM;-;I originally bought Arma when it first came onto steam. However back then I only played 1-2 hours of it, and left it in my library to rot. It was not only until a week or two ago when I started to play it fully. I tried out most gamemodes, and I must say, it is a great game. Below is (a long) first match. I jumped into a King of the Hill match, and it was hectic. People were shouting over coms, team and proximity chat, strategitcal locations and manuevers. The objective was 3 Km away so everyone at the base was finding transport anyway they could. I found this small helicopter almost full taking off, I hopped in and we flew away. The pilot, attempting to avoid fire and a long flight, flew over the deep ocean. Now we weren't that far from shore, but far enought that it would be an insanely long swim. I was sitting in the middle of the helicopter looking at the pilot, as he looked back and told me it would only be a couple minutes, and that we would have to parachute. As he looked back at me, I could see through the windshield a missle coming right towards us. There was an enemy hidden on the shore with a rocket launcher. We were hit and falling at a rapid rate. The launcher hit our back tail, and we were plummiting towards the ocean. Fumbling with my keys to try to jump out, the helicopter hit the water, and sank extremely fast. I was lucky enough to eject myself, and swim towards the surface. As I swam I saw several bodies of the other passengers. I was the only survivor. Hurt from the crash, I was unable to swim fast, and I was stuck in the middle of the ocean. The waves were big so I had to fight staying on the surface. I was about to give up hope and drown myself, as I knew I wouldn't make the swim. All of sudden I hear a helicopter! Some pilot saw the crash and saw me swimming! He lowered himself and I hopped in. Boy was I glad, I thanked him a ton, and we started to fly off as I saw the bodies of my comrades float to the surface. I was able to capture a picture of the rescue below. (I play on three monitors so excuse the extremely wide screenshot) http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=367509437 Sadly this rescue would end soon as the same rocket launcher shot us down for good. I spawned back at base and rode out on an ATV with some random teammate on the back. The drive was long, 3 Km, and towards the end, a helicopter lowered down and shot rockets at us. It had come from nowhere. As it hit us with one rocket, a friendly jet shot it down. Hurt from the rocket, my teammate and I escaped into the bushes. We were still 500 meters from the objective. Moving at an extremely slow rate because of the injuries, we ran into battle. Sadly we were both easily picked off. My 30 minutes thus far has been a failure to go into actual battle, and I wanted to actually fight for once. I rode on a helicopter and we parachuted down, all 12 of us. People shot up as us as I saw a few friends fall, I flew into a tree and hid in some bushes. An enemy tank and some infantry walked right past me as I lay in the bushes. Once they left, I ran into a broken down house with half of it missing. I look out a window and see a dozen enemy troops parachuting down.. into the backyard. None of them saw me but I knew once I started firing, I was to be outnumbered. Desperate for some firefight, I opened fire. 1..2...3...4... they all fell as I shot them down. More men had landed but they were confused where I was firing from. I had killed 4 men at this point and killed a 5th as I looked to my left to see a sniper in the bushes. Him and I stared at each other for a few seconds, as I saw him aim down his sights, and headshot me. Seriously 9/10 great game. Only reason not a 10 is because of some bugs and poor optimization on some servers. This game isn't for a casual person looking for some quick action, you should know what you're doing or else people will yell at you. Too much water -IGN
Kouch Pouch;-;game bad from commies to nazis this game does not have you covered sad sad i am sad this game is bad bad this game is bad!
Snow_Wolf367;-;My friend blew up a friendly helicopter after we told him it was friendly. He said he panicked, There was one survivor*, 10/10 Would play again I love this game XD Seriously fun game though. *out of 7
Cat of Handegg;-;Arma 3 is just as boring as Arma 2 until you play King of the Hill. KOTH makes this game, its the best. Worth the cash money just for that mode alone. Why? Progression, teamwork. And last but not least, friendly helicopter pilots will drop you onto the Hill of Death just for , giggles and points. 10/5 Oh by the way, its unoptimized like every Arma game, so to make it go from 20fps to 90fps you need to balance out CPU and GPU performance.
ShineMYShoes;-;Arma 3 is another hard core shooter. It's hard to get into when you have never palyed Arma II. The graphics are amazing. There are multiple different scenarios to play if you dont feel like playing multiplayer. But I would say multiplayer is where the game is at its best. It may take some time to get into the action which is where the Arma 3 fails at, but once you are in the heat of battle the gameplay is unmatched by anyhting else. Communicating with squad mates, tactically moving about to achieve the objective, and the feeling of being in huge squad is just something no other game in my opinion has achieved. If you are interested in Arma 3 then I recommend you buy it. Although I don't have much time in Arma 3, and I have played many other FPS, I can clearly say that this is one of the better FPS out there. The first time I got into battle was what changed my view of Arma 3.
Kopy Kap;-;Cant get a single match to function. -.-
jordan_gill1;-;i dont know how to get in to severs it kicks me out all the time why ??
Xanthone;-;UNREFINED AND JERKY -- describes every aspect of this game. Even with the settings turned down the animations are horrible and the guns are garbage - I cant even hit a window on the side of a building. Bohemia needs to take some pointers from other shooters, refine the animations, fix the guns so they actually can shoot someone, and fix the jerky animations and lag so that whopever you shoot at, is not ghosting and jerking around like someone having a seaizure. I wouldnt even call this and Alpha build and this game has been out for years -- NO EXCUSES AT THIS POINT. I want my money back, this game is garbage.
White;-;Arma 3 DLC the game
RubenF;-;Poorly optimized game, 30 fps and crashing when joining multiplayer: My pc specs are pretty good.
Ryo;-;We were a group of 3 soldiers stranded in a city in the middle of nowhere, with only sidearms to protect ourselves. 9mm's in our hands which compared to the firepower of our enemy, it would make them have good laughs. Our top priority was scavanging for supplies and guns. We found an old SUV parked in the middle of a town hall, with apparent damaged transmission and busted wheel. I procede to repair the SUV, while our squad's sniper and combat medic scout for any enemy infantry or vehicles. I was a professional engineer with 10 years of duty repairing stuff no one cares about until they are broken. After the repairing took place with no problems, we look to the trunk of the SUV. Boy, it was like looking at the Lord. Two assault rifles accompanied by their respective ammo. Now we were loaded, and looking at our next mission. We saw a convoy 2 clicks away from our position. We took this as a chance to gear up and scavenge food and water while fighting the enemy at the same time. While en route to our ambush location we found a military truck with a big anti-tank weapon sitting of top of it. It was the perfect setting, except the engine didn't work. We had to toe it to our SUV. Even with all my experience I couldn't put the engine up and running, but the gun worked. We set up at the ambush point waiting for the enemy. But while waiting we saw a big white vehicle in the mountain north coming toward us, which was being towed. "Is that a god damn boat sailing on land on the back on a truck!?" - said our sniper. It had miniguns attached to it, and the instance we saw them, we proceded to open fire with our anti-tank weapon. It was a tough fight. They shot back as soon as they heard our shots and fought the best way they could. But our weaponry was too strong for them. The truck catched fire and exploded after a couple rounds into it, killing all the enemies in the vicinity. It looked like a scene from a Michael Bay film. After that, we ambushed the convoy, stole a couple of anti-tank RPG's and sold them into the black market to buy a tank. 10/10 It was good.
Elena from Rheinland-Pfalz;-;In the mainmenu 20 FPS In game 70 FPS 10\10
Coldice54;-;Very, very disappointing. Lacking in equipment, as well as vehicles. Arma 2 OA is much better, as well as less expensive.
Sean;-;By far the best military sim out there!
[tpt]Whitefur22;-;ArmA III could have, and still could be, a great game. It is only set back by few things. Pro- Great Graphics- It looks amazing, and even makes old maps look better then they did in ArmA II Stance System- Now you no longer have to go prone if your head was sticking out a bit PhysX- You no longer get the really wonky physics that appeared in ArmA II Ragdoll- Running over people is now a LOT more fun! Con- (spoiler, theres more than the Pro) Awful Performance- They said that any computer that could play ArmA II could play ArmA III, they never said at a playable framerate Inventory- I still dont understand it, I mean you had ArmA II weird UI, now you have a even weirder drag-and-drop UI (Just use DayZ SA inventory, its fast and makes a load of sense) Dreadful Netcode- Still running ArmA crappy netcode, now with every server at 200 ping Missing Content- The game only has planes and transport helicoptors for Indies, not Blu or OP, so it makes missions on either end really wierd with green helis (Yes, there is mods that add planes, but you shouldn't rely on the modding community to finish your game for you) In all ArmA 3 is a sad avoid, DayZ standalone is still doing better in its alpha than ArmA 3 did in its. It could get better as the stupid "Free DLC" thing goes on, but a spin-off team working on a zombie game did better then BI's main team. It's just kinda insaulting
Catface;-;Walking through the countryside, hitching a ride on a helicopter for 10 minutes, and a whole lot of nothing happening all the time. Just like real life, 10/10 would wander pointlessly for 2 hours again.
Kurt117 | And I'm back...kinda;-;beside the performance issues,this game is absolutley awesome ,probably the best tactical/sandbox shooter available........ gameplay mechanics,sounds,graphics and almost everything is great in this game AND it has mod support! (YEAH I'M OBSESSED WITH MODS SO WHAT! ) i mean most developers and "Big" companies don't support mods anymore and having a game like Arma is a really nice treat. i haven't played much (yet) but i'm gonna mod the  out of it and probably spend 500+ hours on it :| buy this game,you won't regret it....... oh and the community is not as  as other games :D so yeah almost no kids and no more "C.YKA BLYKA" :|
mrHallodri;-;Never seen so many bugs in a final game (that is out for some month now). In general, it could be so much fun.. an open world, a sandbox with lots of vehicles and items. But everything is laggy and broken. I want my money back Bohemia! -_-
Paid_Didnt_Win;-;INSTANT BUYER'S REMORSE I want to like this game. I really do. I've watched soooo many Frankie youtube videos of various Arma2/3/DayZ antics, and I thought to myself, "boy, despite the billion graphical glitches there seem to be present, and the staggering amount of complete aholes in servers, and the really, really clunky looking UI/inventory system.... this looks like it could be fun!" Team based objectives, mods that have huge open world survival based gameplay, vehicles, realistic (seemingly) weaponry, military tactics....at a glance, looks like a pretty decent game So, free weekend, 50% off... 30 bucks for a game that has singleplayer AND multiplayer? infinite modding possibilities? SHUT UP AND TAKE MY MONEY, SIR! 4.2 hourrs on my record, I would say AT LEAST HALF was spend alt-tabbed googling various "how do I do this" or "arma 3 tutorial" since the in-game help/instructions/interface - is . I don't know if it is because I've never played any ARMA installment, or I'm mentally , or the game is simply an unintuitive cobbled together sack of confusing and unhelpful , but either way, prepare for a heavy learning curve. Some enjoy this aspect, some people PREFER a game with 400 keybinds to take advantage of their expensive gaming keyboards and mice.... I am not one of them. It's a first/3rd person shooter with sim aspects - there should be no need for you to be a contortionist or have a 2nd monitor with a keybind list up at all times. Honestly, a lot of the keybinds are whacky and frustratingly unintuitive. I get it, new things take time to learn. Like learning a new language. Like piloting a jet. Like learning how to script. For me, playing a game and learning the controls should be remotely similar to any of these things. I do not want to dedicated 20+ hours just to be able to navigate gameplay. It's not a MMO. Hell, I HAVE PLAYED MMOS WITH LESS BINDS. Not only that, but for the life of me, I could not get my extra mouse buttons to perform the way I wanted them to. Arma3 is the only game I've ever played where that has been the case. Get ready to spend hours scouring the web for 'FPS ISSUES' or 'FPS TWEAK GUIDES' for a game that really isn't incredibly impressive, graphically. All the same, it will make you wonder what your $700 video card and top notch processor, 16 gigs ram, SSD HD, etc are ING DOING. You'll notice, if you have monitors up on your PC, that they aren't being taxed all that much (20%?) yet performance is still AWFUL. Guides will have you downloading CPU parking/unparking software, entering a billion command line switches, sacrificing goats to the Bohemian pagan gods, but alas, very little you do will change the fact that this game is optimized like a bag of bloody . Don't bother searching through forums, 95% of people that don't recognize there is in fact, a massive persistent issue with FPS in this game (so maybe 20 people on all the internet) will just ridicule your computer or setup and tell you to "get a guhd computer, I get 60 fps, must be a problem with your setup,    !!!!!" etc. The campaign is horrendous. The AI is bad. Like, mind blowingly bad. Your teammates will just charge in, and either kill everything in sight while you're playing "realistically" (taking your time, scouting, moving from cover to cover, etc) or they will charge in and get annihilated. Either way, prepare to be a spectator for a lot of the action simply because your character is bound by the "realism" parameters that both friendly and enemy AI is NOT. Examples of this include the enemy have clairvoyant abilities to spot you behind that tree, rock, building, etc and the SECOND you pop your melon out for a little lookie-loo, boom, headshot. From 300+M. From an enemy who ISNT EVEN RENDERED. Oh, okay, I thought I was fighting human beings, not Terminators with cloaking shields. Woops. The enemy AI will have astonishing accuracy. Unbelievable and certainly not realistic accuracy. Accuracy that you simply cannot pray to match if you have been moving at all in the last few minutes before you raise your gun. Try drinking 10-15 beers, then playing that stupid game we did as kids, where you get a baseball bat, and put your forehead to the pommel and jam it into the ground and spin around and around and around for a minute. Then, pick up an assault rifle and try to aim at something 10 M away, let alone 300M away. (I'm not American, so as kids we didn't have the assault rifles, but the baseball bat spinny thing WAS a thing, its not just the 15 beers talking) This is what its like to try to aim down at an enemy after running 15 feet. For a game striving for realism.... yeah. This amazing and ultra realisitic military sim mechanic only affects you, in case you were wondering. Besides the game breaking AI and mechanics and horrid control system and clunky AI and awful on screen instructions - the campaign itself is a lot of "ho-hum lets traverse the country side for 15 mins listening to horrid voice acting (to be fair, its not AS bad as what some people are saying, but its still not good, and considering its the only god damn thing to take your mind off HOW BAD THIS GAME IS PERFORMING ON YOUR GAMING RIG, it just grates on your nerves). Literally, a mission starts, and they have you run from one in game cut sceen to another, with zero action in between, with a few fadeouts, and 15 minutes of walking... is this deliberate to bore you to  death so that when action takes place, you don't notice HOW  the AI acts? Perhaps so. Prepare to traverse the same stretch of not so pretty landscape over and over as the save system is another baffling part of Bohemia's design. I understand not allowing you to save whenever you damn well please (wait..no, I don't) but making me listen to same uninspired, boring, and inane voice acting while running up the same god forsaken hill for 3 minutes over and over and over because the AI consists of super soldiers who can no scope you .5 seconds after a full out sprint to prone is just infuriating after a while. Even during firefights, I did not get an overwhelming sense of "holy shieeeeet, war is scurry man, this is so realistic, only supreme tactics and skill and will have me come out on top in this conflict." It was more like, why the fk am I druken soldier with asthma who can't run 5M and raise his weapon without swaying so bad it's amazing he's even still standing upright? More often than not you find yourself letting your AI teammates do everything while you cower in a bush hoping you might get to shoot 1 or 2 enemy soldiers OR you allow your teammates to cannon fodder themselves and you mop up while the enemy is busy annihilating them. Either way, you barely feel engrossed in the action, and never really feel like a main player in the game. Don't even get me started on the UAV mission. To be fair, this is the single player part of the game. I have yet to really delve into multiplayer - I'm afraid to. People state (numerous times, I might add) that single player FPS is fine but MULTIPLAYER is where it REALLY goes downhill. Oh, goodie. When the game is made so inaccessible, it makes it real difficult to start it up again, let alone try playing with other people and getting into the lovely world of Arma Community friendliness. Better make another run to the beer store. Even if you're not a drinker, spend $30 on booze. You will get way more entertainment out of it. Hell, if you're really not a drinker, give the booze to a bunch of teenagers or your little brother or something. You will be better off for it, trust me.
ballisticchicken;-;A lot of people lead reviews by saying this game "has potential"... which is a really polite way of admitting that, right now, it absolutely sucks. It also does not reflect well on the game or on segments of its fanbase that well-deserved criticism is met with accusations of being a "Call of Duty" fan or a console kiddy or other supposed slurs on the critic's intelligence. I've been playing this series since Flashpoint and y'know, it's always been bug-ridden, poorly implemented, and heavily dependent on its modders to even be playable- BUT the series has been just good enough to be worth the aggravation and massive time-sink necessary to make it work... until now. The AI is horrible. For a game that involves realism in combat, where damage is more realistic and is dependent on squad tactics, the AI NEEDS to be competent if not excellent. Instead, the AI is incapable of navigating the terrain without getting stuck, incapable of responding effectivly to fire and totally lost inside of buildings - no, literally, lost inside. God help you if your AI decides to use a grenade because he'll just kill himself. The "Action menu" is STILL in the game and has been combined with environmental add actions that are even worse than in previous games. Face a door and click the action menu key... now watch as you transition to your handgun instead of opening the door because the action triggers are inconsistently placed by an incompetent dev team. This has been a major problem since OFP and it's actually worse now. You will lose many many many games, not because you made a mistake or were unlucky, or for legit gameplay reasons, but because the AI is totally- and I mean totally- incapable of doing what the game *depends* on it to do. The devs have taken to claiming ARMA 3 is a "toolbox" (when they're not insisting it's a game not a simulation- or conversely, that it's actually a simulation not a game- what they call their game depends on which set of their errors you're pointing out) in defense of it lacking a campaign. Fine. But what you get for "tools" is laughable- there's a handful of armor, vehicles and equipment, but it's basically just re-skinned copy-and-pastes between factions. Basically everyone shares assets with superficial cammo differences. Did you think ARMA 2 had bad optimization? Well, the dev team topped itself with ARMA 3 being even clunkier, slower and more bloated. Seriously, everything about this game/simulation when it comes to optimization looks like a rough draft of code rather than a finished product. It will slam even high-end machines to a halt because of poor usage routines, bad scripting, and other lazy shortcuts. What about mods? Well the modding community is a brilliant one, we've got some really really good people who really should get credit for making ARMA remotely popular (or playable). But BIS is depending on modders, not to expand the game, but basically to make the game WORK. No matter how good the mod team is, it's still less efficient and effective to try to fix a broken AI with an addon as opposed to fixing the core code. BIS is content to be lazy and coast on its unpaid modders, but there's only a handful of people who work on AI/game core issues (a lot work on maps and missions, but core realism/errors are another matter) and they seem pretty tired of doing this stuff. It's also a pretty sh*t thing for BIS to do, to release a full priced game with barely any content, crappy optimization, an outdated engine and terrible AI- but then expect the modders to bail them out of trouble. Well... maybe it ain't gonna happen this time. Hell, maybe they can't pull it off this time, even if they want to. TL;DR: This is alpha quality work at a final version price. BIS maintains that its games are like "fine wine" that "age well" when actually they're more like cheap wine that you need to take home and mix with fruit juice and a pound of sugar to be in any way drinkable. Arma 3 is yet another great concept that in practice is totally undermined and destroyed by what is either laziness or incompetence from the developers. Wait a year from now. Maybe the modders will fix this lazy incompetent mess and Arma 3 will be a playable game like Arma 2. Until then, just play Arma 2.
r2com;-;UPDATE 07/06/2014 I was a big fan of OFP. I am playing "this" game since literally 2002. I was hoping that developers will take it to a completely new level, not only graphics wise, but also improve and sophisticate its Simulation part. That didn't happen. Instead, what we have now as ArmA III is simply an OFP converted to COD/BF/CS:GO. This game is dead, and not worth spending a dime on it. PROS + Improved graphics, soldier equipment is detailed + Improved movement features, leaning, several sitting positions etc. + Bullet ballistics + Big areas available for play as an Islands CONS - Horrible and non realistic human damage system (aka CS-like) - Fictional and not practically realistic weapons - Helicopter can lift and carry a heavy MBT while it is using its main gun in the air... - Sniper can shoot a person sitting inside armed IFV... - Aircraft/Helicopter simulation is at the PS2 arcade flying sim level... - Tank/Vehicle control is simply W A S D + Mouse click, horribly simplified - Vehicle movement on a terrain is a joke, totally screwed up physics - Helicopter can lift 5 ton truck, drop it from 10m and truck continues to drive normally... - Flying physics for Aircrafts/helicopters is a laughable joke - Shooting enemy Aircraft with AA Vehicle is all about "button-press-hold-click" - TONS of bugs without attention. I do not see a value in this game. Developers should have been fixing the above issues and improving our gaming experience, instead, those clowns spend time on releasing trash like KARTS in order to suck additional buck from us! KISS MY A$$ BOHEMIA!
A Playful Tiger;-;So where do I start!! Review is below please read all before passing judgement :) I'm so so so disappointed :( I bought a PC again after a massive 8 year PC break when I moved to console in very late 2006 . I bought an Xbox 360 which I owned for almost 6 years then only 13months ago I moved too XBox One had it for 4 months and thought get rid of this piece of junk and use the money I get and put it towards a new Gaming PC so june this year (2014) I bought a PC. Anyway so I bought a PC with one thing in my mind "Yes it will be like the old days I will join back up with my clan" I was with almost 7 years ago. I enjoyed countless hours days weeks years with the lads on Operation Flashpoint : Cold War, Arma and then Arma 2. I was in the AirCorps for them "GOL" clan they are called so I signed up for them cause I forgot my password (come on its been 7 years ago) and used the same name as I was back in 2006 ish 'GOL Tactical' I thought wow its been that long I was wiped from there system :) Anyway LT Chris didnt know how I was so I mentioned a few names to him and that were old clan memebers and he stopped talking for a split second "are its you Bloody knife" (which was my original name before changing to GOL Clan when I )was expected) The guy that made me start an AirCorps. I was so excited to be back sadly most of the old memebers werent around (god I sound like a child Im' 25). Sorry for all the text above :) I just wanted you/people to know that I've played Arma before for alot longer than most 7 years straight. I bet most reading this didnt know about Operation Flashpoint was originally part of the same team that is today currently making Amra still today. Anyway present day 30/12/2014 The Review I'm sorry but the Arma I grew up to love is just not the same Arma! Arma 3 is like to me the Call Of Duty of today every childs dream, its the game that they must have otherwise your not cool etc although that last statment isn't true for Arma franchise it only came extemely popular in like 2007 to early 2008. Thats how much I love or sould I say loved Arma it was my goto game whenever I was bored I would talk about Arma when I was at school when I was with anyone, as soon as I got in Lets play Arma whenever I had spare time Lets Play Arma I even bunked/skipped days of school to play more. I just didnt get bored of Arma or Arma 2 or Operation Flashpoint Cold Assault if I'm honest it consumed all of my early teens and into my late teens. Yes a full 7 years of my life I was coming up to be 19 and on my birthday I bought a Xboxb 360, go and read the above for a full discription :) So the Arma I knew was a realistic military simulator the best simulator infact but Arma 3 what have you done you've gone slightly futurisitc. Why? Its a military sim how can you simulate something that isnt even made yet keep it with the real life stuff that is used today you at least in my eyes have ruined my childhood game thanks Bohemia Interactive and 555 games thanks a bunch. It isnt all bad though its just because of my history with the game as you can tell they are many happy customers giving good reviews. But if Arma 1 and 2 and 2.5 is anything to go by hopefully they are modders out there that feel the same way as me and remove all the futuristic stuff and replace with Real Equipment Weapons etc that are used today If you got this far thanks for reading and dont base the game of my review its just because of my history with the game. The core components are there with what I can assume is realistic simulation its just not me furturisitc stuff in a Simulator you cant call it a sim in my eyes anyway. So as you can tell I dont recommend this game. Even the it almost hurts to say it : (
YOUNG BASED LORD;-;its cool if u like anal with no lube
NiceandFresh;-;"Children play Call of Duty, Boys play Battlefield, MEN PLAY ARMA."
WinterBreeze;-;im sorry but this game is a piece of , its terribly optimized and barely ing works. i played this on my travel rig (GTX 680 with a i7 4770k) and it could hardly get 30 fps on low in a city. This game feels unfinished and extremely unpolished.
FUTuti GM;-;ArmA 3 is a very good game, with fantastic graphics and physics, however, ArmA 3 is very poorly optomized. To get a stable 60fps on high-ultra settings, you need a killer machine. Singleplayer story is good enough, and the map editor is VERY fun. You can place units, chose your own guns, do whatever you want in the editor mode. The multiplayer is where the main fun is at. ArmA 3 provides large scale multiplayer (100+ people) and co-op mode to enjoy user created missions with your friends. However, multiplayer is terribly optimized, and most people have a hard time getting good FPS. Co-op missions new players HAVE to try: -Escape Altis -Escape Stratis Multiplayer Servers new players should try out - Wasteland (freeroam survival/PVP) - Altis Life - King of the hill - Battle Royale There is a DayZ type of mod for ArmA 3 called Breaking point, which is very fun. It has its own map, weapons, clothings, etc.
VyCanisMajoris;-;This game has awesome graphics+gameplay+singleplayer and worth every penny...Buy this...
j1llyb3an15c001;-;great game, i have had it since very early alpha and i have a total playtime of almost 700 hours. the game is great in itself and offers many different ways of play. mods are also great for the game (dont get too many as it ruins the game) all dlc's are great and the game is a close to real (basically the most real game avalible) and it covers a range of factions and teams (military,civvilian etc.....) i really reccoment this game to all !!!!!
Bindon;-;It's better than ArmA 2, nuff said.
Nullrick;-;ArmA 3 (Armed Assault 3) is definitely the most graphically and mechanically impressive title so far in the ArmA series. However - despite it being "released", there is still a heafty amount of bugs and glitches in the game, although they may be small and more in the background than presented upfront. There are also more optimizations that could definitely be implimented that would fix its problem with inconsistant (few and far between but are still issues) crashes happening during multiplayer experiences. These issues have lead a number of users, both old and new, to see ArmA 3 as still being in beta developement. That will ultimately be left up to you to decide though. Besides these issues though, ArmA 3 has advanced from its previous titles in terms of an updated and continuously polished physics engine, numerous graphical improvements to drive immersion, new mechanical upgrades allowing more in-depth maneuvering in either land, see or air vehicles as well as hoofing it across the battlefield and already developing expansions to add more content to the game. (Zeus game mode) Bohemia Interactive are definitely heading in the right direction withthis title, giving it all the love and attention they can muster and, in my opinion, doing the best they seem to be able to do as they're still defined as an independent developer. Pushing onwards from their previous flagship; ArmA 2, BI so blatently wants their entire fanbase, present and future, new and old to be able to take away and share the same amazing experiences from ArmA 3 as they did from the previous titles. And making way to provide great enjoyment for said fanbase which consists of diehard veteran players and their amazing moding community which has put out vanilla content-worthy additions to past titles as well as already ArmA 3. Being new to the series as of the official beta of ArmA 3, I've gone back to ArmA 2 to see where ArmA 3 is coming from. Even though A3 is considered by some to still be an unfinished product despite being released with a pricetag of $60, I can see that my investment will be paying off sooner or later. However I spent $45 when it was still in beta. So you may have to look harder if you've only recently purchased it.
=GzR= MadHatter;-;Love this game could play for the rest of forever just need to make the dlc free and add in new gun skins aswell as new air/land/sea vehicles. Other than this its a beautifull game.
Beef Lazer;-;its awesome
FataLxxProdigY;-;An amazing game take a little while to get used to the controls but the campaign has an amzing story line and the multiplayer is unmatched.
That One Guy;-;Maybe one of the best military sims out there. Its multiplayer could use some work, has bugs, but its early access. To some people, the $50 price tag may seem like mush but, its totaly worth it
Will;-;Fantastic game. No regrets at all about buying it. 10/10
reaperz73;-;With over 470 hours so far in this game all I can say is awesome!!!!!!
Duzzino;-;Amazing game well worth the money, doesnt get boring with the amount of endless funny stuff to do, alot of mods and customization for game modes
Kemeros;-;I was introduced to Arma through the DayZ mod for Arma 2. It says a lot when a game is so moddable that it spawns other games... I've bought Arma 3 during the Alpha. Best money i've ever spent. Find a good clan/group/community and you'll have a hard time running out of things to do with this game. Cherry on top? The devs are mad men. They hammer daily on the dev branch and release monster patch notes every months. The game has a few flaws like the scroll menu that makes me sometimes lose my  when i try to open a door and instead change weapon. Ladders. Oh dear god ladders. If you want a good FPS with awesome vehicles. Arma 3 is for you. And when you think you're done... Go look at the mods...
Constantine;-;Really good game, but a little buggy at times.
Kumo Buta `AT;-;By far one of the best , or even THE best FPS game i've played in a long, long time.
Stryker;-;Endless hours of fun
Blacky;-;I love it :)
Lord Joeraxxus;-;Arma 3 = Awesomeness
[uG] A Player;-;While it's definitely lacking in content as of yet, the developers are constantly pushing out more and more to add to the game as time goes on. It has sleek graphics and very realistic gameplay; incidentally, if you're looking for Call of Duty or Battlefield with tight corners and insanely over-powered guns and dumbed-down ballistics, you, sir, have come to the wrong place. As said by Runekn so perfectly: "Arma is not a game which you pick up at launch, play the campaign and a bit of mp, and then trow away. You buy it, love it or hate it, and then play it forever or trow it away immediately." The community is incredibly active, and if the game is missing something (a jet, or faction, or gun), there are modders out there currently hard at work making this game more incredible. At the time of writing, the first of three campaign episodes have come out, the next slated for early next year. The game is becoming more and more intricate as people "leave" ARMA II to rest for a bit while they pursue ARMA III and more Scenarios are being made (thanks to Workshop Integration). Overall, this is an excellent game, and if you're sick of CoD or BF, need a dose of excitement or realism, or just need a satisfying filler while the sequel [of CoD or BF] comes out, ARMA III will give the experience yourself looking for.
Ghost Pig;-;I love this game, I genuinly cannot play other FPS games without thinking "Why don't I just play Arma?". It has completely changed what I expect from FPS games and I look forward to continuing to play this game as it grows in both features and community made mods.
Lieutenant C. Paragon, 88U;-;Unique game. This doesn't count as a shooter, its a military simulator, but with good reason. The term "shooter" is used loosely to designate any game with guns. In this game, understanding military language, logistics, and tactics is just as important as having enough ammo and good aim. I rate this game highly, but don't walk into this expecting guns ablazing and being an insane tank able to take down platoons of dudes. It's for its own crowd, it's up to you to figure out if you are/want to be part of that crowd.
Josh_Nz;-;Awesome and with so much content it is an amazing military simulator/ straighty game that will be forever epxanding and modding
atTheinguin;-;really cool game when you have time to play it!
sHAKA*;-;I still need to learn how to fly a jet :(
T4mpscope;-;Love this game love playing it. Still needs a bit of work like adding new weapons helicopters but other then that its a great game.
King John;-;Very awesome game, simulates how war is very well, If you liked Arma 2, you will love this. You can play online such as Wasteland which is fun. I've had this game since they released it.
Mongo64;-;I played the Alpha Lite, and was not too impressed by ArmA 3, I saw it on sale and bought it. I can say I do not regret my choice. I'm having a blast with it thus far. If you played ArmA series before, you know what you are in for. Content wise its lacking compared to 2, but that has been out longer. I have faith in the community to make some intresting mods for this game.
IncRaven;-;About the game background: In 2001 the game Operation Flashpoint was made for the PC, it followed the Cold War era fighting between America and Soviet Russia. Due to copyright names in 2007 Bohemia Interactive created Armed Assault or ArmA. ArmA was followed up in 2009 with ArmA 2. Now in 2013 the fourth game is out. Armed Assault 3 is set in the near future of 2035 where NATO forces are pitted with a equally powerful foe. Gameplay: ArmA 3 is a very fast paced realistic shooter. With smooth controls and advance movement and stance options. The biggest feature is modualr gear and weapons. The ability to switch scopes, vests, or anything else on the fly to help protect you or assist you in combat sets this game apart from anything else. The AI in ArmA are ruthless and relentless, with advance path finding and adjustable skill they are able to hunt you, flank you, and take cover from you. Multiplayer: The game supports missions with over 80 players! Everything from Death Match, cooperative, team, squad, and unit missions. With the new physics system weapons are more realistic and so is the damage. The Community: ArmA's community is one of the strongest around. Skilled missions makers release daily content. Amazing Modders make new addons that completely change the way the game is played. Final words: While I personally enjoy this game, I do understand it has a lot of content that has not been added (yet). The development is always working on the game, and adding more conent but in its current state it only has half the units, weapons, and vehicles of its predecessor. Graphics: 9/10 Gameplay: 8.5/10 Story: 5/10 (next DLC will add more story content) Multiplayer: 9/10 Overall: 8.5/10 Worth every penny.
Kieran;-;Very Good game for those who like to be tactical, i dont recomend this for lone wolves you may just die alot of times , compared to arma 2 the AI,campaign,multiplayer and custumization have significantly improved. If you are used to playing any call of duty series this game isnt recommended. Perhaps 60$ is alot but this game is worth it to me. It may be a bit glitchy at times but the gameplay makes up for it.
Hartman;-;Great game, it is one of those games I can always go back to 10/10.
Dick Cheney;-;this game is a simulation and it takes alot of tatics to play so if you like tactics and realistic games then this game is for you
cliff 's you;-;This game has a lot of potential. Can't wait to see what becomes of it through the community.
Karlos52aus;-;Great game
SandboxDenmark;-;You really need to play this to realise what a skillbased shooter is all about. And it's fun to boot!
Mitochondria;-;My potato has 2 anuses. 10/10
Fred;-;Yes, best game I ever played as in war
The_BigKahuna;-;Really well built game! They certainly did not disapoint with this one!!
LjMax;-;OK first things first. This game has endless possibilities, great campain, PVP modes king of the hill or wasteland, even better PVP in battleroyale, role playing games like altis life and arma 3 life, Zombie(dayz) mods like breaking point. In fact when you get arma its like you got 10 different games, which is awesome! My first day in altil life looked like this: i go get my licence, buy a car, get a delivery mission. I got one farest, like 26 kilometers acros altis. Got on a highway, after couple of miles, i crash into abandoned vehicle on the middle of the road without toolkit. Some guys found me on the road and gave me their truck so i could continue(awesome guys). Couple of miles ahead guy jumps in front of my truck trying to rob me, and he did robbed me. He walked back into his chopper and somehow insta chrashed(talk about insta karma?). I picked up his money and procced, only to be pulled over by a cop for speeding, he wrote me a ticket. Finally after 2 hours a got to my destination and delivered a package, i was so happy. 10/10 would recommend to anyone!
Walsh;-;Great Game
Urinat0r;-;Buy it and start with the Battle Royale mod (which is excellent for both solo and coop play) if you like super tactical shooters with roaming like far cry/crysis games. The map is 270 km2 and super varied so the encounters are always different. I've played 110+ hours and i still haven't seen everything on the map. I experience immersion in this game like nothing else i have played for a long time. There is a lot of potential in the mods. The value is good because it's future proof due to mods and updates. You can really stress out your high-end rigs with this game, and the optimization isn't terrible - it runs better than Arma 2 and Dayz. I tried the game with a 7 year old rig and it was playable. The game is pretty much reliant on mods so you should be prepared to install some, they are easy to install though The game is definitely not bug-free at this time, and the physics are questionable. You'll get stuck inside rocks and walls, shoot invisible obstructions, and die some unfair deaths. The controls are also really technical, so it is best for hardcore and patient players, maybe as an evolution from Battlefield-like games
TAW_LeftCrusade;-;I don't really like the vanilla game, also the old Arma II missions like domination 2 and insurgency are terrible. But when you play in an experienced group with a few hundred mods. It's freaking awesome. Vanilla I don't like the gameplay and their are only a few weapons. But with some mods this game has no limits. Try to find a group or clan who makes their own missions and you will have an amazing time. If not, good luck with the single player.
McGyver;-;since the mod-community is starting to warm up on this game, i recommend it to every MIL-SIM gamer/lover!
ChiefBlackdawg;-;Armawsome, get it, play it, live it. More addicting the crack or cigs, even more than ice cream. If you end up getting and playing let me know, so we can multiplay. I been on this one alot with my buddy c0axl, we love to have a team/clan on this one. ~Blackdawg out
Motivational Speaker;-;This game is so good I love to play Simulations especially Military simulators. I might not have alot of hours of ingame time now but im going to be playing this game untill it gets boring.(Which it Doesn't)
JarHeAdNL;-;Great Game
Ub3r_L337;-;GET THIS ING GAME GIVE THEM YOUR MONEY
gunsmoke500;-;Yeah I like the game. It just doesent have the ArmA 2 feel to it. It feels to bland and boring. Dont get me wrong its a good game but I dont see my self putting tons of hours into this like I did ArmA 2.
TheFlyMan;-;This is a lovley game. I have trouble finding immersion in games but this game is where its at. I can sit an play this game for hours on end and not get bored. Has an amazing story and the multiplayer is just great. There is zero reason to not have this game. 11/10 Amazing job Bohemia. *Note even though it has some bugs i only find those relevent in multiplayer and its not even that bad. Doesnt take away from the game at all in my opinion.
ctulipano;-;If you play solo using AI allies against AI enemy this game is a 7/10. BUT with the right mods it quickly becomes an 8/10. Then add in muliplayer, open modding, PVE, PVP, friggin zombies!, a bazillion weapons and equipment, sound packs, then forget that they added gokarts ( I think the devs were on meth the day they came up with that idea ). In my mind you simply cant find any current or past milsim game that can offer anything close to what Arma 3 can. This isnt your little brothers Call of Duty or Battlefiled, 1 shot can and will kill you thats what the kiddies dont like, but guess what thats real sonny boy.
Kawaii Sanchez Senpai;-;Best Military sim out there. You can do anything and the community is great. Alot of addons to download, missions and people even make awsome gamemodes.
Thomas;-;Very good game once you learn it! So many gamemodes to try!
[DTH] ZowZy;-;one of the best games played!
iburnfurbies;-;Get it noobs! Also - SuMatra Wastelands - US # 2 . Come get owned.
Tillee;-;Buy it! Do it! You want it!
wunda;-;This is game is like the pizza pete of shooters 9/10
Ziggles;-;If you are into realism and/or a fan of the Arma series, this is a great game for you. The game does need a few fixes here and there, but the game itself is beautiful. With Steam workshop, i can download the old Chernaurus map from Arma II and play with the Arna III vehicles! very fun, especially with friends on Wasteland. For those who like realism, there arent many other sims that deliver a military experience such as this game. Get past the difficult controls and see how great this Military Simulator can be!
ottoDSFB7;-;The best game.
Ordies ( ~  );-;1/10 best game of the year - IGN
Frodo Swaggins;-;Forget the metascore this game is the best.
zacpez;-;There is something simply exciting about Arma 3, and for me it is primarily driven by the moddibility of the game. From Vanilla to 20+ mods, every aspect is quite enteraining. Even after nearly 1000 hours of gameplay I continue to enjoy Arma with my friends in the Tac-Ops Gamming Community. Arma 3 is worth its prce serveral times over.
Mayo;-;This game's review has had a long time coming from me honestly. The single most played game within my Steam collection is undoubtly Arma 3. It is one of the few games I play that I continue to come back to over and over again. I won't go into much of the stuff you can read about online through professional reviews; stuff like the mechanics, graphics, etc. What I will go over though is why exactly this game is a gym despite any short comings and why it has such a loyal community. Arma is a game that scales with your imagination. While not necessarily easy, users can create whatever mod they want for this game. Just recently I saw a video for a T-Rex mod. T-Rex aside, many of the modders for this game take it upon themselve to implement items and equipment into the game that the developers could not (most likely for legal purposes/trademarks). Missions are made constantly so there is never a worry of running out of something to do in Arma 3. With one of the largest maps, realistic ballistics, and a sometimes brutally hard AI, the game provides a sandbox for players to play whatever military simulation they could every desire. Games can be designed to have a small 4 man team infiltrating small enemy camps or they can be designed to have huge operations with several platoons, armored vehicles, and airsupport. My only warning would be to take your time learning the game and the modding community. When I first purchased Arma 2, I didn't play it for a year after my initial play through because I didn't quite 'get' the game. My brother also was not a fan of Arma 3 at first. This is a game you need to Google and learn about. The rewards are definitely worth the time.
xAndrei;-;Greatest Video Game
AgentKiri;-;This is my first review. Arma 3 is one of the most realistic military sim you'll play in awhile. The realism beats battlefield, but is slower. At first if you're not use to it you will wonder how you died. After awhile you will realize that you were shot around 500 meters away. ARMA 3 is for the players who want more realism than battlefield.The game has many positives and some negatives that I can note. Positives: + Amazing graphics in some places + Big maps (2 really big islands, with one about 270km squared) +A decent amount of vehicles / weapons +Alot of uniforms for player customization (using the virtual ammo box, that is present in some servers) + A very good editor and a real time edior named zeus + Life like situations with other players + No annoying kids like Call Of Duty Negatives: - The campaign does not have a story that leaves an impression - The AI downright has no IQ - Needs a good computer - The map though big in some places are really just open land - Hard to learn The game has it's shares of positives and negatives, but will not be like any other game you've ever played. Don't buy this game if you won't take the time to learn how to play. That is because it will overwhelm you if you perfer games like Call of Duty.
_Psycho_;-;If you're looking for a great game to give you some adrenaline, then Arma 3 is the right choice for you. Warning: This game involves massive team work on a large scale, if you like playing alone then this game may be too awesome for you. But other than that, work together to succeed! ( It Is Singleplayer, but I dont recommend playing alone ). War has never been accurate in a video game like it is in arma 3. Instead of run & gun combat, you experience patient and heart pounding moments knowing the fact that if you die in a mission, it's a game over. Work with your friends to find advantage points to your enemys and call air support if a tank has you under fire. And If you get it in maybe the leg or arm, you can always bandage yourself to avoid bleeding to death. Many missions usually last many hours so be sure to have nothing to do during the day and time in your hands. And if Arma still feels like it's missing something, visit www.Armaholic.com for all your modding needs. Hooah, Marines!
3xtr4_cr15py;-;I started the game up and when I got onto the main menu, I crashed. 10/10 GOTY
Stannis Baratheon;-;It is completely undeniable that the Arma series is one of the finest series of video games on the market. And the latest installment, Arma 3, is no exception. The endless amount of hours you will sink into this game unkowlingly is beyond belief, and every hour is justifiable. The countless mods and gamemodes at your disposal is borderline spectacular, and not only Bohemia Interactive; but also the community, put an extreme amount of blood, sweat and tears into making every second as enjoyable as the last. From a casual player, to a Mil-Sim enthusiast, this game will be enjoyed and appreciated by most. As well as this, Arma 3 incorporates some of the most astonishing graphics, mechanics and customization options that many games fail to even begin with. I am truly impressed with this game, as some aspects are just flat out upgrades of the series' predecessor, Arma 2. However, this is not to say the game hasn't got flaws. Optimization has always been a problem with the Arma series, and that is definitely something I, and many other members of the community believe should be addressed. The game also has minor problems that do occasionally affect the gameplay, and in some cases, the immersion. Nevertheless, I am confident that the simply brilliant developers over at Bohemia will address not only these, but all issues they encounter with Arma 3. Overall, this game has got some minor flaws, that get completely outshadowed by its complexity, graphical fidelity, mechanics, customization and so much more. If you are currently thinking of making this purchase, I'd think no more. Even at full price, it is worth every penny. This game, and the Arma series in general, have not just received my respect and appreciation. They've earned it.
Luigi;-;completely epic...
Panc0ck;-;in my experence with the game I have found that it is even more cpu intensive than arma2. unless you have a good cpu i would not recomend getting the game i have a fx 8350 and i only get 30 fps. not to mention arma 2 has abour all the same stuff. overall all a 8/10 game
EGY-Meedo;-;This game is great combines between FPS and simulation, in a realistic environments it got everything a game needs, starting with the amazing graphics, sounds, ambient effects, everything gameplay is great, & steam workshop got some of the best mods you'll ever imagine, great game, a must have.
Selling Chicken Aimbot;-;It has turtles 10/10
Welshlad7840;-;One of the best first-person shooter games i've played in my life! Its also fun, and realistic, so is it worth the money, oh, hell yea!
Comrade Roe;-;Having bought this on day one, I do not regret it. I'll start with the gun play. Small arms feel weak against anyone wearing a vest, taking more than two shots to kill sometimes even with the almighty 7.62. However, if you play a scenario without body armor of any kind you should have a deadlier match. While I wish BI would fix the problem themselves, the Authentic Gameplay mod seems to help, or at least it makes me wanna go back to an Arma 3 firefight. Driving vehicles feels a lot smoother than Arma 2 in my opinion, thanks to PhysX. A lot of it is still off though, for example, the karts turn ridiculously fast. It's no GTA IV in the driving department, but it's clear they're making improvements over past installments in this department. Sounds are... acceptable. It's clear why sound mods are always so popular for the Arma series. They smoothened out the dialogue, but gun sounds sound weaker and quieter, though they can still be heard from some distance. The campaign is good improvement over the past, or that's what I think at least, up until the end. Although, commanding the AI or waiting for them to move can be a tad annoying, AI still need to be improved a lot. I'll leave it at that to avoid spoilers. Healing system actually seems kind of worse than Arma 2. The First aid kits everyone has heal you up 75%, so you're not totally good to go, but it still makes medics feel useless. Again, you'll need mods like AGM or XMedSys to get past the healing system. Content remains a bit lacking still. There's only a few civilian cars, literally no women of any kind, and no civilian aviation. Also, NATO, CSAT, and the AAF all lack any kind of transport plane. The only new sort of vehicle they added was either the Tempest "Device" or the Bobcat, a Panther APC that clears mines by plowing them. Also, the AAF only has mortars for artillery, which isn't good against NATO with their 155mm guns and 230mm rockets, or CSAT's 155mm guns and 82mm mortars. Also, CSAT lacks rocket artillery. Fun. And, back to aviation, NATO and CSAT don't have an air superiority fighter like the F-15 or anything, which interestingly is where the AAF makes up. If combat photography is your deal, Arma 3 delivers. You can create some beautiful scenes, or horribly gruesome, to capture with the Splendid Camera. Just go into editor and set it up, and then go to the menu and click splendid camera. The new Zeus feature is a fantastic addition though. Whether being added as a supplement to an existing mission to add challenges or relief depending on how things are going, or making an entirely new mission in the Zeus GM missions, it's usually excellent fun as either the victim or the Zeus, although like most multiplayers it can be ruined by awful people. While it may be clunky at first with the controls or function, when you get the hang of it it's a great tool for making other people's fun, or in SP editor preview, just making things for yourself. Karts are terrible fun. Enough said. Considering all these, I'd give it a 7.5/10. Zeus bumps it up a lot, although the weaker guns against just about any armored soldier, and the weakish sounds take it down some notches, it's still great fun to play. P.S. You should really ignore the people who whine about the "futuristic crap". Seeing as everything ingame is either feasible or already existant, there's really nothing "futuristic". If you wanna see for yourself, check out the forums, with the Arma 3 Is it Authentic? thread.
kw1k str1k3;-;Very fun to play, my favorite game modes are altis life, king of the hill, and wasteland. Overall great game.
NIMA;-;I love realistic games!
Tsubaki;-;I'm usually not into serious military sims but ARMA is more than just a sim. Its modding community is amazing and wasteland servers especially are what sold me on picking up ARMA 3. It is incredibly enjoyable to get you and a few friends together to form up in a squad and carry out objectives in a tactical style with somewhat realistic gameplay. My only complaint is server desyncs and the random physics. Other than that totally worth it.
[GCG] One Trick;-;Not entirely sure how much of this game I have really played, given that I simply took advantage of the free weekend (Who knows how long ago) and was hesitant playing it, given that my laptop has the processing power of a potato (And even then I think the potato is lighter, so yet another minus for this thing), on lowest settings in the SinglePlayer Act that was available, I was able to get a terrible 2-10fps. Despite all of this, I still enjoyed literally every second of the picture show that was playing infront of me. Riding in a helicopter, getting to see a limited view of the still beautiful island, seeing the troops and vehicles moving around below me, to shortly after scaling a mountain while taking fire from well camoflagued native soldiers, and rummaging through their gears to find the best sunglasses or helmet I liked, every moment was constant excitement, laughter, or crying behind a rock as I am suppressed and see my squadmate fall and need medical attention. Somehow able to survive all of that, with that terrible tract record, I thought "Hey, I lived, I'm ready for Multiplayer!" Having seen countless, hilarious videos of the Survival (or whatever the name is) gamemode, I joined that first, as a civilian. Not having played much of Arma other then Arma II Free to Play, and even then in terrible Fps, I expected a few people to be slightly hostile, but hoped deep down I'd find a good mate to run with. Shortly after spawning, I found a fully loaded M4-Something or other, nice shades, a backpack, and a cool helmet. A few steps down the road, I found a funny looking Frog-like APC truck, with gas, and decided to take it for a ride. A soldier on an ATV rides up infront of me, I stop and say "Hey! Wanna hop i-" and he's already off, pulled his pistol out and shot me in the face. 10/10, this is the driving force for an actual gaming setup. My goal is to find the soldier that shot me, kidnap him, take his clothes, pop his knee caps in the middle of the wasteland, and leave him there. He shall be mine.
yAz_;-;Great and hooking game that keeps you engaged. If you're looking for a war simulator, you've found it.
Evanw1256;-;Great game, its very fun but it would be best to play with a mic (multiplayer). They also have some great mods
Sneezymr Milo;-;In Zeus mode you can spawn hundreds of goats and blow them all up with artillery.... GOTY right here boys!
McMoneyBags;-;This is a great military simulator and the engine compared to the last game is amazing the physics and the feel of it is just amazing. The only problems I have with this game is the time period and the map is not as good as the the arma 2 maps apart from that thye game is beautiful.
Allied Mayhem;-;Over 900 hours played. I'm sure I'll be well over 1k when all is said and done. While the singleplayer campagn is ok, the game's true potential is unlocked in multiplayer. This is a true military sim built by the same company that builds sim's for the military. With mods like Breaking Point, Battle Royale, Wasteland, and King of the Hill, it's hard to get bored. If you go deep enough down the rabbit hole, you might even find yourself playing Altis Life... the horror!
[TS] ThatNewZealandGuy;-;A fantastic military simulation game that will provide you with hundreds of hours of entertainment. It has a huge modding community constantly adding on new vechiles, weapons & missions. A solid performace overall & simply stunning visuals 10/10.
Lyon;-;You either hate or love this game and I love it! In my opinion it's one of the best shooters out that that require skill. That is rare these days.
lgN-;-;Inconsistent performance, but you soon forget about that when you realise the scale of battles and just how in-depth a game it is. Amazing.
schnip;-;This game is absolutely amazing. It can be whatever you want it to be deliver any experience you are looking for. Whether that be hardcore realism like no other game imaginable, shooting with your friends and driving karts, simply taking in the beauty, and everything inbetween, this game can provide it. It may be slow paced at times, but this allows for a scale beyond all others. In no other game can I say that I had a good time in a mission, but also have used my compass more than my trigger.
^2H^0ammy;-;Its a really amazing game, very realistic and a variety of different gametypes. I really recommend it!
BurntToasTJ;-;I really only play Breaking Point mod. But this game is amazing! even on the lowest graphic settings this game is beautiful! unlike Arma II(2) the inventory management is super easy to use! if you like DayZ then you'll LOVE Breaking Point! so much more to offer!
Kilian;-;Best game ever made. Nothing more to say.
Colonel Q-tips;-;Lots of guns, lots of explosions. Much worth money.
CoDEJunKIE;-;Arma 3 is hands down one of the best war simulator/games that I have ever played!!! If you just want to run and gun then this game is not for you, maybe COD or Battlefield is something more suited for you, but if you are looking for a full immersion into what war is really like, then Arma 3 is the game that you want.. or the game that you need!! Arma 3 has hundreds upon hundreds of different mods and scenarios that you can play so that you are never bored. With mods like Battle Royale, Breaking Point(DayZ) and King of The Hill you will find yourself playing for hours upon hours!!
Reasons * G2A;-;As coming from arma 2 and what it gave was out-standing. Arma 3 atm gives alot to do from player made missions to mods. With time to come am sure this game will grow. The only downside is the fps lag and servers with lots of plug-ins and player count. Overall this is a great game and if you are fan of arma, battlefield or just looking for a game to buy i recommend this (10/10)
scout24;-;This game is fun to play any time, army simulator not just a fps but more
Ckor;-;Awesome way better then arma 2 has Greatly improved should definitley pick up some time
Comrade Doge;-;I went from shooting a guy in the head to racing around in gokarts with machineguns attached to them. 10/10 would play again
Lucht;-;Great Military Simulator but the best part is the community.
tugdaddy22;-;Great game
- Brigapes -;-;If you want realism combined with awesome FPS, then this is a game for you, if you want Small maps, repetetive gameplay, no pshysics(Sorry i can't spell that word), Same game every year in a row on more than 10ys old engine with a bit laggy netcode and same gameplay with same guns(remodeled) and screaming kids online, then Call Of Duty is the right choice for you. Yeah... I'm not talking about Arma here because i don't think it even needs a compliment, everything it does and it was suppose to do - IT DOES GREAT, not to mention the graphics. BUT BEWARE! YOU DO NEED A BEAST PC TO RUN THIS SMOOTHLY ON DECENT GRAPHIC SETTING. Long boring story: This game focuses on realism also as on gameplay, if youre a tactical player who wants a little bit of challenge and thinking, then this gam is meant for you, if youre a 12y old kid, then turn around and play flappy bird on your stupid iphone(yeah i'm also against ripp-off's = Apple). I am thinking of actually buying this game when i get bored of Battlefield 4. To comparise if you can run this game, check my specs in my profile, i can run it on medium-high(Without AA) with stable 60fps. My CPU is enabling me for longer(like 4000) view distance, which is very useful Imho. Not to even mention that this game has awesome community made mods for playing, as example of Arma2: DayZ. My Rating: 8,5/10 Pros: Excellent in what it does and is meant to do Cons: Not for everyone, but thats not the con? Well, you do need quite a beast PC, because if not, you're in huge disadvantage.
AlmondSlushie;-;There is a dlc for go karts 12/10 its okay
ChaddlesG;-;A huge step up from previous ARMA titles, graphically and mechanics wise. A3 has addressed nearly all the features I wanted added to increase immersion and to make the game a bit more fluid. Although set in the 2030's, A3 retains its grounding in realism and all the military equipment in this game exists or could exist in 2013 . Pick it up early to save yourself about $20 before the games full release.
Newman;-;This game is one of the most, if not the most realistic shooter game I have played. The multiplayer is a definate must especially if you can find a semi serious server where people work together to complete objectives. All in all this game is very enjoyable and the community is great!
Combat_Wombat;-;This game is very well done. It is about as close as you can get to total realism in a game. This is also somewhat a downside though. It makes missions being done by yourself without any AI or player assistance very difficult. But if you have a group of friends to help you take on some of the missions, you will enjoy this game. The multiplayer is awesome. Before I found this game, I had always been searching for a game with a gamemode that has teams with about 65 players or so each all fighting over one point. The workshop feature makes the game even better, being able to download new missions whenever you finish the ones you already have. This is overall a pretty cool game.
LONE WOLF;-;Arma 3 is an excellent game in the way that; Gun play is realistic in the sence that if you're the first to shoot you usually get the kill, Vehicles are mega fun, the general flow of the game is a lot more to my liking compared to say... Call of duty. Instead of run and gun, it is probably best if you plan out what you are going to do. Probably the best part about ARMA 3 is the mods and other game modes they have, 2 random examples are Battle Royale and Altis life (if you don't know what they are you should probably look them up, they're fun :) ) BUT this game has down sides too. Such as; To enjoy Altis life you really have to play it with a friend(s) otherwise it's kind of hard to get into. Battle royale is definitely an option for Lone Wolves such as myself but there's a downside to that too, you always seem to get a clan of 5 or 6 in every match, i honestly don't understand why, seeing as it's a Free For All. They don't care though and they group up anyway. To be completely honest it's a game some people hate and some people love. I myself love it but it really depends on if you like ultra realism (like this game) or the kind of realism in BF4 THE THINGS I HAVE MENTIONED ARE MY PERSONAL OPINION AND I REALLY DON'T MEAN TO CHANGE THE VIEW OF THE GAME FOR ANYONE.
Nova Cyclone;-;Died walking up a staircase.. then went into space. 10/10
Spectre Actual;-;The newest iteration of the ArmA milsim franchise, ArmA 3 is set in the near future on a set of Mediterranean Islands. The Single Player is by far the best I've seen in an ArmA game and that's only after playing the first part of a three part campaign. The movement and pacing in ArmA 3 is greatly improved in relation to ArmA 2 and the combat and AI are far above it's predecessor.
Russell;-;this is a very fun game and very funny whilst playing with mates on altis life but this game is buggy and are wierd for example if i volt inside a wall, i start to swim in the air then die or i will drive a tank with my friends then drive into a wired fence and we all die. overall i would recommend this game because it is fun and the bugs can sometimes be very funny.
Captain Insano;-;its the best
Overlord Triclops;-;This game is an incredibly good one, but like past bohemia works it has a long path ahead of it. Do not go into the Steam Community Hub for this game, it is a disgusting look at overrivliged and spoiled children who don't understand how the game works they expect it to run like triple-A action shooters. The Reality is Arma is a military Simulator: your character can get hurt from non combat experience, he will become incredibly exhausted after running and carrying heavy gear, one bullet from any range can cause him to bleed out, it take time and patience to make a shot over 500m away. The vehicle combat requires multiplayer players, if your driving you'll need a gunner and a crew chief to spot targets for the gunner. Helicopters are fragile and take practice for good maneuvering and landing. Part of combat is the journey from your base to the AO, it can be anywhere from 2-25+ minutes of NO combat. To enjoy this game you need to give it time, The studio is still releasing content (FREE CONTENT) on an almost bi-weekly basis. If you don't like the game than I recommend keeping quiet about and maybe return in a year or two. For better opinions on arma 3 go to the arma 3 community website, this steam hub is just a cesspool, much like how the A2:OA hub turned into a DayZ orgy a year ago
AAmdahl;-;This game offers an experience like no other, although the learning curve is quite steep and boring. this game offers literally everything from RPG environments to hardcore milsim groups. if you like shooter games but you want a little more diversity and some more possibilities then this is a game for you! My personal experiences with arma games could not be better, with a mature community and helpfull forums aswell as an awesome modding community, i have spent hundreds of hours playing everything from wasteland to missions with my friends, and editing/scripting missions. what have I gained from this game? + awesome experiences + really good keyboard controll + basic scripting knowledge + Some fat <3 + awesome friends + 700+ hours of amazing fun! 10/10 do recommend!
Batteredburrito;-;Very Good gameplay and great mechanics, a tad poorly optimised but runs okay and highly playable. I Dont have a bad rig (HD 7990, FX 8350, Sabertooth 990FX R2.0 and 16 GB ram) but cant run any better than high with just 4xMSAA. be nice to run on ultra with 8 on this card as it is definately capable
PutinVladPie;-;awesome raging mothaf*cking s
McNinja;-;You ever wonder what it's like to snipe an enemy from a kilometer away? Well you can do it in this game, which is the go to game for simulated battles. Forget your bullet indicator, you'll have to rely on line of sight and the muzzle flash from an enemy. This game is fun but it shouldn't be played for short periods of time. Prepare to sink a couple of hours at a time and be cautious. The cautious fighter will and that may mean camping and trying to scout an area from afar for at least a few minutes for enemy activity. I usually play multiplayer and that's where this game shines. -Wasteland It's a survivla game pits three factions against each other in a war that's really only about getting better guns and owning certain parts of the map. Raiding an enemies base is always fun. -Domination A large group of players against the AI. You are tasked to take out radio towers to take control of enemy infested towns or bases. They give you all the ammo it requires but this can't be done solo as the AI has very good aim and some players are soley invested in transporting troops or tanks from a helicopter.
Ninja Gaijin;-;AWESOME SAUCE FOR $32!
Moon Holiday;-;This is what a real simulator should be like. Not goats running into cars.
KEEPwalking;-;One of the BEST ARMA game i ever played!!! A must have
dennis40000;-;the controls are still ed up. Didnt you learn anything from previous Armas
VeteranSpy [RO];-;It's a beautiful game. !!
lil fuckin timmy;-;awesome, everyone need to buy it
Booska Shite;-;Pretty Gnarly
[NZ]Logan's Transport;-;this is a good game it is fun to play but i think the intro with the helicopter is a bit to long for my liking i would give this game a 4 out of 5
Miller507;-;This is a really good game if you like war sims and just fooling around on a big map with lots of weps and cars. BOTTOM LINE its just fun
James272;-;I have over 300 hours plus into this game and I have to say it just might be one of my favorite pc games of all time. I highly recommend if you like mass online game play and military simulations.
Titler;-;This game can provide endless amounts of fun and entertainment. It is great for being serious and tactical or goofing off.
Chad Pentler;-;Very realistic fps/3rd person shooter with vehicles and gamemodes. Beware it is a hard game to run and requires though and patience to play well.
[SA]IrishMan;-;Although it may still only be in a disguised beta sort of stage,its still immensly fun when you hop onto a multiplayer server (Try Invade and Annex which is what I'm referencing here) hop into a formed up squad and clear AOs with the help of coordinated allies. Zeus is also incredibly fun if you're into dropping people into S**t Storms. The ability to basically create your own batles is a very fun concept indeed. Workshop intergration allows mission creators publish their stuff easier and more people have more acess to it. If you want to buy it or not, I don't mind but you definetly keep your eyes on ArmA if incase something makes you just suddenly get the urge to buy it (Like many, MANY mods) and I hope to see you on the field.
trollgesicht = bestes may-may;-;a more realistic battlefield/cod when you play modes like wasteland or king of the hill; can also be fun if you play the dayz mod for free; battle royal, do I need to say more? get dropped on an island with 30 other people, find a weapon and "survival of the fittest"!; if you're the roleplaying person, who likes to deal drugs, have s (women, who sell their bodies to greasy guys) or just be a corrupt cop, then altis life is just the right thing for you! so in general, this game offers are great variety of mods, it's very own realism and it's not full of garbage kiddies, who flame and pretend to have made love with your mother (like the cod-fanboys, lel) 10/10 would buy again
BrokenSoldier;-;Best ARMA Ever !!! Love the attention to detail :D
Jaysen (old);-;Arma 3 has a great campaign and intense battles! You can download and play countless singleplayer missions created by the community and even make your own with the level editor! The multiplayer experince is certainly spectacular with the infinite amount of gamemodes you can play, for instance: Stratis/Altis Life, Wasteland, Domination, Deathmatch, Armory, and many others!! I recommend this game 100%.
Toddles;-;Great game, Highly recommend
RETARDED SEAL;-;its a big world out there
REVERtris!;-;what a ing game xD
Reid;-;You buy this game for the engine and the possibilities, not for the content. This game revolves around the mod community, not developer-produced content.
WonderchildBiceps;-;i would give the game 4102 meows out of 100 woofs
yerrothsoj;-;This game amounts to about a half a pile.
=TNZ=MWarmy;-;Arma 3 hits the spot nicely, loving the co-op missions.
SheepDogM24;-;Great Game! What else can I say?
gonsa;-;This is THE game! I've been playing Bohemian's games since the first Operation Flashpoint: Cold War Crisis. Played all the next games and still love this kind of gameplay. They've been improving the quality of it ever since and now it is an experience only playing can tell. 10 ou of 10 stars.
Aziz_X;-;Love This Game
Juri ();-;Best open world, sandbox game made to date. Fluid movement, shooting and driving. Top tier graphics and draw distance make it even more impressive. The newer DayZ Breaking Point mod for Arma 3 is also very good for how developed it is.
Settle;-;If you have a good computer. And you like in the . Buy this!
Blade4296;-;Arma 3 is one of the coolest free roam army shooter that I have played I have played it for 66 hours with only me and my two friend you don't need much friend for this game just one or two or three arma has lots of other game mode there is modes like Sandbox you can spawn items theres wasteland survive and found items like guns and cars so I give ArmA III a 7/10
CounterSwitch;-;SICK!
deltagamer;-;Great game. The community is amazing and very active, the content in this game offers new gameplay elements that other games may not give the option to try out. This is a game you won't regret buying!
SwiftDemon;-;Arma 3 makes big steps forward with a huge world and more vehicles and weapons. This time around its trump card is Steam workshop integration though, making downloading mods effortless. A smart move by Bohemia Interactive because it are those mods that will give Arma 3 its long lifespan. Unfortunately Arma 3 is quite inaccessible and doesn't seem to grow along with modern game design on certain fronts. Space time and perseverance are your best friends here, until Bohemia's support starts paying off.
*[S]enp4i;-;Really amazing game Massivly Multiplayer Plus Online Mods.
Gamezguy71;-;If you are expecting a normal FPS experience walk away now! This game is a simulator, you must work with the team you are placed in. This game is personally fantastic. I have played the previous games in the series as well and this one is obviously the best one yet. The community is amazing with adding new content, and the develolpers are great too! Highly recommended for someone who wants to get a serious game going on. This is one of the reasons to own a gaming PC personally.
Toadey;-;Really fun game to play but gets REALLY frammy sometimes, I would highely recommend this game to anyone.
TurqoiseCorgi;-;This game is badass
stemajor7;-;Do I recommend this game? Yes I do. If you are coming from console shooters, then the pace might be way too slow for you. But I recommend you stick with it: once you get over the adjustment, you will be rewarded with some really memorable moments. I found my way in to this series with Arma:Gold, which still looks great to this day. They all feature the same basic framework: large open world, your choice of weapon/vehicle/aircraft and a powerful editor for creating your own missions. This is why it appeals to lots of us, because you may have had Airfix soldiers when you were younger, where you set up battles on your bed, using the folded quilt as custom topography. Arma taps into that part of you, giving you the tools to create your own stories. The only limit is your imagination. Other reviewers here Im sure will have commented on the other game modes, so I dont think I need to review them again. Prerequisites to enjoy this game are: 1) Patience, you need to learn the controls, and dont expect to be firing your weapon at enemies every second. You sometimes will have to travel large distance by foot. 2) A PC that exceeds the requirements. It looks fantastic. 3) Toy soldiers as a kid.
Derek;-;I think that if you dont have this game you should invest in it because its a great game
Eddie;-;This game it's really fun! Plus it has a lot of mods so the game types are endless.
Mechanical;-;Yes, yes, yes - you should buy this game.
Caesar;-;Worth The Money. 10/10 Game.
Rev0r . P13 .;-;Do you like ArmA II? You do, good, get ArmA III and stop reading recommendations...
Captain.Hat;-;If youre looking for a game thats both realistic and fun at the same time then this is the game for you.
M3gal0maniac;-;I've never tried the previous ARMA games before ARMA 3, and i've never played anything like ARMA. Its a hardcore military sim that honestly is'nt for everyone. But playing this games, there are many spectacular moments that no other game can compare. The sheer strategy and timing required in a well planned mission is intriguing. The bility to edit maps and create custom missions along with steam workshop integration makes the experience more enjoyable.
[ARP] Seor OreoBunz;-;As a veteran of both Battlefield and CoD Franchises, I can say that this game WIPES THE FLOOR with BOTH of them. Due to recent computer upgrades I can finally dive into this franchise and experience what all my friends have talked about for years. Yes this game has its glitches, bugs, crashes, ect.. But then again, what game doesn't(yes even TF2)? I have got to say this is a game that you either LOVE IT or HATE IT, and since this game keeps me up till 3 a.m. and gives me hours of mindless fun(giving a reason why Special Forces is "Special"), keeping me on my toes(on my butt and my head down), nearly endless mods and player created content that are added everyday to keep the game fresh, and giving a sense of realism that Battlefield or CoD can't.. This isn't any casual shooter that you can run at the enemy and expect them not to hit you and you suddenly regenerate health, this makes you feel like you're at war.. Should you buy it? Thats up to you and your bank account, but in the long run, it's completly worth it..
#Motherfucking P-STAR;-;It is a great game to play. A lot of traveling to do as well and many things to explore within the world.
<CT>Mursaat;-;Why didn't I get this game sooner?
RavDio;-;This is way superior to Arma 2. Better graphics, better animations, better physics. Alot of bugs but it's to be expected on a game of this scale. However with all the mods it's one of the best game out there!
BZ;-;the most immersive game ive ever played , (need a beast pc to run it)
OsEcAmSmRaD;-;Aswesome game , best war simulation ever , it is worth every cent .
RaekwonThaChef;-;A yo dude dis is te  if yo want to shoot sum of dose cops niqqua. DAMN DIS  IS LIKE DEtroit LIKE BAGHDAD NIQQUA GOOAAD DAAYM
[LP] M-DELTA @ OnHolidays3week;-;If you loved arma 2 you'll LOVE arma 3. AWESOME GAME! Buy it!
HarryPalmer96;-;Must buy
Styxblade;-;Arma is such an amazing franchise, and Arma 3 is no exeption. The game got over 40 weapons, but with different weapons for each faction, where two is very similar. In Arma 2 there was alot of mods, like DayZ or Invasion 1944 but in Arma 3 they added intigration with the steam workshop, which makes modding really easy. Overall the game is amazing and definitly worth getting, and I would give it a 8/10 with the only downside being what I feel as too few weapons.
broguy;-;yo a this game is so swag i love teh fact that u can jump out of airplanes and quickscope people l;ol so fun. i love planting marshellows in the ground and see them grow into full size tyronese militants. this game revolves around the freeing of the small county of tyrone from ottoman rule while the IRA is enforcing a heavy tax burden on the spanish navy. all and all this game pushes the boudries of imagination with insane quickscope mechanics
Stratiic;-;It's a very good game and lots of fun, especially with some of the mods you can download.
arcticequine;-;This is the definitive shooter. Forget Call of Duty, forget Battlefield, this is leagues beyond those titles. From fighting as a lone wolf to supporting a team of seventy-two other players on land, above or below seas, and in the sky, everything feels just as it should, just as it would be if it were real. For those that love beutiful visuals, sharp skill curves, and of course, Bohemia's trademark realism, this title cannot be missed.
NYCNEO;-;the Greatest military sim, game and all of the above ever made. keep up the good work guys and gals @ Bohemia.
OsEcAmSmRaD;-;Aswesome game , best war simulation ever , it is worth every cent .
Stratiic;-;It's a very good game and lots of fun, especially with some of the mods you can download.
stimpy;-;Vastly improved in movement, combat, and functionality, ArmA 3 is a big improvement graphically and gameplay wise. The content inside although, is nowhere to be seen. It's still a pretty barren game, with only 1 episode of the campaign. But it is still very fun, and I do reccomend it to fans of the ArmA series and even newcomers. Just wait for the modding community to fix most of the problems.
biffa72;-;Arma 3 enhances on the Arma 2 experience by running better and expanding on features to make it a lot more of a smooth experience. With Arma 2 movement was clunky and sometimes that could have gotten you killed in a firefight because you couldn't get in cover because of the really bad control scheme, however with Arma 3 that is fixed with the stances system. The vehicles of Arma 3 are a lot better than Arma 2, it works. I can't wait until mods like ACE are released on Arma 3 expanding on the experience even more. It's well worth the price. Although the content is slightly lacking, the game expands on Arma 2 loads and I'm sure an expansion pack like Operation Arrowhead will appear for Arma 3 aswell. Buy it, well worth it.
Gavina16a;-;A great game if you like sandbox milsims. I'd recomend it if you're looking for a new game. It is being constantly updated, and it's totally worth a try.
Keyes;-;Arma 3 is definately improved on Arma 2, and what it lacked at launch is now in the game; Full Campaign. When we start to get more maps, I think Arma 3 will be a very good purchase. Right now, it is quite fun if you are in for a full military simulation, however if you are looking for the aftermarket mods like DayZ ( Or any big mods, I don't think DayZ will be in Arma 3 for obvious reasons) Then you should wait a bit. Arma 3 was definately worth the full price, and It was one of the only games in recent times to really "Wow" me with such massive scale. And for those new to the series, Arma 3 shouldn't be too intimidating as it has many tutorials, but in game and outside it. Once again, Arma has a very good level editor, which you can access from the game and begin making scenarios straight away, or use external scripts for more advanced ones, if you know how to.
Bob Diggler;-;What an awesome game !
ninjawithamullet;-;i friggin love this game :D buggy as hell.. but i know (sections - come on it's too big to really know) of the map better than i now my home town... breakingpoint is a must have mod...
TlaiLaxu;-;This is definitely one of the hardest games i have played, i mean, i tried the first mission +30 times on easy and never survived the first encounter with the enemy. I had to find a cheat just to get past the the first battle, but the next was just as hard. I don't think Dark Souls is this hard, and it gets worse as you progress. One annoying thing is when your character gets fatigued from running he starts to pant harder than a vintage German porn flick, i guess NATO must have lowered the standards in 2035. He'll start panting after ~30 meter and it gets worse if you continue to run, even walking makes him sound like he a heavy smoker with Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease. But don't let the single player main campaign scare you from buying the game, you can have much more fun with the editor. It takes some time to figure it out, but you can make really good missions with it. The graphics is good, but you need a very powerful PC to play it with high settings. The FPS is showing when you do the changes so you don't have to exit the menu to test it. A joystick is recommended for flying the planes and helicopters. The game have a good variety of weapons, equipment and vehicles. The ballistics add a touch of realism.
SOCOM;-;Some things in Arma change: -Customizable weapons -Customizable gear -No more helicopter MFD's -SCUBA diving -Everything has FLIR -Bigger maps -Lots of vehicles -Lots of guns (that kinda suck...) Some things in Arma never change: -Sloppy mechanics -Buggy... -That mouse wheel menu... -Hiking -Wandering -Walking around aimlessly -3 factions -Server lag (sadly even with low ping sometimes) Verdict: -Buy this game
Robinhood2109;-;Extremely Tactical, incredibly fun to play with friends. For people looking for a real military spec ops feel this is the game to get. The giant maps and the ability to edit and create your own missions allows for infinite possibilities of gameplay.
Nathan;-;Arma 3 is an absolutely amazing game. Some servers can be laggy but that is not the games fault. It is such a good game with many things to do and the graphics are amazing its just like real life (in a way) Arma 3 is amazing.
(SWE) Jonathan;-;The best action game made yet (in my opinion). With mods its really cool to create your own missions/scenarios becasue you can build pretty much everything you want to, the only bad side is that the editor map can be difficult in the beginning but when you have learned how it works the game will be fantastic
Garniso;-;A great continuation of a very successful series from a community oriented developer.
KJBoone33;-;this game is fun i have had loads of fun theres plenty of game modes and mods so engoy your self 10/10 would play it again
DanijelSVK;-;Very good tactical game, through steam workshop offering hour, days, I think even months of fun and action...
Potatotron_2000;-;Arma 3 is a visually stunning sequal to the legendary army simulator Arma 2. Although the game is amazing, it still feels incomplete, but because of it being one of those games that are continuesly developed I will say that it is not a major issue, for what there is in the game thus far is well polished. Optimasation is a slight issue still, but will hopefully be fixed in future updates. All in all a great work-in-progress title.
Kurome;-;Well, since the game campaign isnt finished yet I'll talk about other stuff. First of all Altis Life is awesome, Breaking Point rocks and I havent tried Wasteland yet. Performancewise the game is very demanding. Although the single player is playable for me, i cant realy say i enjoy multiplayer with less than 15 fps, besides, i am running it on a GTX 260 and Dual Core xD. Oh and THAT MENU MUSIC IS FRIKKEN AMAZIIING O.o!!
SoulfulPrune;-;If you are looking for another FPS to play like COD, this is not for you. This game brings a much larger meaning to combat oriented games. The situations that you have to adapt to, the fact that the map is about 19 sq. km, and how fluid everything is compared to Arma II, thesse are all factors of the this game that stand out to me the most. This game is not for any COD player (or Battlefield at that) that just wants to shoot people for fun. Once you get used to everything and how the game is played, it really latches on to you. Especially when you have some buddies to bring with you.
Amerisun;-;The best thing about Arma 3 is the open ended content you can play on it, and you can get on a server with 10+ of your friends and play together against the computer or other people. The game has it's glitches (network blips) that can be mitigated by going to a strong server host / game type and making sure you are close to it geographically. This is because the game world is huge, and you can see multiple kilometers away enemies running around and can snipe them from a distance or rocket their vehicle. I am glad that DayZ got me interested in the Arma series as I have had a blast with them so far.
EzL;-;free is free!
Sergio;-;Yes, it good game. Buy it.
THIRTYJULY (dendi al ayubi);-;best Military simulation game ever!! 10/10!
Zamorak - CDA;-;Its ArmA2 brought to a new level which I'd never expect it to reach. Finding a clan or team and doing missions together defenitely is the most fun and epic thing ever! If you're not that realistic tho there still is king of the hill which is one big bloodbath for you CoD players ;) Defenitely a 10/10 if you ask me!!
Trooper;-;Pilot Jumpsuit Army vs. Iranians From Outer Space. And some greek guys that suck.
Mestari Kessu;-;Buy this awesome simulator, and it doesnt need high powered computer for graphs!
Hajimoto [ECWC];-;I typically do not write reviews or recommendations on Alphas or Betas of most game titles but it is important to note that even in its Alpha stages, Arma3 is an awesome experience. We all know that A3 is not built on a new game engine and that it is really a polished enhanced A2OA game engine with popular community add-ons integrated into its core combined with a graphic overhaul... but you know what.... thats fine, even knowing all that, its a sweet first person experience. If you do not believe in paying for Alpha access, then buy the game at the now reduced rate and do not play the Alpha but wait for the full release, but buy it, its worth it.
Syrex;-;Its a good game and with Altis Life the best game :D
SS  CaNdLEE [Mehmet];-;Great Game With Altis Life Mod
Midnight Marauder;-;This is the sequel to Black Ops 2. Everyone throws away a bunch of the high-tec stuff, and now people fight more like it's 2012, even though it's 2030something. Fight against the army of Greece and all of their Spartans, so that zombie Menendez can't steal Reznov's Gold!
Keyes;-;Arma 3 is definately improved on Arma 2, and what it lacked at launch is now in the game; Full Campaign. When we start to get more maps, I think Arma 3 will be a very good purchase. Right now, it is quite fun if you are in for a full military simulation, however if you are looking for the aftermarket mods like DayZ ( Or any big mods, I don't think DayZ will be in Arma 3 for obvious reasons) Then you should wait a bit. Arma 3 was definately worth the full price, and It was one of the only games in recent times to really "Wow" me with such massive scale. And for those new to the series, Arma 3 shouldn't be too intimidating as it has many tutorials, but in game and outside it. Once again, Arma has a very good level editor, which you can access from the game and begin making scenarios straight away, or use external scripts for more advanced ones, if you know how to.
Bob Diggler;-;What an awesome game !
ninjawithamullet;-;i friggin love this game :D buggy as hell.. but i know (sections - come on it's too big to really know) of the map better than i now my home town... breakingpoint is a must have mod...
TlaiLaxu;-;This is definitely one of the hardest games i have played, i mean, i tried the first mission +30 times on easy and never survived the first encounter with the enemy. I had to find a cheat just to get past the the first battle, but the next was just as hard. I don't think Dark Souls is this hard, and it gets worse as you progress. One annoying thing is when your character gets fatigued from running he starts to pant harder than a vintage German porn flick, i guess NATO must have lowered the standards in 2035. He'll start panting after ~30 meter and it gets worse if you continue to run, even walking makes him sound like he a heavy smoker with Chronic obstructive pulmonary disease. But don't let the single player main campaign scare you from buying the game, you can have much more fun with the editor. It takes some time to figure it out, but you can make really good missions with it. The graphics is good, but you need a very powerful PC to play it with high settings. The FPS is showing when you do the changes so you don't have to exit the menu to test it. A joystick is recommended for flying the planes and helicopters. The game have a good variety of weapons, equipment and vehicles. The ballistics add a touch of realism.
VeteranSpy [RO];-;It's a beautiful game. !!
arcticequine;-;This is the definitive shooter. Forget Call of Duty, forget Battlefield, this is leagues beyond those titles. From fighting as a lone wolf to supporting a team of seventy-two other players on land, above or below seas, and in the sky, everything feels just as it should, just as it would be if it were real. For those that love beutiful visuals, sharp skill curves, and of course, Bohemia's trademark realism, this title cannot be missed.
RaekwonThaChef;-;A yo dude dis is te  if yo want to shoot sum of dose cops niqqua. DAMN DIS  IS LIKE DEtroit LIKE BAGHDAD NIQQUA GOOAAD DAAYM
Aziz_X;-;Love This Game
Juri ();-;Best open world, sandbox game made to date. Fluid movement, shooting and driving. Top tier graphics and draw distance make it even more impressive. The newer DayZ Breaking Point mod for Arma 3 is also very good for how developed it is.
Orc5552775;-;THIS IS A GOOD WAR SIM
MykeyRM;-;Played arma2, Loved it, Played arma3 and loved it more. I joined the AHOYWORLD team and thrashed this game hard since alpha came out and its great. Endless possibilities for missions with many servers, editors, mods and scripts. Awesome game to get a clan together for team play although just as fun to play alone or MP. (Server dependent): Custom faces,uniforms,vehicles,weapons,sounds,textures,Virt Radios and more. This game has so much potential its crazy. Although..... known for  frames 20-30 on mid systems It tends to make up for that in good times to be had. High spec systems will push up to 60-70fps but conditional. Script running, current spawned in objects and AI, graphic effects overload will hammer some systems. Overall if youre system is good enough to run it and you can handle maybe turning some effects down on mid systems its an awesome game sure to entertain and war sim lovers. 9/10
TonyMo;-;A big open wonderful military sandbox that is made even better by its active and passionate modding community.
CroHazarD;-;Best game ever! There is so much content because of people making addons, missions, mods all the time, this is like 10000 games in 1. Best purchase I've made! Only down side is that its in the future. I mean that they are using prototype vehicles that nobody knows about. It would been a 10/10 game for me if they just made "Arma II" with this updated engine and graphics!
Foxum;-;Fantastic game with a mind blowing amount of customization and a great modding community. The game is a military sim and is quite true to the details. Though I will stress this game is very complex when it comes to the controls and customization. As of now there is no easy way to create a "loadout" without coding in some nasty box of text. There is plans to fix this. But just be warned this game does require decent understanding of PC gaming due to mass amount of controls and options there is big leaning curve. But I would high recommend this game.
Gavina16a;-;A great game if you like sandbox milsims. I'd recomend it if you're looking for a new game. It is being constantly updated, and it's totally worth a try.
Brick;-;Arma III has outstanding visuals and a intense set of game play mechanics. This game is not for the average FPS player, its for players who want more from the average FPS shooter. All in all it takes awhile to get into but once you find a good community to play with you have a  ton of fun!
[HLPL]TehKatsikosGR;-;Very good game..but a little bit too heavy for a gaming pc..i have i5 4430 8GB ram & GTX770 and i can't handle it with 60fps while i am streaming..please just make a new patch for CPU cores because mine hits on 80& usage..:( i am playing on high setting without anti-allaiting on 54 fps on average..soo bad for gaming rig with 2 SSD's and some good parts!
Mr.H.t.G;-;best game ever ! you guys must buy it :)
SGT Cairney;-;If you are looking for a proper Army/War Sim this is what you need. Forget Battlefield, COD and all the rest. Arma III is a sandbox true as you will find sim. Not only that the modding community are 2nd to none, adding tones of extra content.
E_L_M_O;-;One of the most realistic shooters I have ever played. If you love games where action is at every turn and everything is tramatic , this is not for you. This game is about patience and time, waiting for the right time to strike and getting into position for the battle. Once you are in battle, things change and you have to adapt to them. Great game 10/10.
stimpy;-;Vastly improved in movement, combat, and functionality, ArmA 3 is a big improvement graphically and gameplay wise. The content inside although, is nowhere to be seen. It's still a pretty barren game, with only 1 episode of the campaign. But it is still very fun, and I do reccomend it to fans of the ArmA series and even newcomers. Just wait for the modding community to fix most of the problems.
biffa72;-;Arma 3 enhances on the Arma 2 experience by running better and expanding on features to make it a lot more of a smooth experience. With Arma 2 movement was clunky and sometimes that could have gotten you killed in a firefight because you couldn't get in cover because of the really bad control scheme, however with Arma 3 that is fixed with the stances system. The vehicles of Arma 3 are a lot better than Arma 2, it works. I can't wait until mods like ACE are released on Arma 3 expanding on the experience even more. It's well worth the price. Although the content is slightly lacking, the game expands on Arma 2 loads and I'm sure an expansion pack like Operation Arrowhead will appear for Arma 3 aswell. Buy it, well worth it.
Sheader;-;Truly game that can call its self a simulator. I have tons of fun with it and i always get amazed at how good the graphics look. There is a ton of things to do. you can play around the missions of the single player displaying all kinds of combat situations. You could create your own made scenario and share it with others. You can also live edit the combat events with the new Zeus patch while playing multiplayer. The game also features an realistic ballistic system including bullet drop, shooting through walls (also decreases damage), and bullet speed. and these are effected by the type of weapon you use and what kind of ammunition. Also the game has a lot of vehicles you can mess around with. Boats, cars, tanks. Helicopters, planes, drones and even submersibles. And if that isnt enough for you than you could visited the stream workshop for many more vehicles. Weapons, and combat scenarios. I defiantly approve of this game!
big d @epic_DAN FIFTEEN;-;Absolutely miles ahead of any other shooter out there. It's cheap as of now, but snap it up soon before it goes into full release. Consider it a mix of any game you care to mention with a-maz-ing graphics, ARMA 2, and the best simulator out there, and you'll get ARMA 3.
[MSLK] Lord E*$Do*;-;If you like shooters, this one has EVERYTHING you could ever want in an FPS simulator, plus the graphics are Amazing!
[TRU] Duramaxx;-;Amazing 3rd or 1st person shooter that has a very realistic feel (aka simulator) hard to get bored with all the user created content and the editor. The controls can be a tad tough to learn at first but with in a few hours you should have them down. Being able to mod your game file gives you tons of customizable things to do. I would recomend playing with a group of people because playing this game by yourself can tend to get boring. That is the only flaw iv been able to find really aside from a few random bugs here and there.
leocervantes27;-;arma 3 is awesome!
Misaki Mei;-;10/10, Great game and a great mods for it
FabulousGeorge;-;I'm not going to say, BUY THIS GAME!! because it's not for everyone, if you like ARMA 2 or military, FPS shooters (not COD, thats more like an arcade game) then yeah this game is awesome and is a leader in that market. If you think this game is full on, arcade style action packs bullets,bombs and metal flying all over the place, it's not, but it's just as fun as one of those games.
Tswear(JSOC);-;AMAZING! Just wow, graphics are so good, its scary, (OH SNAP! GRANADE!! wait, its just a game! :) ) I am a Huge Fan of Bohemia interactive and codemasters, from Operation flashpoint when i was 7 (dont tell anyne :P ) all the way to This Beta Game, and for this price ( which is steep, but You will Never Ever run out of missions to create. want to kill a government leader? get a mod of that guy and do it! , and the ai are tough to kill, but if you catch them by suprise they are alot easier to destroy, and no spamming units in warfare will help, its all about strategy, and with the new uavs and ugvs , im suprised the millitary doesnt use it to train their teams, ( would be crazy to even think about that, but we have alot to learn from games... to sum this up in two words? BUY IT!!!!
StealthXD;-;Arma 3 is a great game to play with friends!
Talat Mahmood;-;When you play this game, you will become Karma Charger
HAVAPULL;-;As of late i find this game to be alot more entertaining that the current dayz. although the dayz graphics are better in some ways this just has so much more to do other than run......forever.
BRUXXUS;-;This game grew on me. One of my favorite YouTubers plays this somewhat often so I was decently familiar with the idea of the game before a few friends told me to get it. We've played a few of the multiplayer modes and recently been playing the Battle Royale mod, (which is a BLAST when you finally get into a reliable server). As others have mentioned, this is more of a combat simulation. It's unforgiving, which is why players need to use actual tactics to accomplish a goal. Sometimes things get slow, but that only helps to make confrontations way more exciting. I'm looking forward to trying out much more of what this game offers, which is a LOT.
Kaiser_Kurt;-;Very enjoyable war simulator. The story is a little weak but who cares when it looks this good. The multiplayer is what it's all about really with a variety of servers and game modes. 7.5/10
radr3j;-;This game is not for the console kids that play COD all day. This is a difficult but fun game. If you look at the negative reviews on it the reviewers have 300 to 700+ hours in this game... thats not the amount of hours you put in this game if you dont like it.... I dont get it.. Anyways. If you choose to buy this game get VAC. It will save your life. The community behind this game is huge and there is always new player created missions and content available. Theres also breaking point mod for arma 3. Basically Dayz for Arma 3. Which I think is better than SA. The guys saying they get low fps... one saying he gets 10 frames?? Its a demanding game... play it on something besides the laptop you bought at Wal-Mart... Bohemia labels it a military sim... thats what it is. It's most def not a run and shoot.
{CoM} Hondor;-;The most realistic war simulator ever made. I won't give it a 10/10 because of its bad support for old graphics cards. 9/10
H/\lcyon;-;This game is amazing. Straight up no ifs ands or buts about it. It does fall short in some areas compared to previous titles, for example the vehicle selection is tiny compared to ARMA2 but this will likely change over the course of the game's life as BI is releasing new content in sections like the campaign. Then of course there are the myriad of mods to tide you over :). If you're at all into Milsim or Hardcore FPS games you're probably going to love this. The game's biggest strength is simply that you can do almost anything you want to in it. You want to drive into the target area with a sub, swim to shore and rise out of the water like a Navy S.E.A.L? You can do that. Want to fly in in an AH-6 loaded for bear? You can do that, want to fly a jet? Drive a tank? Skydive? Attack at night? Use a mortar? Be a sniper? Fly an attack heli? Or just go in as a footsoldier? ARMA 3's got you covered. It's as it is advertised...the ultimate military sandbox. Probably going to be my favourite or one of my favourite games of 2013 and 2014 especially in terms of longevity.
FeasibleCurve4;-;Best Game In The World
CLiPaZiNE;-;With the right mods and people, this is about as close as you want to get to actual combat [at least for the ground warfare] Arma's best feature is the dedicated modding community, you can find a mod for just about anything for Arma. the game simulates fatigue, breathing and pain effect, as well as weapon weight, meaning that there won't be anybody out shooting a sub machine gun with a long rifle after being shot in the chest at near point blank range. There is a pretty good balistic simulation for vanilla arma but you can find mods for very realistic ballistics. I love pretty much everything about Arma except these two things, of course, nothing is perfect. The game requires a pretty powerful computer setup to run effectively, even with my Nvidia 770 graphics card, larger battles decrease frames quite a bit. And finally, Arma's controls can be rather clunky at times, the stance/lean controls specificly. It can be a problem at close range where a real human could move much faster. Overall- 9.5/10 definetly worth the price if you can run it and enjoy Teamwork and tactical combat.
Turtle-Sama;-;An amazing game! 6.5/10 As I started from the Alpha of ArmA 3, I noticed as the game progressed I lost my ability to not only run the game once it hit beta but also blue screened three times. I've had multiple problems and even mangaged to fix the issue after hours and hours of searching for the answer to the issues. Now as Beta was a complete horror and full release was right around the corner I decided like many others to quit playing and go back to some good old ArmA 2 A.C.E. and waited till the games full release. As I was pumped for the full release I noticed that nothing had changed from the beta. Same maps, same vehicles, same sounds, same weapons, and same factions. The lack of things for the Sea was a huge disappointment because the ArmA 3 engine actually has a working water system and it was completely wasted. The lack of Air vehicles especially no big cargo plane makes traveling on altis boring and hard to move from place to place. Although it says its a ArmA game I dont feel as if it compares to its counter parts. Yes, a graphical update has been put up for the game itself but after playing ArmA 2. I dont feel the immersion of ArmA:Gold Edition and ArmA 2 in ArmA 3. but, it does have alot of neat things like futuristic vehicles, amazing hud system, stance system, amazing animations, ability for both customization over weaponary/uniform and a bunch of downloadable mods/maps that can keep you playing for hours just like ArmA 2. I'm just disappointed that they didn't take their time on this game. Why couldn't they have made this game better by looking at what players loved in the previous games like the ACE mod or even some of the other cool things like I44, VTE, and etc. Although all the bad things I have said its still a game in development and could possibly have a big turn around. I just hope this game becomes better in the future so I can start enjoying it again.
volkie;-;Mixed emotions about this one... Bought it when it was 40 bucks, kinda wish I didn't. Only real good parts about this are customizing levels of your own. Custom KOTH servers are good too. Other than that, I didn't really enjoy this. I was hoping a lot more from Arma 3. Arma 2 still has unlimited gameplay in it. RP servers, and normal servers. If you want a good war sim, this is pretty good. If you want a semigood war sim with basically unlimited gameplay, Arma 2. I don't exactly RECOMMEND this game, but it's pretty okay. 6.4/10
LemonCake;-;the main story can be really hard as it is very realistic so you can die in a few shots. but the mods are SO FUN ! 9/10
Cook-E;-;Good game... better than Arma 2 or Operation Arrowhead.... BUT and a BIIIIIIIG BUTT. please please please please FIX THE FREAKING AI PILOTING AND DRIVING ALREADY!!!!!!!!! Ex: Yesterday I'm playing Arma 3 (Bennys CTI mode), I have 7 M4 Scorchers all parked at HQ with 1 gunner in each. The plan is to sneak in at about 500m from the objective, use the M4s to eliminate all opposition, then take the objective single handed while the rest of the team is attacking another objective. I hire a quadbike w/driver, assign the driver as Green Team and jump on the back. I tell him to move to the next town, and I open the map to select my best approach to the objective. After selecting my approach I go back to 3rd person view. We are about 10m past our HQ. The AI is crashing into a small rock on the side of the road. Over and over and over and over and over and over again. To my left there is apx. 10m of wide open road. :S All I can say is WTF. A statement, not a question. WTF. Not WTF?. WTF. Get it. Anyways good game. No other game is as extensive as Arma. I would even call it more a "sim" than a game. Not a true sim, but a sim none the less.
Jimmy Bibs;-;Very fun to use. The graphics and realism aspect of the game is extreme. The firefights are intense, and it's easy to be immersed into the combat. The vehicle (Including Aircraft, submarines, helicopters) interiors are nice to look at as well. Zues: Before this addon I couldn't get up close to watch a firefight without getting shot. This makes a great RTS, and a pleasurable theater of war. Go Karts: I was kind of confused about this addon. "A war simulator with Go Karts?" I got it, tried it out, and to be honest it wasn't that bad. Bohemia Interactive was trying something new. it was apreciated.
ban-bros;-;Best military ery game out there
[EX] thematrixman;-;Hello everyone thematrixman here giving my review on this fantastic game. So if you have played Arma 2 this is a huge jump in the right direction. Personally I didnt like Arma 2 due to its crappy controls and bugs. However, I did like the big open atmosphere which Arma 3 keeps and even out does it if i say do so myself. I gonna be straight out with you guys I have not beat the campaign yet because of difficulty and just lack of interest. The multiplayer is really the way to go as well as player made levels. I recomend playing capture the island for it puts this game to its max and create the intensity of a real war. Overall if you are ever wanting to play cti msg me and we can frag some noobs. The commaning is really crisp and you often have to think on the fly which is great for people who like strategy like me. The A.I arent that bad as they can fly helicopters better than me, but driving is another story (psst, if you put them in relax mode they will only drive on roads). So I conclude that this game will provide you with endless entertainment and i hope to see some of you online. This is matrix signing out!
Bogsley_The_Pig;-;I was half way through a very long operation which a friend created and my TV Remote slipped and fell on my keyboard, I threw a grenade, reloaded, went to prone and opened my backpack in all one hit. Then I ran up a slight incline and was fatigued, we were then contacted from the south and a turned to see a squad. My CoD experince thought "Huh, four guys easy!". I soon came to realise that even anybody can kill you in this game with ease, a few shots down range at me and I was to shakey to even locate my target in my sights. I got shot in the head and ragdolled down a hill. The last save point was 20 minutes before this. I decided to try a campaign mission where you are alone with a guy in a forest. I was following him close behind and he stepped on a mine and killed us both. Turns out you're not meant to be close to this guy. I played again and kept very far away from him. I stepped on a mine this time and died. A brutal shake-em-up with a massive sandbox to blow things up in. You're not even safe in the scripted events.
Zygzak191;-;True military sandbox!
DMentMan;-;awesome and fun to play with friends
D.Barrnet;-;I've been part of the ARMA franchise since Operation Flashpoint. This is by far the best MilSim to ever be released. If you're into slow, simulated and realistic gameplay... This game is the one for you.
captain_weegee;-;I killed a man with 0 thought.... found out he was friendly then I was running away rouge with the threat of being court marshalled held over my head. Then I found this great game and now I play it. 10/10 would shoot sarge again.
Mike;-;I was pilot and my friend was a copilot. Gave him the controls because he haven't flew in this game ever. He flew 20s and we died. 10/10 Would never let him touch choppers again.
KUDOX;-;I thought a snake was going to bite me so i jumped up got shot in the face somehow lived only to be killed by APB. 11/10 the chem lights are pretty.
Diabolical Hands;-;Chased around by exploding red people for hours. 12/4 best 5 hours spent in my life
A Clever Idiot;-;I got a helicopter, crashed it into the middle of a group of enemies and killed them all. 10/10 would jihad again.
Joon;-;I could not find the god damned cake!
FeX <ThugLifeAu.com>;-;This game has goats, enough said. - 69/10.
Rossmore;-;Excellent, just absolutely excellent game. The possibilites and endless scenarios that you can create yourself just makes this games one of the best games of this genre, and possibly one of the better and more unique games for PC. Unrivalled in creativity and possibilities, ArmA 3 is a masterpiece added to the genre. Bohemia delivers, yet again.
Abs Abs Abs Abs Abs Abs Abs Abs;-;buy this for the fight for trees to bear arms. arm a tree. 10/10
djboogy;-;This game is simply... Amazing 10/10
Blizzardstruck;-;I love this game to bits. My only problem is my PC isn't that powerfull, so I can't experiance the whole moment. Im going to get this game for my friend, and would do so if I could with everyone in the world.
Jenkins;-;Fantastic game! Plenty of action and 'moments' - even better if you're playing with friends! However, if you're a hardcore Call of Duty fan who enjoys fast paced first person shooters - highly not recommended. But if you're looking for a different challenge, then definitely worth a shot!
-CML-Gryphon;-;Arma is the most impressive, ambitious, challenging, and rewarding game I have ever played. Arma is best enjoyed with friends (and Teamspeak). The mod community is outstanding, and our clan has really gotten into map/scenario-making. If you are new to Arma, I'd recommend first hopping in to a King of the Hill (Hostile Takeover is pretty good). You can "lonewolf" it by casually moving with teammates; you can take the next step and ask if someone has an in-game group going and move with them; you can take the greatest (and most rewarding) step and join a group in teamspeak. Feel free to reach out to me, personally, for tips OR if you'd like to play with our community: MagnusLegio.net
Batmon;-;Arma 3 has to be the best game I have ever played. It has one of the best communities possible and the amount of addons for the game is unreal. A must have!
Napkin;-;I have no words. Boheimia Interactive has done it again, this time on an even grander and more immersive scale than the last. Alone, this game is amazing. With friends, this game is amazing. With food, this game is amazing. Masturbating, it is amazing. Did i mention that its amazing?
TheZenGuard;-;Bought this game for the Breaking point (Dayz) mod,but i decided to give Epoch and Altis life a try.It was a blast i had a great time playing with friends,so i tought i should play the campaign,i'm sorry to say that it was horrible,the AI was dumb as F*ck even at the hightest level of difficulty,and sometimes game would crash at the end of a cutscene(although this might be an issue on my end).So overall i think that arma 3 is a great choice for those who want to play online,if you are looking for a good singleplayer campaign you might wanna avoid arma 3.
EdF4ce;-;A game that has no equal, there really is nothing quite like arma.
Charlie;-;Guy blew me up shouting hail isis 69/8
Ichigo;-;Much good game, very fun role play servers and some good coop servers. you can drive tanks and  and even fly jets. Quite realistic. Try to avoid any |GITS| owned servers as they are the most biased and power abusing  on the whole of the game. Their servers are very not good. 420/10 - IGN
[14.JgKp] Ben@Arms;-;One Word for this Game:G-R-E-A-T How many hours does a normal EA title entertain you for like 60-70 Bucks? 5-8 hours, maybe 10-12 hours? ArmA3 is easily crushing those titles because of re-playability, nearly endless options of customization, building your own szenarios, scripts, addons, islands. You can even find gametypes and mods, that change the way to play ArmA3. They modify it to be played apart from the original way to play it. (Those mods and missions are Boiling Point, Wasteland, Altis Life RPG) Some might hit their heads now to a table, as this isnt the way ArmA is meant to be played. But it shows whats possible with the game and the engine at all =). This is, what gamers want. A long term motivation (Look at my game hours :D) and a huge sandbox to be entertained for years. (Sure there are bugs and features, the communitiy is mostly right to complain about) But the steps BIS did to fulfill the wishes of the community, involved changing parts of the team also. Since like 6-7 month the developing and bugfixing gets faster. ArmA 3 in a nutshell: -A tactic Shooter with simulation elements. -You have to actually think before making a move. -You can have great battles, both coop and team-vs-team. -The Mod support for this game is really great. As above: User created content like islands, content addons, mods, missions, campaigns, replacements. -Even a normal battle between a fireteam gets you harder than it would on every other game here around. If you search for a game where you are entertained for years, a semi-realistic warfare, combined arms gameplay, an open world sandbox game? Then look no further. Trash the other games and get in soldier!
Ser "Bacon" Bearington;-;I tried to go down a slide. Biggest mistake I ever made. Thankfully there was a kind doctor nearby who saved my life from the evil creature that was the slide. Notify the government, slides are lethal. And to think we let children play on them. Science has gone too far I say! 10/10 for kind doctors who understand the dangers of slides.
Rossmore;-;Excellent, just absolutely excellent game. The possibilites and endless scenarios that you can create yourself just makes this games one of the best games of this genre, and possibly one of the better and more unique games for PC. Unrivalled in creativity and possibilities, ArmA 3 is a masterpiece added to the genre. Bohemia delivers, yet again.
Abs Abs Abs Abs Abs Abs Abs Abs;-;buy this for the fight for trees to bear arms. arm a tree. 10/10
[EX] thematrixman;-;Hello everyone thematrixman here giving my review on this fantastic game. So if you have played Arma 2 this is a huge jump in the right direction. Personally I didnt like Arma 2 due to its crappy controls and bugs. However, I did like the big open atmosphere which Arma 3 keeps and even out does it if i say do so myself. I gonna be straight out with you guys I have not beat the campaign yet because of difficulty and just lack of interest. The multiplayer is really the way to go as well as player made levels. I recomend playing capture the island for it puts this game to its max and create the intensity of a real war. Overall if you are ever wanting to play cti msg me and we can frag some noobs. The commaning is really crisp and you often have to think on the fly which is great for people who like strategy like me. The A.I arent that bad as they can fly helicopters better than me, but driving is another story (psst, if you put them in relax mode they will only drive on roads). So I conclude that this game will provide you with endless entertainment and i hope to see some of you online. This is matrix signing out!
Bogsley_The_Pig;-;I was half way through a very long operation which a friend created and my TV Remote slipped and fell on my keyboard, I threw a grenade, reloaded, went to prone and opened my backpack in all one hit. Then I ran up a slight incline and was fatigued, we were then contacted from the south and a turned to see a squad. My CoD experince thought "Huh, four guys easy!". I soon came to realise that even anybody can kill you in this game with ease, a few shots down range at me and I was to shakey to even locate my target in my sights. I got shot in the head and ragdolled down a hill. The last save point was 20 minutes before this. I decided to try a campaign mission where you are alone with a guy in a forest. I was following him close behind and he stepped on a mine and killed us both. Turns out you're not meant to be close to this guy. I played again and kept very far away from him. I stepped on a mine this time and died. A brutal shake-em-up with a massive sandbox to blow things up in. You're not even safe in the scripted events.
Zygzak191;-;True military sandbox!
DMentMan;-;awesome and fun to play with friends
D.Barrnet;-;I've been part of the ARMA franchise since Operation Flashpoint. This is by far the best MilSim to ever be released. If you're into slow, simulated and realistic gameplay... This game is the one for you.
captain_weegee;-;I killed a man with 0 thought.... found out he was friendly then I was running away rouge with the threat of being court marshalled held over my head. Then I found this great game and now I play it. 10/10 would shoot sarge again.
Legendary;-;ArmA 3 Altis Life RPG- Bought an illegal weapon worth $1,000,000 from a corrupt cop for $150,000, but was arrested by his friend! #WOULDBUYGUNFROMCORRUPTCOPAGAIN! 8/8 m8 - IGN
Wang;-;Altis Life. That is all.
Zoey;-;This is Arma 3. The game we have been waiting for forever to improve our arma experience for along time coming. The game does add lots of cool new features to arma but the vanilla version of Arma 3 lacks content. If you are planning to mod it and play with a group of people then i highly recommend Arma for you, But in the long run without mods this game lacks content. 7/10 //UPDATE// Instead of actually adding content to this game they've decided to release all the content this game needs as DLC. Very disappointing and cash grab move from BIS.
[<Dills19>] ( );-;i luv this game it has amazing graphics but there is one problem with playing! that is you need a group of freinds
Beast;-;I love this game so mutch why? you can play on a open sandbox map, there are like tons of mods out for Arma 3, Co-op missions, Deathmatches, RolePlay-Life mods, it has everything for everyone, actually too mutch to mention i just love it!!
Grim;-;Good game maybe a little work but i see a lot of mods being made in futrue.
Tactical Shovel;-;Went to jail for asking a paramedic to give me a lift to the pub. 10/10
Fizzle ma Nizzle;-;was fun
Encore;-;Arma is Big, open world simulator, full of content, hard and realistic gameplay give you much fun and rage :P, but satisfaction after complete mission is unimaginable :D. Another things are mods, Wasteland, RPG mods or BattleRoyale give you new multiplayer experience, Camping with assault rifle with 75x Scope and try to kill people on 1000m distance is very good felling :). I highly recommend Arma 3 + Advantage <Hard (for people who like this) <Realistic Simulation <Multiplayer <Zeus <Mods nad custom Scenario <Long Campain <Huge open world (278 Km2 !!) - Disadvantage <Bad optimization <High hardware requirements <Hard (For Casuals)
Ryan;-;Why this game is simply amazing? It's hard and unfair.
Fhoer;-;man, is like life, but with better graphics and a exelent background history :V :v :v
Halo1m;-;Best military simulator i've ever played. All it's missing is tons of weapons. But what it has is great!
MiniMeDee;-;I love this game its very fun and alot like a simulation.It does take some time getting used too the controls but after you can have a blast playing it.
[RG] ToastyZA;-;Brilliant Game. cant stop playing
Loli <3 Onii-chan;-;This game is fantastic. Infact it is the most immersive game I have ever played. I realized this when me and some random person I met found each other on a wasteland server and survived by the skin of our teeth, savenging items, raiding towms, and dying a little too many times in the varied and colorful landscape of Altis. This is only just a small part of the game that I happened upon, so believe me when I say that I can't wait to discover the rest of it.
Dr.Catfish;-;If you want realism in a shooter, this is where you go. The bullet drop and lag make this game challenging along with the one shot death`s that happen alot. Using their new cover system. You can go behind cover and shoot stuff that you never could before.
`);-;This game is sweet but really need a high end rig to exprience the "GAME"
WLf;-;Great game! takes a while to get used to but the mods are amazing. I am coming from BF4 and they might seem like they are in common but both feel very different in a good way. ARMA 3 is great and e ven better when u get for half off =P
Acesone1!;-;Its a very good game,has a great easy to use editor,good mod supports. the game has a bit of a learning curve but its not that big. over all its a wonderful game
LobsterCorgi;-;I barely got this game and let me tell you I had the most terrifying experence ever (to me that is) I just finished Basic Training and finally knew how to play and understand this game, I joined a King of the hill server with 103 people in the game. As i joined i bought the first gun given to you and went on, I marked where my objective was at and catched a ride from a fellow teammate flying a helicopter over to the objective. I introduced myself to him, He Introduced his name as well. His name was John, as we were waiting for more teammates to join us on the ride to the objective, We chatted about this war (Trying to RP Here and he joins me in RPing) As we were chatting he told me that he been playing this game for 769 hours now, and that he was going to quit soon. I told him i understood why, The helicopter was full now and we began to lift off and go to the objective. As we were going there we were shot at and began to crash everyone jumped off and was killed, Me and John were still inside the helicopter that was falling slowly He told me "Jump, go now you er." I jumped and made it into the ocean with a broken leg, I swam up as fast as i can, and saw the helicopter slowly fall and crash into the mountain side, and then exploded. I swam to shore quickly and patched my leg up and ran to crash. I found his dead body and said in chat "RIP IN PIECES John." i took his gun which was better then mine and ran to the battlefield. As i made it to the battle field, there were explosions, gunshots, Helicopters crashing and then exploding, and People dying right in front of me. I have indeed seen some , I saw a fellow soldier on the ground i asked if he was ok he replied" Does it look like im ing OK?" "I'm crawling for s sake when i could be running at the hill and be taking it over." I said "Ok, ok here" I dropped a med kit and ran to the Hill we were suppose to take over. I saw 3 enemies run pass me, i shot at them and killed 2. One of the enemies saw me and began to fire at me and shot at me chest once. I ran and the enemy followed. As i thought i was going to be found and then shot, I attempted to heal up but then he found me and was about to fire when 2 teammates came to me and killed the enemy. I thanked them, healed up and ran to the belly of the beast. I met a teammate being shot at heavily and was wounded I told him to run to me, he told me he couldn't he was hurt and couldn't run. I threw a gernade at the area where all the enemies were shooting at and got a double kill but 2 enemies survived. He had time to run towards me and survive but as he tried to run towards me a Sniper got him in the leg and made him crawl, as he was about to die he told me to run, the sniper finished him off and hen payed attention to me. The sniper shot me injuring me and i began to crawl. 4 Enemies ran toward sme and all four shot at me. And i respawned. 10 out of 10, will get shot at by 4 people and wounded by a sniper again.
Hamakaze;-;This is a good game. :P
Hunter Andrew;-;Bought this while it on was on sale for 50% off. So far it has been well worth the money and I plan to keep playing for quite some time. So far I have experienced hilarious moments with friends and in online servers but at the same time, I've experienced "milsim" roleplaying and taking scenarios and missions much more seriously which is a blast as well. Although there can be an FPS problem at times, which I have not experienced very much at all, I highly reccomend the game. With the in depth combat gameplay, amazing graphics, and and huge mod selection, I can't complain much. Highly recommended.
KB_717;-;Arma 3 is a war simulator but gets used for a lot of other reasons example, wasteland altis life etc but there are a few problems with it as it still just been released example the FPS on servers are very bad and i know its not my computer as many other people has complained about it but overall it is worth the $60
Sheep;-;Do you like a good shooter? Are you a strategist? Are you more inclined to play on hardcore servers in other games when you get the chance? Then this might just be the game for you. The realism and beauty in Arma 3 will blow you away. With heaps of multiplayer game modes avaliable for you to play, there will certainly be one that you will enjoy! And if multiplayer isnt your thing, then why not download one of the many custom made, high quality scenarios created by the community? Steam workshop integration allows for ENDLESS fun, on scenarios that you can enjoy alone, or with friends! This is a game you really must try.
bob;-;10/10 played invade and annex server was in a helicopter for 1 real life hour and then got shot down
Steve|SS|;-;It took me couple months to master all the commands and controls etc ,but after that the sky is a limit ,10/10 Comrade Stalin approves !
Hippie;-;After playing Altis life for the first time, I accomplished holding a guy up at a peach tree field outside Kola, or however it's spelled, I didn't know how to pick the peaches so i made the guy pick em for me at gunpoint, I then made him take off his cloths, why I did this? I don't know, but it was very amusing. He picked a couple hundred peaches, handed them to me, after doing so he booked it to my truck, which i stupidly left unlocked, he got in my truck, pulled a u-turn and hit me, I some how survived this, with very low health, like, very god damn low. He had to get rid of the evidence, including me. He pulled me off the road and behind one of the houses, he waited for me to bleed out. I told him he didn't have to do it, that he was a good person, he just sat there and waited. After a few moments, the light faded, It was game over, I goofed. Best first time playing Arma III ever. 10/10
Cyberion;-;One of the most epic games ever made. If you want a true simulator of a soldier - ARMA III is the way to go! I recommend it to every hardcore player there!
Lyrex;-;From the perspective of a player that hasn't experienced the previous 2 ArmA's, this game is great! It's provided something that I've wanted for a long time; a sandbox, army based, mod-able, campaign! The graphics are lovely and customization is very vast. The DLC is actually worth it for once, and I cannot wait for more to come out! Very Good game, Get it if you like combat! - 10/10
rhyswilliams999;-;One of the best games you can get, building on the old Arma games, this is a new chapter in the Arma-verse that allows you to create realistic (or not :-) military scenarios. Unlike COD or BF4, Arma 3 is a game that you can make what you want in it, Take a look at armaholic for example, its not a storepage of hats to buy, but a list of mods that add to the game, you can edit, create, adjust so many times. Half of the game is creating the missions, let alone play them. If you want to make the best of Arma 3, join a group/clan and get in on the dedicated missions, ALTIS life has its place, but does not compare to actual teamwork.
ASIANGRUNT101;-;The best simulator and its called arma! Literally the best game ive ever played
WaRdOg;-;Put simply, this is the only first person shooter that any self respecting gamer needs to buy. It has it all.
Noxeys;-;arma 3 is the best simulator out yet!!! recomended for everyone:D
lazing  hroma;-;why why why is this game so lagy i get 14 fps and i have a i7 4790k @ 4.7ghz and a msi r9 285 if i put all max i get like 14 to 40 fps on a good sever but wen i put all low i get 14 to 40 fps like wtf why is this game so bad like what do i need my pc cost 1,700$ like really and yall see why ppl go to consols fix this my god you have a very nice game and ppl still play it even if they only get 14 fps with the top of the line hardware this is ridiculous.
Joseph;-;Probably the best MilSim game i have ever played, 10/10
Prince;-;This game is a definite improvement over it's predecessor, despite the optimization issues for those running lower level Intel rigs or mid-high level AMD rigs. Even on low this game looks impressive and if you have an Intel CPU (or high level AMD CPU) & Decent GPU (Either brand) you should be able to run it on high where the visuals are sure to impress. The AI has improved over ARMA II, though not tremendously, You will still have issues commanding your squad to do exactly what you want them to but they're not quite as derpy. If you decide to get this game you're definitely going to have fun with it, I strongly reccommend to google custom optimisation settings and tinker with it until you have the most stable frames you can achieve. Finally, the modding community for this game is excellent, there are plenty of great mods on the workshop and community sites like ARMAHOLIC.
pcgaming101;-;get this!
Turtle;-;This game is very enjoyable, my personal favorite game mode is Wasteland because it takes the least ammount of time to get into the action. The game has amazing graphics and the game play is extremely enjoyable. I personally haven't came across a bug yet since I've played. There is many game modes and such and I feel like this is basically another Garry's Mod for the simple fact that you can play it for countless hours and never get bored.
Danger Dolan;-;Fu.ck you Densanblue (Jacob from Teesdale)
T.W;-;Great game : Nice graphic Open world Fun playing with friends :D P.S i wish there are armory mode like arma 2 Also hope there will be more map coming soon :D
[92nd] The Weird Gamer;-;Would be good if they fixed the performance issues and shiity servers and the compatibillty with different drivers ect. Come on Arma ing get your act together! :D Re edit: Arma 3 is a decent game with alot to do and is very fun, it may have quite alot of dsync but still. It is very fun to play with friends especially on my favourite Altis life where you can process and sell coacaine and even take marjeuna. this game is good but you better have a good pc, and hopefully a 15 or better otherwise your screwed and though AMD and Radeon is good, it's sadly not good for arma. but stilll this is an amazing game :D
Ronald Reagan;-;Only gold medal gaming athletes play this game
Zacheriah Trollston;-;This is THE most realistic you will ever get in a military simulator. I have over 50 hours on it and have never been so amazed by the content it has to offer. Not only do you have all this great stuff as in, Sniping, CQB, Tanks and vechical combat, but there is an editor for testing and making missions scenarios. There has also been a new Bootcamp update added in that lets mods and more expirenced builders (of missions) expand their ability to create missions.
TacoCat rip skins;-;ArmA 3 is a superb game that should be in your library no matter what. You can do much with this game. The community is 10/10. Let's not forget the immense amount of mods. ArmA 3 is a game I'll play for years just like I did with ArmA 2.
Nick;-;Great milsim type game!
Dr.Yammy;-;Just... Amazing. I see a lot of fun ahead. Still a noob and it is just great. AMAZING community. Found a great guy on a server and he spent over an hour just showing me how to play. Why are you even reading this, just buy it.
Mexican Ninja;-;This game is one of the best I have ever played! It's worth every penny! It's also good for new players because of the new bootcamp feature!
Harry Hood;-;Is this DayZ?
Nico;-;Left my friends behind in a bank robbery in a ATV 10/10
Good Looking Shirtless Black Man;-;It's Arma 10/10
Lorddwarvin[EN];-;Worth every penny, This is a combat millitary game with gorgues massive battlefields. Every inch of this game amazing from the Sea combat to Air Combat. I, Lorddwarvin Recommend this game ! Buy this game now!
Ev1lsp00n;-;Arma is a great series of games and the scope of each title is always more impressive than it's predecessor. Yes, like those it follows ARMA 3 has it's bugs, but these are in no way irritating. At most, they are hilarious.... because you become immersed with experience of being a lethal weapon, methodically removing enemy AI from their short lived lives, when all of a sudden the yells and laughs of comrades "hoovering" in a tank or being insta-killed by randomly exploding vehicles that touched a small pebble, breaks the cycle! It's a game you have to try out. You can get into the game quite easily and add to your knowledge as you go. But don't be a lone wolf and complain it was boring. Arma is about team work... and not your Call of Duty or Battlefield TDM capture the flag balls...but actual teamwork where communication and learning your place in a squad keeps you all alive! The A.I. on this game is "effective" - they will suppress, they will surpise and they definetly do more than just flank you from obvious places. It's very dynamic and lonewolfs die quickly... a good squad will have a much higher survival rate! So get yourself in a game, be a local on the server and join in with "regulars" to have the best experience. There is a lot to learn, but ARMA 3's new tutorial system is far superior to older versions of the game and many of the players online are very helpful. Heaps of content & the workshop has lots more additions. Goto Armaholic for the best and widest range of addons. My only gripe is that they can still be somewhat difficult to install. So it maybe best to use a loader. I'm a big fan of the Arma series and this one has raised the bar again! Get your 's off COD & BF and play a real game!!! 11/10
Oke;-;I think this Is a great game. You will probably learn alot of It, depending on how you play It. You can play either ways, the typical action game way or the simulator way. But back to the point, there Is so much to do in this game, there's a BIG map and great graphics. A well made game, worth buying If you're Into these games.
Saint Aaron;-;You like realistic military games? Than this game is for you! Arma series has impressed me yet again. STeam workshop for this game pretty much adds a brand new game to arma 3. I use to play the deathmatch for arma or the coop for arma but now i find myself playing stratis life which is a life simulator. game gets updated a lot and adds new stuff every month. game is worth every penny Pros open world military game everything is driveable small caves firefights are intense Cons Dlc are overpriced buggy
Wolfram The Ranger;-;this game might be the best game ever! it both got the tactical wasteland-take peoples base build base etc + an RPG mode that are really well done! if u want a game that u actully learn from buy this!
Basheon;-;All around a good game, I would highly reccomend it to anyone who likes FPS games.
Ser "Bacon" Bearington;-;I tried to go down a slide. Biggest mistake I ever made. Thankfully there was a kind doctor nearby who saved my life from the evil creature that was the slide. Notify the government, slides are lethal. And to think we let children play on them. Science has gone too far I say! 10/10 for kind doctors who understand the dangers of slides.
VeXii;-;This game is a military simulator. Its very fun to play and instead of running into rooms guns blazing like most shooters there is a lot more stratergy in this. It has quite a few mods that you can download from playwithsix and the workshop now. Im in a group called special team delta and we do operations every weekend and they are pretty fun. Even without my group I can have fun on public servers playing Wasteland or KOTH. The story is very good and is a good length. There are optimisation problems with the game. I cant really get over 50 fps on high with my $900 computer but even on 15fps it is still playable.
420xHunky;-;10/10 loving altis life,wasteland,battle royale this is a great game defos would buy an arma 4
Trevorjohn8;-;Soup
Trusybee125;-;I used to play a little bit of Arma 2 back in the day, but Arma 3 sure takes the series to the next level. The game runs better and smoother in general. The graphical detail is sure as hell better, it's basically a repackaged Arma 2 without cheap and incorrect copy and paste like EA's BF4. Most of the games content is user created; by you and others within the Arma community so you'll never get bored. It's Arma so it's buggy, but that's fine. If you played or like Arma 2 or Operation Flashpoint, there is no reason that you shouldn't buy this game. Excellent Game, best $35 spent on Steam. 9/10. I'd give 10/10 if there was more official content. Start by playing the base game and it's campaign and server downloadable mods, then download yourself some proper mods like Battle Royale or Breaking Point.
BlknTan99;-;This game where do we start..... Well for starts is a good game with alot of game modes by default. King of the hill is probably one of the good ones for solo players or domination if you like teamplay. So this game is by no means bad vanilla but there is a problem, it suffers from the same thing that titanfall does. It lacks content of course there are a plethura of things to do but what the game does on its on really isent enough. That being said this game truely shines with its modabilatiy and is best played with mods as they improve the gameplay alot. So overall its a good game and I would buy again if it were lost somehow.
cri74;-;Keeping it real - Bohemia is one of very few developers making games for the PC platform. Besides beeing a very beautiful game, the frenchise is pushing the envelope and bringing you a community game - modable and keeping you, the player, the most important part of the game. On todays games-market, the ArmA experience is like no other. This game is one of the reasons why we still buy Personal Computers - cus' we like to play Personal Games :) Buy it!!
Peter;-;This is one of those games you get because of the mods. The core game is nice, but the mods is what really makes it. Battle Royale, Arma 3 DayZ, Altis Life RPG, and many more things to do with this masterpiece military simulator. It's a big step up from Arma 2, however Arma 2 (inc. Operation Arrowhead) have a few more things this doesn't have (like Island Life). Great game overall.
Punky;-;This a very fun and never boring game!
Spinxo;-;Arma 3 is an amzing game. If you owned Arma 2 and experienced terrible FPS, then this is the game for you. They amazingly increased the FPS in the game, and it has amazing graphics.
D e l t;-;Realistic Battlefield Simulation!
TandelK;-;Best preferred game in Military Simulation game. This game is just not about Military Simulation but also have other roles such as RPG and Survival Challenges. Well i would like to say this game is mainly preffered for CO-OP and working with real tactics of the army. Arma 2 brought me to buy this game at the pre orders itself getting it more and more playing the whole time and making new stuffs. Not only that it allows you to create own missions which is more good thing then any other games which have pre defined misisons are available. This game also allows modding making the game whole next level. Third person shooters are very less available but this is surely best example for third person. If you have VR glasses i would prefer to use it in First Person as this game is so much realistic . Hoping to get new updates about and the game and Heads up if you want to buy the game.
[880MBN] Hansen;-;How to fully enjoy ARMA III In my oppinion: 1. Get a launcher to run it with (ArmaIIISync is great). That way you can tweak the performance so it runs properly, and it makes it easier to run mods. 2. Find a good clan to play with. I can heartily recommend the VDV-GRU if you like serious Mil-Sim experiences in a friendly enviroment, no matter your starting skill level. Be advised: we use a lot of mods, and we play as Russians, so be prepared for a lot of AK's and shooting at NATO-friendly forces. 3. Get some good mods to shape your arma Experience the way you like. Have fun! Sincerely, Efreitor Hansen , Bravo LMG, 1. Squad, C-Company, 45th Light Recon Detacthment of the VDV (Russian airborne) (Arma titles, not real life)
Unsolvable_Puzzle;-;This game is so much fun  COD
F0x_7;-;AMAZING GAME, I LOVE IT!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Ludvik;-;So many mission files...... The possiblities are truely endless. When this bad boy gets some serious modders involved there will be even more to experience. This game is good, very good.
K. Green;-;Do you want Realism? Well let me tell you in simple details how fuc**** awesome this game is!!! Sure, a few glitches and errors but when you get it, You'll say its all worth the investment. This simulator beats all of the other Armed Assualt series.... by Graphics... meaning; texture,terrain, and others. The sound is.... GREAT, just needs a little tweak. Customization for soldiers... wicked!!! I would recommend this game by my fullest ability. No game can beat the realism of this game. "It's just simply Astonishing & Jaw-Dropping"
[63e] SIR ONI;-;when i played this game for free and it was only for two days .My bro and me could not stop play arma 3 wasteland is all we played I highly recommend this game if you are in to big maps first preson shooter best game i ever played in years
Dynamike;-;good game but not worth 60 bucks
Wulfsok;-;Arma 3 is a game you will either love or hate. VES2 is the actual Simulator this game is based off of, and yes, "Simulator". No rambos in this game. No running into a little hut with a .50 in one hand and an RPG in another blasting guys who all take 5 years to aim their gun at you. Rather you've been walking for a half hour with no enemy contacts, then in seconds you have BMPs on your  like its WW3. Save: Do I? Run north through the town and try to hug the walls. Nope, BMP painted you from the hill to the NE. Double back around the coastline. Nope, a chopper just landed some spetznaz looking dudes on the coast who take you down without reservation. Turn east and run straight for the trees. Nope, that BMP to the NE is still holding you down. No no no no. Since you're flanked to the front and rear its advised to draw fire from both, crossing their firelines and reducing their shock value, even slowing down the SF behind you as a BMP is firing in their direction. Now that the BMP to the NE has shifted into the town to avoid friendly fire, you have only one chance to book it east into the trees. Which isn't easy with SF on your . Everyone knows how "clunky" arma can be. When comparing it to medal of honor or call of duty, then yeah it's a pretty clunky game. It's like the actor actually has to catch his footing before running rather than kind've "gliding" atop the surface. Oh and "gahd this game sucks i cant even get into a doorway", because your freakin sniper rifle is clipping the doorframe. Because afterall in real life soldiers just clip their rifles through walls to get around tight hallways. tl;dr, if you have always wanted a game that made you feel like a real soldier in a massive battle, this is the one for you. If you want Akimbo Uzis and love to spam insults at the other players, stick to Call of Duty.
Twizted;-;I could tell you all about this game after near 800hrs (790hr at the time of writing).. but I won't because I don't want any Call of Duty or Battlefield Fanboys coming in and ing up my game :) - I mean, really i should tell you to buy it because the only thing Arma shares with CoD and BF is that you shoot people..OK well CoD I haven't liked since Modern Warfare 2 and BF I grew out of as it was a good series that basically just got  all over by big companies seeking quick profits. Anyway Arma on the otherhand has been around just as long as these two but perhaps didn't spend so much on its marketing campaign and put more of its budget into making their games? I can't say for sure, but if you're into realism (not photorealism, like you call of duty cs) and Military Simulation types whether it be Tank Sims, Combat Flight Sims or just good old fashioned FPS types of games, you're probably going to enjoy some part of ArmA.. Thats one group of people that could enjoy this, then theres the creative types.. Have you ever wanted to drop a Fishing Trawler from 20,000ft onto an Airport runway filled with fuel trucks, planes, helicopters, tanks, cars whatever you fancy, just for fun.. to test your PC's capacity or performance? you can do this. Have you ever thought of a scenario and wanted to see how it might play out with two or more opposing factions in some kind of freaky multi-national royal rumble in the middle of nowhere with armour, air and infantry forces going at each other ? I know I never did until I played with the Mission editor in Arma 2, I played around making small missions in the previous games but not really until arma 3 did i experiment with weird  like that.. it's quite fun for wasting time, and it looks great.. Anyway, you guys could keep reading or you could be downloading it as you read.. its worth whatever the price is at the moment.. I don't really care how much it is, it's worth it. I've been playing this series since 2001 in the very beginning back when it was a Codemasters game Operation Flashpoint.. ing awesome game. If you're currently in the military, plan to enlist in the future or have previously served and want realism - buy Arma.. join a tactical realism clan or milsim group depending on your preference.. they're both the same to me.. immersive groups are best. **Warning** not so much a warning, but if you have PTSD and are triggered easily, perhaps this isn't your thing having PTSD myself I can safely say, this game will scare the absolute  out of you occasionally, depending on how you play and what triggers you or maybe just ease into it I can't tell you not to get it, it's an awesome game.. just try to remember that it's just a game. Easier said than done in some cases like mine.. I couldn't play properly for a week but that's another story that I don't think you need to know about ha.. Best game ever - possibly not best storyline, I liked Arma 2's campaign better but everything else in Arma 3 is ING AWESOME! - Don't take my word for it though, try it out - oh did I mention upto 64 player online multiplayer coop, pvp etc and thousands of servers internationally (I'm Australian and even we have low ping servers to  around on).. ahh I think that's it.. I chose not to technically review the game because it doesn't need a review, there are plenty out there just don't go with any saying anything negative about it, there's very few things that I don't like about it.. and the list gets smaller each day with the devs constantly releasing new fixes or DLC buy this game, I bought it in it's Alpha stage and the list of bugs was relatively small back then so you can imagine what it's like now after having been out officially over a year now ;-)
Nr1IIFrenzyII;-;bought this game 1 year ago afther i build my own game pc one of the best games i have ever purchased there are so many diffrent mods you can have fun in like the all new overpoch from arma 2 now in arma 3 :D wasteland,battleroyale and all the hours of playing altis life and being a good civi or a cold blooded criminal the wrokshop is a good place to find some awesome singleplayer mission or co-op missions to do with your friends still love this game afther 1 year 10/10
[KlykoN];-;Very buggy, But beautiful, Tactical, Realistic, Adrenaline intense action, Many weapons, Cars, Helicopters, Boats, Airplanes. One of the best Simulators with big landscapes (Open world) with many places to hide and plan advanced ambushes. Enjoy!
Toms;-;Really nice game but a bit expensive :P
DeathTech;-;Todays review: Arma3 Short Scorebased review: (Longer review below.) Overall [73/90] Singleplayer [7/10] - The game is hard you would do well to save as often as possible. Multiplayer [8/10] - Its great for multiplayer, sadly the in-game browser still lacks refresh button and fails to ever find the server you want to find. On a properly forwarded server still stakes 30m - 1hour of tinkering for your friends to find it. Vehicles [ 7/10] - Vehicles are cool, plentiful, feel well balanced and responsive Weapons [9/10] - Lots of weapons, with now as added bonus you can customize them. Multiplayer Missions [3/10] - Couple of premade missions, most of them proof of concepts no real fun to be had untill you download some from workshop or armaholic. I recommend playing my zeus based map which is like playing with a dungeon master who can spawn everything and anything. If not that use their awesome easy to use editor and make one yourself! Editor [6/10] - It works, but doing advanced stuff requires lots of google usage lots of wiki diving and being best friends with the bohemia interactive website. Also doesn't generate a full mission as it does not include some sort of default description.ext in the mission file. DLC[33/40] 1. Zeus [10/10] - Play as a dungeon master, make a scenario on the go. & Its free. 2. Karting [8/10] - Make races, drive in karts and wear the arma 3 karting outfit, adds racing elements for race lovers. 3. Marksman [9/10] - Adds weapons, loadouts, weaponmods, some items, facepaint, garrage ... Its good, trust me. 4. Helicopter [6/10] - Adds two helicopters, and helicopter pods. Adds sling loading (aka pick stuff up and drop it elsewhere) Long review below: If you have played Arma 2 and loved it you will love arma 3. Its the same game with better graphics, a lot of additions and great changes. Anyone can just say that though so lets get into some specific as to why arma 3 is a great game. For fans of the series and for new players. Lets start with some points for new players. Arma 3 is a realistic military combat simulator. Or that is at least what i'm going to call it. Every iteration seems to contain 2 big landmasses. One is generally a lot bigger. In this case the big landmass you'll probably find yourself always playing on is "Altis". Its big, varied from mountainous to large flats and has a small dessert. The game comes with many vehicles for both ground, air and water transportation as well as combat. We have well known vehicles and newer "imaginary" versions based on existing vehicles. There are also UAV's that CAN be controlled by a single or multiple players. As for the gameplay. You play as the traditional teams Bluefor, Opfor, Independant or Civilian. Movement system is great, feels very fluid and responsive. Vehicles can be damaged as a whole or you can shoot out their tires/engine/... Realistic physics allow for some HOLY **** moments. No Seriously if you have no idea how physics apply to fast moving vehicles this game will teach you by making your car roll over at high speed bends, or lets not forget the time I drove a truck on top of a plane hangar because I hit a quadbike, then bounced up onto a sand barrier, which launched me in the correct angle and with my speed I made it up there. Then I asked an admin for salvation because falling off was certain death! Player damage can range from "just a fleshwound" to holy **** my ****** leg is gone... MEDIC!!!!! If you get shot in a leg you won't be able to run etc... +10 for pain "uhhhh" "ahhhh" "uuuuuuuuhhhh...." Arma 3 is mainly a big sandbox. Missions can let you roam all of it or just a small AO. Still you know at all times that everything you see is somewhere you can go. Almost all buildings can be entered and interestingly with enough explosives, almost all of them can be destroyed into nothing but ruble too. For veteran players: Its arma 2 with better graphics. And some improvements. The old maps can still be played and included with mods. WARNING BUTTON BINDINGS MAKE SENSE NOW G = GRENADE i = INVENTORY Car mirrors now actually work. Lots of overhauls to the core game systems. Helicopters from the DLC pack now can lift, cars, vehicles, boxes,... In-game server browser is still . Arma 3 has a launcher which allows you to play without battleeye if you don't want your computer data compromised. NO SERIOUSLY BEFORE ACCEPTING READ THE TOS FOR USING BATTLEEYE I THINK MOST PEOPLE WOULD DISAGREE IF THEY ACTUALY READ IT, YOU CAN STILL PLAY WITHOUT AGREEING TO IT Arma 3 zeus maps, aka make your own fun on the go, its a sandbox dungeon master, ITS FUN, try it. Arma 3 has arma 3 dayz epoch, its great, try it if you love zombie survival. Racing is now possible. Karting and other vehicles too. AI are improved, no longer  and are deadly at close and long range. Expect to be fighting them like trained professionals because they will wreck you. For the rest its basicly the same as Arma 2. I guess. Simply, if you liked Arma 2 then buy this one... You'll love it... Its worth it. Thank you for your time.
Adzm00;-;Arma 3 takes me back to the days of deltaforce (long time ago), it being a thoroughly enjoyable tactical military shooter, albeit with its own special glitches and graphics fails. The interface may seem somewhat clunky at first but you soon overcome that, and although the game has many controls they quickly become familiar and are relatively intuitive. The scales and graphics on Arma are pretty impressive, although as in many games, the graphics are less impressive up close, less the textures and more the number and complexity of objects, however, with a game of this size if each house was packed with objects, you can bet the frames are going to take a massive hit, what bohemia have done is find a reasonable balance with this. Generally the environment looks great, there are some questionable physics interactions which can make for some strange happenings, although that is part of the charm with Arma. If you want a military sim, that generally plays pretty well with a decent amount of guns and vehicles to mess about in then this is well worth it. Whilst not quite as slick as some games built on newer game engines, Arma does hold up pretty well.
xSe7eN;-;LOVE IT
Aleksandr;-;Rappelled from a chinook with my mates. Last guy caused the chopper to explode. 10/10
[DeagleSquad] RageFu;-;Bohemia interactive never stop surprising me. When you think they reached the best anyone can do, you notice the Beta or Alpha in the name, that tells you that isn't even the best they can do. From Arma II and pretty much all the expansion packs, to Arma III. If you enjoy a realistic war simulator, or wasting times in the huge amount of mods you can find for the game (Looks like "Skyrim"), this is your game!
Gordon Swagman;-;Not many games will amaze me, but this one did. I did not belive that Arma 3 would stand a chance to Arma 2/OA but it gives it a good run for its money. Only downside to Arma 3 is the lack of weapons and vehicles but mods seem to patch that right up, good job Bohimia Interactive
FlyingDuck*Traveling*;-;I love the epic in-game stuff, you can't go all Call of Duty on it or Battlefield, this is the real .
Hagsterr;-;Very fun if you like RPG and Hunger games. ( Atlis Life RPG, Battle Royale hungergames)
TheHardcorian;-;Super fun game worth every penny!
Viper :3;-;Good sim....awesome mods and ''gamemodes'' maybe some glitches here and there but still good game.
Zack;-;I like this game alot, the details, how the vehicles get damaged, how you can customize your weapons and choose many diffrent armors you can have on youself.
TheTysonator;-;Amazing Game, intense graphics and outstanding action packed stratigic gameplay
xXQuIcKsCoPeZ_MtnDewFaZeMlg420Xx;-;Great game, tons of possibilities and modability, although lacking serious realism factors at its current state such as weapon sway (said to be fixed ) which in real-life being a gun owner, say i ran a quarter mile as fast as possible, I stop and aim my gun, you hold your breath as much as possible since its necessary but in this holding your breath is nothing and it is the exact opposite of what real life is like... your gun will be bouncing literally side to side on your screen after a long walk when you actually need it, youll be hitting 5-10 feet left and right of a target 30 yards in front of you... ing rediculous.. And the fact that the DLCs even exist is , imagine getting into a wasteland server, seeing a heli and you want to fly off in it, then you scroll wheel up to it, get in, yeah all gud in tha hood rite? wrong, without paying $15.99 for TWO HELICOPTERS you will be kicked out and not able to fly it. Is it just me or is $16 rediculous to fly 2 new helicopters? Yes, i own it because i bought the DLC bundle. Im not saying dont buy arma but think about the stupidity running through their heads about these ideas... Might I also mention that the helicopter physics in the AFM (Advanced flight model) is somewhat exagerated in some areas. Speaking of the AFM, its optional.. which is stupid because like 1/200 people are actually using it now, which makes the dlc a god awful waste of time..
Soup;-;mcdonalds is a good game, i would recommend it.
Kronos;-;Arma 3 is a game that you love, or hate. If you liked the previous Arma-Games, you wont have a lot of problems getting into Arma 3 quickly. Pros: +Improved HUD +Improved Movement and more control over your Character +Great Graphics +Good for Simulation, but also provides a lot of fun due to the variety of missions you can play, from racing to a Life Simulator, you will find something that fits your taste +Amazing Player Interaction and great to make new friends, overall fun to play with other. +A variety of Workshop content Cons: -The controls, while being better than in Arma 2, are still rather unresponsive -Very demanding when you want to play the game at high setting and a good framerate, especially when youre playing online -Altis and Stratis are very boring maps that dont bring a lot of tactical possibilies nor are they really fancy (fences and rocks will be your worst enemies) -Very few weapons and equipment to chose from This list might be uncompleted, I will add further points when I encounter them while playing. The Devs are still working hard on this game and are releasing some reasonably priced DLCs that add new gameplay elements such as new vehicles, new mechanics or new weapons, aswell as free updates to balance and fix any issues that might accure. After all, I highly recommend this game, wether you like military simulations or not, you will have a lot of fun with the variety of possibilities this game gives you.
Cletus;-;Arma 3 is way more than a game. Arma 3 has a vast variety of things to do in the game and it gives you an amazing feeling of what its like being in the military. You can fly a helicopter or planes, roll out with a tank or an ordinary car, you can use boats, etc. This game also has amazing graphics and it feels like your in the game. But the best part is the developers. They have made the game way better than when it came out, and they continue to do so. 10/10
Peon;-;"fukin gr8, i rised frum teh graev just to play tihs awesum gaem" - Kurt Cobain
FlightLieutenantYama;-;First off all there is no BIKES like there was in arma 2 but this Simulator is still fun
Bootched;-;How do you not own this yet, are you a friggin caveman?!
{=Corrosion=};-;Amazing graphics,gunplay,gameplay.....get it
NoDachi18;-;Love the ARMA franchise and will continue to support it, very good multiplayer games for all those who enjoy team work.
Aleks For President;-;If you enjoy realistic military simulators,this is for you.
Connorwarman;-;A great start into a new age of tactical gameplay.
King Craftsman;-;Um so to get this start.  Massive Desync  More Desync  Lets throw in some lag  Your friends offroad just decided to fly  FPS drop  Shotty Hitboxes  They ed up the sounds so now every gun sounds like a BB gun and you can't tell which direction the incoming fire is.  Third looking over a wall to find your target in a military realism simulator  Apparently the entire maps of Altis and Statis are quarries cause thats the only reason I can think of why there is a minefield of ing large rocks scattered every 50m.  Please don't make us pay 16$ for every new scatterbug dlc idea you guys come up with.  Why the  does 5 feet fall kill me and why havn't the developers fixed this issue that has plagued the past 2 games?  Why do I phase into rocks when I try to walk on them and why do I have to vault to get past a tree?  Your car is made out of carboard.  3=============>~~~~~~~~  One last thing... More desync 10/10 Welcome to FPS HELL
twangy;-;Has to be one of the best games i have ever played, it has me addicted to playing it, would definatley recommend this to friends and other players, would also recommend the Altis Life gamemode as it is good fun and what I personally send most of my time on.
=DD= Lt. Randy;-;This game sucks no trailer parks to assistant supervise..
Bun;-;After being released from Beta a year and a half later they've finally gotten rid of all the bugs and added in the vehicles that were supposed to be in here when it was released from Beta.
Kingsland;-;This game got right where ARMA 2 went wrong. With the engine you no longer have clunky controls! Though the gameplay feels a little arcadey, it still remains intense and delightful! From Wasteland to the Arma 2 Zoombies port, this game is a perfect open-world shooter!
WILL BE BACK SOONE PLS NO WORRI;-;did i mention its a must-buy?
Kenneh;-;Nothing gets real but this.
Shrapnel Effect;-;Brilliant army simulator, it offers so much more than just the base game. WIth custom missions workshop. and fully mod-able. its deffo a good buy. amazing for co op, multiplayer and single player. a massive improvement on arma 2.
Anal Comes Standard;-;When you play on Stratis, your main enemy is rocks, and when you play on Altis, your main enemy are fences. Also, if you hit anything hard enough with a hatchback sport it blows up.
At0micFall0ut;-;Amazingly fun game, takes a bit of getting used to but once you've got it its golden. I recommend this game to everyone.
-FL0W;-;Great serious Milsim game. Lots of improvement in graphics from ArmA 2. The infantry movement is smooth and adds a realistic feel. Without a doubt reccomend this game.
MoRgiie;-;I played Altis Life and told people I was going to bite their fingers off. Then got nicknamed Finger Fetish 10/10 game.
Drakedge;-;Arma 3 is a wonderful platform for military simulation. Where the game truly shines is with the extensive modding community. You will do yourself a disservice if you do not check out any of the multitudes of mods for this title. The game itself with out the mods is a great improvement over prvious titles like Arma 2 for example. Personally I used to be big on the Battlefield series but once I started playing Arma it was Arma or nothing for my modern day first person shooter. The depth and scope that you can get into here with the combined arms focus is truly amazing. Everything fromt he graphics, to physics to sound effects are really good. Oh and if You don't want to use the vanilla stuff, again there's mods, even full conversions that bring all the assests from previous games into this one. There's also a really fun multiplayer mode called Zues, which is essentially Dungeons and Dragons meets first person modern day shooter. One player acts like the "DM" and the others play in his / her world. Allowing you to create dynamic ever changing and unique situations on the fly. This one gets my whole hearted thumbs up. For information on how to mod your game, check out this youtube video: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=kK6rsWMIvyI
ANZA | EL3CTRO;-;GENERAL. Arma 3 is an amazing game that simulates real military action,objectives and tactics.Once you start the game for the first time you will see that there are tonns of controls and commands,but you'll get the hang off it eventually. We'll start off with the campaign.You play as corpral kerry in the NATO forces.Altis and Stratis the two main islands are being invaded by CSAT(bad guys).Even though there is nothing you can do about it,the NATO forces are trying to force them back,and near the end of the campaign you have two choices, try and find out where james(friend) is or play a part in the final stand against CSAT,depending on the choice you choose you could win or lose.The map editor is a good addition, it alows you to create your own missions or you could just tour upand down the islands like i do.The scenery on the islands look amazing and realistic and driving at night is even better. The realistic weather is by far the best weather you'll see in a long time,like if the start of a mission is suny the weather will probably change drasticaly.It is also very easy to get lost in the vast open world at night but the accurate star map should help you find your way. Also look out for animals like goats,deer and rabbits on land,in the sea there are fish,turtles and sharks to make you nervous when diving. There is a dedicated community on steam workshop,they create player made missions, weapons,vehicles and mods. There are also updates rolling in frequently to improve the game. AIRCRAFT. The aircraft in the game look well designed from helicopters to jet fighters but you do have to be a certified aircraft pilot if you want to play multiplayer or a lot of people will laugh at you because you crashed the 3 million dollar aircraft. LAND VEHICLES. The land vehicles also look well designed.The selection of tanks in the game are plentiful.The civilian cars are good for exploring the huge islands and The infintry transport look and drive just like they should. WATER TRANSPORT. There aren't as much boats as there are land vehicles but there doesn't need to be.There are 2 civilian boats and 2 military boats. There are also submarines as well. Pros 1 Great simulation. 2 Big open world to explore. 3 Amazing scenery. 4 Well designed vehicles. cons 1 Hard to learn aircraft piloting. Over all score 8/10
Ayy lmao;-;This game made me an operator,its so tactial 30 minds ride to fire one bullet and die,also made me pop boners on tacticool gear,all in all I give if 9 out of 10 dynamic stories,if only the FPS was operational level i would operate with other operators,
Dr. Lego;-;best military sim
Deputy Jew;-;Forget CoD, forget BF or any other pseudo military FPS. This is game is the real deal. I can not express how much fun and how into this game I can get. Every aspect of it is amazing; on ground, flying a jet or operating a tank. This is as close as you can get to the real thing. Graphically (and audio) beautiful and divine, realistic in every aspect. What more could you want? You can't, because this game is it. The thing I love about Arma (and always have) is that, it's the game you make it and want it to be. You want a non-broken DayZ? Breakingpoint. You want sector control? King of the hill. You want a death match? Wasteland. Team co-op? Invade and Annex. I could go on. If you enjoy games where you actually have to work, think, become involved and immersed then Arma3 should already be on your steam list.
Mr_Tactical;-;Fantastic but real, hardcore but awesome!
Black Metal Dash;-;Seriously, it's not your average Battlefield or Call of Duty shooter... FAR FROM! this is real war simulation what all possible factors included! If you want to wage war like a real soldier in life-like situations, this is a game for you. This game however has many different controls and doesn't exactly have a user-friendly control because you need to press multiple buttons mostly to even execute one action, apart from basic movement and such, but if you've ever played any other Bohemia Interactive game, you should already know that. other than these hard-to-master controls, this game is truely amazing, breathtaking, and even let's you use an editor for putting together your own missions. I personally like it for combat flight simulation.
Fahr3nh3iT;-;A sensational accomplishment, deep and action packed game play, backed by a vastly creative community means that many modifications are available for this hugely popular title. A must have for any serious gamer's library. Game of 2013 by a country mile.
Dark Matter;-;Honestly hands down the best realistic FPS ever. The authenticity just by itself is worth the price. But the multiplayer is phenomenal and very tactical and fun. Highly recommend this game, but there is one thing. THIS GAME NEEDS TO BE OPTIMIZED! I have GTX titan and I still get from anywhere 20~65 fps which is unacceptable, like really 20 f**king fps? But other than that super fun.
Feuerex;-;Want a game where you can do practically anything? A military simulator that can also turn into a horror experience, GTA-style free-world multiplayer maps, or Zombie post-apocalyptic wasteland. Recommended for single-player and multi-player fun, casual and hardcore style of play.
Amarah;-;Fantastic Military Sandbox. Tons of maps and missions to download created by the community. Highly recommended for playing with (and possibly against) friends!
bd.strelkov;-;If you are considering buying this game, read this first. Let me say this: I really enjoy this game. Its massive open world environment makes it an awesome combat simulator. It comes with fun stock game modes, and has a good fan base. But if you really want to have fun, I highly reccommend playing some mods, such as breaking point, battle royale, and Altis Life, to name a few. PROS: -Large open world terrain -Challenging gameplay -There is a thrill everytime you play. It never gets old. -Good mod support -Lots of vehicles air, land and water -Realistic engine -Almost endless possibilities CONS: -Poorly optimized. Even on my $1500.00 custom build, I still averge only about 40 FPS, dipping to 15 FPS sometimes. this is a minor problem, seeing as my average of 40 FPS is more than playable, however it is still an anoyance. -The game has its fair share of glitches. For example, sometimes I'll be driving behind one of my teammates when his truck snaps back and destroys mine, killing me in the process. Nothing happens on my teammate's screen. Many of the glitches are purley aesthetic, for example, when you die, sometimes your neck stretches out to 5x its size. A bit like BF3. -While the sounds in the game are decent, they are not exactly fantastic. To fix this, get JSRS sound mod. Are you thinking of getting this game just for Altis life? Many people do. Thats fine, infact many of the biggest servers are altis life servers. I play on GSN's Altis Life server. It has an excellent community and friendly admins. Overall, the game is very fun, and a massive improvement over ArmA 2. I would give it 8/10... Thanks for reading. ________________________________________________________________________________ UPDATE So, after spending over 200 hours on this game, I will say this. Playing this will change you. If you are a COD player, Battlfield player, etc, you will find yourself 'not challenged' by the gameplay anymore. I've gone back to COD once or twice, and it no longer provides me with the realistic thrill that it once did. If you are in the market for realism, and a game that requires real strategy, get ARMA. Just remember, your play style must adapt. You cannot rush. You cannot spray. (Well, you can, but you will likely die and get yelled at).
[Real 7] Aus;-;The arma series is fantastic in its flexibility and mod support, arma 3 is no exception. the shiny new engine is great, still a bit clunky with a few underlying bugs but definitely a step up from arma 2.
Ma77h3hac83r;-;The level of this game is pure awesome!
(U.W.C.) E-9 Little C;-;Pros: -2 of the best game maps I have ever seen. -Mission Creation tool with a library full of free missions to play (created by community) -Amazing mods and DLC available on the armaholic site -Very Realistic Combat (2 shots and your done, this aint no call of duty crap) -Detailed Options and Settings Cons: -Rough learning curve in multiplayer (practice makes perfect though) -Good Computer required to get 60 FPS and still have pretty looking graphics
BitSane;-;It's like skyrim, with horrible controls!
Haiku;-;Funny as  to play RPG servers. 10/10
Whiskey |Trading Knife|;-;I played it a little. It was okay.
itsdouqiexd;-;Best game you can ever have!
Cuddles;-;I have almost 120 hours in this game and i still dont know half what it got to offer. it is simply the best game of 2013. if you is wondering wether or not to buy the game so buy it. the editor is the best way to experinece all the vehicles. play it as the game is ment to be played and you will enjoy it. if you are an battlefield or COD player dont buy this it is slow phased and you dont get you healt back after 5 seconds so buy it if you like slow phased and realistic games. this is the best way i can describe it. I have to go and play the game
!bloOd!Chris02845;-;Well... To start off I'm not a very big third person fan but with this game i think it beats all first person shooters. I have now logged over 400 hours with in the first months of owning this game. This is by far the most adictive/relistic warfare game i have yet found on the internet or (Steam) this game re-defines warfare to omg need more, I highly recomend this game to all who like warfare. P.S. In order to have loads of fun get a group of friends or forum a group to play with
#SwaggerWagon;-;After plying 75 hours of it, I can happily say that this is my favourite game, it out does Warthunder and WorldofTanks by far. An arma game isn't complete without mods and I love the mods that people have come out with, though I'd love to see hunters with gpk turrets cause it annoys me with only having 4 seats in a hunter. 10/10 best arma game and I can't wait to see if they release some awesome DLC
Joka;-;Great game which offer you the possibility of doing what ever you want to do. Plus the amount of mods in this game is amazing. But you'll need friends because solo isn't funny.
Milan;-;Best 900 hours of my life. Thank you bohemia! Everyone get this game!!!
Black Out;-;This is what PCmasterrace is all about endless mods and maps the MP content you can create on your own is endless, 10/10 would ARMA all day
Seycara Music and Arts;-;Arma 3 breaking point mod > DayZ SA. Need I say more?
Genghis Bong;-;This game is great, coming off from playing a lot of arma 2 this was a great change in this franchise. You can make this game whatever you would like it to be. Always wanted to be a hard-core cop killing drug dealer? You got it! It is a great well made game. r8 8/8 m8 gr8 f8s & b8s
Black Metal Dash;-;Seriously, it's not your average Battlefield or Call of Duty shooter... FAR FROM! this is real war simulation what all possible factors included! If you want to wage war like a real soldier in life-like situations, this is a game for you. This game however has many different controls and doesn't exactly have a user-friendly control because you need to press multiple buttons mostly to even execute one action, apart from basic movement and such, but if you've ever played any other Bohemia Interactive game, you should already know that. other than these hard-to-master controls, this game is truely amazing, breathtaking, and even let's you use an editor for putting together your own missions. I personally like it for combat flight simulation.
Fahr3nh3iT;-;A sensational accomplishment, deep and action packed game play, backed by a vastly creative community means that many modifications are available for this hugely popular title. A must have for any serious gamer's library. Game of 2013 by a country mile.
Feuerex;-;Want a game where you can do practically anything? A military simulator that can also turn into a horror experience, GTA-style free-world multiplayer maps, or Zombie post-apocalyptic wasteland. Recommended for single-player and multi-player fun, casual and hardcore style of play.
Amarah;-;Fantastic Military Sandbox. Tons of maps and missions to download created by the community. Highly recommended for playing with (and possibly against) friends!
SonnyKthx;-;mean as
WILL BE BACK SOONE PLS NO WORRI;-;did i mention its a must-buy?
NiBy;-;day 1: spawned in made some money walked off some stairs died day 2: got some cannabis seeds ran and jumped a rail landed on rocks..... died medic came revived me died again medic revived me died again medic left me day 3: knicked a guy out and legged it day 4: stole some dudes kart and crashed it day 5: got taken to the hospital after being revived to have free jelly nek minute guy rocks up and takes us hostage i escape get a gun and come back. Police tell me to go away but i sneak in. i see a cop and panick i kill the cop every body runs what seemed like a heroic rescue mission went to . got arrested day 6: im an nvidia enthusiast 1/10-IGN 74/49- GAMESPOT oh yea and i almost ing vomited because of the hectic framedrop and unoptimization
Guardsman179;-;best milirtary game ever
Toxic Melon;-;Awesome game to play with some friends, lots of fun but requires a good PC.
Kar98k GUCK FAYBEN;-;I was in a heli , on my way to the sky i saw a squad of 4 people was flying almost over them shout in direct communication ALLAHU ACKBAR and crash the heli into them. heli/4 would allahu ackbar again.
Malthox;-;Besser als der Vorgnger, schon in der Alpha gefllt mir die allgemeine Spielmechanik. Die Grafik ist schn anzusehen und die bugs sind bei der Alpha nunmal nicht anders zu erwarten. Trotzdem besser als Battlefield 3 und der andere Shooter Mll. I can already say that I like the Alpha from Arma 3 more then Arma 2 with better game mechanics and beautiful Graphics. The bugs aren't unusal for an Alpha version. But I still prefer Arma 3, rather than the rest of the "shooter-crap" like Battlefield 3.
[BBF]Mikewolf22;-;An interesting FPS that is highly realistic, but still maintains a very fun feel. NOTE: It is a fairly intesive game hardware wise, so i belive it will require a decent computer.
Dirk Decker;-;Great game. Only with there was more guns and vehicles.
ObzTicle;-;I really enjoy this game. This game is different to other wargames. You can make your own missions, the graphics are epic and the maps are 200KM big! You can play alone or with friends. Either way you will enjoy this game. I suggest this game to anyone who is wanting good gameplay and epic battles.
1SG M.Harrison[173rd];-;Arma3 is where its at!
Budable;-;Paradropped in my underwear, landed on top of an enemy tank and died in my underwear. 11/10 would do it again!
llwolf;-;I wish I had a better internet to play this awesome game on servers that are on the other side of the ocean.
Adam^;-;Amazing Game Love playing it on Altis Life!! Wanna play on a good server? Altis Life of Steve is super good!
ayylmao;-;better than cod lol
BossMann;-;I might be biased, but this is worth the money 100%. The DLC, the community made mods and scenarios, the game itself, its all at the top of the pile when it comes to being a game spanning the entire military simulator genre. I have 250 hours in the game and I KNOW that its only the tip of the iceberg. The quality of some of the mods released for this game (all free, by the way) are worth the price of the game alone. Then comes the DLC from Bohemia, Free to access to all players, only difference by paying is almost entirely cosmetic bonuses. This is a great game, single player or multiplayer, its all good. If you like being immersed into an incredibly large and diverse world where split-second decisions matter, you will LOVE this title. Be warned though, if you are used to fast pace action shooters, this is not one of them.
MrWong;-;Toe
Nwa;-;get the game on sale.
[MBG]Dec;-;Wow best game in steam from rp to zombies this is the game that makes me happy :)
[TRF]Col.Taylor;-;IT IS GOOD
Sportsfreak;-;Decent game wait for sales to buy... :3
Koanga;-;Much better than its predecessor, Arma 2, it features the most accurate depiction of real life warfare. It's significantly more fluid and dynamic, much more optimized, and features refined movement and shooting mechanics. All in all, it's a must a buy for people who enjoy a blend between simulation and gaming.
Edqar;-;Best military shooter ever. 700h have passed, still counting and end is not in sight. You can play singleplayer, multiplayer or COOP with "unlimited" game modes and scenarios. Bohemia is maintaining and updating game frequently, so it is continuous project which is getting better and better.
ReturnToForever;-;time to put on your big boy pants
[UNA-A2]Pino[Pvt];-;I have been playing for a bit. There is guns and stuff there go PEW PEW PEW. I feel so american. Its like playing Battlefield but with adults. You can swim. You can walk. ALOT. You can be a bird. You even have missiles and stuff. 10/10 could fap to this.
Stefan F.;-;I recommend this game because it is a great simulator and has some great mods like arma life and epoch. This game is as close to real life as you will get
THE BOSS;-;it's realy a cool game while playing with friends
Johnny Coxie;-;I've had this game since early alpha, and all I can say is that it is a very good game. the amount of details and ways to play makes it very injoyable. You dont need the DLC's to have fun in the game or experience anything more. just the base game is fun as it is. The amount of gamemodes and mods w/ addons just shows how much fun you are able to have in this game. the graphics are astonishing and the controls are amazing as well. finally what I have to say is that, if you are wanting a good FPS game with many other things to do whilst playing it then this game is for you. 9/10
antibirus.net healthbar inhaler;-;Hard to play but it's nice
WETSAUSAGE;-;great game. its not designed to make military look badass yet its still one of the most fun games i have ever palyed
PM_Redding;-;There is something in Arma 3 which will suit your skils, not everyones the same (you will know this if you ever played A2 operration arrowhead) this skill or friendship you have gained by joining group/randomly meeting online will keep you coming back and you will never regret buying this game (unless your an 8 year old FPS swag i know bloody everything cos i play cod )
AdamPJ;-;10 out of 10 would bang
Thanis;-;It is hard to review Arma 3 without using the word platform, because it is one. Arma is one of those game where you first see the horrid UI and you go: there's no way in hell I'm playing that. And then you try that thing and another one... and the magic happens. For instance, optics are actually useful in this game, and when you see the little 4 on the RCO (sort of ACOG scope), it's not just there to look good... it actually tells you where the bullet will hit 400m from you. And it's in the little details like that that you understand you're not gonna play any game, you're playing Arma. It would be all good like that, but it gets better. The community of players is amazing. Ever wanted to play a proper tactical game? Just plug your mic in and coordinate your attack with 2, 3 or 20 teammates (or even more!) you just randomly met on a server. (a coop server, otherwise prepare yourself to get killed pretty darn fast.) Oh, and forget about COD/BF fanboys... they're simply not there. And griefers and other trolls are probably jerking off on DayZ, so it's all good! That's about it, I think. I played 170+ hours and I still can't get enough. I found a miriad of like-minded gamers to play with, and I never cease to be amazed by their skills and willingness to cooperate to get things done. Get this game, get over the UI (might take a couple of hours at least) and find a good community... you'll forget about other FPS in a the blink of an eye.
OdinsJockstrap;-;When you look down you can see your legs 10/10
HenkkazoR;-;Cool...
Wheatley;-;Great for roleplay. You can play different gamemodes like Wasteland or DayZ - post apocalyptic gamemodes where you can survive together, or compete for resorces. Editor lets you create your own battlefeild on two massive maps Altis and Stratis.
- \/G - Rogue;-;Gameplay and sound effects are great, this is a good military simulator, campaign has a great story but no replay value except for the last mission of Ep 3: Win. Editor is very smooth and easy to use.
alf;-;love it really good game
DaNK FUCkING MEmE;-;If say you like call of duty, straight into some action, then probably not the game for you, however, forget this game's campaign and clunky  controls and go to the multiplayer, give say an "invade and annex" server a try, trust me, if you are to just follow a group of players, you are bound to have some of the best moments in your gaming life so far.
CLUTCH;-;I own/DL&crack/play tons of games. My rig = 2x GTX970s + i4970 + 16GB DDR3. This is by far the best online shooter I've ever played. The emotional experience of playing online is on par with that of the HL2 single player campaign (although the games are nothing alike.) Everything in the game is rewarding if you stick around to figure it all out. Every day I play this game I love it a little more and I've had it for about a year. Hard to get bored in MP because there are so many different roles to perform (fighter pilot vs. tank crew vs. combat medic vs. sniper vs. drone operator..etc). I get bored of games easily and this one has managed to keep my interest. The setting and gameplay is similar to the Battlefield games, HOWEVER-- The Battlefield games are arcades. This is a MILITARY SIMULATOR. You can simulate the tedious monotony of being a plane or heli pilot, ground-pounder, medic, tank crew, +others. I prefer the helis because they are very realistic in both physics and detail, including working gauges. I recommend this game to anyone looking for an in-depth military simulator that is more rewarding the more you play. I rate Arma 3 (MP) 89/100 For reference: I rate HL2 (SP) 91/100 I rate BF4 80/100 (on a good day.)
Inquisitor Fizzleclaw;-;*After two hours of benchmarking and testing my FPS i finally played it smoothly, so i decided to join a Co-op server.) :/ *I chose to be an auto-rifleman and grabbed an LMG, Big backpack and ammo, a few grenades too.* :D *I took a helicopter to a drop-point, to come under fire by the enemy!* :O *I quickly laid down and just began shooting, and after killing about two, i laughed evily over Direct Communications.* >:3 *My friends died and i tried accessing their inventory, so i pressed G like in arma 2. I threw a grenade and died.* D: *I respawned and did the same mistake, just to get banned from the server.* :'c 10/10 would benchmark again.
Agent 006.9;-;This is a very fun game with stunning graphics and amazing amount of detail. This game looks breathtaking and have so much multiplayer cappabilty. However the content included with the game at this stage (July 2015) is very limiting when comparing to previos ArmA games such as ArmA 2 and ArmA Opeation Arrowhead. However what orginal content this game lacks is made up for in the extensive amount of mods this game holds. There is everything to suit your needs to zombies, base building (if you liked Dayz Epoch) and then relism mods and there there are RP mods. This game is great and keeps getting getter. I would recomend the DLC espically if you intend on playing mods as they will give you a great advantage.
yearlink;-;offline-60+ fps constant @ ultra settings online-25 fps @ lowest settings apart from the terrible servers this game is amazing, in my opinion its the best military sim to date, at max settings the game pulls just over 2gb of gpu memory in a heavy area (i.e towns with heavy foliage and lots of buildings) it runs smoothly on a wide range of hardware ( as i'v tested) and is easy to achieve solid 60 fps on all hardware at good settings
Zings.;-;Great game I love Arma 3 life
Dsisrock;-;good game except for the fact my potato runs it at 20fps on lowest settings
rickstang;-;love this game
Oke;-;Good Game but the Engine is unmatured. This game runs on my Pc with out 30-40 FPS. PC: AMD FX6300 3,5 Ghz 8Gb RAM Nvidia GTX 660 Arma needs a new Engine then is Arma perfect. I call a few Pros and Cons: Good Gameplay many vehicles many Weapons a very big Map (over 22km) the Multiplayer is nice Fun is endless in this Game ________________________ -Bad Engine(FPS Drops) -too many Bugs 9/10 Points
Donnie;-;If you are buying Arma 3 expecting the fast paced, point and click first person shooter style that games like Call of Duty have made popular, you are looking in the wrong place. Arma 3 is the most challenging, exciting, military SIMULATOR I have ever played. I place emphasis on the word "Simulator". If you're approaching an enemy occupied town and plan to use your sniper, you better find a good hiding place on the hills and change positions right after taking your first shot. This game is very complex. I tend to stay alive when I work in good groups. I tend to die a lot when I work with people who do not take it seriously. The maps are GIGANTIC in this game. This is the most impressive open world military style game you can play.
MuricaFuckYea;-;best army simulator i have ever played
Chadillac3006;-;This game has to be the best immersive game you can ever get makes you feel like its real life.
, _g,`;-;Best game in the world for me ATM.
DarkMasta;-;Ahh...Arma 3...love it so much that makes me hate it in the same amount... Arma 3 is not your tipical "guns game" its not an FPS and if you are coming from games like CoD this is NOT the game for you! Arma 3 is a simulation game where you must stop to take a shot, consider the distance between you and the target, set your aim according to the distance of the target, consider the bullet drop if necessary and take the shot! This is a game where you will fall on your belly in the woods and crawl 100 meters if necessary! The game map is something like you have never seen and that sets the right playground to have large (and I do mean LARGE) scale combats where you have soldiers running inside a building to rake refuge from enemy fire, helicopters landing to deploy soldiers, airplanes making a strike at the city and leveling the place, tanks set on a hill 1 kilometer away from the target location along with snipers and all kinds of madness! It is pure epicness and you feel like you are in a war! So if you like those kind of games where you run, jump, do a 360, shoot with a sniper rifle in mid air without scoping, and headshot a guy. This is NOT for you. You must have patience in this game, like I said, you will crawl 100 meters if you need, hide inside a house and die if you are unlucky enough to have a airplane missile dropped on you, peek around a corner and get shot by a sniper, drive an helicopter and it gets shot down! You must be prepared for that but that is why it is so epic. There is no game like Arma 3 that acomplishes what Arma 3 acomplishes. Its the best war game I have ever seen, that I think a lot of people have been waiting for. Games have taken a step foward, and if you played FPS's like CoD and those other FPS's under the radar like Artic Combat or what not and kept imagening "it would be cool to have a game like this but more tactical, with a huge map and lots of players and cool stuff like helicopters, parachuting, having kilometers and kilometers of map to play instead of a close quarter corridor map" This is the game you have been waiting for. But be warned, its so good but it has a huge flaw...it feels like its an Alpha performance wise... It's so frustrating that you can't just, enter the game and play...but you can't because you will play with 5 FPS even if your computer meets the recommended hardware. Its poorly optimized and it sucks to play a game that you should be able to play with max settings and you have to play it with low settings or a find a certain combinations that gives you more FPS's and even then it will LAG and cause things like. You have a guy laying prone in front of you and you press to aim and your FPS's drop just because of that and he kills you, you start shooting and the image freezes for some seconds and the person you were shooting is no longer there...thats the only problem with Arma 3. With that said, its still a thumbs up on my part, but be warned about the problem I just pointed out if you are considering on buying it! To you, do you think the epicness of this game, that no other game can provide, out weights the huge FPS problems? The choice is up to you!
[SFST]*CoM*4thDimension [Owner];-;Very amazing game best military sim and most realistic ive ever played
Witchy ~GodLucifer 666;-;Great game ... only on ALTIS LIFE MOD servers... otherweise get rekt.
sOrk;-;Look like beta to me. Got stuck during tutorial, encountered GUI bug 2 hours later. Horrible performance.
Prophet;-;Day No.43 I've sent BattlEye appeals for my supposed 'cheating' with no replies from actual humans. game wont launch and now apparently I have to reinstall half of my game. I'd recommend it if the anti-cheat wasn't trash
rusumihaiionut;-;Game is nice, testes two days, but its all about the mods for me, unfortunetly theres alot of hackkers on these servers and kinda ruins the fun, dont recomment it, just not yet.
Maxut;-;That Game is a lot of fun with a lot of game modes. My favorite is BattleRoyale.
Cock;-;If you want to get ed in the  this is the game for you
TwentyEight;-;This game is amazing! Definitely one of the best FPS games i've played. If you ever thought Battlefield was realistic, this game is the definition of what a realistic first person shooter should be. Apart from its low FPS count (as experienced by many players all over the world), this game stands out in every other aspect. If you're looking for a realistic military simulator with an amazing community, look no further! You've found it :D
Narnlls;-;Grate game you can get a lot of fun in to this game
iPixie;-;10/10 would shoot again
evilwar;-;If you have fun rubbing dirt in childrens eyes this game is for you.
[EO] Aaron;-;Coming up on 900 hours I think....maybe it's 800. All I know is that this IS the best military simulator out there. Highly recommended to those that enjoy realistic gameplay and beautiful graphics.
ksamomo;-;words can't describe how much i love this game ARMA IS LOVE ARMA IS LIFE
Gadzy;-;Died and my friend stole all my clothes. Shooting is so hard its like bullets don't come out of your gun. Played epic music as we were dropping out of helicopter... it got shot down. Trolled mates with zeus mode. Providing cover fire for a friend... he got brutally gunned down. Was in the middle of a battle running away from enemies... had to reload. Pinned down got support from a tank... blew us up by accident. 10/10 Best experinces in gaming.
BoomsticK;-;Rating: 4 out of 5 cans of Tactical Bacon. Pros: Open world military simulator. Emulates infantry combat and tactics. Extensive community support means the game doesn't get old through the release of community based mods, scripts, addons and missions. Great mods available (Altis Life, Epoch, Breaking Point, Battle Royale, Exile and more). Realistic and accurate firearms ballistics and ranging (as far as a game can attempt to emulate). Beautiful and well designed maps. Destructible buildings and map features. Huge variety of weapons and load outs especially with the addition of the Marksman DLC (highly recommended). Large number of vehicles to drive. More mature community player base. It's a game where you need to use planning, teamwork and tactics to succeed so it attracts a higher age demographic. ARMA 3 is not Call of Duty, Battlefield, CS:GO. Cons: Prone to bugs and glitching. Death by staircases, insta-exploding helicopters and being sucked into walls is sadly not that uncommon. Deducted a full point for this as it sadly detracts from the quality of the otherwise brilliant game. It is worth noting there is a steep learning curve to the game but this can be offset by utilising the in game virtual arsenal, virtual training and practice scenarios. Will eat your CPU and GPU for breakfast. You need a solid rig to run this with ultra settings. Not a problem for me personally but players do experience FPS issues. Inventory system could do with improvements. DLC content. People however do need to be aware some content requires DLC. Personally I don't have an issue with DLC as it supports the development of the games I like but I do understand DLC annoys some people. Summary: Highly recommended if you would like to experience simulated infantry combat. Not recommended if you want to kill, die and respawn constantly like in a typical FPS shooter. It's a difficult game to master but if anything learn to shoot first. Finding a group to play with that can show you the ropes helps. Learn to communicate meaningful information to your team mates (eg. CONTACT! 2 infantry, bearing 40, 200 metres, left of the house with the orange roof). Effective communication and teamwork is key to succeeding. Check out the mods available and extensive ARMA 3 online guides and wikis.
Staff Sergeant. Sweden;-;Die for falling 3M 10/10 would play agian IGN
SPC Zed [506th];-;The best war simulator ever, ofc with mods :D
The Black Fin;-;This game gives me as much cancer as it gives me joy. Best sandbox game out there. Millions of possibilities. Turn your Military Simulator into a Survival Simulator or Michael Bay Simulator or if your one of these people that is scared of daylight but you still want to get a small taste of how life is outside your trusty walls, for you theres also City Life/Altis Life (W/E They call it these days). However to achieve fun in this, one has to go through things like infinite loading times, crashes, crappy frames (unless you have some 2000 PC) and theres probably some more things that will make you ignite your computer and then yourself. Dont even get me started on the AI in this game Tough when this game works like it should and does the things you'd want it to do (lol ye right) it is defenitly worth your money.
ElJusus Crust;-;Best Game I have ever played! the game is great but there is a slight problem with lag issues but other than that this game is spectaculer when you play with friends. I recommend this to anyone who has a good computer and is looking to buy this game!
MSGT Arkangel;-;Good Game Overall, Brillant First/Third person military sim/shooter, Modding and a pretty good variety of things to do, not to mention the zeus mode so you can troll your friends or just mess around. Great Game 10/10
Tobias;-;+1 plus one for me great game when it comes to the mods... my heart has never jumped out of my chest from pvp in a long time...
Rey | trade.tf;-;This game. IS THE BEST ING GAME YOU WILL EVER IIING TOUCH M8! YOU CAN PLAY ARMA 3 LIFE AND GET DOLLA DOLLA AND  HOOKERS AND ROB BANKS SMOKE KUSH AND MUCH MORE! THEREEEES EVEN A JURASSIC MOD COMING OUT JUST LIKE DAAAY Z BUT WITH DINOS!!!!!!!!!!! Yes. Game of the year, makes GTA look like a baby. what? no don't worry about it, Just buy it then ask questions.
Nillers;-;If you see me playing this, I'm probably having the time of my life, so don't bug me.
Billybob Chlamydiasnitch;-;You can slide around on your butt. 11/10
Ducky;-;Extremely Fun and has a diverse amount of different game modes
Kamerad Skarr;-;Arma 3 is probably the most fun I've had in a long time. Singleplayer is ok but scenarios from the workshop are really fun. Most of my time is spent playing the Wasteland mod. I recommend you all try it out cause it can get insanely fun with a group of friends all teamed up in one server.
RealityCache;-;Love the game, but including the multiplayer and themods. this game is god like
Takeo Kun;-;Me favourite utuber likes this game. 10/10 and i too 1000/10
Christinas Combo Toy;-;ARMA 3 has been a constantly evolving game. Definitely worth checking out now that it's a more refined experience, has tons of incredible user created scenarios, a lot of variety online, and finally, the first part of the campaign is available. This has been the most fun I've had in a shooter all year, and I expect to continue enjoying it for years to come.
Jest;-;Definetly a step-up towards more realistic gameplay than CoD and Battlefield series. Steep learning curve with all sorts of options in how to affect your avatar in the environment - too many for most of us - so it really takes time to get into. Huge sandbox environments so plan on spending several hours in a match rather than your typical 20 minute arcade-shooter match. Some of the options and controls do feel a little clunky at the moment. You do need a pretty decent rig to run on full graphic settings to get the most out of it. Challenging - very challenging. Great realism - it can be fustrating for new players so expect it going in.
Metro;-;Much better than that of the 2nd one, less glitched a very polished look that really adds to the atmosphere.
Rey | trade.tf;-;This game. IS THE BEST ING GAME YOU WILL EVER IIING TOUCH M8! YOU CAN PLAY ARMA 3 LIFE AND GET DOLLA DOLLA AND  HOOKERS AND ROB BANKS SMOKE KUSH AND MUCH MORE! THEREEEES EVEN A JURASSIC MOD COMING OUT JUST LIKE DAAAY Z BUT WITH DINOS!!!!!!!!!!! Yes. Game of the year, makes GTA look like a baby. what? no don't worry about it, Just buy it then ask questions.
Metro;-;Much better than that of the 2nd one, less glitched a very polished look that really adds to the atmosphere.
Hazed;-;Bought a 50k SUV in altis life, drove it to a drug dealer bought  tons of drugs with a 3 friends. we did all the drugs in the main town got arrest 20 seconds later, by officer owl then ran the police officer over abunch of times. Drugs/10 would play again.
Breaking Breakfast;-;Bohemia Interactive have really created something special here, top of the line military simulator an experience like no other. For those unfamiliar with what a Military Simulator game entitles here is a few of the things you will be doing in Altis and Stratis the two maps in game which are ridiculously huge: - Gokarting - Flying helicopters to the max height and then skydiving to your death - Dealing drugs and becoming terrorists in Altis Life - Having a great time attaching .50 cals to your gokart and killing your friends - Great community workshop maps and missions such as 'The Lost Doge' and 'Skytrack 3000' - Having intense raves with glowsticks and coloured smoke The list goes on, in conclusion BUY THIS GAME
Jennay;-;Do it. Best decision you will ever make. Join a Mil-Sim community and enjoy the next 6 months of your life :)
Sir Doctor;-;I mostly bought this game to play Altis Life and have primarily done so, but the single player campaign and other multiplayer options offer a lot of fun as well. Was definitely worth the cost and has been the only game Ive been playing lately.
Isaac Clarke;-;The real military simulation..giving you much pressure than you expected. To complete the objectives, you must have extreme concentration and high teamwork rate with your team mates in completing your team's objectives and getting out alive
Preetham;-;Amazing game for anyone who enjoys a fun military simulation! Great gameplay, graphics, lots of interesting mods and high replay-ability.
A Care Bear Stair;-;Bought game, played online, ran 10.3km to battlezone, 30 minutes later died to enemy behind bush. 10/10 - Will play again.
Mitrem;-;Huge maps, amazing graphics, smooth performance, great gameplay... If you're looking for a MilSim or slow paced shooter, than this is the game for you.
MannYSJ;-;Better graphics than real life
Enjoii;-;Arma 3 compared to Arma 2 is a big improvement for sure, but it stills has a few issues and features that where in Arma 2 that I would have liked to see in Arma 3. Overall its pretty good now since there are some great mods that have come out.
TheRealJrW;-;This is a really good game, I enjoy playing this game loads. The amount of gamemodes is great as theres loads of things to do and popular gamemodes such as wasteland can give you hours of fun. Worth the money 100%
420 Glaze It;-;Arma 3 is, by far, the best millitary simulator I've ever seen. Only for those who like hardcore millitary simulators.
SPTNiK;-;its like skyrim, with military grade weapons
QU4N;-;The most realistic game I have ever played!
Slabby;-;I ran into combat in my underwear 10/10 would do
a gentle fish;-;id like to take this oppourtunity and apologize to everyone who was at the BestBuy by my house yesterday. (the one next to Lil Choozie's Bar and Grill) i tried to get the "scoops" on all the hottest and latest gadget tech but ended up assuming the fetal position in the radio section screaming for my life because a couple of Rogue Pixels called me a "dink" for wearing camo pants. once again i apologize for the many people i disturbed and next time ill invite my tech wizard pal mikey so that an event like this will never embarass me again. t
Zeroproto0;-;This game is just what you would expect from the Bohemia Interactive devs, a great game that is fun with a group of friends. You have many recuring mods in the ARMA series such as island life, wasteland, domination, and even an ARMA 3 port of DayZ, there is even a gamemode only in ARMA 3 called King of the hill. With the multiplayer basis out of the way what about singleplayer? ARMA 3 provides a story driven campaign, and a couple of showcases i.e. Infantry Combat, Aquatic Warfare, etc. ARMA 3 is also returning with a more user friendly mission editor/creator, here you can make your own missions that you or some friends can test out, or upload it to the Steam Workshop. Along with uploading you can also download others missions, some serious, some not. But other than that you should have a great time with this game. Now for the cons (every game has some) just as expected this game is extremely CPU intensive, and GPU intensive, so if you are getting this game make sure you have a good computer. P.S. FPS will be drastically higher in singleplayer compared to multiplayer i.e. SP 45-60 MP 15-30 depending on the server (some are crappy) BEWARE!
timh1203;-;Arma 3 is a military sandbox from Bohemia Interactives. I did not have the pleasure of joining the community until Arma 3 was released but glad to have bought the game after highly rated reviews from the online community. I have played the introductory showcases which shows you infantry, armor, and air elements of the games to get started. The campaigns were also an interesting experience as well but lacked that live squad tactics that I desired. Consequently, I transitioned towards multiplayer to see what it had to offer. At the current time, Invade&Annex (capture the town objective), Breaking Point (Zombie RPG), Atlis Life (RPG), and Wasteland (Dynamic Missions and RPG) remains the most popular maps on the servers. Invade&Annex is probably the closest to a military element out of the 4 and the other four are probably experiences that can be better found in other titles. A game model built in realism, infantry tactics, and armor assets should be better utilize than just simply playing RPGs. In search of a more military experience, I discovered Endless Survival, Whole Lotta Atlis, and private gamemaster games more enriching. I found some things that you can't simply experience on those common maps & servers mentioned in the previous paragraph. When can you say that you were able to fly the A10-C Thunderbolt II, parachute into the AO next to your squad, or evacuating out of a hot LZ after protecting the president at the hospital? These were just some of the satisfying environments in which I have played in. In hopes of playing with more like minded fellas and pushing for milsim, let's play! I'm always glad to meet new friends. Strength and Honor, timh1203
its not tarik its tank;-;Great for people who like realism, Lots of realism groups for you to join to do this on a large scale, It has a nice community and with the addition on zeus mode the game is pretty much an open sandbox world for mission creators to play with. Would definately reccomend picking this up.
Gus;-;Arma, for me, is one of those few games that you can't get into immediately. You begin playing, if you're like me you jump into multiplayer without any idea of what you're doing. Everything looks interesting, but hyper-realistic, immediately immersing you in the game. You board a vehicle, drive around for a little while, thinking there's no-one to fight, straight before getting shot by an enemy you never saw. Your friend now joins and you both spawn, but miles away from one another. After walking for fifteen minutes, you finally meet up, mess around with the inventory system, aquaint yourselves with most of the controls and head off on your adventure. Then you die. It may sound like a rant on how unfair the game is, but it seems to be a pretty common experience. Teamwork is essential in Arma 3, with good communications helping such endeavours. This makes for an experience of what real combat might be like, without all the physical exertion. Finally, you need patience for this game. Large maps with a small number of vehicles can make travel horrible if you get stranded. If you like Call of Duty for its small maps and quick combat, chances are you won't enjoy this. Fun but frustrating, 7/10.
Public Inception;-;This game is hella good you can go from Helicopters, Jets, Boats, Submarines, Parachutes, On Foot... You can do anything that you want freely the choice is up to you. You want too explore you can but... You always must use caution you never know if/when you will be shot at from any direction, any height, any distance and from any type of challenge wether it's Planes Boats, Tanks, Mines, Enemies aka Troops and Paratroopers you name it.. You can also create Missions for you and your friends to play, you can also do anything set on your mind.. But you must follow Server Rules, if you don't want too be Kicked/Banned. You can also do Solo Missions, the Campaign, Training ANYTHING! This game has a ton of Mods! So what are you waiting for BUY NOW!!
mortem incarnatus;-;endless hours of fun...and running
Nuk3;-;You can fight wiithout pants! my gawd best game ever 79 fishsticks out of 56 cakes
Valiance Swiftaim.com;-;Absolutely in fantastic 10/10 like lads
SaberToothGaming12;-;Ahhh Arma 3 the third expansion of the Arma series. I love it and hate it at the same time at different moments. The increased modding capabilities really made me really interested. The main thing that REALLY disappointed me was the lack of variety in the weapons and vehicle department. They weren't really unique but the gear system helped add more variety to the cosmetics of the characters but, that doesn't really help due to the fact the weapons don't have much variety. I love the Arma 3 campaign, not as personal and deep as the Arma 2 campaign but still fun. There are still SOO many bugs that need fixing and Optimization for multiplayer FPS wise is very bad at the moment too. I still give this game a 7/10 since it has many abilities from Arma 2 and is still fun. Expect a lot of bugs though and a few random FPS drops but, that doesn't really effect the gameplay as much.
Krille33;-;The third game in the ArmA series brings the series to a new level. The first thing i noticed was that the mouse-acceleration from ArmA 2 was gone, a welcome change to me. And the physics system got a great overhaul, from being nearly nothing (ArmA 2) to be one of the best to date (may get better when we get the full release) The graphics are really good, the textures are big, and the shaders are gorgeous. And best of all, the bugs/glitches are close to none. The gameplay doesnt differ too much from the prequel, though there are some improvments; More positioning options (prone, low-crouch, crouch, high-crouch etc.) and toggleable sights (RDS and scope), of course there are many more, but these are the ones that stand out from the previous game. Also worth to note is that the game is built upon teamwork in the multiplayer mode, In othe words; One does not simply walk into enemy territorium alone... Overall the game is really good, even though its still in Beta. There are room for improvments, and there has to be more content (tanks, jets etc.) But still i enjoy it as much as i enjoy ArmA 2; if not more. Final Rating: The alpha was a bit too buggy to be played 6/10 The Beta feels much more reliable, but we still need tanks ;) 8/10 If it continues on the same path as right now, the full realese will get a 10/10 Nothing to complain about (its Beta after all). I just got one final word to say; BUY! Edit: Tanks etc. are added, but there are still some glitches that make the game unplayable at points. But I'd still give it a 9/10
Gin;-;The level of fun and excitement I've had playing this game has not diminished a single bit since the day I first played it back in it's alpha stage 10/10.
KraToR.;-;Best roleplaying game!
Dial 322-escape;-;Just two words: must have.
Brown;-;It's the kind of game that if you like it enough, you play it for hours but if you don't like it you play it a bit and then delete it. I like it so i've played it for over 400 hours now. I like it because in my opinion there is almost unlimited thigs to do: Campaign, Workshop missions (Around 300-400 good ones), High Command, Mods, Zeus, Wasteland, Altis Life!!!, King of the Hill, BattleRoyale, Maps, your own scenarios that you can develop, the game even helped me learn the basics of Javascript.
Nife;-;wait4ace
TG Xiaoxiao;-;'IMPORTANT' Expect a somewhat big learning kerb if your used to such shooters as BF and call of duty. Actually don't go into this game expecting the same type of game play as those games. Now if your still one of those people who think that Arma 3 is just a graphics overhaul game your WRONG. I found I could never get into the base Arma 2 game much, with Arma 3 they've improved the overall smoothness of the game added bigger maps and my favourite the Advanced Stances. Ever played a fps and your running from some sniper fire and you see a rock and think its some good cover but once you get to it and crouch down your head ends up poking 4cms out over the top of the rock and you get your brains blown out by the  sniper. Well now you can just simple crouch just a bit more to the point where your guy is sitting down. I highly recommend joining a clan for this game it is very much a multilayer game. If this review helped and you ended up buying the game add me on steam and we can have a game.
Valiance Swiftaim.com;-;Absolutely in fantastic 10/10 like lads
Zeroproto0;-;This game is just what you would expect from the Bohemia Interactive devs, a great game that is fun with a group of friends. You have many recuring mods in the ARMA series such as island life, wasteland, domination, and even an ARMA 3 port of DayZ, there is even a gamemode only in ARMA 3 called King of the hill. With the multiplayer basis out of the way what about singleplayer? ARMA 3 provides a story driven campaign, and a couple of showcases i.e. Infantry Combat, Aquatic Warfare, etc. ARMA 3 is also returning with a more user friendly mission editor/creator, here you can make your own missions that you or some friends can test out, or upload it to the Steam Workshop. Along with uploading you can also download others missions, some serious, some not. But other than that you should have a great time with this game. Now for the cons (every game has some) just as expected this game is extremely CPU intensive, and GPU intensive, so if you are getting this game make sure you have a good computer. P.S. FPS will be drastically higher in singleplayer compared to multiplayer i.e. SP 45-60 MP 15-30 depending on the server (some are crappy) BEWARE!
timh1203;-;Arma 3 is a military sandbox from Bohemia Interactives. I did not have the pleasure of joining the community until Arma 3 was released but glad to have bought the game after highly rated reviews from the online community. I have played the introductory showcases which shows you infantry, armor, and air elements of the games to get started. The campaigns were also an interesting experience as well but lacked that live squad tactics that I desired. Consequently, I transitioned towards multiplayer to see what it had to offer. At the current time, Invade&Annex (capture the town objective), Breaking Point (Zombie RPG), Atlis Life (RPG), and Wasteland (Dynamic Missions and RPG) remains the most popular maps on the servers. Invade&Annex is probably the closest to a military element out of the 4 and the other four are probably experiences that can be better found in other titles. A game model built in realism, infantry tactics, and armor assets should be better utilize than just simply playing RPGs. In search of a more military experience, I discovered Endless Survival, Whole Lotta Atlis, and private gamemaster games more enriching. I found some things that you can't simply experience on those common maps & servers mentioned in the previous paragraph. When can you say that you were able to fly the A10-C Thunderbolt II, parachute into the AO next to your squad, or evacuating out of a hot LZ after protecting the president at the hospital? These were just some of the satisfying environments in which I have played in. In hopes of playing with more like minded fellas and pushing for milsim, let's play! I'm always glad to meet new friends. Strength and Honor, timh1203
its not tarik its tank;-;Great for people who like realism, Lots of realism groups for you to join to do this on a large scale, It has a nice community and with the addition on zeus mode the game is pretty much an open sandbox world for mission creators to play with. Would definately reccomend picking this up.
9starferret;-;This is an interesting game.. It features a unique experience from mil-sim to even a "life" simulator. it is a community driven and built game that allows community built missions, modes and mods, which makes it the ultimate sandbox for anyone. My experiences come from a realism unit focusiong on USMC structure and we use mods for comms and weapons/vehicles. My derp around screw around, comes from mass server altis life and wasteland. I'm also taking an introduction into coding and this game has opened me up to a world of creation, of which can be shared by the click of the button to all of Steam. Also, this game has its issues, its Arma. (slang for, This  is normal). Low scoring or reviewing this game is not logical or well-supported. Play a game or two of Arma 2 and tell me, animations/physics/lighting/mechanics/engine/graphics/rendering/ease of use hasn't improved. The game is a massive upgrade from its predecessors, however lacking a lot of content, and in the end, is an excellent infantry simulator. I gice the game a 10/10. Simply for its improvements and the abilities given to the community. This game will surely grow to be greater then the developers could ever think to make it, if it hasn't already.
Super67;-;One of the most incredible games ever made, following a long line of fantastic military simulators. This is the collimation of Bohemia Interactive. A true PC masterpiece.
[WP]Mkill73;-;Gonna be the best ever....already great.
Inazuma Kai;-;10/10 Would  again
Christinas Combo Toy;-;ARMA 3 has been a constantly evolving game. Definitely worth checking out now that it's a more refined experience, has tons of incredible user created scenarios, a lot of variety online, and finally, the first part of the campaign is available. This has been the most fun I've had in a shooter all year, and I expect to continue enjoying it for years to come.
Triangle [PWRR];-;The ArmA series stole my life 4 years ago, and continues to do so. 10/10
Tim The Enchanter;-;They Spelt Army wrong. Thats ok though.
vlk;-;Best game eu..! Or it would have been if only they implemented the weapons of modern war, instead of weapons of a war 50 years ahead.. I mean 6.5 caliber rifles? I use that for hunting moose.. But nothing to cry about when there is mods.. ALOT of mods including modern weapons like hk416, m4, scar and so on.. with every possible attachment u can think of.. I highly recomend this game WITH mods.. And for multiplayer experince i recomend ahoy world eu#3 modded server.. its just a blast.. :D
eye_socket;-;Look at the amount of hours I have played and guess if I recommend it. Good: Military realism Large map Can't run and gun like COD Almost everything about the game You can be/do pretty much anything in this game. Even a stupid mod that's highly popular called Atlis Life where you.. well... live life as an avatar. Graphics are always a plus, if your computer can run it. Bad: Even after a year of full release, it still has glitches. Fatigue system is a pain in the , but realistic(ish) It's plain and simple. If you love a legitimate military tactics, movement, feel over all, then this game is for you. The modding community is over the top and will release content for this till arma 5 comes out. (Notice I skipped arma 4, that's how dedicated people are to these games). If you like running and gunning.... you'll rage quit within the first day. Highly recommended. Join us on EUTW
{GT}Lord_matthew82;-;I think this game is a great military sim.It combines teamwork with tactics and mixes it up with mods and good bots that will give you a run for your money.Now ive only played this for the free weekend so I cant give you a super good reveiw but I will say that from what me and my brother played that this game is vary fun and challenging game and we will definetly buy it in the upcomeing days
Leirith;-;ArmAIII ruined my life Strongly recommend.
(JSOC) aviax;-;I figured it was about time to right a review about this beautiful game. First off, this game, in all actuality, is more of a sandbox, and a gaming platform, with a military theme than it is anything else. People will fanboy out and say that this is a hardcore military simulator bla bla bla, but really it is what you make it, and it depends on how you play and who your playing with. For example, like survival based games? Wasteland! Into roleplaying as police or rebels, Altis life. Like large scale team on team pvp? King of the Hill by Sa-Matra. Like the hardcore military aspect arma has to offer? Find a good tacsim clan. And there are quite a few. The thing about ArmA is it is designed as more of a platform for things to be developed on, such as the mods that the wonderful community has designed. In our clan we use quite a few mods ranging from sound mods that add more realistic and adrenaline pumping sound effects, to weapon and vehicle packs to give us weapons used in real life by the military units that we essentially try to recreate. The problem with some people is that they expect bohemia to add all of these features and what not such as a medical system, or more realistic this and that, but the problem is if they did things like that the entire community would be effected, not just say the military simulator players of arma, and at that not all clans wish to play the same way, so if ArmA added say a much more realistic medical system, some clans wouldn't like that and it may mess up there playstyle, which is where mods come in, so clans can adjust there gameplay to how they see fit. Overall this game is amazing, I have spent many hours playing on our tactical realism server, and i have spent MANY hours up all night with friends in skype and teamspeak on wasteland servers, playing with extreme military tactics in a post apoc. world gathering gear and taking out any and all contacts. This game has the pontential to bring you hours upon hours of entertainment. Forget all the complaints of "lack of this and needs more that" b.s. This game can be what you make of it and most of us have chosen to enjoy it! There are some amazing things being devoloped for this game such as the A.L.I.V.E. mod which adds a very realistic living breathing ArmA world where enemies have there own objectives and behave like real humans being controlled with real tactics and objectives in mind. Things like that make this game amazing and I expect to be playing it for many years to come. I've been with it since the first month of alpha and it never ceases to get more and more amazing weather it's updates to the engine, or updates from the large and amazing community. There is so much that I can't even begin to cover in this game but from the experienced I have had in this game, it is easily my favorite game of all time, even though it may have some querks here and there, it is amazing - 10/10.
BullHorn;-;The best game ever. It runs like . But it's still the best game ever.
RadDogOne Alt;-;Arma 3 is great! Hands down the best shooter.
Truff;-;Such a good game everything about it is great you should definetly pick it up
Greywalker;-;fantastic. best military sim out there. it's all about the wasteland for moi! 10/10 edit: breaking point mod is also pretty good.
Satan 666;-;Ruined my social life 10/10 would do it again.
You Tryhard | RIP SKINZ;-;Best. Army. Simulator. Ever.
Royal Underpants;-;I am very recommend this game , super realistic with the new update 10/10 - Gameplay
PawkBun;-;Fantastic progress made by the developers, the most realistic combat style game yet
Blah146135;-;you need to buy an extra 3 CPUs and an extra 80 GBs of ram to run this game at low settings 30 FPS on a serious note: i bought an extra 8GB of ram just for this ing game jesus lol
HypeR;-;When I first got ArmA 3 back in alpha stage, I thought "You know what this game lacks? Go - Karts..." Well alas, I jump on Steam, and what do I see? "Arma 3 Karts" I thought it was blasphemy, a ruse if you will, but after throwing my money at the screen, then realising that buying things on Steam doesn't work like that, I purchased the DLC. The handling is supreme, and Arma 3 is now what I'd call a finished game. 11/10 would Go-Kart again
Impulse;-;- Zip tied someone - Take them to the top of a church - Cut the poor soul's kidney out of their body - make them jump while being shot at and hearing gaben being chanted best game - 10/10
Demon;-;Great Game
[COG]ThanksObama;-;Amazing...but too heavy :/
Uribe44;-;Is the best game ever made in the saga of Arma, i strongly recomend the game, but buy it on a steam discount,becuse is really expensive.
TheCoolRubberDuck;-;Best thing since sex.
nikos-christos;-;I played the game at free weekend and i find it very good but even more promising. The graphics are breathtaking while the gameplay, in my opinion, can imrove a bit. I loved the greek setting, it reminds me of my vacations. The bad thing is that the free weekend is over and now I can't afford to buy the full game...Anyone offering it as a gift? :)
art thou mad?;-;Children play Call of Duty Boys play Battlefield Men play ARMA
TG Baby Seal Hunter;-;Great game. Can only be described as a platform. If you can dream it, you can do it.
Chandler;-;Dont get this game. You will lose your life.
Sir Demotana;-;This game will give you shivers as you play it, it's just too epic. I can tell you that it is worth the price. But when it doesn't overwhelm you with epicness, it makes you laugh your  off because some random  happens from time to time, like tanks flying into space while backflipping nonstop or sudden raining men.
CookieMonsta ( );-;Worthet to Buy I am really Enjoying the game but the Only thing that is Makeing me Sad is that the update 1.26 is trash and causeing People to crash there game alot that before crashing servers. Need to make dead more Realistc like arma 2 and Dayz Mod and Dayz Standalone , not get killed and Fly somewhere not to be found. 8.5/10 ~Cookies
TTGjacobieachi;-;I think this game is great buy it omg im crying to my mom because she slaps the  out of me please help she wanted me to review this game help
88 JSEM ESK  CZ;-;Awsome realistic game, much better than COD of BF!
jimmymcbean;-;Arma 3 is a great military simulator which allows you to explore a VERY large map called Altis and a smaller map called Stratis with other players which leaves you fighting off the enemys who have control of the island. Just recently Bohemia servers have shut down due to Steam buying out the Bohemia and for some unknown reason, we Arma 3 fans are still waiting for the servers to go online. It has been almost 3 months now and still no sign of the servers. This game is best when you are able to play with friends as I dont reccomend purchasing this game until Bohemia Interactive and Steam sort out the server issues. Unfortunately, Arma 3 is going to be sitting in my Steam library gathering cobwebs until the servers are back online.
Kaynee;-;Intense and enjoying game at the same time
Kirk;-;This game blows me away more and more everytime I play, and I can't get enough of it! Arma 3 has definitely made its way to being one of my favorite games and I highly recommend it to ANYONE who's even slightly interested, you wont regret it! 10/10
Kodi Tanerau;-;Simulation isn't the defining aspect of Arma. It's scale. The enormity of the map is the foundation for the experiences that distinguish Bohemia Interactive's flagship franchise. It's what makes radios, topographical maps, binoculars, and compasses practical equipment in an FPS. It's what allows for kilometer-long headshots and coordinated convoy raids. It's what makes using your eyes to spot hints of enemies--muzzle flashes, tracers, gunsmoke--as valuable as being a crack shot. The scale of Arma 3 dwarfs everything in the genre, including Arma 2 . Altis , a keyhole portion of which is seen in these screenshots, is a Mediterranean island-nation assembled from ruins, airports, coastal villages, solar power plants, military outposts, salt flats, and tank-friendly scrubland. It's a variegated backyard for you to play war in, but what's more significant is that Arma's landscape finally has the technology it deserves. Arma 3 represents an aesthetic overhaul of the series. Unbelievable dynamic lighting, a volumetric cloud system, genuine vehicle physics, 3D weapon optics, ragdoll, noticeably improved weapon audio, and other grainy, eye-level details await scrutiny inside Arma 3's macro elegance. The best improvement is the merciful cutting of Arma 2's rigid, Tin-Man-without-oil combat animations, which makes infantry combat more responsive in your hands. A half-year in paid pre-release has given Arma 3 time to gestate, but the final build is far from being a comprehensive reinvention of the series, and some long-standing blemishes that arise from its nature as a gargantuan simulation linger. Even on high-end hardware, my framerate dips under the spectacle of some multiplayer missions. Friendly AI units, though marginally better-behaved, still depend on the player to be their brains, an issue that's circumvented by playing Arma the way God intended it: cooperatively. With voice-connected friends and a good user-created mission, Arma 3 is an unparalleled war story generator. On Operation Fault Line with a gang of Steam pals, I had to drive a clumsy, eight-wheeled transport called a HEMTT across the map. To protect this elephantine truck we had a IFV-6c Panther, an APC with a mounted grenade launcher and 12.7mm MG. Minutes after leaving base, our tanky bodyguard eats a land mine, ruining its left track. As we get out to survey the damage, rockets streak across the valley. Everyone's okay, but the Panther is immobilized. Dumping the APC is the only option. We clump into the fragile HEMTT, burning diesel to get off the exposed ridge. Green tracers track the truck, eventually pricking some of my tires. The wheels don't deflate enough to go flat, but the suspension slumps to the left. For the rest of the mission I have to drive lopsided, constantly counter-steering just to keep the truck on the gravel road. But everyone works together to keep our war bus on track--my teammates give turn instructions, read the map, and scan the road for more mines. When we're free of immediate danger, we send someone back to base to retrieve an ATV so that we have a forward scouting element. At one point we position two machinegunners with nightvision scopes at the lip of a valley to provide cover as we drive the HEMTT down an exposed valley, then taxi them back to us on the ATV. The sequence of events, the chatter, the wounds and kills we rack up, all developed because we happened to run over a mine and our tires got shot up. Getting flexible Arma's capacity for stimulating camaraderie, atmosphere, and problem-solving, in other words, is fully intact. The feeling of ownership that arises over these moments between you and your squadmates sticks in your brain. Central to this fun is how malleable Arma continues to be for its community, which before launch day had published almost 1,500 missions to Steam Workshop . Assuming you have an internet connection, this well of content compensates for the absence of an official campaign at launch, which will integrate in three free monthly installments beginning in October. On the ground, a new stance adjustments system is the best thing that's ever happened to infantry combat in Arma. Holding the Ctrl key as a modifier while tapping W or S cycles between nine vertical stances, and you can also take a horizontal step in addition to using Q or E to lean. You feel articulate--making small body adjustments while behind cover initially feels like finger gymnastics, but the system makes more types of cover viable and more types of weapons viable in that cover. Coupled with the general smoothing of movement and the near elimination of Arma 2's uninterruptible, sluggish animations, running and gunning should finally feel comfortable to average FPS players. On the opposite end of your gun, though, AI remains a shortcoming. Arma 3's enemies share plenty of their ancestors' DNA, which means that they oscillate between being eagle-eyed snipers at one moment and static, dumb, 3D silhouettes evocative of a light gun arcade game another. Their greatest flaw is that they lack personality, which mostly resigns them to being targets rather than soldiers. A few sparks of intelligence did impress me--after we killed the rest of his squadmates, I watched a rifleman flee for the first time in Arma, setting up a tense shot where I had a narrow few seconds to snipe him in the back before he disappeared behind trees. This is the sort of human behavior I'd love to see more of, stuff like blind-firing, limping, throwing smoke grenades for cover, claiming abandoned vehicles, or looting bodies for supplies--anything that would lessen the predictability. Friendly AI is even worse, unfortunately, because they're typically your responsibility. It's absurd that my squad's medic won't patch me up when I'm bleeding right next to him unless I order him to. Pathfinding isn't reliable, either: I spent five minutes repeating the Move to and Get in vehicle commands, trying to convince a freed hostage and my squadmate to cross the map so we could finish the mission. They wouldn't budge. The crux of the issue is Arma's mile-long command menu, which scatters dozens of commands across all 10 numerical keys. Like the enemy AI, though, there are glimpses of authentic behavior. I felt like a proud parent when my AI fireteam, unprompted, broke formation and spread themselves behind cover during a raid on a cluttered factory. Breaking formation Bohemia's graphical improvements are substantial enough to make Arma 3 one of the most visually impressive games on any platform. Altis (and its little-brother island Stratis) are rendered with incredible clarity, illuminated by lighting that produces pink sunsets, blinding solar glare, and golden afternoons. I love the way the earth feels textured as you jog and crawl through it--gravel, sand, and grass all emit different sounds under your boots. I'm mostly happy with the graphical performance I've been getting on the three configurations I've been playing Arma 3 on. The caveat being that my framerate varies based on where I am on the map, the number of objects and enemies, and if I'm playing online. On a Core-i7 X990 at 3.47 GHz and two AMD Radeon 5970s on Very High settings, I've gotten 17-25 FPS on one single-player mission and 40-50 on another. Multiplayer is where I found the least-consistent performance. On a Core-i7 870 and GTX 780, I can get 55 FPS in a tight, six-player scenario on Very High, but 20 in a large-format mission like Wasteland . Tinkering with Arma 3's 25 configurable video settings allowed me to improve these numbers a little, but even dialing down the quality to standard or low on my rigs barely helped while playing large multiplayer missions. The scripting or complexity of some scenarios simply seems to bottleneck performance regardless of your settings. Some specific actions also consistently produced framerate dips for me, (Sorry ran out of words)
@TheCrimsonFuckr;-;Its Arma, so I cant recommend it, if you ever played arma withhout beeing a fanboy you know the flaws and bugs it has cause theyre still the same as in arma 2 and thats how easy it is!
iTz 1i;-;I wish I had it
B181;-;Found a chance to try RP. Bought a car and equipment before a crew bumped to my car. They stole my equipments and my clothes also my car. I've said them I need to find my kid. They said we will help. They took me a place where they stole your kidney. They stole my kidney and literally gave it to my hand. Then they took it back and put a bullet in my head. 10/10 Would take my kidney on my hand again.
Webelix;-;My favorite game since 2002, and it keeps getting better, and better, and better... Mostly thanks to Bohemia Interactive for making an open scripting command game. Then it was improved enormously by the community and their mods and missions, third party softwares, and blogs/youtubes. In my opinion, the ACRE mod made the immersion so intense that it became essential. We now also have Task Force Radio who is clearly 100% inspired from ACRE but they reacted faster to the porting to Arma 3 (probably because they are open source). The ACE guys made an amazing job at making better weapons, ballistics, medical, etc. etc. etc. Now AGM seems to be taking over that role in Arma 3 (another open source project) Also, VTS with its game master for real time mission creation and adapting, which inspired the MCC makers, and later Zeus... And finally Play withSIX (previously known as Six Updater) which made it so easy to bring all the community mods launchable, and allowed us to create repositories for keeping up with updates and mod changes for long nights of great fun. Even though BI eventually took and implemented pretty much most of what I just described in the last paragraph, it could only be made possible in the first place, because how open this game was made by them. What comes around goes around I guess. And maybe that is why they are having the MakeArmaNotWar contest where they are giving out some money. I just hope that the original community innovators who actually made this game better get some credit/price. IMO, BI started with an excellent idea with Operation Flashpoint, they kept improving the engine over the years, and the openness and the community is what made it what it is today, my favorite game.
SneakyAzShiite;-;Best $60 I have spent on a game. There is just so much you can do with arma right out of the package - King of the Hill, Altis Life, Wasteland etc. Then there are many options being created by community members in the form of modifications; guns, vehicles, gamemodes. If you're on the fence i suggest you just buy it. There really is a community for just about everyone in Arma.
wilkins;-;Badass game with badass graphics and badass mods and badass sound. Buy it
Lery;-;This is a damn good and realistic game. Very good war simulator and graphics are awesomeness when they are at high and when graphics are set to ultra or better they are fantastic! This is one of the best games I have played!
Lyrekem;-;Arma 3 is just great. With the amount of customizable styles of gameplay, anyone can play it. With the oncoming Marksman DLC along with the Update, there is even more customization. If that isn't enough for you, download mods! Unlike games like Call of Duty and the like that make you pay for character models or weapon camos, in Arma 3 you just download it yourself. The mods can add any amount of uniforms or weapons or vehicles or nitty gritty details that people like me like to take note of. Arma 3 isn't all about streamlined gameplay. Sure, you spawn in this Invade and Annex server where all of you get onto a Blackfoot and fly towards the objective. But there can be any other sort of factor that can either throw you off track or...well, anything flying at 200MPH and exploding upon contact rarely makes the situation better. You may land safely, or, you may get shot down and go Black-Hawk-Down style to the floor. That, in my opinion, is one of the greatest things ever. To be able to survive a helicopter crash and be all disoriented with bullets flying around and explosions all over. Even if the whole process repeats, there is a chance something will change. Boom. Your Combat Life Saver takes one in the face and dies. Your second Combat Life Saver also gets owned. Your Squad Leader dies as well. Instead of reorganizing and heading to the objective, your team has to run to the forests or the nearest thing that looks like cover to take a breather before moving on. Even then on-out, the situation is all different because your team is down by three and the odds have been shifted. Moral of the story: Your whole squad should be Combat Life Savers.
Hiretsun;-;ABANDON ALL HOPE!!!!  THE CHILDREN, SAVE YOURSELVES!!!!!!!!!!!! THE KEBABS ARE ALL AROUND US!!!!!!!!!
Furious Don;-;I am a army vet and have been longing for some military action for years since leaving the service. I waited too long and should have played this sooner because it is almost everything I desire from a military simulator. The other day I was thinking how great it is being back in the army without the disadvantages and useless activities that army life brings. No drills, no inspections and no hurry up and wait attitude and especially no getting yelled at because you missed a dust bunny in a corner behind a shelf somewhere. First The BAD~ Unfortunately as good as this simulator is there is one major glaring problem which will make you pull out your hair constantly. What I'm talking about here is the really dumb AI. I am really not sure how the developers completely overlooked this aspect of the game. The enemy AI is extremely stupid and has magic aimbotting skills. One time I was doing some scenario and enemy troops have been called to the area to look for me, so I was about 500 m away laying in prone position behind some rocks and looking at them with my binoculars watching their movements. The AI looked like they where basically fighting their own coding. They would walk, then spin, then fire a couple rounds at me and then continue walking. Rinse and repeat this till I finally left. Another time I was in prone position in a house on the second floor with no prior enemy contact, All doors closed, somehow the AI knew where I was laying on the floor and headshotted me with an M60 through the wall. So far I have talked about the enemy AI, but once you get control of a squad you will start screaming at your pixel friends and people in your house will think your ptsd is acting up again. Fear not, we all have these outbursts playing with an AI squad in arma 3. They are simply the most useless squad members on the planet. They act like if you actually took civilians off the street, gave them a rifle and started throwing commands at them in a war zone. They are clueless and useless. The squad control UI is horrible and during heated exchanges you will be fumbling with numbers and f# keys on your keyboard trying to give quick commands. Although are AI improvement mods which slightly fix the AI like ASR AI 3. This will make the enemy AI slightly smarter but unfortunately the squad AI is still very boneheaded. There is also the problem of glitches and bugs. They occur often and sometimes completely break your game. There are times where I had to restart a whole campaign because my inventory would stop working or again AI would not follow its coding and either get stuck or get into a car and proceed to run me over. The worst are the UI bugs because they literally break your game and you usually have to restart the scenerio. I have also had a couple crashes and game freezing issues. The GOOD~ Now that we have that out of the way this is why this game is one of the best games I ever played. Personally I have been in the military for a couple years and know how things work. This game is simply amazing. Although I haven't played multiplayer yet (waiting on my new mic) I have watched videos of different scenario's and mods like altis life. After playing arma 3 for 27 hours and playing user made scenario's like pilgrimage and whole lotta stratis with mods like TPW mods, allintextures, blastcore, JSRS3 DragonFyre and some other mods I am simply blown away by this game. The mods listed with whole lotta stratis will make your gameplay insane. You are thrown into an all out war. The first time I played it I was literally blown out of my seat from the sequence of events that fell before me. I remember pausing the game sitting in disbelief on how amazing the game is. This is just an example of my most recent in game events In the first 15 min of gameplay of whole lotta stratis this is as short as possible synopsis on what occured. -Inserted in dinghy with 4 squad members during night time a see distant battle on land. Its pitch black and the only lights are near the shore where I see a little village and where my rebel contact is marked on the map. Even further I see lights glaring by as tracer rounds fly by, explosions erupted and war rages on. -Head to LZ and talk to rebel contact. -Get mission to cover LZ from enemy so that a civilian can get extracted -Suddenly interrupted by explosions on the outside of the hut that I was in talking with rebel. -Run out, tell squad to take cover. -See enemy Apache in the distance and its firing rockets at my parked dingy parked beside shore about 75m away. -Hear explosions and run for cover behind some house while Apache flies closer and hovers above us firing its machine gun. -Then see the Ghost Hawk (heli) is flying over to pickup civilian for said extraction mission. Wondering how the hell will be cover the extraction point if there is an Apache above us. -But its too late, Apache turns around and fires multiple rockets and shoots down the extraction heli we were waiting for. I was confused on what to do, no way of taking it out and started thinking that we will probably be dead any second now after literally 10 min of gameplay. -Suddenly out of distance over the vast ocean horizon I see rockets flying towards the Apache and it gets hit. The Apache turns around and tries flying away while failing to time its flare release, then BAM another rocket hits it. -Apache goes behind some cliffs trying to emergency land but its too late as another rocket hits it and it explodes -Then I see my saviors as 2 friendly Apaches fly by over a hilltop and zoom by towards another mountain. -I continue with my tasks and then hear huge explosions in the distance where a couple second ago my saviors where headed to. I see flashes in the distance. ---- I have other stories like getting for example hunted by a tank after I took out a patrol unit but they called for support before their demise. In my profile I have a screenshot on how the tank almost ran over me when I was hiding from it, laying in some bushes. It's pretty hilarious and was scary at the time. This game is simply amazing and even though the AI is a massive, almost game breaking con everything else is very good. If you are a veteran and miss the good days of service go ahead and get this because you will be satisfied. This is the best game I own on steam and in general. Get the mods, get a mic (for multiplayer) and have a blast. One thing to note is that I can see this game being NOT FOR EVERYONE. You do need to have patience because there is a major learning curve. Every key on the keyboard and mouse is used. But once you have some basic commands down and learn to properly navigate in terrain while avoiding getting killed the game becomes challenging but fun. When I started I was dying very quickly even with turned down difficulty. Now I simply allowed myself to raise the difficulty and even though I do die I feel like I'm surviving longer. Usually its my squad AI that screws me over. Anyway hope you enjoy the game as much as I am. Before purchasing I advise you to download the demo, which can be found online and which will allow you to see if you want to learn how to play it.
Jon;-;joined a wasteland server, met a guy screaming allah ak bar, Kamakazied into blufor's base. 10/10 would jihad again.
Selina Kyle;-;In this game, you're not the hero anymore.
Sir Percivale of Wales;-;Very First Minutes: Oh god oh god who shot me who shot me ?! 30 mins. later: I see you but I won't shoot you because I can't. 60 mins. later: ing campers ing CAMPERS ! 1 months later: SITREP Grind 061357, Enemy 200 metres R.U.A
-potus-;-;will never grow old of this game. my parents will.
President Ab;-;My story on Arma 3... This was not made up, I wrote this review for what it was likef or the first time... Before the war started... I remember watching on T.V. Where landing craft was landing on the Beaches and men were getting killed... I landed in the airport and I remember how people were signing up for the army. I ran through the grass in California, rushing to the airport to head to Afghanstan. After I landed, we landed in Europe somwhere. It get us half an hour to get though training. I fell asleep after a day. I woke up hearing the transports going by of Officers. I got up and looked around, I decided to go aboard my Heilcopter. I looked outside, the driver closed the Heilcopter down after my new sqaud got in. I looked as we passed the terrain, beatiful. Then we were going accross the sea. I still had my pistol out and tried to quickly figure out where my gun was. Then, I saw land, the same land and beach I saw on T.V. We landed a mile or two away from the beach. I didnt have time to figure out my equitment so I rushed with my sqaud. My sqaud was getting ahead of me. Heilcopters and airplanes were everywhere above me. I kept running, my sqaud split up, I kept falling my objective to follow my leader. I looked ahead and saw fences and tons of troops. I finally got my gun out and rushed accross grass and fences. All of a suddden, gunshots started to fire, I didnt know where so I kept running. A sharp pain in my hand and I dropped to the floor taking cover. I kept crawling until my worst enemy was in front of me: The fence. I decided to get up and run, I kept running until I reached the troops running in the dirt. Then, my sqaudron started to move out to the town. On my way I saw men surrounding a man. The man was dead, I heard gunshots all over again. The man checked the boddy and the dead man got up. The sniper was shot by his own teamate. I rushed to where the sqaudron was and they healed the man, appolgizeing. I kept rushing through, all of a sudden, "Mission accpomplished men, onto the next objective"! I lost my team everybody spreaded out. A Heilcopter was picking a man up, I rushed to it and it took off without me. I decided to head back to where I ran through the fences. I kept running, I noticed that I was thirsty, I was tired. I kept running, trying to figure out my radio. Pressing buttons all over. All of a sudden, I pressed one button and talked into it: "Hello, Hello this is Robert, this is my first time fighting and I need a medic!" I repeated the same sentence this time louder. No reply came to me and I was worried I would die Sweat came accross my face as I looked into a empety Heilcopter. I got in and he took me further into the fighting, not back to H.Q. I never knew when the battle was gonna be over. I frogot my Journal on the other Heilcopter and noticed this Heilocopter from H.Q. The ride was longer, we passed many farms in ruins and a city. The heilcopter stopped and dropped me off, alone. Another Heilcopter came in and quickly a man jumped out of it. I remember a attack Heilcopter above me. I ran to the village and was shot multiple times. I turned quickly and got on the ground, I was shot in the back. I fell asleep. I woke up back at H.Q. wondering what was happening. "go go go!" A man shouted as cars passed by. I was eager to get back into the Chopper. I got in and there was a bigger, new sqaud in the Heilcopter. They wispered plans to eachother. I started to write my first battle but time went by and everybody got out. "Robert, go go go!" The man shouted, I got out and the heilcopter waited a second then lifted off the ground. This time we landed in the same spot I stayed with my team this time but the same comamnder came on the radio. "Great job you have taken the objective". Our team ran to the forest silently. Our sqaud commander took his binoculars and looked ahead. "Retreat!" Kept repeating on our radios. A half an hour later, armour was spotted and I  myself. We were under fire and multiple jets were spotted. A artillery shot fired and the civillian that came with us fell to the ground. The Marine got his SAW and fired it. We moved into the town and we thought the two heilcoptesrs were enemy heilcopters. We got into one of the Heilcopters and we waited for a long time for many people to get in. Ranger sqaud got in with snipers and a civillian got in. WE lifted off the ground and this time it felt alot more scarier. All of a sudden while I was about to say somthing a huge hole went into the glass and hit the machine gun and almost killed the sniper. Bullets were everywhere and there were jets outside picking us off. I wanted to get out but everything was down. Nobody moved and we were going on. The heilcopter exploded and we all flew out. A pack of us layed there. I was gonna call for a medic but I couldnt reach it. Nobody could find us. We were all lost. All I could do was finish my story and await for sombody to find me. Thanks for reading this was my first time and im eager to do my 2nd adventure and then get some mods like the zombie mod and Colonial mod!!!
Himmuguegeli |;-;ArmA 3, the most universal shooter you might ever need to own. Back in the old days, it was half life which everyone had to own, because this piece had plenty of content which you were able to play in so many different ways that its almost impossible to count them all. And ArmA nower days is pretty much the same, even if youre not a fan of great and realistic combat simulations it offers massive free content via its big community which wont stop generating content until and after the next ArmA will be released. But be aware this game is a hefty performance eater and it can cause you alot of headache, because of its bugs. But I have no doubt right now, that most of the bugs are wiped out and the rest is still on its way to be fixed. Because this game really gets the love of its makers after its final release. Theres still an Addon to be awaited as well as a very nice DLC and Im positively looking forward to it.
neb;-;No-one plays Arma for what it actually is 10/10
|HKT|sarge;-;This game is the "go to" as far as combining the realism of military simulator and First Person Shooter. If you purchase this game, you have developers that continue to improve the game and a community of mod'ers providing great content.
Phantom Six;-;Lots of missions, mods, and content. Much more, its Arma :P just beware your typical arma glitches but my favorite games to play. Too much for me to say why its good.
Johnthebaptist;-;The most realistic shooter i have ever played. it is not optimized very well especially if you are running older hardware but if you have a decent enough computer you will never forget the experiences this game will bring you. My first day A3 i was on wasteland gametype just running around with my pistol. Out of nowhere a helicopter loaded with enemies was flying directly towards me and i decided it would be a good idea to shoot at drawing attention to myself. Turns out this was a good idea as the helicopter heads directly for me as if it was about to land ontop of my head, Instead it takes a nosedive into the ground killing everyone inside. 10/10 would shoot down choppers again(with a pistol)
Cardboardimus CSGOFAST;-;Sold my csgo knife for 3 copies for friends and I; they never play it with me 11/10 would waste 120 dollars again
MickeyRoadToNova;-;the price is to high
BornLucky;-;The game is amazing!!! And the EpochMod is even better :) Check out the server :) 103.13.103.35:2352 !!!
James C. is (DE/LT);-;You can play this title as a CoD/BF Shooter, a RTS, a MilSim etc. and its perfect in every of this senses! The game got made so that you can play it on every PC/Laptop you could imagine. It runs everywhere but of course the graphics aren't as good as on a gaming pc. The game fearures (the in my opinion) biggest and greatest community ever. There are hundrets of great addons, and they are all free! In conclusion: This game has everything for everyone. Deticated Server for LAN-Parties, very variable difficulty, great graphics, a giant open world, a free in-game editor and much more. Simply a must-have!
zisb;-;I can highly reccomend this game if you are into any sort of simulators, or realistic combat. I have had extreme amounts of fun with all of the user created missions, with or without friends. I reccomend once you have purchased this game to follow these steps to have an early look at the Zeus free DLC as it can add a whole extra level of enjoyment with the mission ever changing due to your actions, in the state of mind of the Dungeons and Dragons Role Playing Board Game. This is ow you can have early access to the DLC: >Purchase and download ARMA 3 >Right Click "ARMA 3" in your steam library >Click "Properties" >Up the top, you will see a "Betas" Tab, click it >The click the dropdown arrow next to "Opt out of all betas" and change it so you are opted into the betas >Click ok and return to your library, you should see an update for ARMA 3, around 1GB >If not, launch hte game, the update should now start >Once the update has finished, launch ARMA 3 >From the main menu play multiplayer >From the server browser, find any server that is marked with a [DEV] tag, this will be running the Zeus DLC >Play around on a couple servers, find which one takes your fancy >Enjoy! That should be all I need to say, oh, have i told you to buy this game yet? Jus jus just.... do it. Take a leap of faith.
CrobraStrike27;-;I am truely amazed by how endless the possibilities are with ArmA 3. With the right mods, or just the right friends, you can make anything out of ArmA. If you are looking to play, I suggest you try out Altis life if you like to role-play, Recommended Altis Servers - Black Water Gaming - The Revolution Gaming - Black List Gaming Or perhaps you are looking to do some military type stuff, then I suggest either find a milsim unit. Recommended Military Simulation Units - 40 Commando 31.186.251.180 (TS IP) Or perhaps you are looking just to sit back and kill people. For that, I do not have any recommendations, but look into King of the Hill and Wasteland.
RiSk;-;Great FPS sim with a great sandbox world and a bunch of mod potencial to play various games whitin a game and enjoy them all. Score: 8/10.
Vladamir Stupuko;-;The Games Gay
Meow;-;Buying this game was probably one of my most amazing and worth while ideas. I would like to thank PsiSyndicate (https://www.youtube.com/user/PsiSyndicate) and Katt (https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCWogxZyjHckCWxQYnBHmosw) for getting me into the game through their videos and streams. Now, onto the review. Many people complain about the high price tag on Arma 3 (Not including the DLC), but I assure you it is worth every cent of it, however if you cannot afford the game through steam you can pick it up from several diffrent websites for about 1/2 price. I admitt the pricing is a little too steep if you include the DLC however searching around for the right price is as easy as 1 2 3. One other 'let down' for Arma 3, is (If you don't have a gaming rig) that you need a nice computer to even run it at low graphics at over 20fps (Multiplayer). The reason this is such a let down is because with a low-end PC your render distance has to be lower if you want to run the game, this is a huge disadvantage when you are facing people who have bigger PC's because they can see you before you see them. Although there are two up-sides of having low graphics; When I tested Arma 3 in low graphics I found that since the render distance is lower the plants and bushes un-render sooner allowing the player to see people hiding in the bush very easily. The other up-side is that if you run it in low graphics you would have your shadows off, this allows people who are hiding in the shadows be seen as if they were standing in the light. This is probably my biggest issue with Arma 3 because it creates unfair multiplayer gameplay, however it does go both ways with advantages and disadvantages for both high and low graphics settings. The high 'Moddablity' is a huge upside of Arma 3 as it allows for endless fun and new things to try out. At the current moment I am running 142 mods on my Arma 3 with only a few minor bugs here and there, but thats to be expected with that many mods. Another thing is the missions that members can create through the built in editor, you can download many mission files for endless gameplay. These missions can include heli races, races, combat missions, skill building missions, modded missions and many more. The realism in the game ranging from the bullet drop, bullet damage, the AI and aircraft flight. All of these and more if what creates an amazing game. Overall I recommend this game to anyone with the money and a PC that will be able to run the game with at least medium graphics running at 30fps or more.
Psycho;-;Very fun game to play with some friends :D
Elite;-;This game is horribly unoptimized, very buggy, and just plain doesn't work sometimes. Most MP servers are garbage and lag like hell, the single player campain isn't very good, and the vanilla game isn't worth anything near 60$. Think of Arma 3 as a foundation for things to be built on top of. This game gets SO much better with mods and other addons. This game is without a doubt the best military simulator out right now, and it gets many times better if you play with a group of people. It has pretty much infinite replayability and more things to do than you'll ever be able to. It just has so much to offer and experience. I've found that playing with a group of people in Arma 3 is an amazing experience that no other shooter can offer. Arma 3 really is the ultimate sandbox in which the possibilites are endless. If you can overlook it's flaws and get over them, you'll find Arma 3 to be one of the best games you've ever played.
Deranking :D;-;A great alternative to the old Arma 2 feel. Very realistic. Few bugs here and there but that's arma :)
Nuclear;-;Great game!Altis life and Wasteland are by far the funnnest
MceraWV;-;Was driving around with a friend in a car. Drove off a small hill, and proceded to stop moving. Asked why we had stopped moving. Friend answered: "We appear to have lost a tire" Walked 5km to the next objective. 10/10 would lose tire and walk to objective again.
hieufox;-;Best thing ever created by Zeus
enchanter of ranks;-;I spent four hours today blowing myself up, running at people with the starter pistol you get and driving some guy around that I didn't know whatsoever for approximately 1 hour of that time. I don't think he knew where we were going, I don't think he cared, he just didn't want to be alone. I repaired that Offroader more times than I could count, and I finally wanted to talk to him to break the 60 minutes of silence we had together. Turns out you can't talk in game more than 3 times on a server because if you do, you get kicked. I got kicked. 10/10, would drive around for an hour with a guy I don't know and get kicked the moment I say something again.
Col. Collier | ASUS #ROG;-;ARMA 3 is a tactical based military simulator with many features. You can play alone or in a team, it's entirely up to you. There are many server's that allow various gamemodes - even custom gamemodes and modservers. The choice of many helo's and vehicles of any kind make ARMA 3 immersive and realistic. One of my favourite gamemodes is a roleplay based mode, called Altis Life. There are two main islands in ARMA 3: Altis and Stratis. The goal of Altis Life is making money and interacting with other players. You can also play as a cop or a medic and much more, depending on your taste.
| Woohoopy;-;10/10 Wish I could afford this game.
dank memes for these dreams;-;This game was especially great for me, recreating a perfect moment in my life... I had two towers, and a c130, and I flew it into the tower.... It's really great to see the perspective my grandfather saw as he flew his last flight.. rip :(
HylleBaby (Away);-;Graphics 8.9/10 Pretty game Gameplay 4/10 too many bugs it feels very unstable at stages Singleplayer 4/10 HARD But fun at stages Multiplayer 8/10 Only Lives Up To Its Potential With Friends Controls 5/10 You use many of you buttons and many in the wrong place Great Multiplayer With Friends But A Bit Too Many Bugs
Coondron;-;I remember getting ARMA 2 on special back in the day, played it once then put it on the shelf. Then I seen this mod called DayZ and I have been sucked into the ARMA world ever since. More to the point, ARMA 3. A vast improvement on its predecessor but still a game that takes a lot of trial and error before you really get the hang of it and can appreciate the engine. The Single Player Campaign was slowly worked on and released over time, with fixes and improvements over a period of time to end up with a really nice and although linear storyline, they really add elements that allow you to verge away from the main storyline and engage in heaps of other tasks and activities ( I had to play the main campaign twice to appreciate it) The main reason to get ARMA 3 though is the mods. From Breaking Point, EPOCH to a heap of 'mission maps' and game modes, ARMA really throws a lot of diversity at you and is great bang for your buck.
WeGucci;-;these rocks. Step on rock and died 66/6
Rabbi Scholmogoldsteinshekelberg;-;You can fight a war naked 10/10
Zarbon;-;Great game, I just hope they fix all the bugs ASAP! :)
Yogurt;-;NICE SANDBOX GAME,I HOPE THE NEW DLC 'TANOA' WILL BE FREE FOR EVERY ARMA3 USER.
SIDEKILLER;-;I have a love hate for this game. Dont get me wrong this by far best mil sim out here other than "Project Reality 1.0" when it comes to PVP. With mods that offered in ArmAholic.com and many missons that offered in workshop this game can quite addicting i mean you can spend hours among hours on ArmA 3. i almost was late for work cause i was having so much enjoyment with this game. One thing i don't understand why they will charge so much for this game i got it for 20 bucks on {LINK REMOVED} .net. my only cons are: - The Braindead (dont care about it own life nor teammates) AI i spend hours on hours looking online for Ai Mods for this game to better my play exp. -Not many Jets -Not many weapons right out the box (go to armaholic.com for weapons packs) -Server Broswer it just hell of a mess -Still a bit unoptimized -This Game is more CPU focused then GPU so have a good CPU and your good to go -Needs a better VOIP system -Needs to teamup with Punkbuster -The Island just dont seems right for the current confilct offered in the game -Wish there was a life walking around "women" and men etc walking around -Wish not every town look the same But be smart dont throw 60 bucks at this look around for deals like i got {LINK REMOVED} .net Cheapdigitaldownload.com 100% legit
Darty;-;This is a not a game. It's a tool. A tool to create ANY military scenario you want.
Coby;-;This game is amazing, def hop in some altis life, if you are looking for a amazing server, search "Easy's Altis Life" he is a amazing person with a amazing server, you will find me on there a lot! ;)
PHANTOM (AKA SIG);-;By far the most realistic military simulation game that's out today. If you're a serious military enthusiast this is your game. It also has the most impressive modding community I've ever seen for a game. This is a true PC exclusive. Arma 3 is more than a military game. If you are someone who is very creative and has a vision of an exciting scenario in your mind, this game will give you the tools to make that vision come to life. It does require a VERY powerful CPU to be clocked very high for it to run smoothly. It's rough around the edges, but at the end of the day it gives you so much freedom that many games fail to deliver. 9/10
[NZ-K] Greenswampy;-;I got perm banned from a server for being on the top of a gametracker leaderboard. Changed Ip got on server again. Months later some guy goes that sounds like GREENSWAMPY! All nzk clan is trying to get new IP 10/10 would get banned again for putting that admin in 11th place. I got banned for trying to vote kick an admin using a votekick feature that doesnt even work. 10/10 Try to make a working vote kick. I once crashed a car into admins heli. Got banned for kamakazi 10/10 would crash again Got banned for vdm but got vdmed the second I got banned. 10/10 Would be banned mistakely again 10/10 would be vdmed again Got banned for running a guy over when vdm was diabled for reason "VDM" 10/10 would vehicle knockout someone again. Great game but watch out for those admins.
Canadalism;-;Arma 3 is an amazing military simulator game (first person & third), it offers an amazing experience from driving a tank to flying a gunship. It offers a three part campaign (Survive, Adapt, Win) which is made of between 20-30 missions. There is also a diverse community of clans, military styled groups and even more. There is also an option to play third person by pressing ENTER (NUMPAD) but of course all keys can be re-assigned. This is an amazing game and I highly recommend you buy it.
Wibble;-;After playing this for a very long time I have come to the conclusion that the community has completely ruined this game. This game is great and it has had a lot of attention put to it but the community is unbelievably stupid when it comes to gamemodes. There are only four gamemodes available in multiplayer and they're all flawed up the . ================================================= Gamemode 1: Survival (Zombies and Wasteland) Zombie modes are boring and Wasteland is extremely boring. ================================================= Gamemode 2: King of the Hill This is the closest thing you'll get to proper PVP action but the leveling system is beyond awful! Newer players are utterly crushed by higher level players who are all wearing ghillie suits, holding high powered sniper rifles and flying around in jets with unlimited missles. New players are given a starter weapon which is totally useless and you don't get anything good until you reach level 13 which wouldn't be a problem if the leveling didn't take FOREVER! Then you have the massive problem with team stacking because players are given a big XP reward if they win the game, so they all stack on one team making it impossible for other teams to win. Overall King of the Hills leveling and cash system is awful and the best way to beat it, is to camp in the cap zone until you reach level 13 but that will take you a good ten hours. ================================================= Gamemode 3: Roleplay Its just like DarkRP in Garry's Mod except its super laggy to the point where its unplayable and the servers are all ran by teenagers with serious issues because they setup these convoluted Police recruitment systems, then they have there police force act like the KGB. Overall Atlis Roleplay is a waste of time because of lag and an endless stream of trolls who do everything in there power to make the game unplayable. ================================================= Gamemode 4: Battle Royale I hope you like waiting in spectate or waiting for the server to unlock. ================================================= OVERALL Community: The community ruined this game with flawed and boring gamemodes. If you're looking for the real Arma experince you have to join a clan but clans are really strict, only play at set times and don't like people who are new to the Arma series. Game: I could go on for hours about the awful bugs, UI, DLC and price of the DLC but instead I'm going to talk about serious connection problems and the System Requirements. Connection Problems: Even if you find a server thats in your country and you have a ping of 20 you'll still lag like crazy making the already broken hitboxes even harder to hit. System Requirements: Thankfully I have a super computer and I can run this game on Ultra settings but this game will go to war with your CPU and Graphics card! I miss Arma 2 Operation Arrowhead because people used to play cooperative gamemodes like Insurgency...I miss Insurgency....It almost brings a tear to my eye. EDIT: After searching for countless hours I finally found a co-op Arma mission people play called Annex, its pretty good but this game is still NOT worth your money!
Too Big To Fail;-;The best massively open world first and third person shooter I have every played. Arma 3 makes Call of Duty Advanced Warfare and Battle Field 4 look likes child play. The amount of detail in all there helicopters, Tanks, Troop Transports, characters, weapons, maps, lighting, effects, go-carts is overwhelming! Sometimes when I'm flying over a city getting ready to para-drop into a hell fire of tanks and jets, I feel like I'm watching a HD action movie of the year! I don't what I love most about this game the most, might be laying in the grass on a hill a mile away from any conflict staring down my scope of my rifle calculating the wind and the bullet drop, then taking the shot. No game has every made me feel so rewarded when I complete a mission. Amra 3 missions are not these 5 minute deathmatches there long fought out high action battles. Also there map is SO BIG its insane, and its not just one island, there's others that are insanely big, I cant even imagine how long it would take to go from one side of the main island to the other flying in a Helicopter going over 200+ miles per hour. Lastly very unique complex non-repetitive terrain. LOVE IT, CARE FOR IT, BUY IT!
Sir Gandalf the Gay;-;Pretty much the best game I've ever played. Looks like you're playing in a picture, and tactics is a really big part. Gets a 100x more fun with some mates. A lot of different gamemodes, and oh the possibilities with all the different mods! Now you can also fire from choppers and ground vehicles with the new update. So gather some friends, buy the game, hop on a server, and get some simply epic experiences.
Graeve;-;ARMA 3 is a great game but it is not for everyone. + Beautiful Visuals that stay in the realm of the realistic: Alot of games that have been released lately are quite beautiful but many of the visuals in these games are overdone and embellished ARMA manages to retain it's beauty while never really going over the edge into unrealistic. +Gameplay Depth: If you've always wanted to experience real lifelike military combat then ARMA is for you, combat in this game is slow, tactile, and unforgiving if you go into combat with a "Call of Duty" "Rambo" one man army mentality you will die. It is complex to the point of near ridiculousness with the game using nearly every key on the keyboard for keybinds, real physics, wind mapping, realistic scope alignment and several other things that bring the game as close to real combat as most people would ever want to be. + Map size: If you have never played an ARMA game before then you're in for something special, this game boasts the biggest map of any game I think I've ever played coming in just shy of being twice the size of Washington D.C.. + Steam Workshop: The game has full Workshop support with everything from new character models to new missions I haven't seen many guns or vehicles but I'm sure they'll come with time. - Accessibility: As I said at the beginning of this review this game is by no means for everyone the amount of content is staggering for a new player and getting used to the controls can be a nightmare if you're not dedicated to the process. - Limited community: As with every game there are good people and bad people in the community, you will find several people that are willing to help you learn the game and you will find alot of people willing to have patience with you but with that being said ARMA has a really dedicated and hardcore fanbase/community. You will get on servers where no one is going to help you, you will get on servers where no one is going to pay any attention to you, and you will get on servers where you are going to be yelled at/shot at for not doing your part there are communities in this game that use real military tactics have a full chain of command and have real military training. - Performance: This game is NOT easy to run I play on an Intel i7 4.5Ghz and an EVGA GTX670 4GB model and I have trouble maxing the game out in SINGLE PLAYER, in multiplayer you'll find yourself turning nearly everything to low just to squeeze every bit of performance out of your system that you can if you are not running top of the line tech I do not suggest playing this game you may end up disappointed. - You make your own fun: If you are not familiar with ARMA then you need to read up a little before your purchase, this game does not have a full campaign (Yet) and offers very little gameplay outside of multiplayer, while the game does have and extensive scenario creator if you are not familiar with how to use this feature the game is going to seem completely barren in terms of gameplay it is very much so a bare bones package if you don't understand how to make scenarios HOWEVER if you teach yourself how to do this the possibilities are virtually limitless. - Quite offputting to new players: I remember my first few days of playing ARMA II and I remember fairly vividly how much I hated them, trying to take the game in is alot for a person who has been used to playing typical games all their life if you put alot of time into the game you'll find enjoyment but it's a bit of a rocky road at first. Overall ARMA III is a great game that I personally LOVE but I can't speak for everyone, some will love this game and some will absolutely hate it, it IS a great game if you can manage to get past the steep learning curve. When considering purchasing this game keep in mind that alot of people that give it bad reviews probably don't play games like this very often this is not Battlefield and nor is it Call of Duty and that's okay it is it's own genre and deserves to be treated as such. 7.9/10
Sniperhunter;-;Shooting is as fun and precise as ever, and alongside the abundance of gigantic explosions, vehicle missions and intense firefights, it feels like the closest thing most of us will ever get to starring in an action film. In that sense, ArmA III is the classic Call of Duty formula at its best, with an important, defining difference: The emphasis on drone warfare, the exotic-but-grounded weaponry and the attention to detail in the believably high-tech signage and architecture makes ArmA III feel strikingly plausible even when it strays into non-historical settings. A number of other smaller design tweaks highlight the clever design of class creation in ArmA III. For instance perks now only affect your character, leaving it to the attachments system to affect your weapon. Thus if you want to do something like fast reload, which will make longtime players look for the Sleight of Hand perk, youll need to hook up your weapon with a fast clip attachment. The Kill Streak system has also been wisely replaced by Score Streaks, making every match less about how many kills and in what consecutive order you get them in, and more about doing whatever nets you the highest score. This accomplishes a majorly important feat: it makes every game less about your Kill / Death ratio. Sure, it still wont keep people from obsessing over it, but if you want to get it higher youre going to need to help with objectives. ArmA IIIs Zombies mode is the deepest the franchise has seen, even if its campaign narrative is reliant on the self-imposed stories arising from your roaming, zombie-slaughtering adventures with pals. The team at BI could have played it safe and ArmA III would have sold well, but instead they challenged assumptions and pushed the series forward in awesome new directions. Itll be hard to return to a campaign where I dont have the ability to shape it, and I simply cant imagine going back to the old loadout system now that Pick 10 exists. Combined with the host of subtle and overt improvements to the array of other systems, the additions to make it more appealing to Esports, and the more fleshed out Zombies mode, this is not just a fantastic Call of Duty game, but one of the best shooters of the last decade. 9.3 Amasing
Evoke |LMC|;-;amazing game and a great improvement from arma2, the controls are a bit confusing at first if youre used to arma2 but after getting used to them i noticed that arma3 has at least twice the fps of arma2 on my laptop and i have the graphics settings set to med/high instead of low/med as i did on arma2 still waiting for the modding community to become as active on this as it is on arma2
GOON;-;great game
koenigscat;-;Tried to pet a goat and died. 10/10
Zephyrnix;-;This is what Battlefield 3 should have been before EA got thier nasty little hands on it. This game is as close to the military as your gonna get without giving up your life for 4 or so years (at least from a civilian's point of view). Enough content to cover land, sea, and air. And gives you WAY to many options to play the way YOU want to play (for example. I play intel style). Worth buying.
iluvOP;-;10/10, its bretty gud. MP is still broken performance wise on gamemodes like invade&annex (AKA domination)
Marcos159753 # CSGORage.com;-;Best FPS ever, SO ing cool
horribleaim;-;My car blew up when i honked at someone. 10/10
Joycenator;-;Scrubland running simulator 2014 is the most realistic scrubland running simulator on the market today. There are two whole islands to explore with varying degrees of grasslands, scrublands, deserts and even pine forests! You can even run through the scrublands as a rabbit or a chicken. Your imagination is truly the limit in this game. 10 despawn seagulls/10.
MONKEY;-;Must buy if you like military tactical shooters
SurelyExploding;-;Arma 3, contrary to popular belief, is a very good game. It really just depends on who you are, or who you play with. If you spend your entire time playing Arma 3 hoping to have an experience similar to Dayz, you won't have much fun. What you really need to do is join servers that are running gamemodes such as Domination, and coordinate with your entire team. Keep in mind that Arma 3 is nothing like Battlefield or Call of Duty because you have to pay attention to the global picture of the entire map rather than just what you are currently aiming at. You have to talk to your squad, even if it is people you don't even know very well, because everyone contributes to the well being of the squad. All in all, Arma 3 is an extremely fun game as long as you play it correctly.
iWoundPwn;-;As the 3rd installment to the Arma series the quality that this game brings to the table is unpresidented in any other Arma game. With the RV4 it adds in DirectX 11 to bring stunning new visuals never seen before in the franchise. The clunky mechanics from Arma 2 have been reworked and are now fluid as ever in Arma 3. Although the game was rough at launch with performance the series of patches have vastly improved performance and by far is the smoothest Arma to date! Multiplayer is better than ever with the new vehicles new guns! Overall i'd recommend this product to anyone who likes realistic shooters!
Cocomunches;-;*salutes* Pvt. Cocomunches reporting for duty sir!!! If JROTC has taught me anything, it's that I WANT TO JOIN THE ARMY. ARMY STRONG. I'm a real pilot in REAL life. *Crashes helicopter* FRIENDLY FIRE SOLDIER.....DONT GO AWOL ON ME.
Whitepower;-;11/10 It may have bugs It may have  requirments But Its got more mods like Altis life, A3L and Battle Royale It goes on sale for like 17.99 You can't really get bored of it. Played all of the arma series This one is optimised and graphics are beautiful. ELEVEN OUT OF F***ING TEN
[IGG] James;-;Whilst still not as refined as it's predecessor Arma 3 offers a host of improvements in it's engine and graphics. The community is growing and you can expect to find a vast array of experiences from the many game-modes on offer: CTI (Capture the Island) KOTH (King of the Hill) Life Roleplaying Battle Royale Team Deathmatch Zeus COOP Patrol Ops COOP Invade and Annex COOP To really appreciate this game find a good group of people to play with and it'll probably become the best gaming investment you ever made!
Archi;-;This game is the best war simulator you can get on steam, it cost alot, but it's worth it. Spend 100 hours in this game, enjoyed every single minute. Recommended mods for this amazing game: Breaking point(Kinda fun) Battle Royale(Most intensive  ever) Epoch(Same as Breaking point, but with building, so it's abit better.) Arma3Life(Best roleplay, alot of new cars, guns. Well it was fun atleast, when it was closed beta now it's kinda shity.)
Boppy;-;Fantastic mil-sim game. Sure you may complain about the bugs there are and how the game may look bad, but I've had some of the best times in my life on this game with so many people. So many friendships made, broken, different units, merges, clan battles(trash talking not a pvp match), crazy things and lots more stupid stuff like jumping over helicopters with a HUMMV.
GeNeraL;-;Arma 3 is simply the best combat simulator there is. and if you're playing alone or with friends, the game is fun either way.
Banjo;-;Through all the bugs and the quirks ARMA 3 really is a great game, needs some more time to build the modding community back up from what it was in ARMA 2 though but it seems to be progressing well. Includes a great mission editor which allows infinite scenarios to be created.
Hummerz;-;600 Hours plus. Epic game.
RWG Pureevil6969;-;Great game. Lots of popular mods, great modding community, will be around for a long time.
GuyOnAChair;-;ArmA 3 feels like a step down compared to ArmA 2 with its smaller samey feeling arsenal (That doesn't even include some short of shotgun.You heard me NO shotguns.) and rather boring missions. It's poorly optimized and needs a lot of work to become a proper successor to its more entertaining and vastly superior predecessor. Recommended for ArmA fans that are far more hardcore than me who have probably already bought it. For a finished game it sure is buggy :/. Do you have a beefy PC but are still unable to run ArmA 3 with a consistent FPS higher than 30? Left click on ArmA 3 press properties click launch options and insert the following: -noSplash -cpuCount=8 ultra If your CPU count is lower change it to 4. If you are still getting bad FPS change ultra to high or very high. Running ArmA 3 on higher usually makes it run better then when it's lower. Logic, right? I get 50/70 frames. Very random.
NettoDRG (RIO DE JANEIRO);-;BEST GAME EVER. Good Graphics. AWESOME MODS. Exciting Campaing. And Better of all ZEUS DLC IS FREE. IT TURNS ArmA like an Company of Heroes in cheat mode but with some rules of course... BUY IT OR ILL MAKE YOU EAT CHEESEBURGERS WITHOUT CHEESE!
[MM] WMan22;-;tl;dr Game is slower paced but very good. This game is the pinnacle of the military FPS subgenre. It literally does not get any better than this when it comes to realistic shooters. Do not go into the game expecting fast paced shooting like in most modern shooters. Expect to use tactics and work with your team to overcome enormous obstacles. This is not for people who need to shoot something every 5 seconds. Most of the meat of the gameplay is in coordinating with your squadmates, completing objectives, and getting shots in from sometimes thousands of yards away. Every kill is a small victory in this game; getting 8 kills during a multiplayer coop mission is something to be proud of, depending on the mission. The satifsfaction from eliminating enemies in this game is not one of "I got a lot of kills" but "I helped my squad complete an objective." Personally I didn't like ARMA 2 because of how clunky it felt with both it's inventory management and control, but that's completely remedied in ARMA 3. Movement feels responsive and the inventory is streamlined and easy to understand. The developers are adding new features to this game for free constantly and workshop support + numerous mods ranging from full conversions to minor gameplay improvements ensure that there is no end to the amount of content you can download for this game. On top of that, at least from the people I've played with the community is stellar, the fact that this is a "Hardcore" shooter means that most of the kiddies who come from "That game franchise" get bored and leave immediately leaving only the dedicated whom are willing to learn and utilize the unique gameplay mechanics. This has to be the first game where the times I've actually run into 12 year olds, they were just as helpful, attentive, and cooperative as the average good player. Expect to walk for long periods of time before engaging in any actual firefight and expect to train yourself in single player before joining an online game. I had to play http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=192094335&searchtext=Helicopter+Training for a good four hours before I was comfortable with flying a heli let alone going into enemy lines with one; Even after I'm still a bit rusty. But I'll get better. Same with learning how to operate a sniper rifle, which actually involves adjusting distance for your bullets to go where you want them to. A mission I play often to train in sniping is http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=227323006&searchtext=Blue+viper My gripes with the game extend to at times awful friendly/enemy AI, really. Another thing is that this game could have benefitted from a demo or benchmark as the optimization is different than ARMA 2's and many I know are unsure if this game will run right on their lower end PCs. The game could also do with an official mod manager that streamlines server mod downloads; it's easy to download missions but not mods. You'll be able to play on only very few servers since most run some mod like ACRE or a mod that one might have to go on a wild google chase to find. Edit: Workshop Support has been added for mods instead of just campaigns. One technical aspect I REALLY appreciate is the fact that you don't have to manually forward any ports to host a server. Holy  only few have any idea how much of a pain in the  that is. I'm glad that ARMA just lets you host a server for your buddies, hassle free. Thank you, bohemia. Edit: Since gamespy went down this is no longer the case and you need hamachi. . All in all, I recommend this game highly, even at $60, which I will almost never do. But this game is so fully featured and refreshing that I find it hard to tell you to wait for a sale. But again, I cannot stress enough that this game is for the team player and the highly attentive. It is not for run and gunners or lone wolves. Movement is more likely to get you killed than save you most of the time. I've only put in 25 or so hours so far but I see myself playing this game for a total of hundreds in the future.
Jim Lahey;-;Diz gime is bes gam eber cuz it haz grapix and if you pres v button you dance. but lots of haxerz i prezed alt f4 and dey haxd my game annd make me quite the game!!
Whitepower;-;11/10 It may have bugs It may have  requirments But Its got more mods like Altis life, A3L and Battle Royale It goes on sale for like 17.99 You can't really get bored of it. Played all of the arma series This one is optimised and graphics are beautiful. ELEVEN OUT OF F***ING TEN
[IGG] James;-;Whilst still not as refined as it's predecessor Arma 3 offers a host of improvements in it's engine and graphics. The community is growing and you can expect to find a vast array of experiences from the many game-modes on offer: CTI (Capture the Island) KOTH (King of the Hill) Life Roleplaying Battle Royale Team Deathmatch Zeus COOP Patrol Ops COOP Invade and Annex COOP To really appreciate this game find a good group of people to play with and it'll probably become the best gaming investment you ever made!
Archi;-;This game is the best war simulator you can get on steam, it cost alot, but it's worth it. Spend 100 hours in this game, enjoyed every single minute. Recommended mods for this amazing game: Breaking point(Kinda fun) Battle Royale(Most intensive  ever) Epoch(Same as Breaking point, but with building, so it's abit better.) Arma3Life(Best roleplay, alot of new cars, guns. Well it was fun atleast, when it was closed beta now it's kinda shity.)
Boppy;-;Fantastic mil-sim game. Sure you may complain about the bugs there are and how the game may look bad, but I've had some of the best times in my life on this game with so many people. So many friendships made, broken, different units, merges, clan battles(trash talking not a pvp match), crazy things and lots more stupid stuff like jumping over helicopters with a HUMMV.
Biggie the Choo Choo Train;-;blew up my whole team and left - 10/10 must buy
-=sirHunter=-;-;This game is awesome, buy it !!! 9/10
Baxie;-;GIVE ME A FRIENDS GIFT FOR THIS GAME PLEEEEASE
Jim Lahey;-;Diz gime is bes gam eber cuz it haz grapix and if you pres v button you dance. but lots of haxerz i prezed alt f4 and dey haxd my game annd make me quite the game!!
[MM] WMan22;-;tl;dr Game is slower paced but very good. This game is the pinnacle of the military FPS subgenre. It literally does not get any better than this when it comes to realistic shooters. Do not go into the game expecting fast paced shooting like in most modern shooters. Expect to use tactics and work with your team to overcome enormous obstacles. This is not for people who need to shoot something every 5 seconds. Most of the meat of the gameplay is in coordinating with your squadmates, completing objectives, and getting shots in from sometimes thousands of yards away. Every kill is a small victory in this game; getting 8 kills during a multiplayer coop mission is something to be proud of, depending on the mission. The satifsfaction from eliminating enemies in this game is not one of "I got a lot of kills" but "I helped my squad complete an objective." Personally I didn't like ARMA 2 because of how clunky it felt with both it's inventory management and control, but that's completely remedied in ARMA 3. Movement feels responsive and the inventory is streamlined and easy to understand. The developers are adding new features to this game for free constantly and workshop support + numerous mods ranging from full conversions to minor gameplay improvements ensure that there is no end to the amount of content you can download for this game. On top of that, at least from the people I've played with the community is stellar, the fact that this is a "Hardcore" shooter means that most of the kiddies who come from "That game franchise" get bored and leave immediately leaving only the dedicated whom are willing to learn and utilize the unique gameplay mechanics. This has to be the first game where the times I've actually run into 12 year olds, they were just as helpful, attentive, and cooperative as the average good player. Expect to walk for long periods of time before engaging in any actual firefight and expect to train yourself in single player before joining an online game. I had to play http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=192094335&searchtext=Helicopter+Training for a good four hours before I was comfortable with flying a heli let alone going into enemy lines with one; Even after I'm still a bit rusty. But I'll get better. Same with learning how to operate a sniper rifle, which actually involves adjusting distance for your bullets to go where you want them to. A mission I play often to train in sniping is http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=227323006&searchtext=Blue+viper My gripes with the game extend to at times awful friendly/enemy AI, really. Another thing is that this game could have benefitted from a demo or benchmark as the optimization is different than ARMA 2's and many I know are unsure if this game will run right on their lower end PCs. The game could also do with an official mod manager that streamlines server mod downloads; it's easy to download missions but not mods. You'll be able to play on only very few servers since most run some mod like ACRE or a mod that one might have to go on a wild google chase to find. Edit: Workshop Support has been added for mods instead of just campaigns. One technical aspect I REALLY appreciate is the fact that you don't have to manually forward any ports to host a server. Holy  only few have any idea how much of a pain in the  that is. I'm glad that ARMA just lets you host a server for your buddies, hassle free. Thank you, bohemia. Edit: Since gamespy went down this is no longer the case and you need hamachi. . All in all, I recommend this game highly, even at $60, which I will almost never do. But this game is so fully featured and refreshing that I find it hard to tell you to wait for a sale. But again, I cannot stress enough that this game is for the team player and the highly attentive. It is not for run and gunners or lone wolves. Movement is more likely to get you killed than save you most of the time. I've only put in 25 or so hours so far but I see myself playing this game for a total of hundreds in the future.
Flippers McCuddleBuddy;-;Ruined my Life 10/10
NettoDRG (RIO DE JANEIRO);-;BEST GAME EVER. Good Graphics. AWESOME MODS. Exciting Campaing. And Better of all ZEUS DLC IS FREE. IT TURNS ArmA like an Company of Heroes in cheat mode but with some rules of course... BUY IT OR ILL MAKE YOU EAT CHEESEBURGERS WITHOUT CHEESE!
Zannaza;-;Best simulation game ever!
Fluhffy;-;This game is addictive. Yet it has tons of bugs, it's fun. If you are concerned that you won't like it, try watching some Altis Life videos on youtube, and buy the game when it is on Summer or Christmas sale on steam. Now, lets get to what really matters. There are two sides to this game. There are the RP servers, and then there are the MilSims. The RP (RolePlay) servers are easy to get, it deals with Altis and turns your gaming experience into a life, which then you have to develop your character and become friends (Or enemies) with others. You can mug, kidnap, and  (If you're experienced) other people. This gamemode is for if you want to have some laughs, and a  ton of fun. If you are wanting the military simulator part of this gamemode, then go check the Millitary Simulation Servers. There are fewer of them, but they can be still be fun. This gamemode provides a damn good simulation of War on Altis. Ranging from hardcore strategies to commanding your troops, this gamemode emits a real life enviroment for you to practice your gaming skills in. That's all, hope it helped! (By the way, I reccomend this game a lot, mostly for the people without large ing anger issues.)
TaTaRinBsB;-;The best military sim ever!!!
Kato;-;Awesome Game!!!! I like to play this with my friends! :)
Zedd;-;I hate this game
JakeFromStateFarm;-;A very fun but horribly optimized military sim. Its a great game and has a version of dayz you dayz junkies will be ok!. There are people who care about realism or just joking around so you have some choices of fun gamemodes like King of the Hill, Invade and Annex, Breaking Point, Epoch, and more.
The Bird Of Hermes;-;To have any type of enjoyment within this game, you first must buy a computer that requires a Nuculer Power Plant to power it.... Then buy this.
(J&R) Tyler;-;yes i do and its nice fun cool hard to kill me but u can but one prob not enough money for the dlcs thats to much arma 3 is to much i recomend price droping to 30$ i sen more people buy it at 30$ not at 60$ but its a good gam best shooting ae on steam beside tf2 (team fortress 2) its good but this is 11/11 good job :)!
Mast3r;-;Amazing expreince, join hardmodegames.ru
/ss/ociopathic;-;the world's formost simulator in muslim killing technology you shoot sandies and blow stuff up, america style B)
SCOTLAND;-;Beacuse Spoon
Snow;-;With it's undulging MOBA enviornment, Arma 3 proves to be one of the most realistic minesweeper games to ever come to market. Although I enjoy it very much, an Xbox one dorito edition would be quite profitable for both the consumer and the fedora. Please volv bring dayz to arma 3 to xbone. I highly recommend this over smite, Adventure time, and leeg. Although Arma lacks in features that absolutely make the game, such as hitmarkers, Gears of Arma Theft Auto VII proves to be worth the 13.37.
BECKETT1994;-;This game is a pleasure to experience at times, flying low over the island at sun up you notice how beautiful the graphics are whilst looking out the side window at the ground just whizzing past. Then you face inwards and look around you at your buddies who are chattering away about there lives outside the game, then minutes later the pilot sets you down, you all file out ready for whats next, and everyone is quiet. You tab to the edge of the AO and observe your objective. What you see is small patrols with a couple of vehicles and a tank. Then you look past the area at the sun glistening off the sea in the distance then notice a spec flying towards you and an enemy CAS warning pops up. The heli you arrived in is shot out the sky and crashes a kilometer away. All hell breaks loose, while team leaders relay orders trying to bring control to the chaos but the plan has already gone to s**t! You lay down suppresive fire, then bound towards the town with your fireteam...... This game is a world apart sometimes, its not like call of duty and not a whole lot like battlefield either, this game will have you ducking for cover when you hear the shots crack overhead. Buy it, play it and see how your story ends..... +Also I joined an altis life server filled with french people which I thought would be okay because I speak a little bit of french. I was wrong. It was a bad idea! I approached a police officer making an arrest who immediately started screaming at me so loud I could not understand a word he was saying. So I backed away, turning to run and went around the block, only to round a corner to see blue and red flashing lights screaming towards me! Before I could move he ran me over, then seconds later I got an admin ban for being run over by an out of control police man... Now I live my Altis life far from the law as possible on a different server. Thumbs up, great game and community content will keep it alive for a long time to come! Definitly recommended :)
Barkswag3hunna;-;been playing arma for 3 years now, ruined my life Ex: "oh hey look Dragon Age just came out" *buys and starts playing* *2 hours later get message from friend* "arma?" *never touch dragon age again 10/10
rubixpieguy;-;Gameplay Arma 3's gameplay is unique and realistic. Unlike Call of Duty and Battlefield (which don't get me wrong are great games in their own ways). The controls can be quite hard to get used to in the ARMA series if your new, this game does involve a steep learning curve. But once you've learnt the controls you'll be good at the game it takes time and thats why I think people hesistate to buy Arma 3 or any ARMA game in general cause theres such a steep learning curve to it. Arma 3 is a great military simulator and simulates it very well. Graphics Arma 3 has amazing graphics if you can run it on Ultra and with FSAA and ATOC.. Oh yeah and don't forget to put sharpen filter on 100 otherwise you're game can and will look really blurry. When running on Ultra, Arma 3 will give you some FPS drops every now and then especially when theres alot of AI and or players around. Maps and Details Arma 3 goes across two maps. Altis and Stratis. Though the buildings are empty the map isn't designed to put objects in there, only missions do. Though it does reduce lag when playing around in the editor. Other than that the maps are great and I love to play on both of them. Community Arma 3 has one of the best and most helpful communities I've have ever seen. Though the modding community is all over the place and not all mods are compatible. Very rarely do you get hackers on Arma 3. Because its not a really popular game amongst hackers. Unlike Call of Duty or Battlefield. Developers Arma 3 has a Dev Team that still develops the game regardless of the haters. They have developed this game for over 2 years now and its just amazing how much content they've added since then. Like weapon resting, shooting from the back of cars and helicopters, bipods and alot more. They are one of the best Dev Teams I've come across and hope they don't abandon Arma 3's development. Downloadable Content Bohemia Interactive have released three DLCs so far. Karts, Helicopters and Marksmen DLCs and alot of free platform updates. But some think its way to expensive for two helicopters. But they put alot of effort in the Helicopters DLC to make sure its working proply before we get our hands on it . A platform update also gets released with every DLC :D Overall Overall? I think the game is great and for 60.00 AUD I think it is the best money I've spent on games in my whole life. So I recommend you buy this game. Just go buy it NOW I TELL YOU NOW! FINAL RATING = 10/10 RubixPieGuy Approved
Lord Dank;-;Its a good game.
Cpt.FurryB.Millerson;-;I love this game ^_^
Nabs;-;I played it a little. It's ok.
Dark Centurion;-;(TL;DR IS AT THE BOTTOM) ahh who remembers good old Operation Flashpoint. Not that crap modern sheit, but BI's Operation Flashpoint. There are some that don't know that Arma is it's direct ancestor btw. Anyways when I was young (too young for the game ill bet oooo edgy) i sank a good few thousand hours into OFP Cold War Crisis and its expansions. Eventually i played Arma 2. i wasn't really very impressed due to the crashes and the actual graphical look of the game was horrible. Some sorta film grain gone wrong Then the recent free weekend rolled around for Arma 3. I was so impressed that i had to buy myself a 95 headset - and that was the cheapest price for it. I'd probably have a few more 10s of hours in the game, but its the studying time of the year. But this game. Sure it has a weird looking stealth-inspired vehicles, but its Arma. It's moddable, and BI encourage you to mod, unlike almost every other company. That means you get things like Iron Front (an Arma 2 mod turned into a full game turned into an Arma 3 mod, confusing i know) that features WWII campaigns with maps and units to play with in the editor. It means you get JSRS, a sound mod that changes so many sounds in the game - the one i notice the most is the jets. the jets sound real, and when you wear a surround sound headset or have surround speakers, it sounds real. makes me feel like i'm in the Lake District for some reason. (the RAF does training there). and then theres the multiplayer. i'm not even going to go further than saying the best servers are the 77th JSOC co-op EU1 and EU2. unless youre murican. if youre murican, you lag. go away. if youre a kid, dont even touch my favourite servers. if youre looking for a group that actually plays together as a team, go no further than the 77th. the rest of the co-op servers cant actually work co-op if they got paid to do it. idk even know why im writing a review i just wanted to tell you about the best server on arma. and that altislife sheeit is for kids who shouldnt even be playing the game. you want to roleplay go play  gmod anyway everyone tells a funny story so this one time on 77th its late night irl, its dark ingame too. barely anyone is online. so im leading a squad, and we are driving from the airport to the AO south east of pygros in a HEMTT transport. it takes so long the squad in the back starts shooting rabbits from the back and talking about stuff soldiers talk about, idk. half an hour later, literally, we are nearly there. i cant see the AO, but its just over a hill in front of us. then theres a sound... and then another sound, like a rocket. so yeah a jet comes out of nowhere. entire squad leaves and im left on my own in base. 10/10 tl;dr OFP CWC is Arma, Arma 2 had a bad film grain effect, Arma 3 free weekend, got headphones, mods like Iron Front and JSRS, RAF does training in the Lake District, 77th JSOC owns the best 2 servers in the game - americans and squeekers stay out, altislife is for kids that should go back to gmod, and finally i drive a HEMTT transport full of soldiers to their death by jet. Arma 3, 10/10 not IGN (has enough water)
BOBI COCAINE;-;I dont eaven own this game 10/10
ibfpero // @WORK-back in October;-;Collect flowers and bugs in the lands of Altis and Stratis with a bit of get f*cked up the rear while doing it. 9/10
Sluttershy;-;Got  for apples in Altis Life. 10/10 would be sexually abused again.
AntOO;-;I really would recommend the mod BREAKING POINT (DayZ) wich is in alpha state atm but already very stable. You can download the mod at: http://www.thezombieinfection.com/ The Wiki page at: http://breakingpointmod.com/wiki/index.php?title=Main_Page If you like survival games this game is a must try ! ! ! Breaking point for Arma 3: * Built on next generation Arma 3 * A rich and immersive world Altis island - Greece * Bandit, Hero, Survivalist, Rogue - player classes * Protected with a custom antihack - HACKER FREE * Partner up and try to survive * Boosted client for maximum frames Pick the game up now its on steam sale i need survivor friends ! ! !
tugtugg;-;i get on altis life and run people over, steal their items, and shoot cops. I also steal people who are being arrested and make a 420 getaway noscope fakie
-SK-;-;Well am an Arma 2 Veteran i was skeptical on getting the 3rd game of the series and man am I sad to say this game is a blow to the series while there are many new things that do look and feel rather amazing most of the content was cut out by the DEVS due to unknown reasons,lack of weapons,vehicles,maps and general content makes the game feel rushed and unfinished. I have been there since alpha and yet not much honestly has changed I think the creators let this game slip with intention since little information is given about new content from the community managers and DEVS themselfs making this just another generic OCD/ADD combat shooter. It may best to say wait 5 years until most of the content will be added by the fanbase and community modders . . .
Gigadeath22;-;The game barely runs, don't bother. GTX680, i7 2600k EDIT: There have been minor performance enhancements to make this game playable.
Tywin GIB FALLOUT 4 PLZ;-;Great game when it will actually be ready for release.
HridaySabz;-;Arma 3 is a war simulator unlike anything you must have ever seen, it develops the ArmA legacy even further. If you've only played FPS shooters like Call of Duty, Battlefield, Crysis and the like, then you've been living under a rock all this while. You've let the class of "War Simulators" completely pass you by. In a nutshell, Arma 3 is an open world war scenario with two intricately detailed maps featuring places for all kinds of warfare. Whether your choice is to wage war in the complex blocks in Kavala on a sunny morning, or you choose to dive in and assault a coastline on a cloudy night at 11 PM, ArmA 3 is a thing for everyone. Anything in real life combat, can be done here. ArmA 3 has unprecedented levels of sandbox freedom, allowing you to script and create complex scenarios in and outside the editor. Arma 3 lets you customize your weapons extensively. Choose your ammunition, gun and attachments and go out on the field to decimate your enemies. Accurately designed ballistics ensure you always have a winning edge on your enemies. So what do you wait for? Strike hard, Strike fast.
adlaij17;-;Game is poorly optimized. Don't buy it. Waste of your money!!!
[SG-X] Radar11x;-;ArmA 3 is great when it runs as intended, the problem is when it doesn't it becomes some what unplayable. I'll keep playing it (as you can see in my hours played) becuase its the only game that does what it does.
Faux;-;Crashing Simulator 2015 420/69 would crash again 9/11 actually is cancer
Teh Hamburger;-;Checklist for a Good Game Optimization of a Potato - Check Buggy as Hell - Check Ability to take of clothes - Check Mod Support - Check "Realistic" Physics - Check Kiddnapping - Check RDM - Check VDM - Check Complaining - Check Happy Tickle Time - Check Actual working flashbangs - Check Go karts - Check Worthless DLC - Check Kidnapped one day... The next I have 200 million dollars, Im a hostage keeper for a PMC, Im kidnapping people, Im forcing people to partake in Happy Tickle Time, and I create a game Called Rock Paper Flashbang. 2 days after that I no longer have a life, or any friends in real life. My friends think im dead and move on with there lives. 1 week later I have over 100 hours. 2 weeks later I realize what my life has come to. Today: Realizing that this was one of the best decisions of my life. Who needs friends anyway? 11/10 - Would lose all my friends over and over again
Samblues;-;If you do not own this, get downloading it (free weekend as of writing 26/10/14). This has millions of unique scenarios to offer. For me its playing with a community of 20-60 people (TAW.net) playing custom made coop missions with four squads, two platoon leaders, Command staff ect. Its organised and i've never experienced the feeling of completing an objective with tactics and low amounts of deaths in any other game. The game may have a few optimisation issues but it makes it up with the sheer scale. Air, land, sea, vehicular, foot, scuba diving, parachuting fun all in one game! Feel free to join us at www.taw.net! If you are playing it on the free weekend you will not get the full experience until you have played with a community,group! The mod support is amazing and the community is great with a range of casual to hardcore gamers all under one roof of one asthetically pleasing game that not only offers beautiful looks but amazing content also! I'd rate it 9/10 (with optimisation improvements it would be easy to increase that).
Macarthurian=VX9=;-;Spending enough time in this game to fully appreciate the good and the bad, I have decided to put some words down. I love this game more than any other game that comes to mind. Where do I start? I'll start with the hard stuff. You will stuggle with this game. You will have moments where you hate the way it's coded. You will die to stupid things, like stairs or rocks. You will hate the fatigue system and the weapon sway. You will get annoyed at the reskins for outfits. Eventually, you will mod it. This is not a simple run and gun game. You will not find yourself 'no scoping' after sprinting for 2 kliks. Arma 3 is a simulator first and a game second. The groundwork is solid for the most part. The modding community is devoted. The game modes are varied. There is something that almost everyone will find appealing inside this package. Halo jumping dressed like the UK Special Forces? Check. Thank a modder. Driving a hatchback that's colored like the American flag? Check. Thank a modder. Want to build a mission around the Tet Offensive? Check. Thank a modder. Am I biased? Yes. Do I have a huge amount of respect for modders? Yes. Arma 3 is a cpu intensive game. You will have to tweek the hell out of it to make it just right. You aren't going to get 60 fps on poorly coded MP servers. Please don't think it's your hardware, it's not. Well, probably not. But this game really shines in the graphic department once she's setup just right. I'm constantly trying to squeeze as much performance as possible, but I'm not going to go over everything I've done, it would take too long. If you google it, you will find it. Playing the game by yourself is hindering your fun to an extent I can't even explain. Ok, since you asked so nicely, I'll try. Playing to campaign alone left me yearning for more. I really disliked the interface when assigning targets, or handing out orders to the AI squadmates I had been shackled with. It doesn't feel very fluid, nor does it give me the feeling of teamwork. The AI, at times, can go 'full ' and just stand there while being mowed down by the enemy forces. You may order them to get into the truck you're sitting in, only to find one of them has the great idea to run right into the AO and alert everyone to your presence. Ok, I guess stealth is off the table. At least I have superior numbers? Ha, they won't get out of the truck and that rpg is headed this way. I'll just reload my save then. Now, replay that with real people that communicate and know how to play. Completely different outcome. I'm not typing that hypothetical situation out again, just trust me. Now, onto the really fun part. That part that makes my genitals tingle. The Mods. OMG Becky, look at those mods. They're so big! No, they aren't all large downloads. Even some of the smallest mods can change the game to a large extent. Take AGM for example. It has different frag throwing options. A medical system that includes epi's, blood bags, adrenaline and the ability to drag people to safety. No longer can you see how many rounds are left in your mag, you can only 'see' the weight. It has weapon resting, fast roping, cook offs, vehicle repair options and a bunch of other things I can't think off. What about vehicles? I really like the hummvees from Arma 2. There are a few different options for mods for that. Do you hate that you stop moving when you switch weapons? There's a mod for that. Tactical glasses have no use in the game? There's a mod that gives you a hud when wearing the glasses in first person. I hate the stock sounds. JSRS3 baby! Want a Canadian mohawk? Reskin mod. Tired of playing Altis or Stratis? Bornholm, Tilos, Chernobyl, Chernarus, Utes, Panthera. Just to name a few of the many user made maps available with a few clicks. Be warned. Mods don't always work 'right out of the box'. If you don't have patience, you're just going to have a bad time. Sometimes mods don't work well with each other, or give you graphical errors, or aren't compatible with user made missons. In short, when they work, oh baby do they. When they don't, you deal with it or stop using them. Look, I'm biased. I really am. I love the milsim aspect of this game. I love the squad play. I love the vehicles and the guns. I love the guys I play with. They say that the best things in life are the things you have to work for. That's what Arma 3 is. You have to work for it. But it really shines in the long run.
Samblues;-;If you do not own this, get downloading it (free weekend as of writing 26/10/14). This has millions of unique scenarios to offer. For me its playing with a community of 20-60 people (TAW.net) playing custom made coop missions with four squads, two platoon leaders, Command staff ect. Its organised and i've never experienced the feeling of completing an objective with tactics and low amounts of deaths in any other game. The game may have a few optimisation issues but it makes it up with the sheer scale. Air, land, sea, vehicular, foot, scuba diving, parachuting fun all in one game! Feel free to join us at www.taw.net! If you are playing it on the free weekend you will not get the full experience until you have played with a community,group! The mod support is amazing and the community is great with a range of casual to hardcore gamers all under one roof of one asthetically pleasing game that not only offers beautiful looks but amazing content also! I'd rate it 9/10 (with optimisation improvements it would be easy to increase that).
skru `;-;Very great update compared to arma2
Lemmings |Ronin on Fire;-;Never played an ARMA game, but I really liked BF2 Project reality and Early Tom Clancy FPS games. The pre-order was half of the future retail price and included Alpha and Beta access--so I thought I would give this a try. What I found was a half baked game that was overly reliant on expected croud sourcing assets. The game was bare bones with almost no missions, the engine was sub-par, controls not thought through, and gameplay generally uninspired. If I'd bought a physical copy, I would be selling it right now. Huge dissapointment. If you aren't already a fan of the franchise, you may want to pass or at least wait until it goes on sale for <$10.
Go'Vic.ManytrongWords;-;This is a great millitary simulator and takes a special type of player to play. It has a great modding community and most content from the previous games can be used in this one if you own them. Try the demo of Arma II because this is very similar except for the updated engine. DO NOT expect this to be Call of Duty, they are not comparable. It is a millitary simulator that requires teamwork and leadership to become successful at. I believe this is the best millitary simulator on the market to date.
Centaur Warchief;-;Just WoW! There is so muuuch to discover in this game! Unlimited potential to RPG Gaming! I really enjoy Altis Life ! Hope there will be much more added, so i dont need to go outside anymore and can do all my stuff inside my second life in Altis.
With_Teeth26;-;Mechanically, Arma 3 is outstanding, with controls that are smooth while still portraying the weight of a human body. Weapons feel great and firefights remain intense both against AI and other humas. Atlis is an impressive map with each square kilometer offering interesting options for firefights. The first two episodes of the campaign are good, and there are some great mods and modes already showing up like Breaking Point and the Universal War Sandbox. It also happens to be the best looking open world game around in terms of sheer realism. I'm genuinely excited to see how this game develops in the coming years.
WarriorVet;-;Revised Review: Being a veteran myself I can honestly say that Arma 3 is probably the closest you will get to an accurate military simulator on the combat side. Massive battles that are done tactically, using infilitration, parachuting, convoys, or simply being flown in by another player on a blackhawk. This is war. The first thing I'm gonna get out of the way is the only bad thing I can think of, framerate. I have a decent computer myself but still suffer from 20-30 fps at best. It's not terrible, but can become frusterating. The graphics of the game are well done. Nothing insane here but for how large the maps are, the terrain, vehicle, character, and weapon models are all done very well. Animations are pretty smooth for the most part, and weapon models are accurate to their real life counterparts. Audio in the game is great. Helicopters can be heard, even when they can't be seen, gunfire echos through the streets, and tanks can be heard rumbling their way through the hills. The gameplay is where Arma shines. There is virtually unlimited possibilities to what you can do since the game has mod support. There is an astounding number of weapons and vehicles in the game, and the amount of control you get over them is fantastic. Multiple game modes, such as wasteland (similar to the DayZ mod), RPG (you earn money for new weapons), deathmatches, and large scale warfare on giant maps, with multiple objectives. Many other game modes exist and some are really great. Join in squads with your friends and have a role for each of you, then attempt to escape the island while enemy forces hunt you down. Arma really brings excitement when it comes to firefights, with accurate bullet drops and mechanics, making some fights last awhile, or some simply be over in seconds. The campaign is interesting and will keep you entertained for hours alone, then you can jump into the vast amount of multiplayer options. Altogether, this game is a must have for any military, Arma series, or shooter fans.
Pydrex;-;Game of the year - IGN 1/45
Kylito;-;friend glitched while i was reviving him started walkin around like he was alive was actually dead was invincible killed everyone on other team 11/10
jjani;-;I swam for 30 minutes and the black man ran over by boat.
Linas;-;this game is so hard, i can't even get in the car
Rick *Ayy Lmao*;-;Edit: Serious Review This game is currently the best sandbox military simulator Pros - Amazing graphics - Amazing gameplay - Supports mods, Which is all about this game, Modders does great stuff - Great fun with friends - Constantly being updated Cons - Desync issues - Lag issues when there's alot of people in one server
LegoEddy;-;Finally a game that is not casual targetandshoot, in ArmA you first have to plan your mission and then 95% of the time run around. But that feeling when running to an OP, taking position, knowing that you are gonna open fire soon...Just awesome. As in the old ArmAs you get a lot of online mods, but also a very complicated control system and not much for your hardware. But i mean: It still looks very well on a Mid-End PC. Also it is cool that Vehicels are powered rightly (some a bit OP, Bohemsia keeps patching, so...) and that you can discover the Whole huge map So, I would say definitly buy, if you are clear that this is a simulation, not just a Battlefield or CoD
TacticalDrunk;-;Where to start............ CONS the engine is total  !!!!. multiplayer server perfomance is poor the ammount of content isnt much at all (needs MORE WEAPONS) no shotgun............WTF no support for ballstics and wind ASSLOADS of bugs. some that are gamebreaking little to no support for errors most of all (steam ticket check fail) WTF IS THAT??? its been in the game since alpha why hasnt it been fixed. why does this game continue to crash randomly??? PROS.......... the community mods (better than BI could make IMO) VERY VERY VERY slow improvements flexability if you are considering this game PLEASE think it through, it can be fun but there are MANY problems. i wish i could get a refund honestly
Riso;-;If ARMA 4 does not come out, I will slit your mother.
Anog;-;YOU'D THINK THIS GAME WOULD BE AMAZING. BUT IT IS. BUY IT AND GIVE IT ALL YOUR MONEY NOW YOU ING LOSERS. WHAT ARE YOU DOING WITH YOUR LIVES YOU ING  UPS 10/10 IT'S ALRIGHT.
NFKRZ;-;60 fps on singleplayer, 10 fps on multiplayer. 10/10 i ing love it
Chitsujo;-;Part of the appeal of this game is the realism (i.e. ballistics, stamina, environment), which positive reviewers rave about. The realism makes this the most exciting and action-packed pc game I've ever played. The majority of the game is sprinting for five seconds to a badly rendered bush or maybe a tree with three sides, then having to pause for 30 seconds so that your aim will calm itself. How did the game know I have Parkinson's? You'll unload three clips trying to shoot one contact 100 yards away in an open field, and feel ecstatic after staring and shooting at one another for a good minute. It's almost like playing tag with good friends, except for the part where someone gets tagged. I did enjoy the sounds of bullets whizzing by, and I'm sure the AI experienced the same bliss since we did nothing but lie on the ground and fire seemingly randomly at one another. Ironically, when well- hidden behind a tree or rock (or other random cover) and peek around the corner, the AI suddenly becomes an expert marksman and kills you with one shot. That'll teach me for trying to be tactical. Save points are set within the game, and waypoints are even more predictable, leading to non-frustrating replays and non-existent monotony. There's no real way to be stealthy or use environmental advantages because the AI has Xray and auto-aim, so that's a relief. Your squad will most likely make all the kills, and leave you in the dust since stamina does not affect them the way it affects you. Also, certain characters have infinite health so there's no real urgency in helping with firefights. Time to kick back and let everyone else have fun. Then there's the weird controls, which will have you rolling on the floor (literally) out of cover right into incoming fire. That's the last thing the enemy expects! You'll try to scavenge weapons and ammo from fallen soldiers, only to be shot dead while trying to navigate the extremely simple and intuitive equipment interface. I guess that's my fault for not being able to perform 400 actions per minute. As a plus, you can steal clothing and make yourself wear glasses or bandanas which have no real tactical advantage besides trolling a fallen soldier. I forgot to mention that you'll bleed out and die if you don't bandage your arm with a first aid kit after being shot anywhere on your body. That's actually pretty realistic, since it's a medical fact that your arm is the hub of all your blood circulation and health. As you're wounded, aim and mobility decrease to the point that's so real you won't be able to contribute in any positive way, except to be cannon fodder for the enemy. It's ok though, when you die you'll get to respawn with full health. But then when you restart the checkpoint, you can't fire your gun because there's apparently a glitch in programming (or is it?) which doesn't allow reloading. This is great, since the game already saved your progress and you're stuck with one bullet you can't fire anyways. The realism is scary. I would not recommend this game for $60, or even on sale for $30. I would wait till the price increases to at least $99.99, so that way you'll maximize your regret for spending so much money on a game that's so realistic, you could go outside with an airsoft gun and have the exact same experience. Just make sure you're terrible at everything and the illusion will be complete. Sorry, not illusion; simulation.
Hamedar;-;The game was released with very little content. Except for multiplayer it's not worth it, and even that is empty because of the lack of content they release the game with. Good points would be the graphics, if your computer runs it ok. Even very powerful machines will have some issues with it. Community is great, modding is highly supported and the modding community is extremely active. My conclusion would be to wait. Basically the game is in beta. The game WILL be amazing, however the state it's in now it's barren. Buy it when it's on sale, or in a year or so.
Croucher;-;Review date: 21.06.2014 This game would be great, but without its horrible body armor system, or how you wanna call it. In short, as you see in this video at 11:06 https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Mal2CMf_PjE You take 5x56 mm rifle, point it at the soldiers chest and it takes 5 hits to kill him when he is wearing bulletproof vest. If wearing stronger vest, it takes 11 hits. Yeah you read it right. And there is even more! When you are trying to kill AI controlled soldier, situation usually looks like this: You approach your enemy from back, take your rifle shoot him once, in second, he turns to you, you try to shoot him for a second time, he gives you instant headshot and kills you. After a while of playing you will start to feel like your weapons cant kill anyone and that you are absolutely harmless to your enemy. And shooting from greater distance? Its just saying hi to them.
ChocolateThunder;-;A broken unfinished mess made by some hilariously incompetent developers. Runs like  on any machine and will never get any better thanks to the brain dead decision to stick with a decades old engine and 32 bit code. Despite arma being positioned as a simulator it is nothing of the sort, it is just as much of an arcade shooter as Battlefield of CoD with the only saving grace being a greater freedom of gameplay variety and depth. Despite all this Arma 3 is still the most worthwile game to have been released on PC for the past five years and even if it is still effectively in a beta state I can't help but waste more and more time on it. Any sane person will stay the  away and find something more useful to do with their time.
WarOfHelium;-;CoD players; Our game is very tactical, while screaming 360 no scope. Battlefield players; phuh our game is very realistic with big maps, while jumping out of a jet to pistol down another jet. Me in Arma; After sneaking around for 15min I got shot while hiding behind a bush when I met my first enemy... for the 20th time. AND I LOVE IT. Keeps me from signing up in the military. I can't spend 45 euro/dollar on a single game and I won't spend it on this game but in contrast to most games. This game is really worth it if you have the money. Pro: -extreme modding tools/editor (== many mods) -campaign is the realism I have been looking for (subjective) -vast visual improvement versus Arma2 (and ran very well with me) -much better controls versus Arma2 -Zeus is a vast content addition for strategy lovers -perfect for lan parties -huge amount of content Con: (nitpicking) -Armory? Where is it! -nvidia physX... sorry amd -lacking fully destructible environment -sometimes horrendous multiplayer community -vehicle physics still need improvement -call me annoying but this game needs many more vehicles -action menu still needs improvement -multiplayer can be very laggy -Arma without bugs is not Arma -noob unfriendly UI/controls etc (or is that a pro?)
BAPBAP;-;The game itself was disappointment compared to glorious veteran ArmA2. But now... Over 20 bucks for another minor DLC with slightly remodelled ArmA2 content? For "Chinook"? U must be kidding. Ohh, there's "modular chopper", and "sling operations". Who cares about not so modular, but just lazy modelled halfdozen versions of one chopper? Or sling ops? Or the "advanced flight model" from ToH? If u remember all the DLCs for early OPF and ArmA's - there always was some progress, improvements and pretty new features, SP campaigns and so, but what we have for ArmA3 for whole year? KARTS??? CHINOOK??? Who do u think u r, Bohemia? Apple?
Khaled4;-;you should get this game it's awesome and realistic
ImpairedToast [Sugoi Time];-;Great game with excellent mechanics & graphics. You WILL need to download mods to make this enjoyable however. There is simply not enough in-game content provided, unless you want to shell out more $ to Bohemia Interactive for "DLC" that should be included in the game to begin with. Buy the game when it goes on sale, and mod the absolute hell out of it to get proper content to actually enjoy. 9/10 once modded, 4/10 stock. I will "recommend" this game when Bohemia Interactive decides to give us all the content the game should already include due to its EXTREMELY limited amount of content. I put my faith in Bohemia Interactive & paid for the full version of the game in Alpha. They responded by "finishing" the game with 3 jets & a measly handful of helicopters. Then a week later releasing DLC for $27 that adds more vehicles, choppers and infantry options. Suck my .
Aeronerd;-;This game is . I keep trying to enjoy Bohemia Interactive's war simulators. I've a couple of operation flashpoint games, and arma 2, played arma 3 over the steam free weekend. When the game isn't glitching the  out, the pro-sniper AI will shoot you in the head from 300+ yards in 2 seconds (all while your scope is swaying around like a drunk man because *realism*) I'm so glad I got to preview this game for free because damn it's infuriating and sucks. BI and ARMA fanboys go on and on about how big the maps are, and how realistic the simulation is, but as a single player game this thing sucks major c&*k. Go read the mission reviews and help for "tipping point". This  ending to the 1st stage of the campaign made my decision real quick on wating to buy it.... I finally said " my squad" and left them to die while I went to the mission end by swimming on my 20th quickload (because of robot snipers again). When I got to the boats at the end the mission was bugged out and I couldn't get into them :/ I wish people would just stop buying BI's junk. They improved the graphics here, but the same  AI and buggy interface still exists.
MyDarling;-;The worse Arma ever - cannot connect and play co-op with a friend. Always get a response on game invite "Server is not responding." when trying to connect and play with a friend. They are just ripping off people by taking so much money for the poor quality. That's so devastating and sad. Do not spend your money on this game. Buy something which works instead.
[MDX]WalksOnPoo;-;NOT an AMD friendly engine!! I have played this game since it first showed up on early access. I also had an Intel setup most of the time (2600, 3770K, and 4770K). It ran flawless with those CPU's (average FPS of about 70-80). I had to make a downgrade a few months back, and i went to a 6800K from AMD. Using the same GFX card, the CPU has become UNUSABLE for this game. Average FPS of about 17, and even lower in bigger towns. I know im not the only one, and i do know that this engine LOVES hyper threading. But you would think by now, it would have some sort of optimization of the AMD side of things.
Whisky 5-0;-;Are you kidding me? I spend so much time trying to keep up with the AI's that I'm always so fatigued when we come into contact that I cant shoot? Half the time I cant even see them. Its either that or never get into a fire fight and spend the whole time running around a forest listening to panting sounds! Its utterly ridiculous. There's some great features and I would really like to play the game but at this point I'm so frustrated that I'm over it.
Specter561;-;Awesome game, for what it is designed for. ARMA is a military simulator. And that brings good and bad things. You can't go guns blazing everywhere like you would in CoD. Get shot 2-3 times, you're dead. That's it. Your tank gets hit by a single missile? You're dead. You get sniped from a mile away by someone hiding in the bushes? You're dead. This game aims for realism, and it definitely achieves that. Buy this game knowing that it is very different than typical FPS shooters, but it is so much better in so many ways. The tactical abilities of your soldier, the controls to move your soldier, the gameplay with your friends and THE MODS THAT ARE CREATED ARE AMAZING. The mods seriously make this game come alive. This is a great game. Different from other shooters because it's in its own category.
eRazeri;-;I only played a little bit. Made my own planes, helicopters and stuff :P
{FPG}KD1210;-;good game overall.
Increated;-;235+ Hours of awesomeness
Armasaurus;-;Really good game, I got addicted as soon as I started to play Altis life and Stratis Wasteland. I just cant stop playing it now!
TG BulletDrop;-;I'ts Just AWESOME
Skaylor;-;this is a high quality sandbox game, it has everything to be unique. it has a HUGE map and another very large to. you can do squad missions, be the leader or to be a soldier and a squad member. this game is very interesting and it has vehicles which are very fun to ride, the combat is very interesting and sometimes difficult, if you want a game like counter strike or call of duty then go somewhere els! everyone must have writen that but i will write it to... the graphics are awesome! sometime it feels real so better have a computer that can run this cause i only have the minimum and i really like the game, if you reach max running then there is no bound to how much you will love the game. you can check if you can run the game at:http://systemrequirementslab.com/cyri single player is interesting and nice but the multiplayer is the real deal, you have a lot of servers with diffrent rules and attributes, you can drive with some people around the world and survive and you can go to the missions that the server gives you randomaly. for ending i really love the game and i want you will to! so if you dont want to spend 60$ then wait for a good sale.
skybirdthing;-;The Multiplayer mods for this are the best.
Divii;-;This game is amazing, I was worried that I would have bought a bad game for how much it cost, but it was really worth every penny. Out of 10 stars I would give it a 9.5, and the only reason its not 10/10 i sbecuase at first when I started playing it I had extremly low FPS, and I know i have a very good rig becuase i built it myself so i spent a couple of days trying to figure out what was wrong and frustration everywhere. After a while I set the games priority to high in the luanch options and some other tweaks to the game. Thankfully I'm experienced with computer hardware, but other people with no experience might have alot of trouble with it. Hopefully you guy scan fix that in some way? Other than that this game is 10 out of 10 would definitely recommend to anyone! I just finished playing it, and i started today. Yeah, 7 hours! :D I had a blast and i will tomorrow too!
GeT_RiGhT;-;Fantastic Game!!! It really does need some patches, more weapons and animation fixes (Especially with reloading). But other than that, if you love extremely hardcore games (AND ONLY HARDCORE GAMES, THIS GAME WILL BE BAD IF YOUR GOING TO PLAY IT LIKE COD OR BF), then this is the game for you. Considering the state that its in, i'd give it an 8.5/10 . But when the DEV's fix the glitches and animations, this game will easily score at least a 9.5/10 for a Military Simulation. It has a very steep learning curve, but in 5 hours or so you should get the hang of it :D
Sinthia;-;Won battle royale without killing anyone 10/10
President Taft;-;A game where you can get sexually violated ingame, but still feel like it happened in real life.
Aetherei;-;Not for the light hearted. If you're looking for an easy game/shooter, this is not the one for you. Arma III incorporates aesthetically realistic and functionally sound elements which require not only multifaceted operation but also reticulated execution as such. Arma III caters to the serious gamers who adhere well to solidarity in teamwork and efficacy in realistic measures. With various elements in play such as air support in many forms, ground armour and true ballistics, one needs to be on their top game to prosper in the battlefield of Arma 3.
[SOCA] NuclearDude;-;Do you like tactics? Do you like explosions? Do you like tanks and explosions with tactics? Do you like UAVs with explosions with a convoy with tanks and explosions and amphibious APC's with tactics? Then you need this game!
superchump;-;Do you want to die a lot? Good, 'cuz you will.
twitch.tv/j3han;-;Arma 3 is an amazing game they started off with quite a few problems but have worked a lot of them out. The dif mods, and the Zeus portion of the game gives you an awesome chance at making the game you want it to be as well. I would recommend 10/10!
The Faderator;-;if you are a fan of games that involve warfare, and fps, i strongly reccomend this game. i'll assume that you're not an ARMA veteran, becuase if you are, you dont need to read reviews to know this is a good gam.. simulator. War simulator. good and bad side: it is very hard to learn (it's good because its a simulator not a game, and war is not easy, as CoD would suggest. and it's bad because you're going to die a lot) good side: it is higly entertaining and challenging, the developers worried about things like fatigue and shooting stances and it's effects on accuracy. bad side: tutorials could be better, squad commanding engine is clunky at best, your units will present the bug where they no longer move wuite often, forcing you to continue alone against what you fight with a squad, or loading the game to it's last saved point... what can really  you off. but the goos outweight the bad. 8.0/10
shrooms;-;Great game!
Mechfruit;-;This is a huge improvement over Arma 2. The visuals, the gameplay, everything is better. There's a considerable amount of mods for this already, and the ingame editor is great for making your own missions. I highly recommend this to anyone looking for a great military simulator/sandbox.
pArKeR;-;Very interesting game, teaches us about drugs and guns!
TheMuffinMan;-;Great, great fun. This is the ULTIMATE military simulator. And the mods and community developed missions add only more to it. Highly recommended to any serious war gamer who's not looking for a FPS style shooter like COD or Battlefield.
Benediktus XI.;-;Nice if u want to play mods!
Emperor Squirrel;-;Great game
Jaguar Paw;-;Having owned this since the alpha, I can say I highly recommend it. This beautiful game brings not only fantastic single and multiplayer modes, but stunning graphics as well. It has a much better optimization than Arma 2, but is also more graphically intensive due to being a newer game. Modding community is very developed and mods are plentiful. Breaking point mod highly recomended for those who enjoy DayZ. All together an amazing game and a huge step-up from Arma 2.
Nw.Joolz;-;Unlimited free content. Fully modifiable. Realistic ballistics. Tons of weapons, air land and sea vehicles. Massive maps. The only shooter you will ever need. Buy it.
GoD_IsTWIZTED;-;great game.
The Canadian Beaver;-;i love killing people and selling drugs in this game awesome game 100,000,000,000/100,000,000,000 great game who ever the hell made this
ThermaL;-;The possibilities are endless! :D Seriously this game can do pretty much anything if you know how
sorophx;-;While I do recommend this game, it's only thanks to Arma's modding community. And well in advance. Because, while there already are some very good mods and missions for Arma 3, the vast majority of them simply is additional content ported over from Arma 2. As for the game itself in its vanilla form: thumbs down. Bad net code, bad design, awful single-player campaign, terrible bugs (like AI twitching when you hit them with your fire). Technologically Arma 3 is stuck in 2009. Graphics don't age well, it already looks outdated, while being very demanding resource wise - bad optimization. Unfortunately, Arma 3 doesn't have any competition in simulating combined arms warfare. While every aspect of Arma 3 is done poorly, it's the only game that comes with all of it in one package.
The White Man;-;Helicopter shot down by an AI jet. I manage to escape with a parachute. Land on a land mine. 10/10
El Wango;-;Fun, great community, plenty of mods to keep you entertained but this game is expensive, it's a stretch whether it's worth 60$ imo but its very fun Would buy again if it got cheaper
MyNameIs;-;ARMA 3 is a fun game to play with your friends and offline. The offline story is very god and its always action. If you thinking of buying it i just say DO IT! Its worth it! But 1thing dont stop playing it in the beginig couse its hard, just restart and try a new tactic! ///sry for the not so good english///:) BUY IT!
GhostFace;-;One of the best games ive played in a long time graphics are great if on ultra low graphics are still good and game controls and movement is fluent!
Elijah Rage;-;One of the Best games this year!!
[4N] ItsNickBruh;-;This game has even more potential than it has, this offers all kinds of modes for different types of players. Arma 3 is the best shooting/interactive game in quite a long time. Keep up the good work!
AK;-;Ahh Arma 3... God what a fantastice game Now this game, I would rate it a 7/10. Why you may ask? Here's the reason This game is open world, amazing, physics can be a little wonky, but it gives you such a realistic feeling it's amazing. Want to play with zombies? Go for it, in development but hey, it still counts. Want to roleplay with your friends? Tons of servers waiting for you. While this game isn't exactly optimized for PC in the best way, FPS drops, random crashes, high ping, it is still one hell of a game, go buy it, NOW
smartyzombie;-;cool beanz
Codeydude23;-;A military shooter that, while being mediocre on its own, has fantastic player-created content that makes this game a blast to play with friends, but still fun to play solo
Sauz;-;This gream is great. I've been in the Arma community for 2 years now, and I have to say, this game still amazed me. There's so much to learn and so much that you can do with it. This game is for anyone who is willing to give away hours and hours of their life to play this game.
HeisenbergZ;-;Yes its amazing
boxxybrownn;-;got shot in the head and died instantly, 10/10
Palmed;-;u kill people and they kill u back its really the essence of life itself meaningful
kiLLcaM;-;this game is just epic. just a epic war with so many mods, weapons and vehicles. the graphics are awesome and you can play with friends and make fun
The Ninja Donkey;-;Lets start off by saying that, this game is great. Totaly worth all the money. Now this games does have its flaws. the controls are hard to get used to, almost every key on the keyboard is used for something, or multiple things. Also the game engine is broken. if you want this game you need to have one heack of a PC. On single player, full graphics, usually runs nice for me. i do have a GTX Geforce 660 TI and a 4.33 GHZ prosseser. but sometimes on single player, there are massive framerate drops. on multiplayer, running as low as this game goes, im getting about 20-30 FPS. But not always. And now lets get to some more good things. The vide and screen shots dont seem to capture what this game can really do. You can build your own battles, so much to do in multiplayer like regular battles to survivals to get a jjob make money and live your life out with the need to buy guns and fight the rebles and the cops, or be a reble or a cop. the underwater diving and submariens are fun. There is litearaly SO SO SO many gear types, clothes back packs guns attachments, and alot more. so yes, i do highly recomend this game, but only if you have the PC for it.
Chaos_Mouse;-;Great game when played with the right group of people. Single player campaigns, while challenging, can be a little dull after a while, but this seems to be the way of life for games these days. EDIT 16/05/2014 - The new campaigns added since i left my review have made the world of difference. Changes have been made to the game itself and it looks, simple beautiful. There are lighting effects that make your choice of where you shoot from and approach your enemy critical. Arma 3 is simply awesome, and if you're the kind of player to expect one shot kills with an assault rifle from 100m, then go and play COD, because you will be sorely dissappointed. If, however, you`re after a genuine challenge of realistic warfare, then get this game, convince some buddies to join you, and get tactical!
saapas;-;If you like realistic war games, this has to be yours!!
Jeffaira;-;Massive, massive and one more massive improvement from Arma 2. I've only really played Muliplayer so I can't really review the campaign but if you're mainly after playing mods such as Battle Royale then you will be impressed by the improvement from Arma 2!
knee colas baked af cellar;-;This game is amazing
Eat My Bullets;-;Best game for team work and endless fun. Great graphics too, but you need a beasty system though to enjoy max settings. CPU hungry
Kim Yura;-;I still haven't learned how to drive
Jack6366;-;Best game i have ever played. The Arma series is realy improving from Arma2 to Arma3. The graphics are superb, frame rate is good, overall it still needs some work on campaign and map design. I recently read a post from the mayor of Altis and he said that it "Turend their peaceful little island into a battleground and that it showed a local buisness factory that is private and secret." Overall i rate this game a 4 out of 5.
deBooie;-;Great Game! worth every cent!
EditName;-;Play Altis Life Mod on this, it's absolutely brillian. Blackwing Gaming
RedemptionTurret;-;I got shot, dragged into a garage, was told i was now a sex slave, and t-bagged until my inevitable death. I then went back and thanked the people for that experience, and they shot me again.
!  !;-;I had got addicted to ARMA 2 combined operations before this game. The semi-futureistic feel this game has did not grab me at first, by after a while I loved it. Great game for modding also, in-fact, it is so good for modding that my mod folder is now more than 3 times the size of the game folder. Bohemia interactive did a very good job on this game, I recommend. I give it a 9.5/10. P.S. Do not stand on jagged rocks or rubble - the result is not favourable.
thunderbolt6500;-;as all arma games they are hard to figure out the controls but bieng the next step after the most realistic game in the world its understandable.Arma three has greatly improved its campaign after arma 2's rather terrible one Arma #'s is actually worth playing.When it comes to multiplayer in a arma game there is nothing like it ranging from altis life(role play) to conquoring the whole vast 270 sq kilometers of altis.I would definately recommend this game to anyone that has a computer that can handle it.Nomatter if you have the recommended requirements or not as you can imagine this game puts a load on computers.
Peter Beer;-;This game is awesome love altis life the most :)
waffleboy0122;-;this game is amazing :D 10/10 btw u need a good pc to run this
MiG-21bis Fishbed-L;-;This review has been amended and updated to reflect a major change in the game. ArmA 3 brought the ArmA infantry formula to it's most refined and now it features a more advanced flight model to compliment that. It's still overpriced at $60, but would easily be worth a reduced price on sale. This review will be amended if and when they change the AFV physics and interface.
MisterZiborg;-;If you want a tactical game it's a game for you
MilitaryDude;-;Pretty fun. Although it still runs like it's a Windows XP game.
Reeftercheif;-;10/10 this game is ing briliant
Sasquatch;-;arma 3 is the best game you have not yet played, but will surely play after reading this sweet  review. 11/10-ign
p1nky;-;Very cool game. Lots of MODs.
Lets be Honest Here;-;A great game that I purchased for around $32 in the alpha early access special. With limited content in the alpha, I expected a much more robust library of content in the future with the beta and release. My expectations were partially met, but the campaign is unfinished more than 5 months after release. Other issues also popped up, as well. While more than capable of presenting its fidelity, the visuals in ARMA 3 tend to tax the system heavily (esp. in multiplayer), and w/ a Sapphire HD Radeon 7870 Ghz overclocked i am getting around 40-50 fps in single player and around 25-35 in multiplayer at very high settings. The control scheme can also be very difficult to learn if you are not accustom to playing an ARMA game, as I was. Overall, I do enjoy the game however. The Altis life multiplayer game type is what I enjoy the most, and breaking point is fun as well. The game is continually improving, but the release date seemed way too rushed.
\_(  )_/ Bad Dad;-;pretty much what its advertised as, only more impressive. Way more pretty than the last one, way easier to set up, way more fun.
Cengiz Fahid;-;Played a few hours. It's fun.
AwkwardCookie;-;Really amazing :P
ths [cro];-;great combat sim be it as infantry or pilot, big platform, beautiful engine, lots of mods, different MP gameplays, great community, lots of sleepless nights when conducting large organized warfares it's the closest sim to real life, u either love it or hate it - there is no in between ;)
pixelatorHD;-;the most realistic army simulator/game of all time SCREW COD
Cian;-;Arma 3 is a great game, making many improvements on Arma 2. But it does'nt feel like its finished yet, I know it's still being updated but as its out of beta I thought it would have more than what is has at the moment. Saying that it's still worth a pick up.
Space Pope;-;ArmA II with physics. Finally.
Swayze Crayze;-;Seems great, but not worth it at full price, too buggy for that. Wait for a smokin' deal
MLP_Trixie69;-;It's awesome but it is best to play with friends.
{The}_{IR};-;It's awesome Video game and i recomend this Game for all but try to buy it in Sale cuz it's expensive =) .
[FLN]DanNyG;-;I really love this game. There is some glitches though not that much and is very fun to play with friends or teamamates. There are things like role-playing servers where you have to act just like you act in life and another is wasteland which is just trying tu survive. You need to find your stuff and survive, I really like this game and I could play it for days striaght without stopping because it's just so fun. Add me as a friend and we could play Arma 3 sometime , I am always on :)
Hulk Hogan's Sex Tape;-;Bit Fkn Pricey M8
Gears x Falcon [TF2:GO];-;this game is good u do need a great pc. but this game is good if u like car,tanks or helis
Santo;-;I loved this game even though i had it for the 3 day free weekend. i do recomend this game very much just as long as you have a decent pc!! :))
Amphibian Rogue;-;There was so many guns, I is scared for my life
KCLEMONS;-;Great game I would suggest to the people that love army simulator games
Digital_Blauwk;-;Arma 3 Review Arma 3 is one of those games that just can't be put away for very long at all. With endless player-made content, a wonderful modding community, and the most realistic gameplay in a military sim ever, Arma 3 deserves to be Game of The Year , and is a personal favorite of mine. Arma 3 just can not be compared effectively to any other game on the market today. " Military Simulator " is quite a hefty task to do, I'm sure, and Bohemia Interactive nailed it, and are continuing to support the game and update it regularly. One thing for new players that'd I'd suggest is this: The game is meant to played in any way. So expect that with different servers and gamemodes. The most common gamemodes I see today are: "Wasteland"-a team-based survival mode where players must scavange for food, water, and other supplies to live, "Altis Life"-a mode focused on everyday life in Altis, and this does include the criminal part of the island, along with its police counterpart, and finally "Invade and Annex"-this gamemode is all about team work(its a co-op gamemode, so players vs. AI) and tactics to capture all the major areas in Altis. All in all, with its wonderfully crafted enviroments, excellantly made campaign and multiplayer scenerios (most made by other players), beautiful graphic design, and rich gameplay mechanics, Arma 3 is definitely a game that deservest the attention and love its getting. tl;dr Arma 3 is the best, most realistic military sim you'll ever play. 11/10 :D
GrOD;-;Played Arma2 and Arma2 arrowhead, all i can say it has the same spirit, the same awesomness like the others, maybe for me it's too desert type map, i liked more grass, but there plenty of mods to fix that. And of course Battle Royale + Breaking Point makes it even more playable, and KOTH or Wasteland is still FUN AS HELL! And not to forget about Life mode it's simply amazing MUST TRY!
Vickytorious;-;Lots of fun to be had ;)
Beastlynoise;-;This game is total sweets
R U Moist;-;This is undoubtably my favorite game ever. This game IS NOT like arma 2! This game is not so realistic, that when you play it, your head wants to explode. This game is basically a more realistic battlefield 4. But if for some reason, you get bored of all of the combat and explosions in the normal game, try some altis life or maybe some wasteland! The final thing I want to say is, I would buy this game over any game in 41 game library (PERIOD!)
I kiss Goats;-;For those who have doubt about Arma 3 because of the instability and glitchiness of Arma 2 rest assured, Arma 3 is very well optimised and way more stable, I had doubts but thanks to the free weekend I now know that it won't make my computer swoon. Also it's a ton of fun by the way.
shaun_bisset;-;this game is just to good
Knight "PCMatic" Icy;-;hi this is my arma 3 review poo
Critzlez;-;Realistic, Fun, and easy to play when you know simulators. 10/10
CommanderSamcool1;-;This game is brilliant! Hours and Hours of gameplay
pop3132;-;Its awsome you should try it
[TGG] 420-SmokaSizzle-70;-;This is the dogs nads....
Rareapplepie;-;this is the best game i ever played
Revakheim;-;i think this might be the most realistic war game i have ever played :)
Aaron;-;If you like getting killed in one shot and not knowing where you got shot from, you will like this game!
[BF]LnwReBeL;-;Good Game Of The Year
DEVILSHEART86;-;GREAT GAME VERY CHALLENGING AND REALLISTIC COMBAT NOT FORTHOSE WHO PLAY COD OR BATTLEFIELD.ITS A VERY HARDCORE GAME AND MAKES YOU FEEL LIKE A REAL SOLDIER AND PUTS YOU RIGHT IN THE HEART OF WAR.I LOVE THIS GAME ALOT MORE THAN ANY OTHER SHOOTER OUT THERE I JUST HOPE THERE WILL BE AN ARMA 4 SOMETIME.
jasononex;-;This is in no way a review or maybe it is showing how far i will go to like this game, if you are interested in a new Arma life server please read on. Okay here goes. My friends and I have just started a new Arma 3 Life server, which requires No mods to play, The server is brand new and players start with 750k to keep you going for a "little" while the server is called Warhound gaming, we also have a website which i will post Here: http://warhoundgaming.enjin.com/home Our teamspeak is : 37.187.77.74:4204 if you wish to join please apply on the recruitment tab doesnt take long ^^ i made sure it wont. we have rebels and police currently available to join both requiring application submissions to join. all ages welcome to both factions, no roleplaying is required to kill when Rebel Vs cops however both factions must roleplay when interacting with civs. if you wish to connect via remote paste the server address (37.187.135.190:5102) in Address and in remote enter (2301) the server should pop up. thankyou for your time. Admin Cerberus ,signing out
Bubs;-;Best military simulator ever made
Yasuo;-;pls add swords to this game.
S.Griffin;-;Most played in my library for a reason... the workshop and people who continuosly add more to this game make it worth every penny and some! This game fills the role as a war sim, survival, RP, helicopter, fighter jet and even go kart game... and so much more... do it
xBLSLEGENDZx;-;This is the best military shooter i have ever played. With the option to download and create content from the workshop you have the option to play this game for ever !! Only downside is the fact that i need to wait for the campaign but hey enough to do until then ! 9/10
127;-;Arma 3 & Dayz r not just a normall games to play , it's a life to live .
WTFFSwan;-;Honestly, I didn't think the Arma franchise could get any better. A3 proved me wrong. Just get the game, you'll enjoy it.
SeaFoodKingSpecial;-;I LOVE THIS GAME SO MUCH
Willdkay3;-;This is not your typical shooter, it is more of a simulation game with firefights usually at football feild lengths away unlike the close quarter battles in CoD or MoH. This is not a Shooter with tightly scripted fights and cynimatic bravado, it is a sandbox game in the truest sense of the word especially with the games support of the mod community. If you have basic scripting knowledge or patience then the game opens new possibilities with the fantasic mission editor that alows you to set up single and multiplayer firefights in minutes. Lastly the multiplayer is fun though I find multiplayer is better at a smaller scale with friends on custom missions though if you can get into a warefare game it is a lot of fun playing a large scale realistic RTS/FPS.
RaiN -SaiyajiN-;-;I would definitely recommend this game, if you are in to tactical  and great graphics. 10/10 stars
Jihadi John;-;I downloaded Breaking point, a basic Dayz mod for Arma 3 with the main maps and some other maps. If you like Dayz, and Arma itself too, buy it. I force fed a can of hotdogs to a stranger and killed someone with a brick. Like team survival games with objectives? Check out wasteland. Want to become a druglord? Try Altis life. Want to do realism? Arma has that too. Think of Arma 3 as a giant sand box game, that has everything you want, but still contains that military realism.
Siberian;-;IT'S NOT A ORDINARY SHOOTER. IT'S A REAL WAR IN YOUR COMPUTER!!!
Bradley;-;This game is amazing. The simulation feeling you get while playing this game is amazing. The roleplaying gamemodes just create that edge that makes you want to play it even more. Graphics are amazing. Physics are amazing. 'Nuff Said
Skullkid;-;Playing Arma 3 in a tactical manner alongside random people you don't know, assigned to different squadrons fulfilling different roles on the battlefield is among the most rewarding multiplayer experiences I've had in gaming in a very long time. Highly recommended combat sim, immersive and lots of features, combat stances, etc. 9/10
Chaskas Boat \___/;-;its sooo good i recomend this game
Nomad;-;I camped in a Gunstore for 5 days and it took 3 tries with a tank and MG crew to dislodge me. 11/10
Niffy;-;I mostly play Wasteland and King of the Hill, but with its mod support and range of in-game fidelity, I'm surely to play this game for a very long time.
Guero;-;A war simulator that lets you play almost any possible way you could imagine. I can go from stabbing turtles, to jumping off a cliff with an ATV, to flying a group of soldiers to a destination in a helecopter, to becoming a gunner in a tank full of a crew of actual human beings from across the world, to being a cocaine dealer in a gang, to being the cop that catches that dealer. And I'm only talking about multiplayer. I have yet to really take advantage of single player.
Slrknight;-;This game is so much fun and each time i play it i cannot stop playing it.. If you play with friends it makes it that much better but without friends i have the same amount of fun.
Detect_Enigma;-;YES!! Absolutely and easily one of the best games ive played on PC, a must buy!!
CotekH;-;Great
mctavish055;-;this is one of the most badass games i've played in the last 3 years
nicek;-;Sometimes i play this only for enjoying some quality time on the beach with my helicopter :)
CamoMeatball;-;This game is a massive improvement from Arma 2. The gunplay is significantly better, and the map is great. If you like military simulators, look no further!
Meowers Cuddlington;-;Provides whole, solid minutes of gameplay without crashing. AMAZING RIGHT! Running at a maximum of 14-19 FPS! SHOCKING! I am stunned by this game. 10/10.
Gazure Kunare;-;Must Play with a clan. Totally worth the money if played like that.
The Fucking Meme;-;Great game, if your a fan of Bohemia it's a must have!
[NSG] Eazed;-;One of the rather better shooters. 10/10 for quality.
littlecaveman;-;If you play Call of Duty all the time Try this game
Dr.Mamat Xetan;-;IMO this game it so cool, i can be a soldier without joining a military. but this game it's so expensive ;-;
BruceNippon;-;One of the best Combat simulators on the market to date, the shear scale of this game is immense, and as Bohemia have made the game totally open to the mod community it has the largest amount of content imaginable in any game i have played, You want solo, you got it, you want pvp you got it, you want team play pvp you got it, you want team play against ai you got it....It literally has everything. Training maps, under water, jets, helicopters, tanks, infantry, spec ops. Honestly i simply can not rate this game any higher for the money, and the graphics engine is absolutly fantastic, if you got a decent rig, you need this game. The only downfall is the modding side can take some getting used to, but PlayWithSix and Armaholic have made it very easy to mod this game for beginers and their is enough information out there to help anybody. Quite simply a must have game for the price, and tbh i have not played a better game ever on PC, that has this much depth, variety of play and beauty.
Charlie Sheen #fallout4;-;this game is absolutly incredible
l SknK;-;Looks great for an alpha build. Lots of community content in the workshop. And the first Dlc/mission due soon. Great graphics etc (if your pc can handle it). 9/10
ChieF^;-;This may very well be one of the best games I have played this year. One thing which is sure about this game, it has unlimited content because the community behind this game is hands down the biggest one for any game. But be advised, this isn't just a FPS, it's a Simulator. Arma 3 is still in development and will never be truly be finished because the community will make heaps of content for this game, even now, when the campaing is only 2/3 finished it already has loads of content. I would recommend this game to anyone who wants to play a realistic game.
Sputnik;-;Dont play any multiplayer. I got my A3 key stolen and BattleEye wont help in anyway. However it is a great game and I recommend buying.
SniffMyBuns;-;Fun game, a step up from the previous title
Renas | Designing For Skins;-;Amazing game! The Life mod also changed and bringed a lot of RPG + RP lovers to buy this game.
Warlord-616x;-;runs smoother then the last, and theres already alot more diverse mods and game modes.
Roverd;-;Is very fun
Allpack DANGER ZONE!;-;its a lot of fun how ever it needs a favorite server tab so you can find servers you like to play on easy but thats it
DaNieL<>;-;brilliant graphics and amazing military experience ! MEIN FURHER STEINER..........
Pakundo;-;So far it's pretty much the best milsim out there, bar none. I do wish for a mod to include realistic reloading animations and a mechanic that recognizes bullets in the chamber. Negatives are the extreme amount of Wasteland servers out there, and complete lack of proper pvp servers that are friendly for playing without friends. For better or worse, unless you, for some inexplicable reason, actually LIKE the Wasteland mod, you're better off playing the co-op servers where it's you, 20 or so other folks, customizable loadout ammo crates, and places on the map to clear of enemy AI. Game looks good, and it's a real treat for such a milsim to look good, and have alot of potential draw distance.
CrayonBerry;-;Devs have slightly increased multiplayer fps since the release. The game engine sucks but arma 4 should be good if they develop a new engine
Wim;-;Arma 3 is the current pinnacle of tactical military sims. The multiplayer is home to diverse community driven missions, mods, and addons--the scope of which is ever expanding. The single player campaign, though clunky at times with trigger based scripted events and obtuse progression, is engaging and immersive. The maps are incredible. Stratis is a fantastically detailed, compact island only ~20 sq km. It features rugged terrain, a city, small villages, an airbase, and FOBs of various size. Altis offers a massive experience at ~270 sq km. It's a fantastically beautiful Mediterranean environment with cities, towns, highways, military complexes, airports, airstrips, fobs, resorts, energy stations, ruins, castles, islands... critically one of the best environments in gaming.
Dorito Bandit;-;I trolled in global chat.... 10/10
BigDickDaddy;-;Probably one of the best games I've ever played. The amount of mods and features in this game is great, And if you can pick it up on sale it's a bargain! If you're expecting to just run around shooting, That's not going to happen. This game is a lot slower and requires tactics and intelligence to succeed. A great addition to the Simulation and Shooter genres. With the open world, which could only be compared to the size of maps such as DayZ's you'll be completely immersed and entertained somehow by traversing and exploring the map in the different game modes, online and offline. With mods like Altis Life, Breaking Point, Wasteland, Invade and Annex, You'll never be without a new game mode to pour hours into with your friends, and the modding community is truly amazing with the singleplayer missions and sandbox scenarios available and being developed. I could not recommend this game any more than I have. It's my most played game on Steam and will stay that way.
Captain Mongelia Ernest Frinkle;-;This game copied off of call of duty. Run and gunners get 37 kills while the 37 campers scratch their balls and die. Then they have these a.i missions made by babies for babies. Easiest game I have ever played gonna have to give it 0/10 no quickscoping.
Mr1969CoronetSuperBee;-;Okay if you are getting the D3D error your graphics card cant handle it just buy a better one its completely worth it. Best game ever.
Spectre;-;Very realistic military detail. Accurate radio chatter, sounds, and ballistic mechanics. Use of tactics is vital unlike Call of Duty and that crap where you shoot your way through everything. If you want to immerse your self in a lifelike warzone experience wait till this game is on sale and buy it.
haxx;-;This is war :D
Adi Biti confirmed;-;I have to say, This game is dam realistic :), AND PERFECT! even without that mod called DayZ
Valueless;-;Spend 40 minutes just to form a group with some guys to attack the enemy base and then my computer turned off. 11/10 would play again to do the mission again :D
Jobal;-;Great
Tracer_2015;-;my favorite shooter so much to do and learn its awsome SP pretty good aswel much better MP with a good team and a optimised map/mission
[UHL]CURYLJEFFERSON;-;This is an amazing game. king of the hill is a fun sector control game. but he cake is given to the Breaking Point Zombie Mod. At only a mod of a few months already better then Day Z SA.
Rosa Parks' Bus Driver;-;Pretty fun game and it runs better than Arma 2
Mongolian;-;It looks sweet, runs good but the controller layout is all over the place and you cant change it :/
Banzone;-;Pure Awsomeness
JohnnyTheSavage;-;This is one of the most amazing games I have ever played. All of the stuff that were obnoxious and annoying are fixed in ArmA 3. I totally recommend it!
Lewis;-;ARMA 3 is very different from ARMA 2, It is not a game for people that want fast action gaming, this is a game for people who appreciate the small things, this game requires patience and tactical skill, There are experiences in ARMA 3 that you will not experience in Battlefield, or Call Of Duty, for example the tactical aspect of ARMA 3, if your lucky enough to be part of a tactical community then you can get the full benefits of playing ARMA 3, not like wasteland or altis life. ARMA 3 has burst up from the old ARMA's from the help of Dayz, i'm not saying Dayz game arma all the populatrity but it defintly gave them the boost they needed. I remeber when i first joined a tactical server, i was a noob, i had no clue what these call signs ment, or any command chain. But i was rushed to a heli and placed into bravo squad, i was told to stick next to the medkit, when i look back i think i chose the marksman load out, i was not very useful to the group in till we revived a lot of heavy fire, once are squad lead went down, it was just me and the medic, as the medic couldn't go down i had to rush out into the feild, dragging theese random people back to cover, now i did not know any of theese people, but in the moment it felt like i did, i felt like i was part of the team. Once i dragged half of my bleeding team out, i was assigned a special job, i was given satchel charges to blow up the objective, when i came up to the tower i had a little trouble setting it, but never the less i manage to place down the charge, as i ran back in a big rush to the heli evac, i looked around and saw the tower blow, it came crashing down into the hill. At the moment i relised this is what ARMA 3 is ment to be like. 9.5/10 -Lewis
Peder Johnsen;-;I love this game! When it works... Lately I've been unable to play multiplayer (any type of singleplayer mode works fine) as it just causes my computer to freeze when I join a "lobby". It forces me to quit the game through the task manager (doesn't always work) and even then causes things to not work at all forcing to do a restart. It's a shame as the game itself is amazing... Sadly there doesn't seem to be any clues as to why this is happening or of a fix, even though there are several reported instances of this happening from many other people. Hopefully someone figures out the cause of this and it get's fixed.
sir shakes;-;Arma is a game that takes a type of person to like it. It has its glitches, and its awesome things. Altis Life is something you should check out if you are more of a casual RP player. If you are more serious, try out a mil sim server where literally everything is simulated like the military. There are also domination servers where you capture towns from enemy NPC forces. If you have no patience, there is always wasteland, or king of the hill, where you can shoot people on sight without worry of a ban. Personally I think arma is a great game. I would give it a 8.5/10 due to the "arma glitches" and learning curve. They are working on fixing the learning curve though. I would like to see more out of the devs, even though I believe they are working hard. Most of my time is from playing on an altis life server - Therevolutiongaming. Finding a good community for casual RP is what I look for and have found it there.
Cloneorder66;-;Fantastic, the level editor is mostly what I do. But still. Mods are great, community is nice, everything is spot on. I also hooked up a flight stick and throttle and did tons of dogfights. It feels great. Specs are a little bit demanding too.
Aape;-;Best Game EVER, You wont regret this one
Steve (   );-;Found a tank Killed a naked guy Made millions :D
Johari bin Zulkifli;-;I love this game and have played with it for almost a year, i do recommend for anyone who is into tactical and teamwork based fps
Sid;-;Probably one of the best FPS, military simulator, with endless user add-on and mods I have ever played in my life. It's to the point this game is the only one I still play. It's far from Call of Duty and sort of reminds me of the old Battlefield games but better. I give it a 10/10 not for the game only but the the continuous community and their mods.
tempast2003;-;I can't complain, this game delivers on what I was exspecting. I have all other games in the Arma series aside from a small few of the Arma 2 expansions. I love the ballistics, you get a more realistic feel for how a real firearm operates. There is much more to take into account than your simple fps. The series is great and worth a try, the controls can be intimidating but they are managable if you invest some time in training and getting a feel for it. This is a simulator so things are gonna be alot tougher than your typical war game. The AI friendly AI could use some more fine tuning and tweaking, I have had to put a few bullets into a couple insubordinate AI team mates for laying fire on targets a 1000 meters away thus helping bring more aid and attention to the base we were originally assaulting. The game is not without its bugs, and it is also a heavy on your processor much like Arma 2 was but indeed it is definatly a step up in graphics. It could use a larger armory, but there is a great mod cummunity that works on things like that to help the process along. Can't wait to get my Saitek x55 Rhino pro H.O.T.A.S. to be able to enjoy the helicopters alot more.
Arcenist;-;I absolutely love this game mainly for the mods to it. I really enjoy playing rounds of Battle Royale. It is even better with a few teammates. It can get pretty intense at times. I do like their Breaking Point mod. It can get pretty intense. 10/10 gameplay experience
Slatts2;-;The most dangerous things in Arma 3 are as follows. -Stairs -AI -Rocks -Teammates -The car you are driving -The Enemy
ToySoldier;-;My first game on A3 brought me the most horrific experience I've ever had in any game, ever. We're on our way to the objective, a small dump east of a town occupied by enemy forces. I'm leading a team of 4 men. We come to a crossroad and I sprint across, telling my men to hold back. I cross a few more times, trying to get a response from any snipers. Nothing. I run, my SAW gunner runs, my medic runs. But I kept my Marksman on the other side to make sure we'd make it across. Anybody seen Full Metal Jacket all the way through? Remember the sniper scene? The marksman takes a round in the leg as we're running and goes down. He then takes two more in the chest. The kid who was playing had some mad acting skills, he played it up to 11 here. He screams as he's being shot. Crawling, drenched in his own blood. "SARGE? YOU AIN'T LEAVING ME OUT HERE LIKE THIS, RIGHT? I-I WANNA GO WITH YOU GUYS! C'MON SARGE, H-HELP ME! C'MON! PLEASE DON'T LEAVE ME!" he died after that. I cried and he respawned. I would recommend getting :)
Spanking The Monkey;-;Drove an Atv while laying down, only super elite combat units can do this. 10/10 its like skyrim but with guns. - ign
-CML-ChrisKyle;-;dont hesistate buy it!
Tensta;-;One of my all time favorites. Game has come a long way from Operation Flashpoint and it doesn't disappoint.
Joe;-;best game. cause theres no other words to describe this.
Knight Artorias;-;Arma 3 is a very diverse game with many different games modes and mods. Some of the popular gamemodes are King of the Hill, Battleroyale, and Wasteland. There are also many co-operative mission you can do with people if you choose to do so. You can instlal different mods like guns, vehicles, missions and other things. Then theres Breaking Point a mod that involves zombies (be warned it is a very big download like 20+ GB) it can be hard to survive people and most people will try to kill you so be warned. Last note is there is going to be a Arma 3 Epoch Namalsk map coming.
Xetorak;-;This game is one of the rare game that has always something new, the community is big and has a lot of modders. You will always find something to do, but I warn you it doesn't run smoothly often and for me this is the only problem. I hope you will consider buying it if you are looking to play for tones of hours and fun! See you on Arma!
Mr.StealYoHndin;-;This Game is a fun open world game if you have money and you like military play this GAME
ben2009ben;-;I need help i got a big lg tv and on arma the fps gose down i was thinking if i get a pc screen would that help the fps im playing on a lg big tv but every time i look up at the sky the fps gose up to 50 i get 30 fps on very high so what u think if i get a pc screen would that help the fps ????
Pimmie24;-;Great game! I always loved the Arma Series it begon with OFP First Arma and the graphic's of this game are stunning! but i don't like the future vehicles ect but its awsome with mods :D
^1Ole^7Ho^4och;-;this gotta be one of the best games i have ever seen
Dr.Rimpac;-;It's one of the most accurate action/mil-sim game i've ever played. There is nothing else like this out there. 10/10
Violent Chicken;-;From riding in a go-kart attached to a helicopter to stealing peoples organs for money(not that i do that :P). One of the best games ive ever played!
eXo Hartman;-;I Love this game its good graphics and addicting
hasan;-;i love this game
boxychan;-;cool
StrifeWolfe;-;I absolutely love this game. And it just keeps getting better so I can only love it more. At first it may seem daunting to dive into and get familiar with. But after a while of playing, getting used to the controls and then learning some of the more advance controls, you can wage an entire war by yourself by commanding squads or with friends by playing cooperatively. With the Steam Workshop you can also find hundreds, if not, thousands of user created missions that are a lot of fun. I personally suggest Dynamic Universal War System for a fun but brutal gamemode that is really good for Co-Op or solo play.
A MEANDERING TEDDY BEAR;-;if u have an amazingly good processor and graphics card this game is for u
Failure;-;Game is like arma 2 but with a 3. No but seriously the game fixes a lot of what was wrong with arma 2 dont get me wrong it still has its bugs but hopefully soon the game will be perfect.
Snoidel;-;This is a great and fun game. play it by my self but most of the time i play with my two other friends and when i do it is so fun. Then theres the graphics, i have a HD7970 and on a hundred person server i get around 30FPS but other than that i thing that the graphics are a huge update from Arma 2 and overall this is a great and fun tactical first person and third person game 8.0/9.9
Dav of Krypton;-;We seriouslly dont need any explanation for this series. Simply amazing and with the help of the community this get better every day, Steam workshop is a dream come true for the Arma series as it just make the game everlasting. From casual to hadrcore sim style gameplay, it is all here. Why have you not bought this already :)
Hawkeye;-;Arma 3 is an awesome game that I play often
FookinDookin;-;There is nothing more to say about Arma III than WOW. Ive been an owner of every single installment in the franchise from the days of the original Operation Flashpoint. The leaps and bouds that the developers have made over the course of the years is astounding. Arma III is absolutely astonshing as an improvement from the rest of the series. Its far less buggy than its predecessor and is updated very regularyl. The multiplayer capabilities are awesome and you can lose many hours with your friends developing all kinds of scenarios. If you were a fan of any of the previous games this one will not dissapoint.
PlagueBearingRodent;-;If you liked ARMA 2, then you will love ARMA 3! Because it is ARMA 2, with better graphics and less content. I bought it, so should you. 10/10, will have to create your own game to enjoy the game you just bought.
Killed Cat:Crank [ATEDIN];-;This game was a bit frustrated after Counter Strike, but after a few hours of playing, I realised, it is not so bad. It is a totally different, and I must learn how to play this game. After a while, I understand, the flow of the game, so now I like it much better. I recommend this game, for those, who like open area combats, and slow gameplay compare to Counter Stike. It is more like real world.
Fire Bear;-;Don't mistake this game for an FPS, some people enter into this game expecting COD ...it's not. ARMA is a full battlefield simulator which it does well at. In ARMA you're not meant to feel invincible, if you don't take cover you'll die, if you don't communicate with your squad you'll die. It has an insane learning curve that will take most people a long time to get used to, but only makes it very satisfying once you finally figure out how to fly or use artillery or...anything. The complicated controls at first can seem annoying but once you're used to them you'll be grateful you can stick your head up just enough to see an enemy out of a window without exposing your whole body. The games mod-ability makes it possible to play an infinite array of game modes making it difficult to get truly boring. While there is a battlefield like mod called king of the hill the size of the maps alone makes the game vastly more complex and that's saying nothing of the array of vehicles that can completely alter the game from just one player knowing how to fly or range a sniper rifle. Unfortunately the ARMA engine is well known for how glitchy it can get, Most of this has been ironed out and the presence of hackers ruining servers has been greatly reduced since early access. At times clipping through a wall or falling through the floor of a building still happens but it's not so common that it ruins things. At the end of the day the game requires being patient and on your toes while communicating what you see with teammates. The different mods and game modes give the game infinite potential but the glitches can create issues sometimes. ARMA 3 is a military sim not "insert FPS here" don't get attached to scores and if you find yourself complaining over global that someone using a plane is "cheap" or a "noob" close the game and reevaluate who you want to be in life.
dvn;-;Really Good game, with a large number of mods! Buy it and play it!
Fiesta;-;Fun and open world game with really good gamemodes and lots of fun, Make sure your Pc can Handle the game before you get it though.
The Magic Ruskey;-;While i would reccomand this game... I am dissapointed in bohemia interactive for making the game more arcady then the previus ARMA 2 Game. While the controlls ware refined and improved. the graphial fadality is amazing. The game lacks in content. And optimization. A major issue being the fact that if the server host is experiancing 8 FPS. So will you. no matter how many nividia TITANS you rig together. And how many I7's you overclock to . While ArmA 3 is alot more complex. engaging. And immersive then olther tittles out there. Such As Carl On duty Black cops. And Battlefield. It is indeed a thinking mans game. Where map reading. Team co ordination. And communication are key. It does not acheve the level of immersion and simulation that ArmA 2 With mods such as ACE and ACRE acheive. I defenitly reccomand the game to newcommers to the arma series. But ArmA veterans may be dissapointed. To newcommers. ArmA arma allways had quite alot to take in. To learn. to unlearn things you are used to doing in first person shooters. It requires them to learn to use their compass to alert friendlies of contact. How to operate as a team. And even how to operate their weapon system in a proficent manner. Accounting for distance and target movement. But somethings will be new even to arma vets. Such things as the Stance Adjust system, And the awful arcady grenade throw. bound to G. To any arma 2 Vet trying to fiddle with his gear. Thats bad news.
The act of glory;-;THIS is an AWESOME game to play. The developer team is really caring about the community. The workshop and map editor helps you to do a LOT of things that no other games can. The hardward requirement is pretty high and you will not get the best experience if you can only run on low or medium. PLUS, if you one of those people who play COD or battlefield a lot, you may need a few hours to L2P this game. ARMA 3 is seriously an simulation game, any gun can pretty much 2 shot or 1 shot you at any distance(and the AI is pretty good at aiming). Stay in cover, move quick and you will enjoy this war on the island.
Technocolor;-;Let me start off by saying this game is great and the workshop makes it 20x better. But in order to give a good review I must give both sides of the story. This game is very complex and can be intimedating for the noobie, but one of the greatest parts about this games loyal comunity is that no matter how stupid a siduation might be, they will still role play it out. That is partially why this series seems so realistic, the community is great. Of coarse there are always those people who would rather complain about how bad someone is instead of helping them to become better. But most people are willing to help with anything you might need. The next thing is to learn the controls. It will make your life so much easier, there may seem to be many controls, but you only use a few of them unless you are a commander. Also this game is beautiful and usually runs desently well on a mid range pc. Now I must give the downsides. The campaign is ok but it is not arma 2 quality. That is the main theme here is that it is not arma2. I dont know why but this game is missing something that both arma2 and arma cwa nailed. It seems more directed and controlled that previous installments of the series. One will need a mid range ish pc to run this game. All in all this is a great game with a wonderful community and it has endless mods from the workshop so if you are debating weather to get the game or not, let me make the decisioin for you. Get the game.
BenJAMIN;-;this game is epic gooby... breaking point
[DR+SH] Captain Fantasy;-;This game is like being underwater. But the water has been replaced by feelings of isolation, claustrophobia and bullets. Bullets hatefully fired at your face by nameless and unseen minions. And these bullets don't stop. Until you stop...moving.
[7-75] Deist;-;The most polished, smooth ARMA experience yet and its still in alpha. The upgrade to beta then full release looks like it will only be more content as I have yet to find any bugs. If your an ARMA fan this is a must buy
[NSFW] HaWk;-;God Game Tried it out Super Good Recommend it alot! xD xD
Afg-Shahin;-;What kind of  is this? I downloaded the game and now i have to purchase it?
Seventy-Two;-;Proper sick game innit bruv
DPz;-;Amazzing but need a good PC . :3
Duckling Gaming;-;Arma 3 is an amazing game but right now im having trouble with the workshop so if you buy the game and no workshop shows up its a problem with steam not arma
Ray ADD NEW ACC (SAME NAME, PIC);-;Great game, especially Altis Life!
Chief;-;Great Game nothign else to say, Its really fun to play with friends
Zesty;-;168 Hours, It is OP
Grant;-;Fantastic game 9/10. Visuals are amazing on any setting above medium. Style of gameplay is completely up to you. Replayability is infinite. Audio is brilliant. The only downfall is the AI (If you have no mods on), the settings for their skill levels needs a bit of refining. It's either they're as dumb as a stump or so smart that they drop you before you can even get ready. Definitely recommend.
piltovers opskins.com;-;Best military simulation game ever
NastyLemon;-;Buy this game, if you're into real military war games, again REAL, not COD or anything else, this is the perfect war simulator, Reccomend running the game with high graphics option, is the cherry on the cake.
Ghost;-;You aren't buying just 1 game. You're buying a whole bunch of games! There are so many good mods for ArmA 3 that you can have fun with this game for such a long time. When you get bored of one mod or gamemode, then just play another one. This game is worth the full price just for the Battle Royale mod which I play all the time. I highly recommend this game for both hardcore and casual FPS players. This game can teach you a lot of new skills and improve your gaming experience in a lot of other FPS games!
Y Jr;-;sick AF CCCC
SageNTitled;-;This is the most solid simulator out there. The game is improved in countless ways since the previous title in the series. Name a game that can beat Arma in strategic military large-scale team play. None? I didn't think so.
PureAwesomeness;-;Great Game, very friendly community and so much variety within the game itself, as well as the mods made by other users like me and you, which believe me are great! The graphics and quality is magnificent for this map size and even player count. Some servers have the ability to hold over 100 online players; you cannot get these numbers on any other game as far as I'm aware. The performance is great on Nvidia, however I am not sure it works as good on AMD.
G.I. Jew;-;Not as realistic as Call of Duty.
NeXz =DD;-;Great game, tonnes of mods. Definatly recommend
Tasty-;-;Outstanding military simulator like its predecessor, but be warned of its poor optimization as it will bring even the best gaming rigs to its knees.
'tis;-;Difficult, absorbing, I want it so badly.
Nick;-;ArmA 2 is better, but this game is alrgiht
iLLaRoachaKiLLa;-;This is not your typical run and gun game. You must take your time to learn the ins and outs. I highly recommend it.
Webbzyjr2;-;I got the game while it was free for two days and it was awsome, I loved everything about the game, but it was a little to graphic for my windows 7. But trust me this is worth 59.99. But make sure your PC can take the graphics.
cartmanww;-;Despite many of its early faults, Bohemia Interactive - as well as the always extremely-active ArmA community of modders et al - really pulled the ArmA universe to a whole new level. The graphics are only the beginning of the immersive environment: realistic projectile ballistics (as well as surprisingly detailed terminal ballistic effects), well-done animations (especially of essential combat tasks, like reloading), and the variable stance/lean system. Unfortunately, there are a few problems that have plagued ArmA since the beginning of time, namely the AI. I say this because even after becoming intimately familiar with the game and the teammate command system, detailed commands are bulky at best. AI as a whole tends to be relatively oblivious when it comes to medium- and "crew-served" weapons; the suppressive fire command does absolutely nothing with your machinegunners and autoriflemen, and anti-tank gunners apparently forget they have 15 pound rocket launchers strapped to their backs and decide their small arms are the most effective weapons against MBTs. The aerial platforms' damage models could be improved as well (i.e.: losing parts of the aircraft when you clip a tree or wires rather than just exploding), however, this would require a lot more work than may be worth it at this point - perhaps later in A3's lifetime. Fortunately to me, despite these (at times) fatally annoying flaws (*cough* AI *cough*) nothing in the virtual world comes close to the level of accuracy (both from the vanilla BI platform and the ArmA communities' multiple mods) that ArmA 3 delivers.
Kovak007;-;Good god, the realism in this MILSIM is just incredible! Bullet drop, survival, and the AI is just great! ARMA 2 was good, but this, this is amazing! Only thing is, the UI is a little hard to adjust to as I am a Black Ops 2 and BF3 and BF4 player as well. 99.7/100
sheepdog2142;-;Amazing game Great core experiance with full modd support i recomend sixupdater Some of the best editor and mission making out there ecpecialy with the new zeus tool. Choose Arma for you military sim needs
Nick;-;10/10 Super fun game and the mods are great.
[185. CT.9501] Ian Johnson;-;Arma 3 is a great improvement over Arma 2 and OA this doesnt have M4A1's or M16's but does have the FNX45, Masada, and others the vehicles are more futuristic so no ABRAMS or Blackhawks but all of this is fine because you can download mods or get All in Arma to get ported content from the previous Arma games. Over all I think you should get this game and as it says it brings you to WAR!
gaming opticzz;-;think its a good game but you need a good pc to play this game but apart from that its a good decent game
twitch.tv/Paxxow;-;arma 3 is a damn good game, if you like war simulator games so have arma 3 all you're after. This game gets 10/10
Mr.Doge;-;ive played arma for about a good 3 years now went i first got arma 3 i liked it i was very excited but then theres something im really annoyed by the game would like randomly crash and send me to my desktop every 1 hour or 30 minutes every tim i still recommend this game but thats the only thing i think would be a huge step to fix
Defcon;-;This is a great military sim. Make sure you have a really good pc though, because it can be very demanding. At the time no I do not recommend this since the optimization is horrible.
Lastman;-;I recommend this game to anyone who likes a more realistic type of shooter. This game also has a big modding community so there are tons of different ways to play the game. Controls are most fluid then Arma 2 and it feels more natural and less mechanical. It does still have a slight mechanical feel but that just goes with the genre. Every act requires you to take a second to complete that task just like RL. I didn't log many hours when i first got it but iv recently found servers that run the SC (Sector control) game mode and its fantastic. You gain levels by being in the target sector and money to buy new gear. Il keep this brief but its a great game and keeps getting better with every update.
DirtyFerg;-;Altis Life is dead dont even buy this game.
Mother Clucker;-;This game is definately not your standard cod run and gun type of game. You are forced to use tactics and the enviroment around you to gain the advantage and with all the multiplayer content as well as custom missions/mods you will never get bored.
Simbus;-;This game is great, especially with friends, Breaking Point also adds so much to this already amazing game! :D
Prime Minister Sinister;-;ArmA 3 shows numerous marked improvements over its predecessors, but little has changed about the developer andcommunity attitude since ArmA 2. ArmA 3 is a good game. It feels very refined, like a proper triple-A title, which contrasts immensely with the very unpolished, rough, but still charming ArmA 2. ArmA 3 improves on just about everything from the entry before it. Movement is fluid, smooth, and no longer clunky. The controls are far less complex and much easier to master and memorize. Vehicles handle much better and have fully rendered, animated interiors. I personally found that the game ran a bit better on my system, but it can be taxing when a lot of buildings and objects are involved, as the CPU often fails to keep up. That said, ArmA 3 does fall short in a small handful of aspects that ArmA 2 does better. Some people may be turned off by the future setting, although it doesn't affect gameplay much. All together it is smaller in scale, with fewer vehicles, factions, and maps than ArmA 2. Still, ArmA 3 has its strong points. There is a new Zues mode in which one player is an omnipotent, "dungeon master"-like figure who places enemies and allies. There are multiple ways to mix and match Zues, and the game can basically be made into an RTS. There can even be competing Zues'! However, the game does have pitfalls of its own. The AI, a much chided problem of the series, doesn't seem to have any improvements. It continues to be brick levels of stupid while also having improbable accuracy. allied squadmates almost never follow orders, making parts of the singleplayer (particularly the second act) more frustrating than fun. A new stamina system was implemented that adds a new, interesting dynamic to multiplayer, but since the singleplayer wasn't designed with it in mind, the campaign is basically unplayable. This to me speaks volumes about Bohemia Interactives design philosophy, and I have to wonder how much effort is put into testing patches and hearing player feedback. Speaking of players, you will find the greatest challenge of ArmA 3 is the community. Most of the community is hospitable enough, but there is a rampant elitism that pervades the community and makes many players seem like complete twits. More often then not threads criticizing the game will devolve into "this isn't Call of Duty you filthy casual" or something of the like. Furthermore, this makes finding a unit a very tough search, as many are not immediately accepting. This can be a challange, as multiplayer is the key focus of the game and it is hard to have fun without a coordinated group. Another major issue is that the mod developers are often overprotective of their mods to say the least, with almost all of them refusing to use the integrated workshop or allow any change to their mods. These attitudes can be stifling at times. In the end, my recommendation on ArmA 3 is based mostly around 1 principle: do you have friends you can play with? If the answer is no, I would say wait until you do or find a potential group to hook up with. Singleplayer-wise, there isn't a lot of enjoyment to be had, although user missions keep it afloat for a bit. If this is a non-issue for you, than I definitely recommend ArmA 3.
Spiderz;-;This is like a drug. Murder simulation, the sound is probably the best thing about this game. The first time you fire a simple 6.5mm round you realize this game is on a completely different level from anything else. Some games can be more fun, but none are more real. Sometimes you'll have memories of killing people on certain maps and you'll wake up in the morning and remember it, that place you went to and that person you killed. Genuinely a feeling of disconnection will grow when you play other games because you don't feel like they properly exteriorize a sense of realism compared to ARMA 3. The sunlight is like video game wizardry i'll never understand. Closing this review i'll say you should have confidence in yourself, play the multiplayer from the start, switch your rate of fire, run and kill kill kill.
[Rev]Beau;-;because its amazingly awesome
SpitFire;-;You need to love this game to play this game
Zaid;-;My initial review said that ArmA 3 would be a great game by late 2014 when more mods and content were released. I am glad to say that this became true several months before I expected. Between the incredible Zeus game mode (an on-the-fly mission creator) and excellent mods like Advanced Gameplay Mod, Task Force Radio and ALiVE this is one of the best co-op games available. You will need at least 4-5 people to really have fun in multiplayer, but there's really no other game that offers what ArmA does.
Cheshire's Grin;-;This game is a perfect choice for those who love themselves military simulators. While this game does have it's downfalls, AKA it's glitches, they however, are not game breaking. Slow paced gameplay but not so slow as to get boring. I recommend that if you can find a clan, group, or server that is great and lots of fun, stick with it.
ScriK;-;This game is very intertaining. You can have lots of fun by playing the campaign or online. I find the best thing to playis the mod breaking point. This is a dayz like game that has a lot less problems. You can pick a faction each time you die and respawn.
Waggel120;-;great game
Chuckles The unfunny;-;great game
Nightmare;-;Good Game with lots of potential modding and other advantages nothing like COD or BF4 this game is one of a kind.
Napkinboy;-;This game is very diverse with the mods making it enjoyable for anyone to play stretching from all out war on King of the Hill to Altis Life where you live as a citizen on an the island of Altis trying to make a living. Very diverse, very enjoyable and would definetly recommend to anyone.
thelaughingbomb;-;Good game, good graphics, flying cars, broken physics 11/10 would fly again
[G0t0veru];-;This game is great it offers a wide variety of things to play and to whether your thing is role play or killing people just because u can. I'd recommend this game to nearly everyone who like fast pace shooter or zombie survival.
[ISQ] kazuto kirigaya;-;it is a lote of fun i hilly recomend this game
twitch.tv/fireworkmangamin;-;Just simply epic.
IGB;-;If someone likes realistic shots that is the best game that it can Find Waiting for the full version
classc1212;-;THis game is not like any FPS it delivers skill,Awsomeness, and the best army simulator game out there. I HIGHLY recommend this game. In my view if you dont get Arma your missing half of the greatness in pc
Buglet;-;Nothing like pretending to screw up countries!
Suzuka;-;I love this game so much. Amazing graphics and the lighting is fantastic. The physics are still crappy just like ARMA 2 and ARMA 2 OA's but whatever, I love them.
Moose;-;arma3 is a good war game simulator i have been playing this alot and i recommend to buy it if you like war game simulators.
ItzVortex-CSGOFAST.COM;-;epic realistic and the altis and stratis is on greece 9/10
iiTANiMULLii;-;Pretty mean, lacking content but, Content can always be made and added. Gameplay is outstanding!
[JiF][AARP]Grimp;-;This game is a a lot of fun for the right players. Looking for non-stop spawn and die? Then it's prolly not for you. Looking for some slower paced tactical action mixed with some intense battles? It's in there.
Spectre;-;love the graphics, physics, and realistic gameplay.
Mike Pultaski;-;I really like the game. It is really fun and almost all the way realistic. Just sometimes when you fall like 5-10 feet you die. Which is ridiculous iand stupid. I would rate this game a 8/10.
FactoryMade;-;This game is amazing you must get it
Mr_Bear;-;i love the game, awsome map, great textures the hard thing is get used to the control
BORN.45;-;A worthy set in the arma trilogy, it takes place in the future which allows for more unique weapons/vehicles, though this some times can feel like a discomfort. Vehicles, Weapons, and Movements at disposal are all vasely improved and refined as well. With such an active modding community and develepors that are constantly improving the game, this is an expierence you can't disregard. And for the graphics the lighting effects are the best I've ever seen in a Video Game (ever).
The Mighty Krang;-;Really good game, but you will have so much lag if your computer is pre-2005.
Unobtainium;-;Military simulator with extremely large maps, lots of different modes, and vehicles. Spent a lot of time on Breaking Point mod, it's very fun and rewarding.
DodlyBacon;-;Rly fun.a looooot of game modes BUY IT!
Platonroth;-;ARMA 3 So when I saw this game for the first time, I thought that soon will release another excellent piece ArmA. However, the first disappointment was already in anticipation, as the extremely small amount of technology and absence campaign. But this disappointment disappeared when issuing the first chapter of the campaign was excellent and the new technique also appeared. But I will not criticize. I must say that the guys from Bohemians are struggling and working hard to repair, etc. Graphically it's a big shift but a new engine this could offer more. The playing area is huge and real and opens new possibilities for mods. Technical equipment and weapon was terrible at the beginning and the newly added equipment was broken but gradually improves and fixes. Despite this, however, it is compared ARMA I and II, step backward. Personally, I think that would Bohemia Interactive could use a better future. On the other hand, however, the campaign is excellent, what more can I say. Final verdict: ArmA III is an improved forward, but it is incredibly untapped potential. If it Bohemia Interactive put in the time and dedicated technicians and armor, or even a new engine, so it would be something completely different, much better. 8/10
Falsedeath;-;I haven't played it too much but I can safely say make some friends and make your friends get this. cause its hella more fun when you have a group to play with.
creekorful;-;why u read my comment when u can play arma III ?
SuicideDaza;-;Its great Buy it now.
DJ BaoN;-;This was very awesome FPS games! Nice Graphic and there's so many mode on it ....so it's not easy to make you become bored. So fun if u guy's playing together with best friend's or family's. U guy's must have this game! ^_^V
minecraft night;-;this is a hardcore militry simulator you could roleplay from marines to navy seals and has an amazing editor and unlike arma 2 it has under water experince and submarines and way better graphics now i dont play many simulators but this is one of my favorits
Dekuranjmuzu;-;It's like the old days
TwitchingShadow;-;Very Fun. I would recommend this game to multiple people.
Horrorview;-;A mostly incomplete yet incredibly addictive and detailed sandbox that takes "playing army" to an entirely new level.
Bambii;-;Not anyting like the FPS your use to. Its much better! If you are looking for a fast paste fps this is not for you! Requires a bit of your pc, but some commands can help run it a bit better!
king weewee;-;i shot a bunny at 1150m with a .50cal, totally recomend this game
mrk;-;Wanna play a war simulator? Arma 3 is the best! Play with friends and have fun!
Journeyman800;-;Very fun game! It takes some getting used to and you need to know strategy in order to prevail. It doesn't take long to learn the game either. This game is quite realistic with its weaponry, vehicles, and physics. A workshop in this game means more ways you can experience it allowing you to play player-made missions, player-made game modes, player-made whatever really. You can also install mods from a website called Armaholics which adds a higher score in my rating to the game.
Obey Fisken;-;i love arma 3 buy it buy it buy it
Mofo The Third;-;the pinnacle of contemporary and future wargaming
MiLC0RE ok;-;Hmm.. What can i say about ArmA 3? I mean.. i can't describe it because of its awesome epicness. Just buy it and u will never play another game ;)
Knight;-;The sheer scale of the maps. The roles its crazy though Villanlia is alright. Get a few mods installed and you can have alloooot of fun with it. This is the only Milsim game ik that does a milsim better, though their are alot buggs i heard at least i persoanly have only ran into cliping issues. But its pretty good at the end of the day.
Kurt;-;The game as a whole looks really good though even me with a good pc struggles to run it on high settings... getting 20> fps on high.
GotStats;-;Very fun game, I get some fps lag in cities, but overall, its too fun to set down.
STARK;-;Well, this game requires skill. Alot of getting used to the controls and the feel of the guns. Its not the common FPS but you already know that if your getting the game. Arma 3 and the ArmA series in genral have always offered realistic, and addictingly good gamemodes and mods, and ArmA 3 has alot of them, where is being a RP mod, like takistan life, all the way to blood thirst survival in battle royale. This game offers alot, although i may have only 96 hours, i have had over 700 hours on my second account. I can say this game is truely worth it. 8/10 Hit a tiny fence, broke my car. Get the game!
Mental_Implosion;-;I promised myself I would only play ARMA 3 until DICE fixed Battlefield 4. With the prospect of DICE never actually doing what they promise I started to settle into ARMA 3. I immediatly remembered that the relationship when it comes to dificulty kinda goes like this... Call of Duty (No skill required) < Battlefield (Teamwork required) < ARMA (Slow, Steady, and a good plan wins the war) 100hrs later and I have forgot why I bought BF3 and BF4. I knew they were halfassed but bought them anyway and I got burned by DICE. ARMA offers the features DICE abandoned with the realism of a tactical shooter. you have to have a good mix of Ground, Air, and Support players to complete any objectives. With the larger server capacities It seems I always have teammates around me.
[TG] North;-;I would highly recommend this game. It's fun and i've already put some hours on the board in a short period of time.
ScottishCreeper9;-;this game is the worst game ive ever played
work_horse_7;-;OMG. When I need to rub one out, I play Arma III. Seriously... I beat my meat like it owes me money while driving the vehicles. Also, this is a good game.
Amko_Blitz;-;I love this game! I've been playing multiplayer a lot there past couple of days. If you are looking for a real military simulator this is the game for you. When you find players that will join a group with you and take the game seriously it is tons of fun. This is NOTHING like Call of Duty or even Battlefield. I would recommend this game.
Nathan10007;-;Very CPU intensive, but great graphics. Has many different gamemodes to play. Don't recommend buying this game if you have a bad computer. But overall a great game
The right shark for you;-;a great game! if you can run it........
TheBookDude;-;Wow... when i bought this game I thought that I was going to play it like 1 hour or so. But now that I bought it, I'm addicted. It has endless gamemodes. Maybe it's expensive, but it's worth it.
Syntax;-;i endorse this product and/or service
Prophet;-;ArmA 3 is an excellent game for 2 reasons. Number one, its engaging and immersive and fun, and number two is the fact that Bohemia Interactive cares about its modding community (Hence the competition "Make ArmA, not war"). But ArmA 3 comes with a few flaws. Chief among these, in my opinion, is optimization as I own a very good mid-level PC and I seem to be getting around 16 to 20fps. Also is the lack of vehicles and weaponry, although I know that is set to change, I would have liked the game to be complete and not an "about to finish up Beta". But if you have some friends that are interested, then why don't you visit the islands of Altis and Stratis. Live a new life in Altis or Stratis Life, fight for survival in Wasteland, or work together to defeat OPFOR AI in Invade and Annex. Just bare in mind that this is a Military simulator, so no run and gun or Rendezook's here, just good ol' fashioned tactical warfare.
Dobrowney;-;This game is amazing .. That is all I have to say about that .. IF you into games that allow no limits to what you can do with it .. Arma is the game for you. With Modding supported from the start of the game and really the core of arma. Spending 60 bucks on Arma is more then worth it. I have over 1000 hours now into the Arma series and have yet to play any of the campian that BI made. Most of my time has been into Mods like Dayz and Epoch. The Communtiy in Arma is amazing. Modders put their heart and soul into making content for this game. Arma 3 is a game you will for sure get over 5 years of content for free out of. It is a must buy for any Hardcore FPS player, Hardcore RPG player or any one into Mil Sim stuff.
LittleAlmond;-;awesome game! so addictive
[DPN] Travis;-;As always for every single ARMA game the engine is terrible, the real selling point is the community mods that have been made.
Alaskan Bull Worm;-;Only shooting game in my library that doesn't make me rage when I die. Because in this game, death can be fun as well. Weird thing to say I know, but when a new pilot takes 20 minutes to get you in the AO then lands the chopper you feel so excited for him only a moment later an enemy aircraft bombs the chopper and your entire squad. I personally can't do nothing but laugh when this happens. :D 10/10 Restored my faith in Bohemia Interactive.
Twitchyb1t;-;great game!
BenJAMIN;-;this game is epic gooby... breaking point
[DR+SH] Captain Fantasy;-;This game is like being underwater. But the water has been replaced by feelings of isolation, claustrophobia and bullets. Bullets hatefully fired at your face by nameless and unseen minions. And these bullets don't stop. Until you stop...moving.
The Bearded Sniper;-;Let's get something straight right away: I HATE shooters. I've always been the type of guy who likes RPGs and fantasy/sci-fi games. For me, shooters are just too, how to say this, similar for me. Sure, when you first play a shooter you feel engaged in this world where the battlefield comes to life and every action could have an equal and opposite (i.e. death) reaction: it's really fun. But, as I played more and more shooters, they all started to blend together: play the campaign that involves either terrorists in the Middle-East, Russia vs. America, or a black op gone rouge, and once you're completely bored with that, spend hours on end in the multiplayer. There wasn't that exploration, decisions (in regard to gear and strategy), or overall autonomy that many RPGs offered. Then, I found Arma II. This was one shooter that I absolutely loved, and I easily poured hours into it. The fact you could tackle any mission with any strategy (even going in with no combat appearel), find a server devoted to almost anything (i.e. DayZ, Chenarus Life), and the variety of missions all entranced me, but the main seller for me was the content creator. Never before in ANY game had I been able to create what I wanted to at a moment's notice. Found a mission in the campaign to be unsatisfactory? Just create your own better rendition of it, or even your own original idea from scratch. I had spent days in-game, and when Arma III was announced, you can bet that it was an instant seller for me. When I got it for $60, I was awed by the improved graphics, more introducable interface in the creator, and Workshop content that was amazing. For the first time in a while, I felt as the battlefield had come alive, and every choice I made had dire consequences. It was like I had played a shooter for the first time, which is a magical feeling. Sure, the campaign may be run-of-the-mill, but you can always make your own mission or even campaign. I do have complaints about some of the physics and glitches, but (1. It does its job, and (2. The game has to load a minumun of 17+ spuare kilometres. In comparison, Grand Theft Auto V had a world size of about 32 miles at most. Arma III's biggest map is 270 km for Pete's sake! I'd be suprised if the game only had twenty known glitches. All in all, Arma III is worth more than what you pay for it, and is definitely head-and-shoulders above Call of Duty and Battlefield. I saw a picture on the internet that sums up my feelings: "Command a soldier (image of COD), Command a squad (image of BFF), or command an army or squad or soldier (image of Arma III)". Too whoever posted that picture: I deeply concur with you!
Drifter;-;This game is breath-taking, whether you like fast-paced gunfights, long-range sniper duels, monster-trucking it with M1A2 Slammer tanks, playing Ace Combat with incredibly fluid movement, raiding a small outpost of hostile forces with a attack helicopter, playing a role in week long, server-wide wars, doing night raids on an enemy research facility, setting up a UAV to perform reconnissance on enemy camps, packing your scuba gear and checking out the lost treasures of Altis and Stratis, or just hopping in a plane and enjoying the wide, vast, beauty of this game! ArmA 3 really dominates the "realistic, military, video game/simulator" genre. Combine some wicked creativity with ArmA 3's mission editor mode and you can create your own missions and scenarios. In the past people have used this to make their own additions to the game, such as new weapons, vehicles, clothing, and even entire maps! ArmA 3's customization is endless and will keep you constantly changing guns, attachments for them, and other equipment to match the situation your in. If you feel like playing solo, ArmA 3 has totally revamped its Campaign mode to keep the player's attention and actually immerse you in the ArmA universe, or forget the single-player all together and go play good cop-bad cop on Altis Life, a user created gamemode, or blowing up tanks and getting in random firefights with other players in Wasteland, also a user-created gamemode. If none of this satisfies you, then you can always just build your own mission, so that you and your own private team can go and enjoy a experience that I guarntee you is as close as you'll get to war before enlisting!
[XCR] iLLuzion;-;This Game is Nothing But Amazing.... I Don't Have A Bad Word To Say About This Game... This Game is Even Better When Being Used To Play DayZ.... A Must Have For Any ArmA Fan
Zach08088;-;I recommend this game to all army fans out there, But 1 thing you have to keep in mind, VERY BIG GAME, You need a very good computer to run it. I warned you... Final rate on game= 9/10 (Needs more FPS) Community for this game is just FAN--TAS--TIC... Everyone is helpful and game Is heaven for TEAMWORK gameplay, Il be honest, I get the chills when I play it.. -- "Gives you Goose Bumps" -- -TyTomGaminG
OmgItsADelta;-;Arma 3 is probably one of the best games I've ever played. The graphics are amazing and the campaign is awesome. As for the multiplayer, it depends if you're good or not, but I still like it.
1 4 3 7;-;Great game, by far the most realistic looking army game out there !!
-SOF- Cpl.Neff.R;-;This game is amazing, and the mods make it so much better. If you are a fan of simulators (not like COD), please get this game now!
Walrus Hitler;-;This is one of those games that is VERY HARD. (thats what she said). But anywho this game is worth it. No only is it every going to cease to be fun, but it has infinte replayabliaty. Only 1 con is that the weapon sway is hard to get use to. 9/10
Flames;-;this is really great game the graphics are sexy playing with your friends is mad banter yep what more do you want?
InfernalRage;-;I bought the game for Altis Life and I have never looked back.
musgrove;-;One of the best games ive played
Shady;-;Half broken and Ars3. Also big graphix enhancement. 11/10
HeCameInBlack;-;Awesome game! Screw BF and CoD this is where the fun is at!
cobrajmr;-;ArmA 3 brings a new aspect to gaming and to simulation gaming. Being a leading developer in military simulation BIS strived and excelled it's past accomplishments with ArmA 2 and it's DLCs. Me being in the military I enjoy this game. From playing ArmA 2, and it's DLCs, BIS has done a wonderful job with this one. From customizing your weapons to playing CAS in it's new A-164 Wipeout. ArmA 3 brings future warfare to today's technology. Personal Rating: 09/10 Edited: 20140619
Pubicbeard;-;Arma III What should i say, i love the game and have been a big fan of the whole series, as you can see i have put allot of hours in this game and i have bought it since alpha and seen the progress. yet i am abit saddend about the progress, i had high hopes they made the engine better on the AI part that is, yet that still kinda sucks and i can imagine it is hard to make it better because the engine they use is just a improved version of the same engine they used in Arma II. neither do i see allot of content on weapons and vehicles which kinda bums me out, and i think the main reason is because they want modders to add that content and fill the gap, problem is no one including me wants to download allot of separate files just to play on one server unless its pretty amazing. and again dont get me wrong i love this game, i just think the main focus on this game has been badly placed and with the setting the game is placed in (the future 2030's) they have allot of free space to use their creativity. i do need to add that the movement system has improved insanely from its previous game. other than that it is still a game i would recommend you should buy if you love military sim games where tactics overpower the opponent, or games where you need to roleplay as this game is a perfect platform to do so.
Reeses Feces;-;If this game was a woman, I would pursue her until the end of the earth trying to touch her face with my unworthy hands.
ODSTnoble6;-;GREAT GAME 100% awesome you can do so many things
The Brilliant British Banter;-;I went online, ended up in a Go-Kart with a HMG on top, and then getting a nuke and exploding everywhere from hitting a small rock with a gokart. 10/10 GOTAY
IzaN.rM;-;Great game, very fun gameplay, however I only played it free for the weekend. If I had the money, I would have bought it.
r!FF rAFF;-;Best shooter I have ever played, all you need is a descent pc.
Butter Bananas;-;10/10 would download again
GandalF;-;Loving them graphics. Great game
Cykerino Blyaterino;-;Getting high and listening to Enya. 10/10
OUtlAnDeR;-;Can be really buggy at times, and not very well optimized (however I usually have NO framerate issues with a modest PC). That being said this is also one of my most played games. This is what the Battlefield series SHOULD have become (Wasteland mod anyone?). Large open map, customizable weapons, a plethora of vehicles, and the list goes on. I've recently seen comments about the graphics - but truth be told I actually love them. Just the other day I remarked to a friend how much I enjoy the landscape and graphics in general, especially compared to games like BF4 and COD that look so artificial. Anyways, this game may not be for everyone - but it is for me.
sam.gentry95;-;10/10 would play again
Ragnar Lothbrok;-;Are you into FPS's like Cod? You are? Than I dont reccomend this game.. ohhh your a FPS man that likes tactics and slow pased combat? I recommend this game.
[KH]Tyler;-;Amazing game if you give it a chance and tinker with it. Mods ALiVE and ACE (When released) especially has changed this game for the better don't knock it for the odd issue here or there the community are the guys who make this game really shine. Only advice I can offer is get part of a community to really enjoy this game after all the makers gave us the sandbox but its the community who make the sandcastles out of this game!
=1PARA=Melle=C.O.=;-;Even though the game is still work in progress it gets better every update, with the help of testers from the #ARMA community :) is it 100% finished? not in a long way, but i enjoy every minute of the game SP and MP! This is game is never going to be 100% finished, mods/addons/scripts wil come from the community and make the game even better after the developers stopt "creating" new stuff.
[GSD]I Am Element115[Pro];-;HELL FREAKIN YEA! Buy this, this just shows the power of the PCMASTERRACE! Best exclusive ever, i reccomend this series more than any other game, everyone needs the chance to play this game. I reccomend it more than any other game ive ever played, most amazing thing that ever happend to me. BUY IT!
Sithis;-;The one and only sandbox/sim get it while its fresh. All new movement mechanics
MSgt. Dash;-;This game is extreamly addicting, fun, and diverse... And the maps are HUGE!!!
Aunt Jemima;-;of cos
Weaboo Hunter | Pink Nigga;-;Its a good game. Though recommeded for people who like to take millitary shooters very seriously. Otherwise the fun side its pretty
CreepPork_LV;-;Awsome.
IRooman;-;Absolutely best simulator out there
Rosa Parks' Bus Driver;-;Pretty fun game and it runs better than Arma 2
Mongolian;-;It looks sweet, runs good but the controller layout is all over the place and you cant change it :/
Banzone;-;Pure Awsomeness
JohnnyTheSavage;-;This is one of the most amazing games I have ever played. All of the stuff that were obnoxious and annoying are fixed in ArmA 3. I totally recommend it!
Lewis;-;ARMA 3 is very different from ARMA 2, It is not a game for people that want fast action gaming, this is a game for people who appreciate the small things, this game requires patience and tactical skill, There are experiences in ARMA 3 that you will not experience in Battlefield, or Call Of Duty, for example the tactical aspect of ARMA 3, if your lucky enough to be part of a tactical community then you can get the full benefits of playing ARMA 3, not like wasteland or altis life. ARMA 3 has burst up from the old ARMA's from the help of Dayz, i'm not saying Dayz game arma all the populatrity but it defintly gave them the boost they needed. I remeber when i first joined a tactical server, i was a noob, i had no clue what these call signs ment, or any command chain. But i was rushed to a heli and placed into bravo squad, i was told to stick next to the medkit, when i look back i think i chose the marksman load out, i was not very useful to the group in till we revived a lot of heavy fire, once are squad lead went down, it was just me and the medic, as the medic couldn't go down i had to rush out into the feild, dragging theese random people back to cover, now i did not know any of theese people, but in the moment it felt like i did, i felt like i was part of the team. Once i dragged half of my bleeding team out, i was assigned a special job, i was given satchel charges to blow up the objective, when i came up to the tower i had a little trouble setting it, but never the less i manage to place down the charge, as i ran back in a big rush to the heli evac, i looked around and saw the tower blow, it came crashing down into the hill. At the moment i relised this is what ARMA 3 is ment to be like. 9.5/10 -Lewis
Peder Johnsen;-;I love this game! When it works... Lately I've been unable to play multiplayer (any type of singleplayer mode works fine) as it just causes my computer to freeze when I join a "lobby". It forces me to quit the game through the task manager (doesn't always work) and even then causes things to not work at all forcing to do a restart. It's a shame as the game itself is amazing... Sadly there doesn't seem to be any clues as to why this is happening or of a fix, even though there are several reported instances of this happening from many other people. Hopefully someone figures out the cause of this and it get's fixed.
Chief;-;Great Game nothign else to say, Its really fun to play with friends
Zesty;-;168 Hours, It is OP
Grant;-;Fantastic game 9/10. Visuals are amazing on any setting above medium. Style of gameplay is completely up to you. Replayability is infinite. Audio is brilliant. The only downfall is the AI (If you have no mods on), the settings for their skill levels needs a bit of refining. It's either they're as dumb as a stump or so smart that they drop you before you can even get ready. Definitely recommend.
DEVILSHEART86;-;GREAT GAME VERY CHALLENGING AND REALLISTIC COMBAT NOT FORTHOSE WHO PLAY COD OR BATTLEFIELD.ITS A VERY HARDCORE GAME AND MAKES YOU FEEL LIKE A REAL SOLDIER AND PUTS YOU RIGHT IN THE HEART OF WAR.I LOVE THIS GAME ALOT MORE THAN ANY OTHER SHOOTER OUT THERE I JUST HOPE THERE WILL BE AN ARMA 4 SOMETIME.
Slrknight;-;This game is so much fun and each time i play it i cannot stop playing it.. If you play with friends it makes it that much better but without friends i have the same amount of fun.
MadMonkey;-;Perfect sim for those wanting something more than casual games such as COD or Battlefield offer. Arma II is still the big boy, but 3 is shaping up to match or exceed the older (but still massively popular) sim. The engine is a bit smoother and the setting more futuristic, but other than that, it plays very similar.
F4M1N3;-;this game is incredible
Mikhaylov;-;I Gladly dropped part of my paycheck on this game, and ever since its release it has kept me entertained through the various gamemodes it offers. If you do happen to get tired of Wasteland, Altis Life, etc you can check out armaholic, and download many more mods and missions to work with. The game does have its bugs, but in reality every game does. They may or may not get said bugs worked out, but we can only hope. If you want to screw around on a MilSim that has many things to offer Arma 3 is the game you want to pick up.
FARSIDER;-;The most strategic F.P.S game i have ever played. I love the game because it is filled with hard campain missions and an amazing multiplayer
Adi Biti confirmed;-;I have to say, This game is dam realistic :), AND PERFECT! even without that mod called DayZ
sham;-;Went full speed down a mountain, crashed into a tree, and I exploded into pieces. 12/10 its okay.
Predator;-;Bought it a few days ago, Now I have 136 hours of play time. If you value friendships your going to need to not to they will dwindle if you get into this game which it is very easy to as there is ALOT of content.
Tdog;-;Id  the  on this game any day of the week m8. almost onpar with victoria bitter so that's in' sayin something m8. m8 play it and if you don't like it you are a in gypsy.
Jordan;-;Great game to play especially in multiplayer with friends. The combat system is top notch and the graphics are great if you have a good enough PC to run the game in multilayer. The game has its flaws at times with fps dips on some servers but if you can get past that, the game is amazing. The mods for this game is where it shines for me personally. Mainly the wasteland mod and the life mod. On the right servers you will find yourself hundreds of hours of fun easily just by how tense the game can get. My recommendation is to only buy this game if you have a few friends who are willing to play with you. Also, if you want to play wasteland only play on sa-matra servers, this way you can reach 60fps quite easily in ultra if your PC is good enough, otherwise you will have to play on the not so optimized regular wasteland servers with low fps (30-40 or less)
Pt;-;You are kidding me right? You are selling the completed version of the game that should have been released in the first place for $20 more have you idiots fallen out of your tree? It was my understanding that you sold the other version because you couldn't finish the single player campaign in time for your release date. Things you need to address you need to work on your multiplayer experience we your customers love and support you guys cause you have a great lineage but don't  down our backs and tell us it's raining!!! Please, move from the same gamespy technology that you have been using for over 20-years old and get something more updated also spend a little money on the community by getting us some local servers that WE YOUR CUSTOMERS CAN USE here in the states without a damn 100 plus ping!!! Get your in game comm's together to optimize bandwidth. The sounds in ArmA 3 are still a little campy I know you don't want to have to pay for a sound engineer to actually do some sound mapping from real guns but guess what this is a real gun sort of experience so suck it up and get it done! We are your customer not some blind village idoit you can simply pick pocket when you want more money so don't treat us like one! Regards, Tat
Mirazca;-;WHAT THE HELL ARE YOU WAITING FOR? HAVE YOU SEEN THE OPTIONS YOU CAN DO? START THROWING MONEY AT YOUR SCREEN NOAWWWWWWWWWWw
Ayumi Shinozaki;-;Get it and Play it enjoy it. It is alpha and it will have annoying bug or something weird.
Bearta;-;Very good, very hard, very.... laggy at times. Arma 3 is great, it's fun tactical and all that good stuff. The community made content is fantastic and the multiplayer is great if you find a decent enough server. However it does carry over quite a few problems from it's previous installments, some of these incluce -Extreme difficulty navigating buildings due to weird responsiveness of controls -Nearly all of the building are unfournised -TOO MUCH WASTELAND SERVERS -A lot of MP servers are laggy as hell -Vehicles made out of ing paper That aside, It's still the best shooter I have played as of yet.
flichtshooter;-;the game is a veery good Militairy simulation game. even tough its more arcady in some aspects its still a good game . the build "field manual" can give you somme good info about somme of the mechanics and you can try them out in the editor it takes somme time to get the hang of using the editor. but the free Zeus mode DLC is another way to setup missions for tests,etc which is simpeler then the standart editing screen. the games goes realy in depth in somme aspects so i suggest trying things out in the editor or looking them up on the internet becuas sometimes the FIeld manual doesnt give enough info. the game is pretty hard tough to begin with especialy if you never played tactical realism on arma 2. but if you get the hang of the mechanics and how evrything works try joining a server. most of the community is pretty friendly so they will help you out if you need help with somthing. just a small side note : most poeple prefer you having a microphone or at least responding in chat. be aware most poeple want you to use the correct channals if you dont know what channal is used for what just ask them.
Michael Murphy;-;A fantastic game for those who love the ArmA series. The Game uns very smooth and there are many things to do with the editor and even the Multiplayer. Gaphics are insanes aswell as the animantions and even the gun play seems a bit better. i would recommend this game to any friends. - this is a cpu intensive game and would recommend you to use a higher end cpu and gpu if needed.
Rent 0 Kill;-;Really an amazing game will all the different mods that one can play. Eg. best mods for me is WASTELAND, ALTIS LIFE AND BREAKING POINT.
P0WN3R;-;Love this game :D
Filthy Frank;-;AMAZING AS SH***************************************************************************************8I*********************************8T
J. Penty;-;ArmA 3 is a whole new dimension on Military Sim's. It brings not so far into the future tech with squad based teamwork. Even while in Alpha / Beta this game is great. Its another great addition to the ArmA / Operation Flashpoint series! 9 / 10
GraeWulf;-;More a battle Sim than a game :)
Rave;-;There is nothing quite like this game when you are in a full scale firefight, exchanging rounds, helicopters flying over head, your squadmates moving to flank the other team. You aren't alone in this battlefield though, many other firefights could be taking place anywhere on the map. You have free range to go where ever you'd like on the maps which are HUGE. Be forwarned though, you'll want to either ride or drive a vehicle if you have to run anywhere over a couple kilometers. Another warning that this game is NOT like Call of Duty, or Battlefield. It has a much more realistic feeling and is much harder, doesn't have an rpg system of leveling up, and you there isn't a scoreboard. That being said when you pull of something tactical with your squad, or do a combined strike with your team it is so rewarding and fun. There are mods for those of you that don't like just the base game. I haven't played breaking point, but I believe it is much like DayZ (a zombie survival mod with perma-death). There is also king of the hill, wasteland, and a few other things. I mostly play the game for multiplayer, but there is a mission editor to make missions, or to just spawn stuff and fight. There is also an episodic campaign that BI is releasing. Mod tools have just recently been released. The game is early in it's life and is going to hit full stride in a matter of months. If you want to see what's capable check out how ARMA 2 is now. Now on to opinions of techincal things. The sounds in this game are amazing, and the graphics are also phenomenal for such large maps. The lighting is crazy good especially at night. The physics are a little iffy, and there are quite a few bugs. This is to be expected with such a large world though. This is the only game where I actually jump when I get shot at, and find myself instinctly ducking at my computer. There are only two maps, Altis and Stratis. The enviroments have a great mixture from grasslands and forests to villages or cities. In terms of content ARMA 2 has much more, but I believe as the game starts to get older the community and BI will start releasing A LOT more stuff. ARMA 3's urban fighting is awesome. I love it, but ARMA 2 does long engagements better I think. The game is pretty demanding I run it on high with a 7850 XFX Black Edition 2GB, 12 GB RAM, Phenom x6 Thuban 3.2GHz and get okay FPS. The community isn't awful like other FPS games. I love this game for the realistic, tactical, and strategic fighting that everyone has to do. There are mods for other things which makes me think this game has something for everyone. I would recommend this game to someone who is looking for a more mature, serious, and hardcore community than most other first person shooters, as well as looking for a game that is more realistic and team based. If the person loved to play lone wolf, wanted anything they wanted in content right this second, or was easily angered by a bug here and there I wouldn't recommend it to them. TL;DR - Graphics, Sounds, Lighting all amazing. Urban combat is better than ARMA 2. This game is for the person who wants a hyper-realistic first person shooter with heavy emphasis on team work that doesn't mind a bug here and there, and isn't bothered by waiting for more content for a little while.
Redguard;-;if crying, running 14 kms and dying and being abused by children is what you are looking for, then this game is for you. 10/10
Cengiz Fahid;-;Played a few hours. It's fun.
AwkwardCookie;-;Really amazing :P
ths [cro];-;great combat sim be it as infantry or pilot, big platform, beautiful engine, lots of mods, different MP gameplays, great community, lots of sleepless nights when conducting large organized warfares it's the closest sim to real life, u either love it or hate it - there is no in between ;)
pixelatorHD;-;the most realistic army simulator/game of all time SCREW COD
Cian;-;Arma 3 is a great game, making many improvements on Arma 2. But it does'nt feel like its finished yet, I know it's still being updated but as its out of beta I thought it would have more than what is has at the moment. Saying that it's still worth a pick up.
RussianMoofins;-;One of the only games I've found where you can run througha town naked killing people, and hen crashing a helicopter into a building, going into an editor, and fly with 85 planes behind you.
127;-;Arma 3 & Dayz r not just a normall games to play , it's a life to live .
WTFFSwan;-;Honestly, I didn't think the Arma franchise could get any better. A3 proved me wrong. Just get the game, you'll enjoy it.
[TS]DoubleAgent90;-;cool
Rainbow Trout;-;It has fish AI.
densi!!;-;Can't get the hang of the real game, but Altis Life is definetly awesome.
Ides/ThommyGunz;-;Amazing game. Truely unique and majorly realistic. 10 leagues above Battlefield and about 500million leagues above any call of duty game. If a challenge is what you're looking for then the campaign on this game is such a challenge. Even leading your own squad can be a challenege. Almost everything is driveable. Good array of weaponary. And if you play online, it only gets better with Altis life and Breakingpoint. Even Milsim. I recommend you buy this game and support the developers who actually make great games unlike the developers at Activision and Infinity Ward who churn the same garbage out each year.
Grievience;-;This game is a branch in a dynasty of games, that have been plagued by bugs, glitches and errors alike. Some are really funny, some are plain frustrating. All together, the game can let itself be hated, yet, the player will likely clock many, many hours none the less. Why? Because in what other game, you get to play in a variety of gigantic maps, to play epic missions, made by good mates? In what game, will you play in tense, long-duration military environments with complete strangers? This game will let you experience open-world combat simulation at its finest. Along with bugs. And glitches. And desyncs. But considering the overall awesomeness of the game, those eventually become quite funny, or at least acceptable. Reccomended for: The patient, mature teamplayer The military addict Not reccomended for: The immediate-satisfaction gamer
DipwadDeluxe;-;Arma 3 is by far the most realistic, most entertaining, and most intence war simulator of all time! If the technology is availible this game should come out for next gen. consoles. Not only is this an amazing sandbox but it also blows every other war game out of the water! Keep up the good work Bohemia Interactive, and step aside Battlefield and COD because a new age has started. The age of a real war.
Space Pope;-;ArmA II with physics. Finally.
Swayze Crayze;-;Seems great, but not worth it at full price, too buggy for that. Wait for a smokin' deal
MLP_Trixie69;-;It's awesome but it is best to play with friends.
{The}_{IR};-;It's awesome Video game and i recomend this Game for all but try to buy it in Sale cuz it's expensive =) .
[FLN]DanNyG;-;I really love this game. There is some glitches though not that much and is very fun to play with friends or teamamates. There are things like role-playing servers where you have to act just like you act in life and another is wasteland which is just trying tu survive. You need to find your stuff and survive, I really like this game and I could play it for days striaght without stopping because it's just so fun. Add me as a friend and we could play Arma 3 sometime , I am always on :)
Hulk Hogan's Sex Tape;-;Bit Fkn Pricey M8
Gears x Falcon [TF2:GO];-;this game is good u do need a great pc. but this game is good if u like car,tanks or helis
Santo;-;I loved this game even though i had it for the 3 day free weekend. i do recomend this game very much just as long as you have a decent pc!! :))
Instinct;-;10/10 would shoot in game again.
APRman1;-;this is a fun game.... wish i could afford it
Aldaval;-;Bugs, Hackers, glitches, Unfinnished patches, Unreleased vehicles, Just right there would be enough to steer away anyone from purchasing this game. However, even with all that I still will play Arma III. The online multiplayer experiences are pheonominal, and definetly unique. If you've ever played massive online sandbox fps, for example, Planetside 2, you will know the kind of online experiences to expect, however unlike other sandbox MMOs, the experiences you get with Arma, are changing. Its not a repetitive, boring, same old grind. Depending on what server you want to play on, you can find yourself, playing with other players against AIs, using modern military tatics and utilizing resources to save a down player pilot, or you can find yourself running drugs in the cover of night trying to evade player police. As long as I have played Arma III, I cannot say that it has been boring for me. However this game is not for everyone, so if your not into the sandbox effect, i would continue on with your day, but if you enjoy unique experiences, and a endless interaction, then I highly recommend Arma III.
sfrdragon;-;this game is great but be ready to spend hours finding loot
Seph;-;The quintessential first person military sim for the seasoned military shooter fan or first-person shooter players looking for a bit of depth and substance in a game. This aint arcadey casual rambo CoD or Battlefield rubbish folks. This is the real-world modelled experience every FPS player *should* be looking for. And if you haven't been... you need to take a long hard look in the mirror and tell yourself to lay off the drugs.
Unconscious;-;Really good game! Amazing graphics. Suggest to anyone who is looking for military game!
7.62x39mm;-;this games cool except i cant get it f my life
Uri;-;Arma III is the best chopper crash test, LSD dragon catch simulator out there!!!! Watch out for druken pilots and soldier, everyone on arma is drunk or has take some drugs!!! And the level beginning "Euhm I hope were not gonna to die again... Me too Me too ... And we crashed again... Affirmative Shi t F a c k" Well seriously this game is awesome, there are bugs, there are many bugs BUT this are funny as hell. So if you got so often dissappointed by EA or Activision about their next "big" title. You should buy this game!! At first I was like I dont know Arma I wont buy it, and then there was a Steam sales and Arma 3 was free to play, and what should I say.... I got 19Hours play time since beginning, and just bought that game. And a big + is also the multiplayer community is that what it should have been in Battlefield, almost everyone is nice and you can work as a team together to get your objectiv.
El Mehicano's Boys;-;it's a awesome game it's lot's of fun
Linkgray;-;great game! loads of fun on any game mode! but dont buy it for battle royale since i never got in the servers since they are always full or glicthed.
Harknus;-;Arma 3..so far this is the best game of the Arma series, I thoroughly enjoyed playing Arma 2 and all it had to offer and Arma 3 continued that for me, the game is much smoother and alot easier to play yet still keeping that challenging aspect it originally had, the modding community for this game is amazing and some of the stuff I have seen made and played makes the game itself better than what it already was, for anyone skeptical of moving from Arma 2 to this, don't be, It's worth the buy.
MrMelon;-;I ed in my pants when i got this game
Reu;-;If you have played Operation Flashpoint (2001), you'll be right at home with this one - which is my biggest complaint about this game. Not much has changed in game mechanics since Flashpoint. The game is still pretty much waypoint oriented and even the editor is pretty much the same; meaning for instance setting up custom loadouts needs lots of scripting. The AI is downright horrible at times and actions that worked fine in previous releases (like driving in a convoy) are now nearly impossible, with lots of collisions and vehicles getting stuck. At least the first part of the single player campaign was a disappointment, with most of the action being 4vs4 infantry combat. Multiplayer and community made mods are what make this game, so if you enjoy huge realistic operations with real people, or having fun with mods in a beautiful sandbox - then this game might be for you. All in all, ARMA 3 is still in development and hopefully it will break free from the old Flashpoint mold. New features like graphical interfaces in the editor and flexibility to AI behaviour beyond the waypoint-system would be most welcome. Modifications add a lot of potential and replay value. Get ARMA 3 if you enjoy your games as projects. 3,5/5
Saladin;-;Great game, But it really depends who you are playing with that makes or breaks the game !
Izoul;-;Short and skinny: Don't buy this if you are looking for an alternative to the "Big 2" AKA: COD/BF series. It has never been that, and never will be. This is mistake #1 with this series/style of sim/game. People say "How is it compared to BF/COD?" It's the dead wrong question to ask. Preface/General: Now that aside, this is a simulator for it to be 'what you want it to be'. Think again more of a brutal sandbox mode game for either single or multiplayer. It doesn't hold hands, there is not much for a indication on how you die...you just die. Now keep in mind, you might travel from 5min to 30min, or even more to a target area in a sandbox like this without even seeing an enemy/pulling the trigger, and things can be 'randonized'....and if you screw up, or even if you do things perfect/to the book, you still might 'insta die' because you were in the wrong place/wrong time...much like real war. That's brutal to a lot of people who in turn ask the question of "Where is the fun in that?!" To that, I'd say "It's what you make of the experience, what you feel if you do acomplish someting in it." Performance: My experiences have always been that this sim always runs incredibly better for 'single player performance' for it's built in missions, or user generated download missions/etc. There are infinite downloads for user generated content, or you can easily make your own 'what if' missions. Again, you need to think 'hardcore BIG sandbox'. Multiplayer: Can be very fun, but user beware it's not for the faint of heart. If you are looking for a instant 'run and gun' like the intro mentioned titles, you are going to hate the expereince. It's not that at all. The community is more 'niche' and if you don't care for that, this is not your game/sim. Also, mutiplayer is way more taxing on your system for performance generally speaking depending on the mission/group size. Your mileage may vary. It does also support Track IR5 for those flight sim folks wanting that for your infantry control as well which is almost a must for a hardcore sim like this. GUNS GUNS GUNS: Ballistics are modeled to be as close to possible as the real thing. This means gravity drop/pattern spreads, ballistic modeling for impact on various things. It's a simulator. That being said...so many people have become 'conditioned' to 'balance/fairness' for multiplayer aspects. IE: In those FPS games they will adjust/nerf/improve guns based on player feedback and perfomance, largly due to map constraints in the sake of 'balance' vs 'realism'. That's not here. It's all just math in a sandbox. To some people, that is great, to others...a nightmare of people screaming "SRAW IS OP!/GUN X IS OP!". Balance and 'fairness' is not why you play a simulation though. Also bear in mind it's quite common to have fire fights on some areas of 500m or more apart on some areas, so again this is where people might not be used to long range tactical combat. Every weapon in ARMA is usefull and you will be more concerned about your SQUAD loadout vs your own. It's not a lone wolf game, and there are not 'stats/unlocks'. How is it VS "fill in the blank?": Think of this in this comparison. DCS-A10C is more akin to the Arma series, vs say BF/COD/Ace Combat. They all share only one common item "War based". Other than that, they are VERY different experiences. Games like BF/COD, you will litterally be pulling the trigger, or dieing within seconds of spawning in, and if you die, the respawn timers are either non existant, or a short few seconds...it's insta action at it's core, as well as those titles having VERY enclosed maps vs scale of Arma maps. Arma, you will be at a base, and it could be 5-45 minutes depending on a wild spectrum on things whether single player or multiplayer. Some people can't handle traveling more than 10 minutes to a target/engagement area before becoming bored, or will rage quit if they get killed instantly by not using cover. There is no 'red flash, retreat to cover'....generally speaking in comparison to FPS's mentioned above. Depends on what you got hit by, and where. 9/10 you're going to be insta killed. This forces VERY tactical cautious team based game play...because who wants another 5-15 minute trip from home base back to the action? I play both DCS, ARMA, and BF series, and they each have their time and place. Comparing them is hard to do as they are truly not the same genre really. The biggest buyer remorse with series like these (ARMA/DCS) is people go into them expecting an 'alternative' to a mainstream BF/COD/Ace Combat play style, only to then find out they stepped into an entirely different genre of game/sim play style. Like others have said....'should you buy it?' If you want a brutal infantry/ground vehichle (primarily infantry) sandbox large scale map simulation with lots of modding options=Absolutley. If you want a harcore 'flight sim': No, buy DCS instead. Flight mechanics here are more simish than BF, but not even close to DSC series. You buy ARMA more so for the infantry combat aspect. If you want an alternative to BF/COD/MOH: Absolutlety not. It's not the same genre of software at all. I know all the screenshots and user videos can make it 'appear so'...but the reality is that it doesn't play like that at all.
Thien_Nguyen;-;One of the best combined arms simulations i have ever played. The gameplay is only hindered by the people and community you play with. Play with an exciting group of people or with friends and you will have all the funny, stupid, and downright awsome moments you can only have in a few combined arms game. However playing by your self is not always boring but not always fun. So what are you waiting for try this game out and if you want find a good clan to hang out with and have fun.
Ze King;-;Very good game. The campaign is a large step up from Arma 2 being both interesting, enjoyable, somewhat challenging and free from annoying AI leaders and teammates. Multiplayer is varied with both casual servers and clan servers with large battles occuring. The maps are both beautiful and varied, it is also a good template for mission makers. The main part of Arma III, however is the mods and missions created by the community, this is what Arma is all about. User created missions vary from single player stealth mission to large battles from land and air, there are even some more creative mission that allow you to become other things like a police officer. BIS have given the community an enjoyable game which doubles up as a template for a large amount of mods and missions both new and old. There are however some problem namely the optimisation. The is very laggy, there is however some solutions and after a bit of tweaking the game should be very playable. Squad management is still time comsuming but after some practice (from the campaign) it does become slightly easier. Overall Arma III is an excellent game and has set out on what it was going to achieve: Become an interesting and enjoyable game while allowing the community to create excellent mods and missions. Dont listen to people complaining about optimisation and content because optimisation can be solved with a google search and content can easily be fleshed out by those who have excellently contributed to the game on things such as the workshop and Armaholic. This game is worth every penny.
Goon;-;A great improvement over the second game. Animations are very good and fluid, alot of the clunky controls have been alleviated. The games visuals are pretty nice. Multiplayer is where this game truly shines, however to play at a stable framerate in multiplayer, you are going to need an above average PC unless you are willing to do some config changes and graphic downgrades. All in all, I recommend this game. It's worth its price in terms of content, and it has workshop compatibility.
Loller;-;ArmA 3, one of the best shooter out there on the market ( Depends on what kind of shooter you like of course ), despite of all bugs and glitches, Arma III can give a truckload of satisfaction if played with friends, in addition to that, they've added the Zeus mode, where players assume the role of a Game Master, it sounds familiar because the idea is taken by Dungeons&Dragons, the Game Master has the role to create missions, enemies, enemies route, object and everything he likes, it's a really fun game, as you can see i spent 800 hours on this game, and yes, i agree i suggest to buy it if you're searching for a serious and hard shooter, and the content is limitless, all the mode that you find on multiplayer is made by the community!
Pots burned my finger;-;Arma 3 is the game that will leave you endlessly for hours on end fighting and just overall enjoying the scenery! Arma 3 is the next gen Military Simulator by Bohemia Interactive and features over 500+ Units,Aircraft,Vehicles and weapons and many more goodies ingame. Arma 3 is worth buying!
Disco;-;Stop dreaming start war-ing! With Arma 3's sandbox-like features, create any scenario you could think off from ships pirating to base assaults to jet dog-fighting. The moddability of this game is incredible, just about mod anything you want in this game - guns, tanks, warships, planes, choppers, etc. Hop onto Armaholic.com to check out the vast array of mods already available for download - you could just about create a soldier from any nation in the world. Australian? Brazillian? Chinese? Danish? They're all possible! Just remember to keep an eye out for boggies out on the field and watch your teammates backs. And this game screams MMMOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOODDSSS
NIP1;-;Really fun with friends atlis life for the win or king of hill
[TB] GravediggerGF;-;Excellent open world map, plenty of things to do, wasteland, fly heli's, sell drugs in altis life. Fun tactical gunplay, really easy to screw up but very rewarding when played correctly. Tons of fun and highly recommend it.
waffleman44;-;It is one of the most amazing games I played over the course of this year!
Strangelove;-;Great simulation! Needs a good rig but if it runs with 30 - 60 frames it's amazing
hinkzdk;-;Great game, i love the game, and i fell in love the game mode rpg, on projectnarnias rpg server, its nice and good staff
Waffen;-;The community is trash, its a mix of team killing, autism, and milsim faglords making  overly complicated. As usual with arma games the optimization is absolute garbage and no matter what you do, you wont hit 60fps consisstantly in online. The guns feel great but have the impact of a pellet rifle, especially the 9mm sidearm NATO gets. The story doesnt make sence but its arma, you dont play it for the singleplayer (i was very disapointed however that the singleplayer was not co-op like in 2). The only way to make this game good is by A) Having a squad that fits you, whether it be autistic milsims, people who are just playing to  around, or a mixture of both, who is in your squad ultimatily deterimines your fun B) MODS MODS MODS MODS. The massive amount of weapon mods spices up the gameplay with familiar faces like the AR platform and ak platform rifles. It makes the game much more realistic ironicly. C) Having lots of patience. Good luck finding a server that is consitantly good that doesnt have faglord admins (Ive been banned for saying "wat" isntead of "what", asking someone to turn down their mic, and using opfor weapons while playing as blufor). 6/10, 8/10 with mods Be advised, when you download mods, even if its something as small as a retexture, you will NOT be able to join 50% of the ing servers because arma doesnt like having us filthy modders join vanilla servers. So the servers will be split and you will be getting upset because of the lack of a filter between vanilla only and mod friendly servers.
Kappachino;-;8/10 (cuz of bugs) worth buying!
Flushot22;-;This game continues to be one of my favorite games. If you are into survival/fps games this is well worth the try.
Viper_Duex;-;I wish I had the money to buy this game :( IT'S SO FUN!
The Legend;-;I like it, it's very tactical and weird
Playful Desk;-;This game is still a bit buggy since release but that's to be expected with such a large project. I have a lot of fun playing the campaign but the most fun comes out of the community made gametypes. I definitely reccomend this game!
Bradley;-;This game is amazing. The simulation feeling you get while playing this game is amazing. The roleplaying gamemodes just create that edge that makes you want to play it even more. Graphics are amazing. Physics are amazing. 'Nuff Said
Skullkid;-;Playing Arma 3 in a tactical manner alongside random people you don't know, assigned to different squadrons fulfilling different roles on the battlefield is among the most rewarding multiplayer experiences I've had in gaming in a very long time. Highly recommended combat sim, immersive and lots of features, combat stances, etc. 9/10
Armasaurus;-;Really good game, I got addicted as soon as I started to play Altis life and Stratis Wasteland. I just cant stop playing it now!
TG BulletDrop;-;I'ts Just AWESOME
Skaylor;-;this is a high quality sandbox game, it has everything to be unique. it has a HUGE map and another very large to. you can do squad missions, be the leader or to be a soldier and a squad member. this game is very interesting and it has vehicles which are very fun to ride, the combat is very interesting and sometimes difficult, if you want a game like counter strike or call of duty then go somewhere els! everyone must have writen that but i will write it to... the graphics are awesome! sometime it feels real so better have a computer that can run this cause i only have the minimum and i really like the game, if you reach max running then there is no bound to how much you will love the game. you can check if you can run the game at:http://systemrequirementslab.com/cyri single player is interesting and nice but the multiplayer is the real deal, you have a lot of servers with diffrent rules and attributes, you can drive with some people around the world and survive and you can go to the missions that the server gives you randomaly. for ending i really love the game and i want you will to! so if you dont want to spend 60$ then wait for a good sale.
skybirdthing;-;The Multiplayer mods for this are the best.
Divii;-;This game is amazing, I was worried that I would have bought a bad game for how much it cost, but it was really worth every penny. Out of 10 stars I would give it a 9.5, and the only reason its not 10/10 i sbecuase at first when I started playing it I had extremly low FPS, and I know i have a very good rig becuase i built it myself so i spent a couple of days trying to figure out what was wrong and frustration everywhere. After a while I set the games priority to high in the luanch options and some other tweaks to the game. Thankfully I'm experienced with computer hardware, but other people with no experience might have alot of trouble with it. Hopefully you guy scan fix that in some way? Other than that this game is 10 out of 10 would definitely recommend to anyone! I just finished playing it, and i started today. Yeah, 7 hours! :D I had a blast and i will tomorrow too!
GeT_RiGhT;-;Fantastic Game!!! It really does need some patches, more weapons and animation fixes (Especially with reloading). But other than that, if you love extremely hardcore games (AND ONLY HARDCORE GAMES, THIS GAME WILL BE BAD IF YOUR GOING TO PLAY IT LIKE COD OR BF), then this is the game for you. Considering the state that its in, i'd give it an 8.5/10 . But when the DEV's fix the glitches and animations, this game will easily score at least a 9.5/10 for a Military Simulation. It has a very steep learning curve, but in 5 hours or so you should get the hang of it :D
Sinthia;-;Won battle royale without killing anyone 10/10
[FOR] Birdman;-;All I have to say this is still a work in progress game in the way of content with little content to begin with but still a great game and about two years down the road this will be a great game.
Lewis Hamilton LH#44;-;Brilliant game, graphics A1, audio A1, gameplay perfection, couldnt possibley be a better combat game currnetly on the market
AHappyTeddyBear;-;This game is one of the best I have ever played , its a military FPS(FIRST PERSON SHOOTER) with massive battles on campaign and multiplayer its got awesome graphics and is very realistic !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!:D
Mayin;-;Tried shooting the enginer so he would repair my helicopter and was killed by my squad. 10/10
niofalpha * #Road2SBDMFC;-;A great addition to the Arma Franchise! The graphics in it are amazing. Pros - Arma Scale combat Amazing Graphics Amazing Community/ Mods Cons - AI's can instantly find you/ have amazing aim AI's can spot you from 500 Meters from Down Hill through Fog.
Saxton;-;A great game with many different ways to play! A wide variety of community and official game modes and mods exist for Arma 3 that will keep you coming back for more. The campaign/Single Player really isn't anything special, but the graphics are ON POINT. Play with friends to get the most enjoyment! All in all, 8/10 would recommend!
ANCRON;-;1st/3rd person military shooter with vehicle combat. One of a kind "modern" military shooter, with very large battlefields. A lot of clothing, armor, weapon variations, weapon modifications, ammo types, grenades, utility tools and different kind of equipment. Large variety of civilian, military, armored ground and air vehicles. Game has great modding tools and support. Single player missions also included, as well as co-op and multiplayer modes. Game has great visuals, texture quality, animations, environments and good voice acting. Inventory is hard to navigate at first, and needs getting used to. You tend to die fast, and for some people it may be a challenge to stay alive. Game supports large player count on any given map. Personally I think this is good improvement over Arma 2.
JAWS_OF_FIRE;-;Very good game, I would highly recommend this to anyone that likes a semi-realistic war sim. This game struggles heavly from optimization issues. I have an i5 3570K at 4.4 GHz and a GTX 760. At best this game will use 60% of my CPU and or GFX card and only getting 25-40 FPS at 1920x1080 in a busy server. In single player I can get up to 80-90 FPS. Changing my GFX settings really wont change my FPS more than about 10%. 9/10
<CG>Flareside;-;A fun and addicting game for me. Started with just the campaign then started playing the Breaking Point mod which is the Arma 3 version of DayZ. Now playing Wastle land and Altis life. This game has a lot to offer and the community additions are great. I highly recomend this game if you are a fan of FPS games that actually want you to use some tactics.
Ruby on Rails;-;It's everything you love about sandbox games, mixed with everything you love about Battlefield 3 but with everything you hate about Call of Duty stripped. Buy it.
Wild Weasel;-;"Get To Tha Chop..", a thousand meters away a sniper smiles froma cut short sentence.
Hades(Music);-;Nice game
Tony Abbott;-;Where the Arma 2 campaign/s were tedious and frustrating due to bugs and poor AI. Arma 3 is one of my favourite campaigns do far. The AI is so smooth, its not 100% predictable and it just flows really well. Congratulations Bohemia Interactive on really stepping up the game with this well...game (excuse the pun)
Michaelele;-;Fantastic games with a good variety of community made missions/mods etc. If you were an avid ArmA 2 player, you'll love Arma 3! The only problem I could see with this game is that it's quite diffrent from other shooter games, and maybe a little hard to get into without help from friends that have already been playing this or arma 2.
Ninjapotatoe;-;It has everything a person can want in a game.
Coolio;-;its the bes, has a varity of mods its awesome!!
WolfBlade;-;Just buy it! No further information needed
Noor;-;A fantastic Military Simulation Game. I have not had so much continous fun from a game in years, since Crash Bandicoot on PS1. I cannot express how awesome the Arma community is and how much I love the game.
Mercaholic75;-;Most people don't want to buy this game because they were displeased with the last game Arma 2 but Bohemia kicked it up a notch im so amazed on how good of a job they did on this game it's my money well spent!
Cpl. Koala;-;This is not a game, this is a simulation if anything. Admittedly its not really war, and its not a good representation of the horrors of conflict, but its significantly better than Call of duty's over romanticized grade 6 representation. As for worth, this is not a game you can really quantify. Unlike many games where the campaign length or the multiplayer dictate its quality, this is much more than a game. If you played and liked Arma 1, or 2, buy 3. And if youre thinking about buying Arma 3, do it. The endless modibility, the mission creation and steam workshop, and the rich community are what make the Arma series a true beauty. Not to mention the Multiplayer and Campaign are kick .
KingKenDj;-;Great Game With Amazing Gamemodes! Fun with friends and single. I bought this game and never had regrets. Fun, Thrilling & Worth It!
MONEYJAYYY;-;i own my own prizza oven, you can add as many toppings as you want and it doesn't cost you extra
Dr.Headbump;-;An game that turns in to a timemachine when you play it. Lots of content and gameplay. A must buy!!!
Katarina;-;Absolutely incredible warfare simulation. This is by far the best war game I have ever played.
Troubletcat;-;So realistic it gave me PTSD.
Retro;-;YES I LOVE THIS GAME! I ALWAYS GET KIDNAPPED! ITS ALWAYS A FUN WAY TO LEARN WHY PEOPLE KIDNAP YOU FOR COCAINE...
[PWC]Tyler;-;Very good game all i can say buy this if you like role playing/fast action shooter
MuffinMan703;-;Buy this game you will not regret it
Kawyjibo;-;Cats R furry!
SneakyMidget;-;if you like beating people to death with dragon  then this is your game
Wirdal;-;It's great.
Batman;-;Great game overall with a great modding community!
Nexus_Knight;-;ArmA 3 is vary fun yet demanding game, if you have the hard ware for this game I would recommend it but if you don't, don't even think about it. I fyou like milsim this may be the game for you, their are a lot of good milsim groups that play this game and they have fun doing it, there are tons of mods to make this game so much better than it already is.
ScaryNed;-;An undeniably accurate military simulator, no other game like it (yes, COD boys and BF fans, this is very different indeed). Developed by actual military personel, this game is designed to be as realistic to military combat, tactics, and realismas humanly possible. I've played ArmA II for years and never did I imagine a game, designed for the sole purpose of military simulations, take on the challenge of becomeing a modern day platform of ArmA III.
Maxarius;-;I truly enjoy this game. It is very fun. It would be better if the ai werent so strong. I swear it takes 10 shot in the head to kill one. But other than that it is great!
RaidsB4Grades;-;me in the  and call me samantha, this is a good game.
FriendlyPanda;-;Playing this by yourself and not working together with others this game is quite boring but if you have friends to play with all kinds of fun can be had good game not great but good
Combustalemon_;-;Awesome. I loved Arma 2, and this is like Arma 2 but less clunky and lots of new mechanics and graphics. The only thing I think is holding this game back is the almost unimproved AI.
TheTurtler;-;If you enjoy having to trek 3 Kilometers to take out one soldier and then trek to the next objective for another 20 minutes (real time), then Arma is your game. Arma is as close as one can get in a game to real-life combat procedures. Taking one hit will usually result in death or severe injury...and you don't wanna take a hit when you're 3 Kilometers from an objective and have to walk there... There are a few things that you should know first: 1) Combat is slow-paced and tactical 2) There are a lot of different controls that you'll need to know 3) The online community is great for help 4) With enough time and imagination, there are very few things that you can't do/create in Arma The guides that come in-game are very useful and are a must-read if you want to have a good play experience. All-in-all, for the amount of content that comes with Arma 3 and the amount of content streaming-in constantly from users as well as can be made by you, this game will give you unlimited hours of entertainment, provided that you put the time into learning the controls properly. This is a steal for $60, and anything cheaper is almost a crime for the amount of value that lies within this game. Even if you're not into military shooters, this game has more than just "something" for everyone.
ThrillHouse;-;i am a MASSIVE fan of all arma games and i can say after a dodgy release bohemia interactive have eventually have brought this game to close perfection and with visuals like this, i am hooked. if you are new to arma i recommend starting here, it gives you clear instructions and a smooth campaign (thats if you can run it). it has nice, mature, loyal and welcoming community (with the occasional your mum joke) that does not hesitate to mod and create user made missions, so boredom is rare. i highly recommend this game to anyone looking for a deeper fps experience.
John Doe;-;This game will not measure your KDR, this game will not have you grind to unlock weapons or attachments, this game will not release 4 expensive DLC patches every year, but this game will be more immersive, epic and thrilling than any other. It will make you feel like a part of something bigger. Arma is not for everyone, one should not be fooled into thinking so; the willingness to train, practice and execute are not traits everyone posses. However, should you choose to don the desert camo of Blufor, the quicksand colours of Opfor or the grass greens of Greenfor, know that you have become part of a community which will grow, advance and perfect their craft. If you're willing, and if you want more than a game, Arma is the pinnacle of milsims to date. UPDATE: the new Zeus game modes are amazing (currently availible on the dev build), it is difficult to sum up the essence of the gane mode, but it is very interesting, and my new favourite game mode, which is quite an achievement considering I've been around since Arma: Cold War Crisis (as it is bow known) and the OPF games.
Don, Meehan;-;the game still needs lots of work in differnt places but if you have the time to mod it and find the right bunch of guys to play with you will defo fall in love with this game for the price you pay and hours you get need i say more
Juzika;-;Bohemia please code better thx <3
Cpr. Brayrock [WE];-;Great game, loads of mods have come out for it. Problem only exists is that it's still badly optimized for AMD CPU's. And to top it off, there is no official mods that add in content, that have been released.
Casey Jones;-;This game is amazing, but it's still a unfinished product so just be aware.
L3go Ares;-;excellent game and lots of fun
Octavius;-;GLORIOUS ARMA MASTER RACE GAME NOW LOOKING EVEN BETTER. NO WAY TO EXPLAIN IT OTHER THAN BY SAYING IT IS THE GREATEST GAME TO YET RELEASE THIS YEAR. oh wait wrong game. its not that good.
JwilsoN;-;Holy, What can I say? Bohemia you did it again, there is never a dull moment with this game, one moment I was walking through a forest with my men, being stealthy (I took my pants off to be super sneaky) and one guy set off a mine, killed 2 of my men, we had to fight a whole squad of the enemys my heart was racing. Think you have had enough of this game? Your wrong, there is TONS of modders out there creating mods for our entertainment, from zombie killing to diving contests, there is a mod for you. Don't feel like playing a mod? Go to the steam workshop and find a mission that others made, for you to play!!! All in all 12/10
Closet Weeaboo;-;got arrested on a role player server for- 6 counts of murder with vehicle 3 counts of grand theft 1 count of nudity 1 count of asking the admin for a handjob 3 counts of escaping arrest 11/10 better than gta
LT. Commander Scott;-;awesome, a group of people restriant me and left in a chruch and called me the new pope. My friend crashed a tank into my straitor and blew up.
Sublimeee;-;Playing this game like it's my job. Really fun, I would pay full price any day of the week.
?uestlove;-;the definitive go karting experience
Toxyc;-;Its a really good game!
Twisted [UK];-;An improvement from ArmA 2 in every way.
=7Cav=1LT.Tsaba;-;The only game where I had a UN Press team try to interview me in the middle of a firefight about the war in Altis.
AJackson92;-;Too many wasteland servers. More domination and warfare please.
Eno Etukeno;-;Bestest, but hosting multiplayer servers should be done by NASA:
Milo;-;Arma 3 is an improvement over the previous ones, but the game still suffers from clunky interface and lackluster AI. For an Arma fan like myself, though, it is the best Arma so far.
SAura;-;Arma2 with some new weapon stances, granade shortcut keys and zeus live mission mode. Definately worth getting with discount - would not recommend paying full price if u got Arma II already.
ReeferTheReaper;-;Atlis Life If You Want No Life.
Hero;-;First day in Altis was taken hostage by rebels and hurled out of a moving helicopter before being mugged for my car and being thrown in prison as a consequence. 10/10. Would holiday in Altis again.
Zer0 | Heritage Not Hate;-;Really nice game.. Beautiful aswell. Just the campaign made me rage xD
Seceratorul Daniel;-;Awesome military sim
War;-;my favorite steam game! many free mods (altis life, wasteland, hostile takeover, breaking point, etc) we play @ 4th-recon.com
[ZR] JuBJuB;-;Great game its a must have
Triscuitbiscuit;-;I enjoyed this game.
[GG]OfficerDoofy;-;Amazing Game, Lots Of money opertunitys if you get good at scripting>.... Tons of server host looking for mission modders!
cjdjman;-;i LOVE THIS GAME 10/10 I love the guns and items and the user interface that's a big plus way better than arma2 why are u reading this go buy it now im going to buy that's for shore 10/10. :)
Ace;-;awesome game you shoulkd get it
gruh;-;i shot a fish in the face
Mayin;-;Tried shooting the enginer so he would repair my helicopter and was killed by my squad. 10/10
niofalpha * #Road2SBDMFC;-;A great addition to the Arma Franchise! The graphics in it are amazing. Pros - Arma Scale combat Amazing Graphics Amazing Community/ Mods Cons - AI's can instantly find you/ have amazing aim AI's can spot you from 500 Meters from Down Hill through Fog.
Saxton;-;A great game with many different ways to play! A wide variety of community and official game modes and mods exist for Arma 3 that will keep you coming back for more. The campaign/Single Player really isn't anything special, but the graphics are ON POINT. Play with friends to get the most enjoyment! All in all, 8/10 would recommend!
ANCRON;-;1st/3rd person military shooter with vehicle combat. One of a kind "modern" military shooter, with very large battlefields. A lot of clothing, armor, weapon variations, weapon modifications, ammo types, grenades, utility tools and different kind of equipment. Large variety of civilian, military, armored ground and air vehicles. Game has great modding tools and support. Single player missions also included, as well as co-op and multiplayer modes. Game has great visuals, texture quality, animations, environments and good voice acting. Inventory is hard to navigate at first, and needs getting used to. You tend to die fast, and for some people it may be a challenge to stay alive. Game supports large player count on any given map. Personally I think this is good improvement over Arma 2.
JAWS_OF_FIRE;-;Very good game, I would highly recommend this to anyone that likes a semi-realistic war sim. This game struggles heavly from optimization issues. I have an i5 3570K at 4.4 GHz and a GTX 760. At best this game will use 60% of my CPU and or GFX card and only getting 25-40 FPS at 1920x1080 in a busy server. In single player I can get up to 80-90 FPS. Changing my GFX settings really wont change my FPS more than about 10%. 9/10
<CG>Flareside;-;A fun and addicting game for me. Started with just the campaign then started playing the Breaking Point mod which is the Arma 3 version of DayZ. Now playing Wastle land and Altis life. This game has a lot to offer and the community additions are great. I highly recomend this game if you are a fan of FPS games that actually want you to use some tactics.
Fariko lNinja;-;battle royal is the best
VladiSSius;-;It's Arma, not Call of Duty or Battlefield or Halo or whatever... It's simulation, so no 360quickscope, no gender-related bashing, no "noobs vs pro" to a certain degree, Simply one of the best simulations game in existence. It's basically a military simulations, with multiplayers and good gameplay, with multitudes of community mods. With massive content created by community, you buy this game, you could play more than just 1 game. Yeah, wanna play The Sims? Arma 3 have it. Wanna play Tank Battle? Arma 3 have it. Wanna play Ace Combat? Arma 3 have it. Wanna play racing games? Arma 3 have it. Wanna play... oh come on, try them for yourself! I'm not paid to write long review, so I'm gonna leave it here. Oh, and zombies... Hehe, what's better than playing zombie in Arma themed world? Download a zombie mod, use a script to spawn tank, and have fun!
Super Ultra Kami Guru;-;good job bohemia. this game is worth the money
RedRose12;-;love the vids but i wish it was cheaper
Kinguin.TaoLinD;-;Best game ever 10/10 ing sooooo goood the game is jsut just so awsome and so much fun!
Voidwalker Mitch;-;Nvidia GTX 780 = $800 ASUS 24" 1080p Monitor = $300 Playing on all lows and still getting 10fps = ArmA 3
Kity;-;Played around 50 hours of this game so far and its really fun. The main thing that got me hooked was Altis Life, still every other gamemode is just as engaging. Highley recommended game if you have the required specs :)
Freakious;-;If you like Shooting things This is the game for you
Cookie;-;Arma 3 is the most pure PC game in the world. 10/10
Mtn_DewGoat;-;Great game, Very Good War Simulator also very fun to play with friends. 5/5
Martin Luther King Jr. (George);-;I have played over 500 hours on this game now (OMG!!), Since the first time i played this game, every minute on it has been worth while. The amound of different game modes on this game is endless. Altis Life, Battle Royal, King Of The Hill and much more!!. Personally i enjoy Altis Life the best as i have found an amazing communtity to play with (sawclan.net). This game is so fun and is worth every single penny. The graphics on this game is amazing especially when you find yourself in the middle of no-where, the views are out of this world. Overall i reccomend this game as it can fill everybody's needs, apart from some of the hakers that decide to ruin this game (but every game has this), this is one of the best games out there!!
Kotis;-;Arma 3 is a Great addition to the franchise for the "Newer Crowd". AS you can see i have only played ARMA 3 for 32 hours since march when i had purchased. The reason for this is that i just Cannot like this game. The reason for this is that it lacks the "Feeling, Immersion," of its predessesor ARMA 2. When i play ARMA 3 i feel like im playing a Good game, But NOT an ARMA game. The immersion of the game is very poor comapred to its predessesor but its mechanics such as animation,sounds etc are great. While i have only played 32 hours of arma 3, i have played well over 3000 hours of Arma 2 and its expansion OA. And i can say with great confidence that if you enjoyed ARMA 2 you may or may not enjoy ARMA 3.
Seven;-;This game brings realism to the world of FPS, even though when it was released it was some half finished piece of crap, they have really turned it around with the help of the modding community. If you want realism, I would definitely recommend this game.
Alex;-;-Spawn -Get in chopper -Get shot down by aimbot enemies -Repeat 10/10
SuperNaut;-;This game is just awesome. Ppl may complain its too expensive, but they are rly wrong. For what an Arma game have and for what the community build for the game its a pretty cheap price you are paying. Expect to have hundreds of hours of gameplay, because you wont master all the skills necessary to enjoy the full content of the game in just 10 hours. This game is not for casual Players.
Mothix;-;After recently playing a lot of Arma II, mainly on the game modes 'Island Life' and 'Wasteland' I decided that I absolutly must have this game, and when it went on sale this summer sale (2014) I snatched it up right away; and I can tell you I do not regret it a single bit! Wasteland is a little different to what I was used to on Arma II after only playing it for a short while but fun nethertheless, Zeus is where the game has really caught my attention! Read up on Zeus and give it a shot, you wont regret it if you want more depth to a shooter.
Obomba;-;Life-like graphics and immersion would give any veteran ptsd. This game will turn anyone into a adrenaline junky instantly. The realistic gameplay and balistics are punishing, but at the same time very rewarding. This third installment of Bohemia's army simulator set in the near future on an existing island offers tactical gameplay and is enjoyed best playing in a squad. Although lone wolfing can be done your survival chances will be smaller. The base game includes access to multiplayer mods like Battle Royal, Wastelands, King of the Hill, Altis Life and Breaking Point. High replayability value and a mission editor for those who like scripting all makes Arma3 worth your money. Requires a mid-high end pc to run properly. The gameplay can be slow. Some mods don't run as well as others and suffer from desync. It has a few bugs and glitches, though nothing game breaking I've experienced so far. The movement can feel clunky and the controls/keybindings may take a while getting used to as there are just so many. I would reccomend Arma3 to anyone who enjoys a serious militairy simulator.
R;-;I've been waiting for a game like this my whole life without even knowning it. Quite possibly the best shooting game ever made.
HUGE AND ERECT;-;most realistic water ive seen
ShadowSkills (cancelled);-;I drove a jeep for 10mins to get to where the fight was. Immediately after getting out of the jeep i died without even being able to fire a single shot. let alone spot the one that was shooting at me.
The Chivalrous Luchador;-;Lots of different game modes to keep you busy. it's all about that wasteland mod though
Septix;-;This game has so many mods anyone fan of rust , dayz , gta or any other shooter with sandbox features get this its great Altis Life mod Wasteland Awesome mods
manif3st;-;Great game. Worth the amount!
TORDENSKJOLD;-;pretty awesome
Molotov Soup;-;Work on that multy player FPS DROP Bohemia for the love of GOD!!!!!!
HOLDINtheACES;-;One of the best and most realistic modern shooters out there. Great online content and community. Good campaign. Amazing graphics. Well worth the money if you're looking for an open world, modern shooter.
Rayy;-;Needs more stupid content! Like Go-Karts! Oh wait...11/10
Wicked;-;Anyone who likes to play in army sims or loves retared physics. this is your game. best game in the arma series. easily run on IGpus. Jolly good fun :)
HeathCliff;-;Must play game !!!
Jedi Master;-;Great game. Great successor of the previous one. A must have for every military enthusiast!
Hampus;-;Realistic coop/multiplayer game and singleplayer offcourse, I can already tell that this game is based on teamwork and it's awesome. good job bohemia!
jediben211;-;Arma 3 is a very fun game to mess about on but it is quite hard to play seriosly as the AI are absolute  and becuase crashing into a fence at 2 kmh in a car kills you. Apart from this it is a very fun game to play on Altis life but i wouldn't really recommend it that much who actually want to do millitary stuff on it.
MartyredSaint [Trading Skins];-;One of my favorite games, the normal game modes and campaign are really good but the mods and other community content give this game very high replay value.
yoNkz;-;Awesome game! Lots of fun mods to play.
Hakrit;-;najlepsza ze wszystkich arm ale ma dwa minusy: -mao broni (nie ma chociaby strzelb) -okropna optymalizacja ale tak to nie ma nic w niej zego nawet AI daje rade ANG the best of armas but there are 2 minuses -lack of weapons (no shotguns for example) -crappy optimalization overall its very good, even the AI is not so bad
GeorgeWashington;-;I used to have a job and friends. Now I have Arma.
Prison Nick;-;if you like butt stuff you will like arma 3. all praise the booty.
Belt Camel;-;Super fun to play with friends its very realistic and the graphics are great!
NeckNecklace;-;Might be a bit expensive but overall after buying it it was hella fun and can spend hours upon hours on it with all the mods and things to do
CABOOSESSS;-;Overall Arma 3 is a great game once you get the controls down. ALso get ready to die alot
Noki <zorque.xyz>;-;The best game ever, no joke. Although it's tagged as a military simulator, there is much more you can do. The Altis Life RPG mod, for example, is the best game mode I've ever played. Bohemia have factored almost everything into this, and made so much attention to detail. It's purely amazing. Although made on a 7 million budget, this is way better than any other game on the market. Of course, it's confusing. But, it optimizes everything. Every key on your keyboard does something, every animation has so much detail, and the configuration settings are amazing. Even if your PC isn't the best, you'll still be able to run this fine. Which brings me to my next point, the engine was made to be clunky, so you can run this game at 25+ FPS and it's quite tolerable. The only problem I've found is it runs in 16-bit colour mode when running on borderless windowed. But that is nothing compared to how great the game actually is. I have spent a small 60 hours playing this, 57 of which were in the past two weeks, according to my Steam profile, at the time I wrote this review. I have had so much fun in this. Just as I was about to leave gaming altogether, I bought this for 60 AUD. I don't regret it. In essence, if you have friends to play with, and a half-decent computer, you will have so much fun on this game. I recommend it to everyone. This absolutely  on Arma 2, DayZ and any other type of game of similarity.
Carbonrod;-;This is the train simulator for all people wanting to invaid greece. It has many civilians ready for you to dominate with such force as gun, tank, plane, boat. You can steal van and drive like Niko in GTA. The bad guys in 300 deffinatly should of played this game before they tried to get sparta. The best part is the plane. So speed, such sound, wow.
Hoganable;-;Obviously, you'll know what you're getting into if you've played, and had fun playing Arma II. Potenetial for some really fun mutliplayer experiences, and a whole bunch of missions on the workshop to play on your own. Huge map and great game mechanics.
Shad0w Fox;-;This is war! If you like military simulation games this is worth your money.
1eyewillie;-;I enjoy arma 3 most realistic military simulater I have played.
THELASTMASTER;-;Best military game out there!
James;-;GET IT!
xcom 2: snake tits;-;Singleplayer is an exercise in pain on high difficulty. Game overwrites autosaves and limits you to 1 save. Prepare your body for an autosave with grenade launcher rounds inbound forcing you to restart. Great roguelikelike.
Blind_God;-;/!\ This revue is for multiplayer only as there is no actual singleplayer content in this game. This game is weeks of fun with your friends if you can spend hours to learn the keymapping and the demanding gameplay. And it is years of fun if you can spend days to learn to use the complex mission editor. For me the hugest content in a FPS ever, and features are still being added month after month.
Lazercaulk the Third;-;ARMA 3 is so good I don't have time to fully review it I just want to get back to playing.
chrescht17;-;what an epic game!! I just tried the Altis Life mod so far, and it blows me away. Awesome graphic, really nice physics, realistic textures... wow. However, it has some minor and major bugs (specially the mod). It needs enormous computing power to play at high graphics. Glitches are common,... But after all, it has huge potential. I can't await to see more features of this game
MakaVeli;-;10/10 would get run over by car again
Axon;-;This game is pretty well done, I would say this is in the top 20 games on steam it isnt fun as Arma 2 but it definitely improves the way the game runs, and the voice acting. There are also tons of missions to download of the workshop. I would have so say sniping in this game is my favorite. I would rate this game a 7/10 on the game scale.
Freelancer;-;One of the best War games out their but don't be fooled if fast paced action is for you then this game is not the one.This is a Simulator which offers a lot of tatical elements.The ArmA campaign is something I've enjoyed and because of the massive modding community theres always new content being released!
Prince Al-Yaseen;-;Very good game. Love it!!
H8D-cooks1888;-;in brillant!! there,now go buy it ers!!!
Sch1z0p1tz[LV];-;Great game, Great Graphics, Great gameplay, great combat and great to play with friends(that i don't have)
Corby1909;-;Just Epic, all i need to say. 10/10
Travv0;-;very good five out of 7 stars
hell543;-;This game is amazing! If you've played Arma 2 then you know what Arma is all about. If you havent then let me enlighten you. The Arma series is a 3rd and 1st person combat simulator with unlimited game modes such as Breakingpoint, Dayz, Altis Life, and normal seize and secure objective missions. Jump in with millions of players and experience realism like never before. And for all the fans of Call of Duty and the Battlefield Franchise your in luck because this game has campain for you to enjoy with no 360 no scope . Strategize, Compromise, and Defeat your enemies one by one in this tactically realistic military simulator. Worth every penny!
Teal'c;-;When i die im getting plugged into this game
[PVG]MRPlNK;-;I've been playing this quite a bit... it's really pretty awesome. If you like Arma 2 you can't go wrong. It fixed so many things that were wrong. Inventory system is great now. Movement and aiming aren't clunky anymore. And it has Steam Workshop, which is awesome. It's worth buying. I got it on sale but I'd gladly pay $60 for it.
Rarest Pepe;-;great game.
SnuggleTron 5000;-;Severely underated game. Even with it's growing popularity, it's still overlooked by many many people. Trying to get my friends to play it is a chore, probably because they're too pansy to make any effort to get through the learning curve.
Privileged White Guy;-;Best War Sim Out There As Of Forever Ago And Forever On!!
Bloody George;-;One of the best FPS games I have ever played!
Lunat1cFringe3;-;While it may have its fair share of bugs it's still a great game. 10/10 would stick in pants.
Deralam;-;recommended, awnsome game!!!
Windowedboy;-;It is highly realistic. If you are expect a Call of Duty or Battle Field experience, You won't like it. This game is one like no other with realsitic guns and graphics
A/2Lt [Insert Name] [2 SG];-;Best MilSim out there yet. Truly recommend it! Great game for those interested in teamwork play and so on :D
HOLDINtheACES;-;One of the best and most realistic modern shooters out there. Great online content and community. Good campaign. Amazing graphics. Well worth the money if you're looking for an open world, modern shooter.
Rayy;-;Needs more stupid content! Like Go-Karts! Oh wait...11/10
Wicked;-;Anyone who likes to play in army sims or loves retared physics. this is your game. best game in the arma series. easily run on IGpus. Jolly good fun :)
HeathCliff;-;Must play game !!!
Jedi Master;-;Great game. Great successor of the previous one. A must have for every military enthusiast!
Hampus;-;Realistic coop/multiplayer game and singleplayer offcourse, I can already tell that this game is based on teamwork and it's awesome. good job bohemia!
jediben211;-;Arma 3 is a very fun game to mess about on but it is quite hard to play seriosly as the AI are absolute  and becuase crashing into a fence at 2 kmh in a car kills you. Apart from this it is a very fun game to play on Altis life but i wouldn't really recommend it that much who actually want to do millitary stuff on it.
TragicOCG;-;falls 2 feet, breaks legs........ THIS GAME IS AWESOME
RobBobTheCorncob[TRADING];-;Arma 3 is another great game from Bohemia Interactive! The sequel to Arma 2, Bohemia has done a great job improving their flagship military simulator for 2013-2014. 40+ guns, vehicles and 2 more massive maps. Arma has doen a great job in the past combining military simulator with massive maps and games, and it all just comes together in arma 3. Buy this game, its worth it!
Luna gamer;-;in arma the world and things you do will efect you and other players around you for good or bad
LpsLostAgain;-;This game is really fun with alta life and wasteland plus breaking point makes it worth it alone.. plus i got it when it was on sale for $35 ^_^
kekrophilliac;-;Buy it or you are ratchet.
Analytic Alex;-;quite possibly the best miltary simulator of all time
ABC_8D;-;getitgetitgetit Great multi-player game! Great modding community!
xXCriTiCaLBiLLXx;-;It isn't a war unless there is a road march.
Herr Inspektor;-;GRAPHICS! IF YOU GOT THE SPECS, BUY IT!
.Sin3x;-;All what for you need this game is - to play Altis Life or Stratis Life....Aw3some!
G.O.A.T.;-;This game is gorgeous. I love it. Get it as soon as you can!
Akisann;-;Although it's not for everyone, I'd highly recommend considering a purchase of ArmA 3 if it seems like a interessing game to you. It's got tonns of depth and alot of replayabiltiy. I'd also like to note that the game does have a hugley flexible editor which may be a big pull factor to anyone who enjoys creating their own scripted/non-scripted missions to play and share using Steam-workshop.
-{RAGE}- Geldon;-;ARMA III's graphics are amazing, the community made missions are awesome, and the maps currently in the game are very pretty. There isn't much to the vanilla singleplayer, they are currently developing the campaign and have only released one "episode" of it so far, but there are plenty of brilliant singleplayer and multiplayer missions available on the Steam Workshop. They developers have done a great job at making this as realistic and immersive as possible. Rating: 10 slithering snakes out of 10
CinCin;-;shoot men
Anmare;-;First things first. This review is more like comparing to previous Arma titles. This game is massive. With gigantic maps, lots of venicles and weapons you will have lots of fun. Gameplay is more fluid than previous game. Graphics has been improved and look gorgeous and performes nicely. There are lots of problems with CPU optimalization which can be fixed by startup command but still should be considered. Also there are tons of bugs but considering scale of things in this title it can be understood. As previous instalments Arma 3 comes with editor and is fully modable. There is new stance adjustment system which is pretty usefull in close combat. But glitches in PhysX, not giving highly requested features in game and so on are serious problem which however can be fixed in patches. You will not receive lots of missions like in previous titles but on workshop you can find lots of high quality mission which should compensate this. In whole i recomend to buy Arma 3 if you want tactical game which can be incredibly rewarding and punishing at the same time. It still fells like original Operation Flashpoint but also fells lot improved. For new players: Game plays lot diferently than other games. You must think how to aprouch enemy and so on. Run n' gun is not going to work here. You must think in this game. English is not my native language and therefore i apologize for all my mistakes in this review.
S0l1dus;-;worth it
-=312th=-BOXER;-;Arma 3 is a solid game over all still a little rough around the edges i give it 8.5 out of 10.
TOX444;-;If your into war games this is the one. Realistic and lots of fun with friends.
Megatron;-;Awesome game needs some work on the scripting side of thing's
rowie324;-;Arma 3 is arguably the single most realistic and immersive experience you can find today. It took me quite a while to get it running well, however after its up and running you wont be able to put it down. The maps are insanely huge, allowing for intense tactics. The realism of the guns is where this game really shines. while some may complain that the kick is not entirely realistic you have to adjust the sights for distance. If you get shot even once you will either be dead or have an injury such as a broken leg which only allows you to walk. Overall this game is a 9.5/10. aside from some performance issues this game is nothing short of amazing
Napalm;-;Basicly the best game ever made.
scammers add me 24/7;-;Great war simulation game ! I recommend it to all people who loves real action combat, but you might need a decent config for it.
JJHD186;-;This Game is the Best military simulation games, and the best multiplayer gameplay i have played so far. HIGHLY RECOMENDED
Captain;-;Love all the mods, it's incredible how many scenarios you can be involved in.
(GPFP) Urban Ghillie;-;I am yet to find a more realistic shooter on the market, this game offers tremendous entertainment. Conduct multiplayer operations online or with friends, or play special operations missions in the singleplayer mode with massive upgrades from the previous installment of the series. I don't recomend the game, buy it. Now.
#SQUAD Kyle;-;This game is a must have if you like MilSim. It is very realistic, and has a great community. Wasteland is for those who enjoy killing everyone in sight even if they are wearing the same camo. Deathmatch is meh. CoOp Missions are some of the best game modes. If you are new to the series, check this out, The controls are a little strange at first, but you will grow to love them.
Dust Runner;-;This game is a lot smoother and has much better gameplay than people give it credit for. Animations and stances as well as squadplay in this game are efficent and smooth. The campaign is an epic story about your average foot soldier changing the way a war is playing out just by doing his part and staying alive. I have played an extensive amount of multiplayer and campaign and I have to say that it is an experience most can enjoy if they pay attention. While I literally can't say anything about the unfolding storyline without spoiling an entire episode of its three, I will warn you and clarify that if you like explanations to everything this game is not for you. You will be a Sergeant a low ranking soldier with mind, experiences, and skills are his most effective tools. This means he doesn't get the classified info of let's say a Colonel, or a Brigadier General, or the President. Absorb information and make your own conclusions because that Spec. Ops. Captain over there sure as hell won't. This game won't make any shortcuts for you to recap its story so you better keep your head up the whole way through. The military strategies and plans carried out are phenominal and deserve a much bigger spotlight other than its famed multiplayer. Considering I got a solid 30+ hours playing through the campaign alone I call that a BIG win, let alone held up against today's standards. Hopefully you get a good picture of this game's features and don't worry the campaign will help explain them as well. Happy hunting and don't forget. Survive. Adapt. Win.
Morphine;-;The best military simulator and sandbox game, and with steam workshop that accessable, downloadable, and playable makes the Mission Editor becomes fun and unlimited to create your own and play some exciting scenario missions from other Arma3 players!!. Mods and addons are ready to touch and try. Completed campaign [Survive,Adapt,Win] about the story of Kerry with the long story and unlimited optional opjectives that make players explore, investigate and discover things around the island. Two amazing huge and mighty maps makes the battlefield looks awesome like no others. These reasons can make you enjoy and spend times on this grandly beautiful game!!!!! -------Bohemia, you're the best-
Broski;-;This is such a great tactical game. You get to play with players that want to play the game as if it was in real life, so you get a truly great simulator expeirience. DO I RECOMEND? YES!!
Bishop_Baconator;-;So the campaign is complete. A lot of folks are still having the BF4 or A3 discussion (argument). Here's what I found. A3 is not without its faults. One of the biggest apects of the game is that it's aimed at the "thinker". What I mean by that is that you have endless ways to achieve your goals, but yes in being a milsim you can be taken out by a lucky shot from a guy you never saw (with pinpoint AI targeting) from 500yrds away. For some folks that's the heart of endless frustration and this is not the game for you. BF4 shouldn't be bashed either, it's simply for a group of folks that want action and eye candy - and it delivers on both of those in spades. A3 has amazing visuals in my opinion, yet they are harder to appreciate because so much tweaking is required to get decent FPS while keeping some of the visual goodies. It's the fact that A3 is ridiculously hard sometimes, and requires a huge time investment compared to most games, that make it so satisfying when everything finally goes right. A3 gives you a sense of accomplishment like no other when everything hits the fan and you (or your teammates) quick thinking pays off for a win. Being able to jump into almost any vehicle or aircraft leave you feeling that you can be the ultimate ____________ (tank driver, helo pilot, fixed wing ace etc...). Yes BF4 has some of these components, but delivered in a completely different way. Run, gun, get shot a bunch of times, hide, heal, and do it over again. And that's completely ok if that's you're style of gameplay and what you enjoy. A3 plan, plan, plan some more, cross a huge amount of terrain that can literally take hours on foot, and get shot by a dude you never saw, or...) make the hard win. You will dump huge amounts of time into A3 to be decent at it (plenty of folks don't have that kind of time to commit). BF4 get on..play for a match or two and leave if you want. BF4 has some great DLC's the latest carrier edition looks awesome. A3 has mod...after mod...after mod. With a workshop full of missions (horrible to great), plus a community that's pretty engaging and helpful. For me it's A3 all the way!
Angel;-;Great MilSim game, cant wait to see it expand and grow into something much bigger!
Flaskos #fuckCSGOJACKPOT;-;Very good game all the dynamic's are amazing and the graphics, WOW phenominal!! Thumbs UP!
PHAROAH;-;The ultimate game for Military Co-Op, it's my hands down favorite game.
FrostY_PlayS;-;Great Tactical Shooter :) Love the graphics, love the campaign, love the user created content! :) Totaly worth the buck!
KimchiBoy;-;Very good simulation game.
Gekonn;-;"I still cannot believe that such an amazing and huge game is being created by a team so small." - past me in some interview. A3 is the best military game out there. Don't expect and easy win.
AsianFro4;-;This is a amazing game. Going from playing Arma 2 and Arma 2: Operation Arrowhead is a brand new experiance. This game has amazing graphics and amazing gameplay. The only thing i miss is When Diplomacy Fails from Arma 2 where you and some ai fight against another army and you have to control different locations to win. But overall this game was worth the upgrade.
-RiP- Diet Taco;-;Flying a transport helicopter into an AA ridden  fest AO for ungrateful s who don't understand how hard it is to dodge missiles and land at the same time. 10/10
fishpig117;-;Drug runs, shoot-outs to find a dog captured by a BDSM gang and who could forget swiming for so many kilometers that my finger hurt because someone crashed a boat. These are some of the best insane moments I have had in ARMA. 10/10 would bang
Zoultx;-;Really good game. If you prefer a realistic, slow phased FPS game with a real feel of war this is THE GAME for you. Insanely large map and plenty of different gamemodes to choose from. There is also a nice RP server hosted by killernetworkgaming.co.uk where you can be a civilian or cop - choose to do real work or crime. The possibilities of this game and its mods are endless. Looking forward for " dayZ " mod also. My recommendations!
Soidfuf;-;Bought it back in april, pretty bad. Gave it another shot in January, holy  it is good. The custom maps and content are amazingly fun and the campaign seems pretty good as well. The games controls are horrifyingly complex and non-intuitive and the game intself can be a little buggy seeming but the combat realism and graphics are so sexy. No shooter in recent years has provided me with the proper fear of that unseen sniper 800m+ away that Arma 3 has. 9/10
ironpadre;-;When Operation Flashpoint came out in 2002, I was pleasantly surprized that the Bohemia Interactive Studio creators of the game managed to finally make a military simulation that surpassed all other competitors. I still play it, but its successors, ARMA, ARMA2, and now ARMA 3 take this sim to new heights. As a US Army combat Veteran, I can state from my military experience that ARMA 3 tops the list of all FPS sims to date. ARMA 3 involves teamwork, self-discipline, and developing strategy to defeat the enemy. This sim is not for "run and gun" players.
Backstab;-;Good Sim where all mistakes are punished by death.
Hawk(In Germany);-;1st game best grahpichs and features and mods and communicate
Harry Kruton;-;ArmA is military simulation with military venicles,helicopters,... and weapons.ArmA III is good simulation,but body armor is garbage.In ArmA II you kill everything (without tanks,choppers,...) with one bullet.In ArmA III you kill a soldier with cca 2-5 bullets to torso,to helmed is cca 2-3 bullets and to face is cca 1-2 if you if you aim well.But in ArmA III is the greatest island of the ArmA series.Altis A.K.A Lemnos is large with much cities and villages.Stratis (i dont know how this island was called in real live) is the second island with cca 2-3 towns and 1 city called Agia Maria i think.I play this game with some addons and i can recommend addon called Speed Of Sounds.This addon adds to the game a real sounds of weapons recorded from the firing range.ArmA III includes mission editor where can you create your own mission or campaign and awesome multiplayer.The venicles is good,but in most cases the venicle is remake of the for example NATO AR-2 Darter (quadrotor) is remake for the all fractions (NATO,CSAT,AAF) without FIA.In year cca 2035 is a invasion of Hecler and Koch machineguns and grenade launchers.The joke is in the infantry weapons.I dont see any infantry weapons from Hecler and Koch without addons.Lets go to final verdict...This game is fun but the body armor must die.Venicles and technic is good,but its a remake in most cases.BiS dont exploited the potential of year 2035 and nearly vehicle according to the real originals without some features.Mission editor is good and multiplayer is awesome.You can create a mission and you can play it with friends.I give this game 8/10 or 85/100% who want this score.I hope that my review will be helpful when you buy this if you buy this :)
hinkzdk;-;Great game, i love the game, and i fell in love the game mode rpg, on projectnarnias rpg server, its nice and good staff
Waffen;-;The community is trash, its a mix of team killing, autism, and milsim faglords making  overly complicated. As usual with arma games the optimization is absolute garbage and no matter what you do, you wont hit 60fps consisstantly in online. The guns feel great but have the impact of a pellet rifle, especially the 9mm sidearm NATO gets. The story doesnt make sence but its arma, you dont play it for the singleplayer (i was very disapointed however that the singleplayer was not co-op like in 2). The only way to make this game good is by A) Having a squad that fits you, whether it be autistic milsims, people who are just playing to  around, or a mixture of both, who is in your squad ultimatily deterimines your fun B) MODS MODS MODS MODS. The massive amount of weapon mods spices up the gameplay with familiar faces like the AR platform and ak platform rifles. It makes the game much more realistic ironicly. C) Having lots of patience. Good luck finding a server that is consitantly good that doesnt have faglord admins (Ive been banned for saying "wat" isntead of "what", asking someone to turn down their mic, and using opfor weapons while playing as blufor). 6/10, 8/10 with mods Be advised, when you download mods, even if its something as small as a retexture, you will NOT be able to join 50% of the ing servers because arma doesnt like having us filthy modders join vanilla servers. So the servers will be split and you will be getting upset because of the lack of a filter between vanilla only and mod friendly servers.
Kappachino;-;8/10 (cuz of bugs) worth buying!
Flushot22;-;This game continues to be one of my favorite games. If you are into survival/fps games this is well worth the try.
Viper_Duex;-;I wish I had the money to buy this game :( IT'S SO FUN!
The Legend;-;I like it, it's very tactical and weird
Playful Desk;-;This game is still a bit buggy since release but that's to be expected with such a large project. I have a lot of fun playing the campaign but the most fun comes out of the community made gametypes. I definitely reccomend this game!
BeastlyBenjo;-;LITERALLY THE BEST GAME THAT EVER EXISITED EVER
[USE] Owen;-;Don't know why steam did not record all of my arma 2 hours which was over 200 spent on it but Arma 3 lives up to its expectations! I have been playing it since Alpha and even in Alpha it was so much fun, the mods are amazing Cough* Breaking Point *cough and you can play as Zeus! Lightning bolts for all!
xLXMx Bishop916;-;Best military simulator ever. Try the survival Mod Breaking Point www.thezombieinfection.com.
Selo;-;best army simulator game nowadays. many mods, much fun.
SkyLine | gamer9027;-;I really recommend this game because of its nice graphics, great Singleplayer/Multiplayer. I bought the Arma 3 Limited Deluxe Edition for $55,47. It contains Arma 3, a map of Altis and Stratis, an awesome keycard, ARMA: Cold War Assault, a keyboard layout, a digital soundtrack, a digital tactical guide, digital maps and all DLCs. For its price it is just a bargain. Buy it and you won't regret! :)
1MDK1;-;Good game and lots of mods so you never get bored Breaking Point, Waste Land, Altis Life just to name a few!!!!
Mystic;-;ARMA 3: Arma the almighty miletary sim, Which may catch your eye with the immersive feel and the futuristic feel which i will get to later. I feel that this is a good arma but not on the same par as arma 2 which can i tell you can be either a bag of  or alot of fun to play with bugs and  ai to some of the most action packed immersive combat you will experience to date. Arma 3 delivers what it sets out to do an invasion of a made up map and you need to help secure it (sorry if you would class that as a spoiler). There are few if any bugs and beautifull graphics great multiplayer improvement from arma 2 but as a fan of the series i am a bit dissapointed in bohemia with their choice of a futeristic feel which i dont personally like compared to modern combat. If you are a laid back gamer you will still enjoy this title due to the community, multiplayer, beauty, editor. The editor is my favourite part of the game as it lets you be creative and put what you would want in a campaign mission into your own. Overall i would reccomend this game but if you are looking for an army sim go for arma 2 by far.
Die Ant Einz;-;If you like DayZ kinda action, and you are willing to RPG. Altis life Mod for Arma 3 is verry Cool, look up a good community and get your life going. Get a job: Pick Apples, peaches, Mine for Iron, copper, Salt and even Diamonds. Become a criminal, and pick, process weed, cocain or heroin. Become a Cop, arrest ppl. Search vehicles, and hunt people that have a price on their head. You can even become a rebel. Before you get a life on a server, read the rules of a server, the rules may vary on each server, if you want to become a cop, most of the time they want you white-listed. The server i play on the most: Serverfilter: Trinity Join me.
Forrest_Gump;-;Very good and realistic game it also gives you a lot of freedom , the whole islands of Altis and Stratis are yours to explore ... if you are an arma fan you will not be dissapointed by arma 3 , and if you are new to series ,well it makes a great introduction of arma franchise to you ! 5/5
Tuschz;-;Best military simulation game ever made, since Ghost Recon
Batman;-;Brilliant best war simulator ever!
ImUnKnowN;-;Worth every dime
SiN;-;It's ing amazing! Really fun to play, but has a bit of a learning curve. Can be hard tp play at time for people new to the Arma series. This game is a must buy for anyone who likes FPS games.
Chris aka Demon343;-;absolutely the best Arma by far i just cant seem to stop playing it.
Fanboy<3;-;buy this game now!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
SunShine;-;This game is 10/10, I love it. Definatly a big step from ArmA II
deadpie;-;good game and game play
Medium;-;Very good game if you like pew-pew sounds.
Dave Strider;-;Ok, lets face the facts, this game is quite a bit of money, but it is totaly worth it.
NuttyGoBoom;-;What do i think of Arma 3, well i have mixed emotions. I belive its a good game, but there are alot of reasons i dont play it as often. First for it being the game coming out after the previous Arma 2 i was expecting certian things to be added, like better ai, a PHYSICS engine, and a much better map. I think i expected a little to much. Some ups about the game is its FUN! yeah get it like srlsy
FaZe dacks;-;get this
Gilgen;-;Best War Simulation eva! You can make your own War with the Editor. The story is good and the multiplayer awesome! 5 Stars ;)
</JAG\>LeakyAssassin;-;Good simulation. Kinda crazy with distance issues. Enemies can pretty much auto track. A wider perspective would be cool too. Over all, needs all the weapons you can find in Battlefield 4 and you have youself a crazy awesome game. Best military simulation out there. ** Side note, way too many "kids" with no real military time, trying to act like "leaders". They try to talk in police code that they see on TV - destroys the whole concept. but it's a crack load of fun!.
ToeToe;-;Arma 3 is an extremelly time consuming, fun experience. You get to complete millitary missions that include driving tanks, helicopters and more! Its the full experience to a millitary lifestyle. With that you can also check out some of the other game modes that people have made. I first tried out strattis life and island life. These are simulations of a real life situation, you need to make money to buy food and drinks, buy a car, maybe even air units, you can even go into the dark side of the world and process cannabis or cocain! The reward is high but the consequence is being arrested by the police. There are also many other game modes that people have made and I would highly suggest getting this game.
furiaN;-;the real difference between the rest of many fps out there , one unique simulator series
Wadeyboy;-;At last Bohemia Interactive have got their military simulation (you can't call it an FPS because it's so much more) finally nailled. The singleplayer is fine and without the game breaking bugs riddled within ARMA 2. There are also still many more updates to come and the latest one is focused on multiplayer. The only thing that really annoys me though is that everytime a new update is released, it negates all your save games! This is is so much of a wind up that i've set Steam not to update the game until I've finished the singleplayer campaign and solo missions. Is it really so much to ask considering the vast majority of games update perfectly well without rendering your savegame positions as useless? Another plus with this game is that it's designed to be easily modded and with the Steam Workshop also added, you can be sure the new missions, campaigns, etc, etc, will add many. many more hours of engrossing gameplay (look at the success of the Day Z mod for ARMA 2 for example). Don't expect to go running around expecting to shoot everything in sight. This is a simulator where one headshot from an enemy will kill you on the spot. You have to change your stances and find cover according to the situation you find yourself in and work closely with your squad. As you work towards promotions which eventually give you full control over your troops and air, land and sea units. So I'm extremely glad to finally be able to recommend this 3rd instalment in the ARMA series. There are still some bugs to be found, but nothing signifigant thankfully and nothing to spoil your enjoyment. One thing I didn't like is the price, 39.99 for a game that isn't finished yet?!! I was lucky and got my version for 23 in a sale, but charging full price for a game they admit isn't finished, leaves a nasty taste in the mouth. They're not the worse culprits by any means GalCom 3 - 76 for an alpha version!! Before that it was Planetary Annihilation for nearly 100!! That is a shameful way of marketing and Steam censor any negative comments on the games' Discussion forum! Early Access was set up to help small indie developers charge a small price to help then get funding to finish their game and get it beta tested for free at the same time. So I find it deplorable that big publishers are using the system to charge grossly inflated prices FOR AN UNFINSHED GAME!! Plus these are games that are part of a well known and critically acclaimed franchise which are guaranteed to sell well anyway. It seems Steam's reputation for integrity has been ditched ("f..k the integrity, just give us your money, no matter how shady the marketing ploy!"). Which I think is a massive disappointment from somebody who has been a member and fan of Steam for many years (I wonder how long it will take them this time to close and 'delete' this post - they seem to have moderators everywhere!). Anyway, bearing all this in mind on the nearly final game, I can recommend this to anyone who like their games to be military simulations as opposed to your bog standard FPS. The UI is a bit too clunky but apart from that, this is the best game of it's type around. There aren't many, because it takes a long time to achieve excellence in a genre which takes great pains to model everything on a modern battlefield as accuratetly as is possible. Bearing in mind it's not entirely 'finished' you might maybe hang on a little longer and buy it in a sale when by then, it should be entirely 'done.'
NOOBTUBER;-;best game ever like its so cool
EpicPanDemic916;-;some of the engagements you will get into on this game, other games like battlefield attempt to pull off but do not come close to feel at all realistic as it does in this game, would definitely reccomend
Blackmamith;-;This is a great war simulator which suports realisim with real time 1st or 3rd person stratagy. go it alone our with a squad of AI's or players and i general great game
Zenox Ftw;-;This is a great strategical military sandbox game its such a cool but  dont like the mod types like survive so we also need a zombie sandbox gamemod like DAYZ EPOCH,we dont even have a mod like that that game is great for the altis life players so the only great thing of this game is altis life its the best RP mod  have ever seen so PPLLZZZ, bohemia interactive add thing like dayz standalone or just add a expansion like the Arma 2 Operation arrowhead.
Challenge;-;Arma might be a game with bugs, but deep down its truthfully an amazing game when in multiplayer or in custom SP missions, add all the user generated modifications and the game is amazing. Its my favourite FPS even if it isnt run and gun but slow and tactical movement
fruitbag3455;-;Less hollywood, more tactics. Features and Pros: - 3 Campaigns. - Edit your own SP/MP missions. - Over 100 player online games (including co-op). - Huge map (I'm not kidding). - Drivable vehicles including jets and submarines. - Massive mod community. - Impressive visuals. - Night and day cycle. - Encourages tactical executions (get it wrong and you're all dead). Cons: - Steep learing curve. - Although the effects are good, fire fights may not satisfy those who want a BF4 type experience. - AI can be frustratingly dumb at times, but are not bad most of the time. - Automatic spotting (as far as I'm aware, you can't manually spot an enemy). Note: - Tanks and helicopters may seem over powered. This is because in real life they are. It forces weaker forces to adjust their engagement methods to succeed; Hit and run could be one of them.
Tad [HaN];-;A big improvement on the previous 2. Shooting in the previous 2 games felt more like shooting a shotgun glued to the end of a broom stick. Arma 3 has a great shooting model and an actually genuinely good single player campaign.
spritian;-;Amazing Game, then I found Breaking Point and was blown away even more... worth the buy!
-=HATE=- Leviathan;-;Negative reviews fueled by angsty console junkies  off that they can't hipshoot and bunny hop everywhere. If you really like unreal tournament style shooters, go play something else. If you think battlefield or call of duty is too hard core, this game will hand you your  and send you back to the forums crying. There's a reason some military groups use it as a training simulator. It's not for punk kids.
Unobtainium;-;Military simulator with extremely large maps, lots of different modes, and vehicles. Spent a lot of time on Breaking Point mod, it's very fun and rewarding.
DodlyBacon;-;Rly fun.a looooot of game modes BUY IT!
Platonroth;-;ARMA 3 So when I saw this game for the first time, I thought that soon will release another excellent piece ArmA. However, the first disappointment was already in anticipation, as the extremely small amount of technology and absence campaign. But this disappointment disappeared when issuing the first chapter of the campaign was excellent and the new technique also appeared. But I will not criticize. I must say that the guys from Bohemians are struggling and working hard to repair, etc. Graphically it's a big shift but a new engine this could offer more. The playing area is huge and real and opens new possibilities for mods. Technical equipment and weapon was terrible at the beginning and the newly added equipment was broken but gradually improves and fixes. Despite this, however, it is compared ARMA I and II, step backward. Personally, I think that would Bohemia Interactive could use a better future. On the other hand, however, the campaign is excellent, what more can I say. Final verdict: ArmA III is an improved forward, but it is incredibly untapped potential. If it Bohemia Interactive put in the time and dedicated technicians and armor, or even a new engine, so it would be something completely different, much better. 8/10
Falsedeath;-;I haven't played it too much but I can safely say make some friends and make your friends get this. cause its hella more fun when you have a group to play with.
creekorful;-;why u read my comment when u can play arma III ?
SuicideDaza;-;Its great Buy it now.
DJ BaoN;-;This was very awesome FPS games! Nice Graphic and there's so many mode on it ....so it's not easy to make you become bored. So fun if u guy's playing together with best friend's or family's. U guy's must have this game! ^_^V
minecraft night;-;this is a hardcore militry simulator you could roleplay from marines to navy seals and has an amazing editor and unlike arma 2 it has under water experince and submarines and way better graphics now i dont play many simulators but this is one of my favorits
Dekuranjmuzu;-;It's like the old days
Chim;-;Good Game, Hours of fun and hilarious times in multiplayer
[AEF] Crooked;-;What are you waiting for? Buy it!
Minipily [SwG];-;Extreme fun for those who love Anything Military and like playing tactically. I also highly reccommend it for the campaign which is very fun and gripping. 9/10
Jamaican Party Clowns;-;Running around aimlessly through miles of durka-durka land squinting your eyes for multiple hours trying to find something that moves. Once you do, you find out that you need to reload your gun and you get shot a million and a half times. I like this game. It is Fun.
Shia LaBeouf;-;I played RolePlaying and got harassed by a bunch of french guys. It was fun.
BreadyButteryBread;-;Awesome game, you could do a lot of things to play Arma 3 your way, many kinds of server and awesome singleplayer experience.
DrunkCows[Away for 10 weeks];-;Takes a beastly computer to run. -Professor Cow, PhD
Robert E. Minh;-;I will admit a fun game, BUT DO NOT BUY NOW! Now for $60 and a lack of content this game does not deserve the cash. Especially since their already coming out with these DLC. Wait for the price to drop or for more things to be added. In addition you better have a beast computer
Mueckenmensch;-;Best game ever !!! The best OFP you can find.
mr.ben.nutt;-;Buggy, broken, and at times chugs like Thomas the Tank Engine. Still one of my favorite games in my library.
Oliver;-;when you dont get 10 fps its a great game !
MadMonkey;-;Perfect sim for those wanting something more than casual games such as COD or Battlefield offer. Arma II is still the big boy, but 3 is shaping up to match or exceed the older (but still massively popular) sim. The engine is a bit smoother and the setting more futuristic, but other than that, it plays very similar.
F4M1N3;-;this game is incredible
Mikhaylov;-;I Gladly dropped part of my paycheck on this game, and ever since its release it has kept me entertained through the various gamemodes it offers. If you do happen to get tired of Wasteland, Altis Life, etc you can check out armaholic, and download many more mods and missions to work with. The game does have its bugs, but in reality every game does. They may or may not get said bugs worked out, but we can only hope. If you want to screw around on a MilSim that has many things to offer Arma 3 is the game you want to pick up.
FARSIDER;-;The most strategic F.P.S game i have ever played. I love the game because it is filled with hard campain missions and an amazing multiplayer
Razawais;-;amazing game good for pc gamers , fun and liitle bugs here and then but overall good game .
Juice;-;Beast
Sporgasmo;-;Best game of 2014 Award goes to this withought question!
Vaphic;-;While buggy at times, I throughly enjoy this game. It is an easy transition from ArmA II, and is a good buy for anyone who enjoyed ArmA II. 4.5/5
Indiehalibut;-;Beast game, if you have a comp to support it. If not, you can still sit in spawn and pretend you are doing something useful 10/10
Captainhell1998;-;Ma a You Must Buy! Da hood likes it
Denson;-;For all those people out there who think CoD and Battlefield are noch tactical enough Arma 3 is the game of choice. Awesome Multiplayer action for example in King of the Hill and the great modifications (Breaking Point, Altis Life) make this game my #1 at the moment.
Andrew;-;Really, Really great game! Must have for all tactical shooter fans!
METTER;-;There's something about Bohemia's world-building that inspires people. Importantly though, Arma 3's vanilla content now stands on equal footing with those third-party inspirations. It's still a little rough around the edges, but it's a darned impressive package nonetheless.
ThatOldSniper;-;A very big improvement from Arma 3, love playing battle royal fits pefectly with the controls. Might want to have a decent pc to not lag on Arma 3 though. If you liked Arma 2, you will love Arma 3! GET IT ON SALE!!!!
I shit my pants last night;-;The multiplayer is really the ownly selling point for this game, but the multiplayer is really fun (depending on the type of server your on)
TimedDeath;-;This is an amazing game! Quit looking at these reviews and buy it already!
Fallen Zero;-;THIS GAME IS AWESOME
Giffer;-;Operating operators operating operationally meets special needs children walking with their asscheeks.
LordChefMage;-;This is a 1st/3rd person war simulation engine, not quite a game on its own (yet). Arma III comes with very little content on its own and it is ripe with missing features and bugs, but the guys over at Bohemia Interactive have been dilligent with patches, features, and support (There's an entire website dedicated to live bug tracking and suggestions with feedback from the developers which is incredibly rare). That being said, many users still continually suffer from lag and crashes and the game has very high requirements to run and look nicely. Despite the missing bugs and features, the game has all the core components of a strong simulation game. The developers have done well on bullet physics and the graphics look really nice on max. On the other hand, the game is very complex and the controls will be difficult to pick up for new players. Your bullets are not lazers that hit your target immediately, you will need to range your target, adjust the sight on your gun to the appropriate distance, and lead them appropriately to have a chance of hitting them. Unless you're under 300m away, then let your inner call of duty player out. The game's built in content consists of scenarios and the recently added campaign. The scenarios and tutorials are introductions into the various attributes of the game from flying helicopters to assault diving to artillerty strikes. The campaign feels like a bunch of scenarios strung together and adds very little to the game. All things considered, the campaign is bad and you won't want to play or remember it for long. But you don't buy this game for the single player. The multiplayer game modes are what put this game head and shoulders above other similar multiplayer games. Players can join a wide variety of different game modes that are downloaded and installed automatically for the player before joining the server. There are only two maps: A large map that bogs down servers with its sheer size and a smaller map that doesn't bog down the servers as much. Just like in Arma 2, there are many guides, tools, and tutorials provided and created by the community in order to produce new and diverse game modes and content. The popular DayZ mod will likely not exist in Arma 3 because of the upcoming standalone installment, but the Wasteland mode offers the same scavenging/survival mechanics sans zombies. There are also deathmatches, missions, and rpg modes to cater to every type of player. The Call of Duty crowd would probably get bored by the slow pace of the game. The Battlefield 4 crowd will have much more common ground, but might dislike the lack of polish in the game. The Arma 2 crowd will enjoy the game. My tips for starting to play: In any game mode, in any lobby, in any situation where you're unsure, in any situation where you have no clue what's going on, ask questions. The community is incredibly responsive and helpful. They will know the game better than you and their help will mean the difference between all your shots going right over the enemy's head or right into the enemy's head (Adjust your scope's range with PgUp and PgDown). You should probably stay out of global voice chat (Use . and , to change your chat channel, stick to the blue team channel if you're not sure where you should be talking).
Pretzel;-;Would recommend if you have a strong computer. Sounds are vastly improved over Arma II and combat is very great.
.Oval();-;With the new Zeus DLC, I honestly think that the future of RTS is with this game. If you have the hardware to run the game its a must-buy, its the only pc game out there thats actually a full military simulator rather than run and gun fps.
Showoff;-;this game fun for goofing around and fun cause it has so many modes and servers and big maps and good graphics
Brisk;-;I do recomend this game but it has its flaws. Its a tone of fun and multiplayer is fantastic if you are willing to play a long time. Ussaly in multiplayer their are three types of game modes. RPG,Player vs Player or Player vs AI. In all three it takes some time getting used too, their is a lot of walking and not always in your face combat like cod or bf4. Its a simulator, a really really buggy simulator. And here is where the flaws come in. The game is so buggy and poorly optimized it takes more hardware then is nesseary to run it at good fps. People with some of the latest graphic cards and cpus still get low fps, and the ai is horrible, Not as bad as arma 2 but its not great. With a $100 grahics card and $100 cpu you can play this game on low graphics after tweaking it a bit tho. But that being said the game is really fun still and defintaly worth your time if you are willing to put effort in learning how its played. Also you do not need this game for anything that deals with DAYZ. Dayz standalone does not need this game to run and for some reasion a lot of people thought this.
kildalootr;-;much graphics, such sunrays, guns wow
_David;-;Probably the greatest FPS game ever created. Completely unlike all other FPS (COD, BF etc) though. Awesome graphics, awesome gameplay and awesome realism.
Guy Fieri;-;It's ok, kinda laggy, hopefully they optomize for mid-end computers in the future.
TraidicClown060;-;Arma 3 is fun
hipposrock1122;-;This game is EPIC!
Jack Nelson;-;Excellent game, very easy to interact with the enviroment with the many poses etc.
Blackwerm;-;What can I say? This is Arma 3. Perfect in every sense. Best thing about Arma games are their mods. Altis Life, Breaking Point, King of the Hill, Battle Royale..etc. You name the kind of gameplay you want and it is available out there. The bonus is that this game is optimized properly as opposed to Arma 2. The new engine in Arma 3 makes the graphics look REAL. Definietly recommend this.
God;-;I was never a big fan of simulators let alone military simulators, but the first time I played arma 2 I fell in love. Although, I never bought arma 2 I did buy arma 3 and holy crap was it amazing. Amazing graphics, an amazing aresnal, and an amazing game. There is many glitches and long waits to do a mission, but you can see through that and notice the beauty arma 3 gives. There is many fun game modes and even mods to spruce up the adventure. So, pick up a gun a helmet AND GET OUT THERE SOLIDER.
Frolt709;-;i would buy this, but i dont have money
stlmoose;-;Hours of Entertainment
String King;-;This game is plagued with awful optimization issues that make the game practically unplayable in certain mods. For example, in Wasteland, one of the more popular mods out there, the game will literally crash my entire PC every 10-15 mins. I do not have this problem with any other game and have run stress tests on my PC several times. Arma has had optimization issues since Alpha and this really needs to be looked at for Radeon card owners like me (HD 6870). I've done everything from reinstalling drivers to amping up the fan speed to maintain at a very reasonable 60C. Chances are you won't run into this problem. But then again you might and if you do, you're in for a world of frustration. I don't have problem is most other modes. This game is very finnicky and like I said there are some optimization issues as people with weaker specs may be able to run the game better than someone who meets/exceeds recommended specs. Most of my friends have also experienced a couple of crashes in their time with Arma 3. So crashes are not at all a rare occurence in Arma from my experience. Do I recommend this game? Hard to say. Mods like Wasteland and City Life are what really make this game worthwhile and there's a half decent campaign going for it. Grab it at a discount but don't pay full price. Overall: 7.5/10
gReen sAuce;-;Great open world tactical combat game. Buy it and team up with some friends and kick !
Mr. Cavendish;-;Arma 3 is a eagerly welcomed upgrade from Arma 2. The new stance system, upgraded engine, and water gameplay truly helps you experience the life of a military operator. The best part is that the modding community is stronger than it was for arma 2, with mods ranging to advanced AI to weapon resting, and custom gear to real world weapons, this game does everything better. Arma is the only game you're going to find where it's a good idea to find you're grandpa's old army handbooks.
maxokiller23;-;really fun game to play with friends many gamemodes/mission files to choose from great community :)
DaSSie;-;Its really wel done!Awsome game!
Ben Kerry;-;This game for real man, not for kid
Doctor Commander;-;If you can get past the bugs and community, this title will surely leave you satisfied without costing an... arm and a leg. ...When do I get paid?
Extrementalis;-;As a veteran of Arma 2 and its expansions, I was fairly eager to get my hands on this game. However, upon playing Arma 3, I found the game lacking, particularly in its lack of variety. Unlike its predecessor, Arma 3 only hosts a handfull of units and vehicles with each side getting a tank, two or so helicopters, and a few light vehicles and APCs. The same goes for the available weaponry in the game although this part is balanced out by a wonderful ability to customize most rifles and machine guns with a list of accessories ranging anywhere from red dots and holo sights to infra-red lasers and tac lights. Arma 3 does include a fairly detailed campaign as well. The campaign allows for an open experience by allowing to choose between what patrols to take priority over and actually allows for the player to simply leave camp and initiate a solo patrol. All weapons, gear, etc. are saved when returning from each patrol meaning that what you come back with sticks with you until you change your loadout otherwise. However, since Arma 3's campaign was incomplete upon release date, those luxuries are short lived. Being incomplete, the updates that finished the campaign make it inconsistant in its mechanics and by part 3 the whole idea of FoB based warfare is forgotten along with loadout customization. Some could even debate wether the campaign is even yet completed or not since the final mission and epilogue are reminiscant of Arma 2's Eagle Wing. But despite its dissapointments and setbacks, Arma 3 still offers perhaps the most advanced war sim on the market. This and the active modding community that easily fills in whatever the game lacks in make Arma 3 a worthwhile buy.
TheKaikouraTrainspotter;-;Great Game! If you played Arma 2, then you have to play Arma 3. Even if you haven't, play it for the explosions. I would seriously recommend you add this to your library.
XDBoy504;-;The controls are doo doo, but with friends this game can be pretty fun.
Munchin McCoy;-;Good game to play, single or multiplayer. plenty to do in it.
Alex <3;-;THIS IS ING AWSOMEEEE!!!!
The_Imploding_Rabbit;-;THIS GAME IS ABLE 10/10
Dubs;-;Fun and realistic combat simulator. Strong lurning curve but when you start to learn it, you can have alot of fun. I strongly recommend to people who like realistic games.
sooped up wheelchair;-;Iranian s think they can talk  about the USA Allright then ill shoot you with all the content this game dosent have
Lexotanil 77;-;Pretty awesome stuff but a huge lack in content. Still waiting for the update from bohemia that will finally add more guns and vehicles. 10/10 would recommend. Just keep in mind its supposed to be a military simulation game so it is a little tricky.
The Ninja Donkey;-;Lets start off by saying that, this game is great. Totaly worth all the money. Now this games does have its flaws. the controls are hard to get used to, almost every key on the keyboard is used for something, or multiple things. Also the game engine is broken. if you want this game you need to have one heack of a PC. On single player, full graphics, usually runs nice for me. i do have a GTX Geforce 660 TI and a 4.33 GHZ prosseser. but sometimes on single player, there are massive framerate drops. on multiplayer, running as low as this game goes, im getting about 20-30 FPS. But not always. And now lets get to some more good things. The vide and screen shots dont seem to capture what this game can really do. You can build your own battles, so much to do in multiplayer like regular battles to survivals to get a jjob make money and live your life out with the need to buy guns and fight the rebles and the cops, or be a reble or a cop. the underwater diving and submariens are fun. There is litearaly SO SO SO many gear types, clothes back packs guns attachments, and alot more. so yes, i do highly recomend this game, but only if you have the PC for it.
duckslayer69;-;A very incredible game, super realistic. With the ability to add community made mods it just adds that much more to the scope of the game. Now with the "Zeus" functionality which allows players to edit missions on the fly it makes mission creation that much easier. This series is a game that every harcore military gamer should have in their library. The only negative to this game is the FPS drop when too many units are in an area. But thats about the only negative that I can think of.
[SFST]^LCpl^Maurice [Member];-;A beautiful game. really well made, good graphics and nice gameplay. I strongly recommend trying the Zeus game.
Archangel;-;Best FPS by a longshot. That simple.
I2awRz;-;Arma is the best game ever, will soak up hundreds of hours with ease!
Geff_Rey;-;as long as you have a good pc that can run the game well you are going to have lots of fun
K den;-;What is love? Baby dont hurt me, dont hurt me... No more!
TheMole (Skahan);-;Good game for the $$.
Professional Loli Cuddler;-;To be honest, I've no idea 'what this game is about' but whatever it is, it feels great! I didn't have much time to play yet, but once I've sat with it, I didn't notice how fast the time flies (6 hours gone like a few minutes) Also, the multiplayer can be confusing at first, as there seems to be not much predefined game modes, but if you have friends playing it, it's a must have!
chrisd77;-;One of the best game sive played this year, would definetly recommend if you dont mind the occasional bugged death.
Lupin IV;-;I reccomend only if you have a computer that can handle it. Also the controlls arnt easy.
[PHL] MisterPinhead;-;This game is just amazing, it is a game that requires a big big computer, but it looks fantastic as soon as you get the computer! I may have only killed one person, but this game is just really fun, coop, sandbox, tdm, rpg, and so on!
[Batman];-;If you are into military scenarios, this game is great for you. With the new engine and actual physics aspects, it takes a big leap forward for the Arma series. For me, it has been an amazing trip from Alpha into the upcoming release, an was not in any way a dissapointment. I can't wait for jets :D
shurima;-;oMg so realistic even the grases moves unlike cod lol buy the premium edition for your special skull camo and ac-130 killstreak (Srsly tho it is a good game get if you think your graphics card wont melt on ultra lul)
Mr. Xellence;-;it's just so great to play, haven't been playing on my computer cause i can't play it on this one... but ive been playing it on my friends pc and it ran fine, just play and you'll see that is fun. Realistic is one of the things that is well made in this game to, man i liked it since i saw the first trailer
GAMEJUNKYZ007;-;This is one the best combat simulators ive ever played. The sand box on here is a blast and the steam work shop is awesome for user created content. The only down fall for me is that i dont have anyone to play this with.
OZ;-;good game but needs more modes
TiP_OuTLaW;-;Oh yes ArmA 3, one of my favorite games on steam! I dont have almost 300 hours on it for nothing. This is a military simulation game that is set around 2025. But they did not over do it and set it in the future where theres space ships and all that. Even know it does not feel like the ArmA 2, in the way that it is not feeling like it is a true military game, with all the tactics that arma 2 had. But other than that one problem that I have. (Lack of content to) It turned out to be a very fun game that me and my friends love to play. So much to do as in multiplayer, steam workshop with so much into it, you can even get creative with it like my hunger games mission! All in all very fun!
() Kermit Police;-;Really good game physics are preatty sick too major upgrade from arma 2 . Needs a few more weapons and vehicles maybe a bluefor transport APC. Need to fix the constant lag spikes when people are using custom weapons drove me insane in arma 2 and this one aswell but over all, good game.
Tykov twitch.tv/mobi1e;-;Great game, much better than Arma 2. I recommend capture island game mode.
SkullCandyMX519;-;This is one of the best games that I have ever played I hope you come and join the game it's really fun. Also the graphics and some more realism into the game from it's previous Arma 2.
DimeBag "The General";-;Yeah except due to other campaign glitches we cant even make it to part 2
JadeFalcon;-;Great game, especially sandbox and the zombie mods... its addictive like crack is
SocioBlade;-;Arma 3. Good game, good graphics. Amazing variety of gameplay. Gamemodes like CO-OP, Wasteland, Altis and Stratis Life (RPG) and an epic campaign. There are still a few bugs here and there but actually, they make the game funny. If my review didn't help you then check some videos of gameplay on youtube there are a lot of them. I recomend this Game a lot!
[ZTC] BoneSetter;-;good graphics great funny and exciting gameplay extremely large map just a great game
Twinkie Man;-;0/10 would not play again 0/10 graphics 0/10 gunplay 0/10 everything #cod4 #isbetter #loljkthisgameisactuallyreallyfun
Sho'nuff;-;Awesome. Defo worth the cash
Colexile;-;it is just so awesome
Snailpower;-;By far the best War simulator out there. It's just as realistic as you make it. What steals the show is the landscape, beautiful mountains and villages make for a nice scenery to battle in. Giving it a 9/10
Kuzkula;-;Well. Where to start? First off: HARD. This game is almost insultingly hard. The AI let's you know you're boned when the tubes start bellowing out 40mm grenades in your direction. Sometimes they ing cheat, and I tell you, they cheat hard. It's a fun as hell challenge, and I can usually go over 50 kills without getting wiped, but sometimes they barely see you over a hilltop or around a tree and light you up like no tomorrow. This game needs further optimization, however. I can run some pretty insane visuals on other game, and even have gigantic open-world games like Just Cause 2 maxed out, but this one I need to scale down a bit to keep a steady 40-50FPS while still keeping respectable visuals. The weapons are diverse and accurate, but not 'realistic' enough in one simple aspect. You've got all these buttons and lights on a Titan, for instance, to make it fire like a Javelin-style launcher [shoot up, go high, SLAM down], but no way to actually make it do this. This needs to be added. Launching with a top-attack would help with one person, say me, with a laser designator, marking an enemy vehicle on the other side of a hill for an ally with said launcher. The mods are nice, some are even well made! DUWS comes to mind.
Space Cat;-;The game is still buggy but it doesn't stop the fun to be had here. If you are a fan of DayZ then you will love the Wasteland mod that is very popular in the Arma series. Arma 3 does have a campaign mode but that is only the beginning. Modders have made this one of the most infinitely replayable games on steam. There are hundreds of downloadable missions to play and a community that is willing to teach you how to play them. I cant recommend this game enough. If you like games like Red Orchestra and SOCOM then this is the game for you. It might be 60 bucks but, in my opinion, it is worth it. I have put over 100 hours in this game and feel like I have barely scratched the surface. TLDR: Just buy it.
Justin Rampage;-;I'm having a lot of fun with this game. I have been sucked into this Altis Life RPG world where you can choose to live as a law following civilian, drug dealer, cop, medic and more. So cool.
[REF] Malacovics;-;ArmA 3 is a game that focuses on realism without sacrificing all the fun. What you get with the game: -Multiplayer. Many mods (or to be more accurate, missions with scripts) are out there like Wasteland, DayZ (the mod, not the standalone game), CTI (Capture-the-Island, which is like a Conquest mode from Battlefield with a huge map and ArmA gameplay), Domination (which is fairly similar, only it's against AI). -"Competitive" Multiplayer. What this means is that you can experience the "real" ArmA experience. What this means is joining up with clans and operating as a team, as a real army would. This in my opinion is the definitive way to play ArmA3. Clans like this are things like http://www.reacheliteforces.com/ . Look it up if interested. There are many clans out there, just browse the Steamcommunity ArmA3 forums. -Like a dozen showcases which show and demonstrate the new features of ArmA3. -Around a dozen challenges (firing drills) to where you can compete for a better time or train. -3 campaigns, each around ~3-4 hours long (note: only one of them is out so far, second campaign comes on Jan 21st.) -Editor where you can do what the hell you want and can create your own missions or scenarios. -Steam Workshop missions! Download missions made by other players with a click and around two seconds, and play them, rate them. Hundreds of missions are on Steam Workshops, plenty to choose from. BE ADVICED HOWEVER: This game can be a pretty damn big machine hog. You need a pretty decent to PC to play this game appropriately, even more so for the multiplayer.
GreatLordBigler;-;Pretty damn good, make for sure you have a good gaming PC before buying.
BLOODSERIES;-;The Worlds one and only Military Simulation Game ! If you want an awesome Team-based and realistic Military Simulation this is the only right choice for you ! Nothing for Solo-Player like COD or Battlefield !!! THIS IS NOT KILL ON SIGHT AND ITS NOT AN EGO-SHOOTER OR ARCADE-SHOOTER,ITS A MILITARY SIMULATION...THERE IS NO SPACE FOR RAMBOS !!! If you are a lone wolf and think you could kill an enemy squad alone or something...They will show you are wrong. You cant survive more than MAX 3-5 bullets based on your hitzones ! ARMA 3 : THIS IS WAR
Back|Track>>;-;Solid single player campaign so far, and the multitude of community missions means your hard pressed to run out of new missions to play. But this game really shines when it comes to large coop missions. I also recommend Sa-Matra's version of the Wasteland mission over the others.
Qabshtiva;-;Best Army game of all time 100% reccommended, soon will buy arma 4 when realeasd :).
Macogodzilla;-;Possiblt the most realistic fps up to date
Ravelord Nito;-;ITS A GAME WITH THE STUFF INSIDE
ReconTiger;-;I havent been addicted to a video game in a long time.... On my first day i somehow lost track of time and end up playing for 17 hours straight. This game has unlimited protential! I love it. Best game since Operation Flashpoint/Resistance!
Caza;-;Arma 3 is the bbbeeesssttttt!!!!!!!!!
Judge Dredd;-;definitely worth buying, ing great military simulator that beats cod and bf into the ground. lots of fun mods and gamemodes makes this the perfect game.
BeastlyJimbo;-;I would fully recommend this game, it is fun, and amazing. Who ever is a fan of realism shooters, this will be it! I have been a fan of ArmA all the way from the beginning from the first games that was Operation Flashpoint, to where it is today. With ArmA you will have hours of fun, whether it is building missions, messing around in the editor or downloading the countless mods that are available on Workshop and Armaholic.com! Would fully recommend 10/10!
AtomikBranFlake;-;Such milsim, many games, much fun, so ARMA.
B-ray-den;-;The most realistic Army simulator ever created.
W10;-;I have Autism and I recommend this game.
weedgamer420blazeitfaggot360;-;review time:most realistic game,cannot even jump, this game,killslick plays it ofc
A_TRON246;-;Arma 3 is good game, but its not like common run and shoot game like COD or BF. Since Arma 3 was made more like a simulator than a normal game, the controls is a bit spesific. You wouldnt understand it if not played it before, but you will learn it quite fast. The graphics is great, but not the best. the details though is very well done. The gameplay: Arma 3 is a game you will probably either love or hate. In the sigleplayer you get to do almost whatever you would like to. From diving and desarming mines to defending towns in badass helicopters. the multiplayer can also be amazing. Team up with a couple of friends and you got it! Thats some hours you will probably never regret spending. Now, there are som bugs and all of that, but screw them! If you like detailed and huge maps Arma 3 is for you. If you like realstic shooters Arma 3 is for you. And if you love having a good time with friends driving around in various vehicles mowing down stuff, this game is deffinitly for you!
[BST] AngryBagel;-;An amazing step up from ArmA 2 with better graphics and smoother gameplay while still retaining the core principles that make ArmA what it is. Now with the first part of the campaign released, it finally feels like the complete package with a gripping and interesting story. If you in any way enjoyed ArmA 2 then buy this because you won't be dissapointed.
Orcicorn;-;Really fun, but a different kind of fun than your typical shooter. This is about planning, bringing the right gear, the right friends, the right objectives and trying to execute the plan. Even with the AI on the lowest possible setting, they're geniuses compared to any other shooter out there. Take your time, be patient and work your way through the objective. Fun under the right circumstances
Welshliam;-;You love war? you will love this ...
Fantastic Ergo;-;Awesome warfare sandbox. You can do so many missions created by the community, single player, multiplayer VS and COOP. Graphics are fantastic, controls are very well set, physics are phenomenal. This is the King of all MILSIM FPS. All i wish is that i had more hours a day to be able to play this game.
A_retro_gamer;-;This is defenently a work in proggress but with a leap in animations from Arma 2 but still requires jets, planes and more variety of cars and classes with an ability to customize your firearm
runks32;-;Play the Breaking Point mod. The survival and pvp aspect of the game make it a real challenge to survive. Great fun for those looking for a realistic survival game.
Monsuperdude;-;So in depth, it makes COD look like pacman
Skutter87;-;A great game for military enthusiasts, those looking for a run and gun experience similar to COD or Battlefield should look elsewhere though. Its tough and unforgiving at first, but when the games mechanics click into place it becomes a tactical battle. The game is great for its multiplayer components and the modding community keep releasing some fantastic mini campaigns and scenarios. The world is huge and the selection of vehicles and weapons gives enough diversity to keep the game fresh. Theres a lot of running and moments where nothing much happens, but this gives you time to admire the impressive graphics and vistas that are on show. Would highly recommend to anyone looking for a patient, realistic and tactical experience of warefare.
H8Hacks;-;Outstanding 10/10 for great action and simulation! this sandbox brings more than creativity!
BinaryViolence;-;It's realistic. Very realistic. So realistic, you can't really jump, or even bunnyhop. But you can step over things. Which I guess is cool. Also guns.
General X I L 0;-;To put it simply... the game I expected Battlefield 3 to be. Battlefield 4 has a couple steps in the right direction, but the series is no longer a tactical sim like BF2. I will forever miss Jalabad, but... Arma 3 has great MP thanks to the community. More to come teased from Bohemia. Right now I enjoy: King of the Hill Wasteland Breaking Point (Much more finished than DayZ standalone ATM)
[KoL] Issa [Bombing Canada];-;This is an realy awesome intese game the best i ever played. IT has awesome graphics and has those intense moments that can make you jump of your seat. It is a verry serious game and you will find many pepole who want to work together but also many trolls. If you dont got it u dont live!
Robb Stark;-;A completely worth buying masterpiece. The most attractive part is its campaign missions, it is better than ARMA2's missions which got so much vehicle-manipulating requirement with meaningless keyboard controlling and neglected a lot of fun of infantry combat. To be honest I don't have any interest in jet or heli driving, we got other brilliant games to do this part. all I want is intense infantry combat, work in a team or group, sweep some hostile village, rescue our crews, snipe some enemies and fall back etc. ARMA3's campaign is doing well this time, I just completed the first chapter "Survival" and I gotta say I was having great fun of it, it nearly achieved all of my expectation for now, and the second chapter is still amazing, I'm playing the first part of it. Just release more infantry missions, no more ing heli or jet!
TPatS;-;Me and my friend were driving along in a truck. I asked my friend "Are there any tanks in ARMA 3?" He replies "Tanks in this game are like unicorns, you get them if you wish for them." A minute later we come across a tank parked at the side of the road. "Hmm did I just get my wish granted?" We get out and inspect the tank. It appears to be not occupied. We turn to leave and hear a sound. Suddenly we are both shot in the back. As I lay there, with my life slowly draining out of me, I see the tank blow up our truck and drive away. "Goddamm it why did I have to wish for my stupid unicorn!" Then I respawned. 10/10 would wish for unicorn again
The Bullet Train;-;As I was walking through the woods after  went to hell thinking we were finally safe, my team leader stepped on a landmine and exploded before my eyes. Someone over the radio said "Jesus are you alright? Are you hurt?". My character replied "Yeah - I mean no, yes I'm fine" before immediately stepping on a landmine and exploding. I've only been playing this game for an hour, but I'm already hooked. Definitely worth it. Just hope I can figure out how to read a map.
Kaleidescoop;-;I don't even own this game, but it's so good that I have transcended the mortal boundaries of Steam to write this. >starts a campaign game >instantly sniped by AI in the first fight >reload save game >rinse and repeat It's a very good military sandbox. Trust me, it's worth the weight.
Proscent;-;Arma 3 is a great military simulation game, very realistic and the graphics look incredible! the game has a ton of gameplay possibilities and options, huge amounts of content and modding keep in mind you need a good system to run this game at a decent frame rate with high-ultra settings. Overall score: 9/10
Ninja Duck;-;Visually striking but thinly scripted, overwhelmed by digital effects and a bland, impersonal story. Bogged down in a cliched romantic subplot and will bore, annoy, and disgust audiences of nearly every other persuasion. Lazily assembled comedy.
Tyler0Smith0;-;this game is one of the best games i have played with my friends i played 500 hours in total from the game by it self with no mods and another 30 from breaking point when more mods come out i am probly going to play another 500 hours
Mati;-;Flying cars get stuck mid-air, 11/10
wav3131;-;This game is really a great combat simulator, it's one of my all time favorites, and i do highly recommend this game to anyone that likes combat or army games......
Zorelnam;-;this game is a super realistic simulation and yes there are game breaking bugs but in its core you have an excellent made game with good mechanics and well made design its definitevely worth a buy especially if you are a fan of getting 1 shot from a sniper in a hill you werent even aware it was there yeah you get the point its super realistic you wont be surviving more than 3 shots to the chest and 1 shot in the face from any weapon will kill you
unvme36;-;This game is amazing its like 6 or 7 games in one....with all the mods you can play with this game makes this game so worth the money....never have i played a rp shooter but its so epic
BenjaCanada;-;Great game! if you can afford it, BUY IT!!!!!!!!!
Kiseki;-;cool game
Wanderer72;-;wish i had this game so i could play Epoch i played it on my brothers pc and it was bad
corki29;-;great graphics,sound, solid gameplay for the most part. that aside most def. recommend to get this game.....the game itself is awesome........the mods just add to the experience!
Kaneyyz;-;Get It Now Meow
Benj3097;-;Arma 3 has a lot of detail when it comes to its graphics which is good but it can also have some bad points, Although it is realistic half the time you can't see your enemies because the sun is in your way. A massive problem with Arma 3 is the AI, They are totally un-realistic i once used a sniper to shoot at an AI who took cover on the ground and as it was long distance i missed using a sniper, He stood up and returned fire hitting me with about 3 of his 4 shots. At the distance he shot at it would be impossible with an assault rifle. I've never really found ArmA as a game i would play by myself because it becomes boring and repetitive especially when you keep dying and most of the game consists of travelling to the battle. I like ArmA 3 and i would suggest it to everbody because you can have some good times on it. But the game itself needs to have a lot of work for it to be a game i would consistantly play.
cheif22;-;runs very welll on low end computers and high, i find this a very grapical game of fun and open world exploration along with mods of sorts from planes to guns, very well made game, graphics beat xbox type games, crank it up on high and have fun
Wooz;-;Great military sim, far better than Arma 2 although there arn't as many vehicles as i liked. Runs better than Arma 2 beacuase of the new engine which allows alot of people to have fun and run smoother. I will be spending alot of time in this game and i recomend it for anyone that actully values a good military battle instead of something like Call Of Duty.
Tiesto;-;Never have I felt such an exhilaration firing 30 5.56mm rounds at a bunny I thought was a person through my thermal scope at 800m.
Apoch;-;A fantastic military sim which is only restricted by your imagination.
cykaireportnub;-;Went on an AltisLife-Server,started farming peaches,got run over and called a  10/10
Sicobrain / Richards;-;Possible my favourite game on steam ATM
tensoon;-;I love Arma 3 ....and the game is amazing... but isn't it time for the bugs to get fixed ? I am tired of dying when going down the stairs...getting stuck next to rocks, getting stuck inside of rocks.... not being able to sit/lay down on a big *** flat hills/boulders .... Release Date: 12 Sep, 2013 .... its almost 2015 ...
Abrar Ahmed;-;I Love It
Mr.Pew Pew|Dusty;-;This game will leave you in tears of how awesome this is!! 10/10
Crash;-;Excellent game - with many, many options.
InsaniTea;-;Rant about why I enjoy the game -Great game! I love the campaign so far, user made content is brilliant, and so far my favorite multiplayer game mode is King of The Hill ( 3 teams fight for one objective), it's nice because it has a leveling system and saves your level and gear. I also enjoy wasteland, a gamemode where players have to fend for themselves or band together and build massive  shaped forts! (Just kidding but if that was an option, it'd probably happen) Wasteland is a nice gamemode because there are tons of vehicles just lyin about, loaded with guns and ammo, and the moment you get near it an attack helicopter piloted by AI swoops in to say hello, at least that's how one of my many lives went, AI don't roam freely in wasteland, but are side objectives in the game, and if you kill all of them, you could get anything from a box with guns in it to a helicopter loaded to the max with missiles and bullets (But of course it doesn't have fuel, so fresh spawns can't roll up and steal your helo while you are taking out the AI guarding it) Cons - AI can be a bit tricky to deal with, making campaign a pain in the  at times - AI take a moment to ragdoll upon death, and I find myself empying half a magazine directly into them not realizing that they've died - Vehicle mechanics could be better, although they aren't terrible - VAULTING!!! I find myself vaulting my way through objects, and into rocks and all sors of terrible things like that, not sure why devs didn't add jumping, or something with less potential to cause problems OVERALL Is it a bad game?  no, I love it, even though it doesn't have the best mechanics *COUGH* (vaulting), BUT, if you are looking for a nice singleplayer experience, I wouldn't necessarily reccomend the game to you unless you plan on spending hours raging at the AI in campaign, although the campaign is quite amazing in itself it is also quite challenging. Basically if you want to get the game, get it if you have a few friends or if you'd like to make a few on multiplayer, otherwise maybe not the best game for you, I bought the game after playing a little bit of ArmA II on my uncles PC, I enjoyed it, but the AI were overpowered, and I saw that this was coming out so I took a go at it and really enjoyed it, and I think you probably will too! SIDE NOTE I typed this all at 8:46 A.M. after staying up all night, I'm going to enjoy reading this later when I'm in my normal mind
fluudah;-;Playing campaign, get killed by a random mortar shell, restart from last checkpoint, proceed to run 500 meters, get shelled to pieces, repeat. 3/3
Aaramaius;-;Love the realism this game brings to the 1st/3rd person action genre. Recommend to anyone looking to step up from battlefield or Call of duty.
Sneddz_^;-;Its a good game.
RevoFFA;-;Arma 3 is an A-MA-ZING game! It offers a lot of gamemodes and that makes this game incredibly fun to play. Over the past two weeks i have become addicted to ARMA (in a good way) :-). So, where are you waiting for? Buy it already!
Mr. Trigger-Happy;-;Very interesting and realistic game. 9/10
iBlueSkyz || Read Bio;-;This game is great. Not only does it have a great campaign and editor, it offers multiplayer. It is 10x better playing online with friends. And if you ever do get bored with the vanilla game there are mods. A lot of them too. You can also download so many different mods. There are downloads for missions, guns, cars, and a whole lot more. There are also different game modes and scenarios that change how you play the game. This is by far one of my favorite games. So I truly do recommend this game!
Funkyfree;-;The best military sim out there!
DJ_COWELL;-;best game i have ever played and highley recommend this game
Peter Parker;-;I have a FX-8350 and an r9 270x OC. On singleplayer ultra I get around 40-70 fps, AVG 50 |render distance at 2500. Multiplayer gamemodes with Persistance High 15-30 fps |Render Distance 1000. Severs without persistance around 45fps VeryHigh-Ultra |Render Distance 1500. There are other MODS like breaking point and chenarus that are persistant, but I run 80 player servers at 40fps ultra. But this game BASE is mostly persistant servers with 60+ people. So I suggest a MUST BUY if you have a i5 or i7 CPU and a NVIDIA GPU. If you have a AMD rig, buy with caution. But further than specs, this game is really well crafted and is a magnificent game. There is nothing like it on the marketplace. At times it is a little un-realistic with weapon sway, and OP NPC's btu past that, PVP is awesome, the mods are awesome. 100% must buy for multiplayer.
Cheetah;-;The life servers/mods can make you spend way too many hours infront of your PC. If you like i bought Arma II first, Arma III is just an perfect sequel. 10/10 -Xar
SirKingcodcat :);-;Very Good Game!!!
Agent Orange;-;While this game had some major bugs at the begining, it has started to smooth out to be one of the best simulators of all time. Lets start out with the actual simulation. Well you are defaulted to be in First Person everytime you spawn but you can go to third person if you have the keys binded. There is bullet drop, weather, vehicles, weapons(Not real time weapons), and lots of customization options for YOUR soldier. There is tons of fatigues and weapons to choose from if you're playing vanilla. Now if you're playing with mods in your game, you are going to have a even better time playing. Mods can help with AI and add new clothes for your soldier, I.G Helmets, vests, facial protection, and fatiuges. Just a really big tip is if you don't have anyone to play with on this game, find a Milsim unit and I guarentee you won't be bored. 10/10 would join milsim unit again Thx Bohemia Interactive
Pork Eating Crusader;-;Big and Beautiful. Great military simulator, i only recommend you have a mic and join into a clan server where you can take part in some very realistic and large scale operations.
[701st SOG] Kolumbus;-;NUMBER 1 FAVORITE GAME!!!
Mcohn0;-;Not the best game in the world. And when they launched it; it didn't even feel finished. This Game is NOT worth $59.99 if you have arma 2, UNLESS you want better graphics or your a die hard Military Sim. Monkey. Now as for the sale's, which one is going on right now ( 2/24/2014 ); Its 40% off, that makes it about $35. BUY IT! This game has many diffrent mods just like arma 2, and if you dont have arma 2, DONT BUY IT! Get this; its $15 more. SO in all: Pros : Better Graphics More In Dept For Military Sim Monkeys Cons: Price Less Mods Higher PC Specs ( Expected ) Worst Graphics Than Arma 2 If You Run On Lowest. Still Doesnt Feel Fully Finished.
Maine Coon #FreeBrady;-;If you like anyting military than this is the game for you!! There are tons of fun multiplayer game modes ranging from RPGS, Sandboxes and Sector Controls. The single player is just as fun using player created missions and mods. Or you can spend hours just messing around in the simple to use misson editor. The devs are great and keep supporting and updating it, Arma 3 is more like a platform than a game. Overall Its one of the best games ive ever played and has the most content ive ever seen. Worth every penny!!!
SuspensionXD;-;When I first played ArmAII, I barely enjoyed the game, nor did I stay for too long simply because I didn't like it. Coming to ArmAIII, I felt a whole different experience, a new environment like never before. Something attracted me to this game when I first played it during a free weekend; a feeling of excitement, fear, and all sorts of emotions of that nature. I felt like a real soldier in an actual militaristic environment. Months, later when I actually bought it, I got hooked again with the same elements as before. Here are some of the pros and cons after a good 15 hours on the game: Pros: -Somewhat real life experience, (i.e. running, (actual stamina system based on how much weight you carry), driving, aiming and firing, etc.) -Weaponry, (Different types of ammo, explosives range from mines to grenades, Launchers, etc). -Amazing Teamwork -Vehicles -Both a Third Person Shooter AND a First Person Shooter Cons: -Unstable FPS issues, (literally stay away from this game if you don't have a strong CPU, since this game mainly focuses on more CPU power than GPU) that vary depending on either campaign or multiplayer. I seem to run better on multiplayer for some odd reason, but sometimes it's the same as single player on certain occasions such as driving. You literally have to deal with it. The lowest FPS I get on Ultra Settings with a Nvidia GTX 770 and i7 4770k is around 30 tops, maybe a good 25 sometimes, (like I said when doing various tasks). -Unreal Physics at certain times. So basically, let's say you climb a 5 foot ladder inside a building and fall or you leap from a 1.5 foot distance from a flight of stair in general. Picture the size of 5 feet. That's 60 inches. Jumping from this distance= death. Yup. And even a slight bump from the rear of a car can kill a player, (around a 10-15 mph car can kill a player in this). These are some small things to overlook by BI, but still, I face palm sometimes at the unreality of the physics. -Difficult controls. It took me some time to learn all of the controls, and almost 5 minutes to figure out how to aim down the sights. Simple things like these can easily be overlooked, but are for sure some of the things to know when coming into ArmA. It ain't easy to get into like Call of Duty or Battlefield. Neutral Comments: -One last thing to say is that this game can be a running simulator at times. Although you have to travel far distances sometimes on foot, (and waste a good amount of time), the game provides a lush, realistic environment that contributes the beauty of nature. It compensates for all the running that has to be done, but allows you to explore the wilderness of a massive island. All in all, this is my review for the game. TL;DR: Good military sim, one of the best out there. Gives you good feels, but lacks on certain parts. A "deal with the graphical issues" game.
cl0yst3r;-;Arma 3 is a great game that deserves more attention. The only downside, is that you need a Jet Engine to run this game. 10/10
noxgandhi;-;Something between Americas Army and Battlefield, this game gives me what i need regarding realism and graphic design. The performance on custom missions definitely needs improvement - sadly, nothing seems to be happening anymore. Either way, i recommend!
PowerDuDe;-;It's the most accurate, realistic(apart from wildlife in the game) and versatile military simulator I've ever let my eyes on. I will even go that far to say it's the best military simulator that man has ever made...
Gioepyon;-;Call of Dutiers gonna hate.
Hazardous | The Immortal;-;Wow, where to start? Wait I know lets put it in a list! Heres some of the things I like: 1) The graphics are amazing. 2) The multiplayer is not buggy and it all works fluently and without bugs and glitches and it is impossible not to enjoy every second of being connected to a server. 3) All of the game mechanics work fluently and the animations never bug out. 4) The sounds are all good quality and you cant hear white noise in the background for the voice recording so all of that is good quality. 5) The parralax effects and occulent occlusion and bloom always look perfect and the effects all add up to high quality audio to make the perfect immersion. But most of all its fun! I run into a building kill two guys downstairs with my Katiba carbine and move upstairs at a slow pace and I find another guy so I shoot him in the head and I take his Lynx sniper rife and look out onto the streets below. I look about 40 meters down the street and see a guy getting out of a truck so I shoot him and then his friend comes into the same building as me so I hide on the balcony and camp the stairs getting ready to shoot him when I take a shot to my back because someone in an adjacent building had shot me with his handgun. At this point I turn round and the other guy comes up the stairs and gets the killing shot on me so when I die I see a viwe of my body from above and see the guy that killed me gets shot at with an RPG and the entire building falls down! 10/10 for graphics, 10/10 for realism, and 10/10 for a good community full of dedicated gamers who take the game seriously and you know that when you play this game you are playing in a generally friendly environment. (awesome)
bUCHEN.;-;This is game for the real men!
WimpoD;-;The ultimate military simulation. Vast open landscapes, complete battle immersion, and so many singleplayer and multiplayer gamemodes/scenarios/mods/missions to choose from! Great with friends in co-op, against the AI in dynamic skirmishes across the island, or teamed up online against the human enemy in King of the Hill. Runs like , but it's ArmA so I really really don't care. 5*
The Whizzard King;-;People need to get this game
Gamma_24;-;Its good if u have at least one person to play with and even better with more. May take a little while to learn controls but the essentials aren't that complex. There are some missions to help u understand how to play though.
[LP]brosplay;-;Reccomended for: people who like tactical realism not recomended for: peopole who like fps games that dont simulate the army, like COD
Matt_Polak;-;This game requires a good pc, my pc is a decent pc with a brand new graphics card and it is still struggling a little to run this game but, it is deffinitaly a good game.
Mechfruit;-;This is a huge improvement over Arma 2. The visuals, the gameplay, everything is better. There's a considerable amount of mods for this already, and the ingame editor is great for making your own missions. I highly recommend this to anyone looking for a great military simulator/sandbox.
pArKeR;-;Very interesting game, teaches us about drugs and guns!
TheMuffinMan;-;Great, great fun. This is the ULTIMATE military simulator. And the mods and community developed missions add only more to it. Highly recommended to any serious war gamer who's not looking for a FPS style shooter like COD or Battlefield.
Benediktus XI.;-;Nice if u want to play mods!
Increated;-;235+ Hours of awesomeness
TimedDeath;-;This is an amazing game! Quit looking at these reviews and buy it already!
RNPC;-;The free weekend trial was enough to convince me to buy this game.
Dezai;-;This game blew my mind. It is hard as hell, but fun at the same. It's nothing like CoD or some easy  like that. The game where you actually have to concentrate on what you are doing. Rating 10/10
[test]Prodam[pink]Aka ProAdam;-;Great Simulator IF you have Oculus Rift Recomend game Great
ButcherBrah;-;I deeply reccomend this game to people that love realistic fps games :)
Jed;-;Amazing game! Have so much fun playing!!
I eat kittens;-;Graphics are astonishing, the guns are amazing and the inventory system is crafted to perfection. But it all comes down to this... I shot a bunny and it took 3 seconds to realize it was dead. 11/10
ClawS;-;Great game, very realistic. The only downside is that it needs better optimization.
Daphoeno;-;8.5/10 A brilliant game for anyone who wants a realistic* and immersive warfare game. I've been with this game since the alpha and enjoyed every moment. pros -Long and detailed campaign with a good story -varying multiplayer for all players -large mod base for improving or extending the game -large amount of customization for the player loadout and weapons -immersive and realistic* gameplay -stunning graphics (see cons for exceptions) -extremely large terrains for gameplay cons -some of the audio is slightly unrealistic such as explosions (can be fixed with mods such as speed of sound pure) -particle effects are a let down for the graphics -there is not a massive amount of weapons available in the vanilla game* (there are many mods which add more weapons to the game) *personal opinions (some people may disagree with these)
Doctor Killerap;-;Its a great game but you do need someone to teach you the basics because its pretty complex. The only major bad thing is when you shoot at someone and they die its very awkward, if you dont know what i mean watch some youtube videos about arma 3 and watch people die awkwardly
daPhantom;-;Can't join any servers anymore. 10/10 wouldn't join again!
McRae4Ever (   );-;Arma 3 Is a wonderfully developed title from Bohemia. I can honestly say, it is one of my all time PC favourites. It comes with: Full Campaign Map Editor Multiplayer Modes Great Mods A Fantastic and active community Yes, this game truly offers it all. I would genuinley recommend this to anyone, from the casual 'mess around' gamer to the most hardcore military simulation fan. This game is all around fun. You can use features such as the Map Editor to create realistic raids, battles and live scenarios, or simply use it to fly around in, shoot at people or have yourself a nice little airshow. This game also has a fantastic control system, truly giving you full control of your camera view, player movement, weapons and vehicles. I would also recommend this, especially to anyone who enjoyed ARMA 2, This is a perfect successor, with more features, more mods, and my favourite improvement, THE ANIMATIONS! If you're like me, then you wouldn't have enjoyed some parts of ARMA 2 because the animations were dodgy, glitchy and didn't always work quite right. However, you'll love to know that these animation issues have been massively improved in ARMA 3! The animations work smoothly and look great doing it. From scrambling in/out of a jet, to weapon recoil and player animations, it's all been fixed and now works at it's true best, to show everyone what the ARMA series is really like! Conclusion I would most definitley recommend this game to anyone, casuals, sim fans and all. This game has the full package and is well worth the asking price (and that can't be said for all games these days) You get it all in one purchase, so do yourself a favour and buy it! I don't like using numbers, but if I had to, it would get a 9.8/10 from me :)
S.A.O II;-;shot a guy in a helicopter 11/10 ign best game of the year
Creative name #fy fan;-;Great graphics, but there is still alot that can be improved! I recommend this game.
MyGPUIsDeadJon;-;Disappointed in the full release. Copy-paste content between the factions (static weapons, launchers, pretty much all vehicle turrets, drones) really kills it. Seriously. 3 factions, and all 3 of them use the same AT/AA launchers, retextured UAV/UGVs, MRAPs have the same turret, the 2 AA and mobile arty vehicles are just the same retextured turret on a tank base. AI is still ridiculously stupid. At huge ranges they are superhuman, relying on pure aiming ability to be amazing, but at close range often ignore you when you're in front of them, blundering all over the place and eventually shooting the floor in front of you... Drivers crash into walls all the time, tanks don't engage the way you ask them to, gunners sometimes continually fire even though you'd told them to hold fire many many times. The action menu is still in. Disgusting and annoying. Optimisation is horrific, as usual. Hundreds of square kilometers of map to play on, but place down any more than 20/30 individual squad groups and the game grinds down to a halt, especially ruining multiplayer. Sure it's pretty, and Altis is beautiful, and the stances are a nice addition, as is PhysX on vehicles. But a lot of the major points they made got glossed over massively. They said it was set in the future to allow artistic freedom whereas what we've got is altered modern day vehicles (e.g. the Merkava), copy pasted turrets, and retextures of just 1 model on some of the biggest new features (SDV, UGV, UAV, Quadrotor). Same launcher for most factions. All statics/mortars the same for every faction. Same missiles on aircraft. Only 1 jet. Campaign not on release. "Release" was just Altis+some new vehicles. Basically, to me it looks like they got lazy. I hate that idea, so instead I guess they must have run out of time, copy-pasting turrets and vehicles and static weapons between the factions, skimping on promised features, and ignoring big issues, to get Altis out on the date they said they were going to. They bit off more than they can chew, and they're still refusing to acknowledge this. A real real real shame. 6/10. Game is wonderful... but it could have been so much better if they'd just delayed their "release" a few months to actually finish the thing. This crossed with Arma 2's range of content, plus actual optimisation, would be a godly game.
Wibble;-;flopped over from bullet 10/10 would flop
Speed Weed;-;Very good at what it does, which is being a mil-sim. You'll be dissapointed if you buy this expecting it to be like any other fps. Best looking game of 2013 so far.
Sr. Derpsalot;-;worth its money by far! great game!
^^    ^^;-;So i was playing BP (Breaking Point) Had so much stuff... Friend shot me in face i died R.I.P 2014
SpaceMole;-;A true military simulator for the skilled player. If you enjoy FPS games like COD and Battlefield but want to take a step up into the real gaming world, this is your' game!
[DCJ] rocketrob97;-;Probably one of the best games, if you're into military stuff and willing to invest some time at first. You should also try to play this game in a group, not only you will survive longer, you will also have more fun. 10/10, set aside the bugs, which are not really worth mentioning any longer.
[DoA]Tavan;-;this game is awsome, if you are looking for a military based game that is as real as a game can get, then this game has your name writen all over it. you need communication, team work, and strategy to win, lone wolfing it or running guns blazin will fail like there is no tomorrow!
Pakundo;-;So far it's pretty much the best milsim out there, bar none. I do wish for a mod to include realistic reloading animations and a mechanic that recognizes bullets in the chamber. Negatives are the extreme amount of Wasteland servers out there, and complete lack of proper pvp servers that are friendly for playing without friends. For better or worse, unless you, for some inexplicable reason, actually LIKE the Wasteland mod, you're better off playing the co-op servers where it's you, 20 or so other folks, customizable loadout ammo crates, and places on the map to clear of enemy AI. Game looks good, and it's a real treat for such a milsim to look good, and have alot of potential draw distance.
CrayonBerry;-;Devs have slightly increased multiplayer fps since the release. The game engine sucks but arma 4 should be good if they develop a new engine
Alex the mighty Gal-lic warrior;-;It is pretty good.
januzzi;-;100% worth every penny! best game of 2013
xXGman1113Xx;-;If you like shooting guns, driving trucks, driving tanks, and flying helicopters and planes then this game is for you :D
XxFOXBOYxX;-;Absolutely love this game, a must have for everyone. 10/10 <3
OZ;-;Umm I dont have this game but I can still review it. 10/10 would review again
Why Not Bro;-;Stop reading reviews and buy the ing game already.
39Chrome;-;So much fun, Multiplayer is even better!!!!
RossJBD;-;Fantastic improvement on Arma 2. While it is a military sim, and I'm still not 100% how to play the proper game modes, theres plenty for the adverage FPS player to make the most of. Gun game and Battle Royale to name a few,
GburgSims;-;King of the Hill is life... Invade & Annex is life... Atlis Life, is life... ARMA 3 IS LIFE 10/10 would recommend.
kik112gaming;-;it is a good game i love it
GunsIE;-;Arma is not a game, in the same way that a word processor is not a document. Want to play Call-of-Duty-level stuff? It's got that. Want to play RPG stuff? It's got that. Want to play survival horror? It's got that. Want to play a flight simulator? It's got that. This software's so good it will convince you to strap things to your head for headtracking and that this is perfectly normal. However, you will probably find you get the most out of this if you play with a clan. From we-want-to-pretend-we're-in-the-army level of committment to the it's-saturday-and-we're-drunk-and-on-the-internet level of committment to the we-have-small-children-and-this-is-what-we-do-to-chill-out levels of normality, there are clans out there for anyone's taste and needs. And hell, if you're a misanthrope, the singleplayer fun is still pretty damn awesome. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=v1PXJduNQdg
SteF_RiGhT;-;Arma 3 is a great game if you are into shooters. It is a hardcore millitary game and experianced players will enjoy this alot!
jaebae;-;tacticool dogs need to be added 90/1
Geff_Rey;-;as long as you have a good pc that can run the game well you are going to have lots of fun
NIP1;-;Really fun with friends atlis life for the win or king of hill
[TB] GravediggerGF;-;Excellent open world map, plenty of things to do, wasteland, fly heli's, sell drugs in altis life. Fun tactical gunplay, really easy to screw up but very rewarding when played correctly. Tons of fun and highly recommend it.
waffleman44;-;It is one of the most amazing games I played over the course of this year!
Strangelove;-;Great simulation! Needs a good rig but if it runs with 30 - 60 frames it's amazing
Hero;-;First day in Altis was taken hostage by rebels and hurled out of a moving helicopter before being mugged for my car and being thrown in prison as a consequence. 10/10. Would holiday in Altis again.
Zer0 | Heritage Not Hate;-;Really nice game.. Beautiful aswell. Just the campaign made me rage xD
Seceratorul Daniel;-;Awesome military sim
War;-;my favorite steam game! many free mods (altis life, wasteland, hostile takeover, breaking point, etc) we play @ 4th-recon.com
[ZR] JuBJuB;-;Great game its a must have
Triscuitbiscuit;-;I enjoyed this game.
[GG]OfficerDoofy;-;Amazing Game, Lots Of money opertunitys if you get good at scripting>.... Tons of server host looking for mission modders!
Flaskos #fuckCSGOJACKPOT;-;Very good game all the dynamic's are amazing and the graphics, WOW phenominal!! Thumbs UP!
PHAROAH;-;The ultimate game for Military Co-Op, it's my hands down favorite game.
FrostY_PlayS;-;Great Tactical Shooter :) Love the graphics, love the campaign, love the user created content! :) Totaly worth the buck!
KimchiBoy;-;Very good simulation game.
Gekonn;-;"I still cannot believe that such an amazing and huge game is being created by a team so small." - past me in some interview. A3 is the best military game out there. Don't expect and easy win.
Icy;-;Great game, love flying around in the Jets/helis. Also love that there's going be a good variety of mods offered and being developed, like Arma II had. i.e Epoch, Battleroyal etc. =) Only thing I don't recommend is getting the expensive DLC's they're offering.
[LST] fez;-;Arma 3 is bae.
dupeblow;-;Good PC? Buy Arma 3. its worth it
II NOVA II;-;I really do like this game, as it has open world maps, tons of content, mods, stuff like that. I recommend this game because of all the features it has its overall a great game. 1 problem, fix the optimization! I honestly have a pretty decent graphics card but from what ive read no matter what kind of computer you have its just not gonna work out @ 60fps. Ultra settings: NOPE! Very High: NOPE! High: NOPE! Medium: NO WTF IS THIS BS? Low: YES WTFFFFFFFF! no one really wants to play a game that utterly looks like a pile of trash, you know what i mean? Everyone says this game has poor optimization. even if you have a super computer still doesnt work? what is this B.S? all you need to need to do is update it for better fps so that no one needs a NASA computer to run this game Ultra 1080P @60fps.
BLU ~ Vector2005;-;Overall a well rounded, well put together game with a vast community. Whether its role-play, Co-op, PvP, or PVE the community has made and played them all. The game is constantly evolving and constantlly being tweaked and fixed. The progression on the game from alpha to the latest version is by far some of the best work and dedication I have ever seen out of any dev teams, even that of some triple-A titles. If you're looking for a serious gamestyle there are many different realizm groups around to show you the ropes. If your more of a relaxed weekend warrior, the winners of the Make Arma Not War competion for multiplayer missions, Kink Of The Hill has what your blood thirsty hands are looking for. From survival to out right blowing  up this is what your looking for!
Erik/Bryan;-;Nice ! Best game ever !
Sketchy African Warlord;-;Moar realistic than real life.
Sicras;-;best addon game and better military simulrater.
Sniff My Coke;-;Drove down a road and flew into a car and blew up 11/10
[EVO] Darren;-;My favorite game of all time its amazing and i certainly recomend everyone to play it. Tell your friends! The only downside about this game is that you need quite a good internet connection for the online multiplayer servers but my connection is great!
Mr Eaelus;-;I have like, 365 hours in this game in online mode, and probably another 30-40 in offline. It's a bit of a MASSIVE addiction. I seriously plan missions when I'm supposed to be working. If you like creating war campaigns, you'll spend more time in the editor than you will even playing. The joy of letting a friend get slaughtered by your fair and balanced creations is just FANTASTIC.
WaveO;-;Amazing realistic shooter.
williamredpath;-;Brilliant Game which has lots of unlocked potential. It provides a platform to establish social links and is brilliant for making the game trully yours with it's modability. great fun and a great buy. I highly reccommend this game.
chrisxp;-;I cant fly nor do I like to annoy people.. Only kidding, I lurb arma!
Dorito Bandit;-;I trolled in global chat.... 10/10
mardymonkey35;-;i love this game mods are the best way to make this game one of the best
AzaZog;-;This game is simply amazing. I know the FPS may be bad at stages and the bugs and glitches may be annoying, but hey, it's ARMA. A3 is an amazing game and even more amazing with mods. Never can I say I have seen another game where I can screech in my F-18 Super Hornet over a bunch of ISIS Militants in a fictional town in the middle east. The multiplayer is simply amazing as well however, buggy at times. I did not enjoy the gameplay very much at the start but when I added the necessary mods, it was a master piece. 9.8/10 TLDR - PRO: Amazing game with great core gameplay CON: Minor and Major bugs and FPS Issue Tip: Accompanied with right mods, it is a master piece
Moretti;-;Great game.
lemeeto;-;I've had tons of fun in this game already and I'm far from done. Singleplayer can sometimes be a hassle. I've come across a bunch of issues in missions forcing me to restart them, but I suppose that goes for every advanced simulator. If you're playing with friends you'll never get bored. Any sandbox gamemode will do. Wasteland, Altis Life, Invade & Annex and so on... This game does require an above average gaming computer.
Tritium;-;Well, after about 1200 some-odd hours playing I haev to say Arma 3 is a amazing game. Highly realistic, really good ai that can be adjusted to your skill level, allowing you to have a challenge but still making it enjoyable. It is easy to personalize, edit to your own preferances. Now Modding is friggin awesome wait no it is FRIGGIN AWESOME if you want to see some of the content available go to www.armaholic.com it has all the mods, addons, and replacement packs to make your game better suited for yourself. If you buy this game you will not be disappointed.
Wirflesnurfle;-;A very underated game definitely deserves 85+/100 just take some getting use to and adjustments!
Cpl Sandshrew;-;Big difference over arma 2. Very fun, and can be challenging. Online play is amazing!
HolyKrep;-;Before playing this game you should ask yourself - what military operation would you like to play? Do you want to be a sniper? Do you want to be a part in a big combined arms operations? Do you want to ride a tank? Helicopter? Kart? Do you want to be a civilian and simply role-play your wild dreams? Do you want to play as a god? Really, there is not much to be said about ARMA that has not been said - yes, there are bugs, yes it is still a bit laggy, but it gets better. And it will get better because developers still update game and listen to fans feedback. You can have hundreds of mods, do whatever you want to do or simply follow missions. It is all up to you. This is main difference between other military shooters - it is a sandbox concept, which means you are buying lot of games in one.
Dat1Kid;-;Great game, so many game modes its hard to get bored.
Dat1Kid;-;Great game, so many game modes its hard to get bored.
Professor Doom;-;[10/10] Fantastic Game! Altis Life! Hours of fun! A great sequel to Arma II!
Sunshine in a bag;-;Arma 3 is an amazing game! This game is great for anyone who likes shooters or RP games. This game is one of the best first person/3rd person games I have ever played. I have played Arma 2 and I have to say Arma 3 is so much better than Arma 2. The only problems about this games that really game to my attention is... First off glitches, they're not too bad but they can get annoying every now and then. Also servers is a big problem, there aren't many servers out there for a variety of gamemodes, the ones that I commonly see is Deathmatch or Battle Royale, Breakingpoint, King Of The Hill, and some others, but other than that this game is really fun and an enjoyable experience for players that are new or old to the 1st/3rd person shooter genre. I really recommend you get this game, especially if you're coming from Arma 2 or even Battlefield. Thanks! I hope I helped you out!
Rentaro;-;Now Arma 3 is a awesome game but were here to talk about more than the fact its awesome, Graphics are amazing well the way i can run it, Arma 3 can bring someone's FPS to -100 depending on your comp. so if it is lagging i highly suggest you lower the settings down ALOT. What can you do on Arma 3: You can do Atlis Life (Alot of Role play, it has a bank and cops so there you go), Battle Royale (Hunger Games but in Arma 3), Dayz Brecking point (Arma 3 Dayz Mod) Now about brecking point its a pain just to login to it so i suggest you play Atlis life and Battle Royale, And it is a 1rst/3rd person shooter i rather allways be in 3rd person for certin reason's that im not gonna disscuss. There is alot more gamemodes but those are my things. Is it worth the money, Depending on your comp. Yes As allways my rateing for this game is 10/10 REMEMBER THIS IS ALL MY OPION SO DO NOT THINK ITS ALL HERE. THANKS FOR YOUR TIME
WeirdVibes;-;as an arma veteran, i personally recommend this game to anyone who likes the arma series.
dick tugnuts;-;Good game, much wow. 10/10 would do it again.
The Fukulator;-;Recommending this game now, AI seem to go down better now. And the addition of the new bootcamp training, gives us all a better and more functional insight (as opposed to just being told what stuff does). For example, your trainer will now call compass direction by N/E/S/W, and by bearing 0-360, mixing it up, so you can get used to it. (And IMO that is the best way to learn, by making you think it, rather than read it). Scenarios from the workshop have upped my piloting skills massively, and all my other skills. They're great fun, and many of them are multiplayer, giving you drones to mark targets, and jets to kill them. Also, some great infantry based Insurgency missions that I like, a lot! Bad news is, you need at least double the recommened settings to play multiplayer decently, and if your impatient and can't be bothered to wait for a minute or not run ahead, this probably won't be your thing.
MeGaMaN;-;Huge potentiality in this one. How ever huge minus for the Multiplayer expirience. It was very laggy and desync all the time.
Anthony Zampipa;-;Pretty good game
Salaim;-;Do NOT expect to find a completed Military Simulator upon downloading the game. Do a little research, get the mods from the modding community, and then play. This game will not have many of the most requested features, it's always been up to the fans to mod the game to perfection, don't expect that to change here. WIth the right mods, this game can take hours out of your life. Without the mods, this game will fall short of your expectations. DO NOT get this game if you don't like having your game modded. If the mods aren't out there yet, give it some time. Arma II fans, welcome to the next installment, its about to get intense.
Ranger;-;Epic game with awesome graphics. Best Arma multiplayer yet.
Cream253Team;-;Arma 3 is a game that is at its best with friends and well made community missions. -The single player campaign can be difficult for impatient players or someone who is generally "bad", but a "good" player will be able to get through it. -The ingame editor is what gives Arma games the ability to endure, and allows new missions to be made or for weapon testing. However some scripting knowledge (even if its basic) is needed for more dynamic missions. But for some people, 70% of their time may be here. -Multiplayer can be tricky if you can't find any descent servers to play on or don't know a single friend that is willing to play Arma often. -The graphics when set to low-standard quality will not look half as good as any other mainstream FPS, but a computer with a descent graphics card and good cpu will have no problem (unless you take the settings to the extreme). -The Upcoming DLCs and Expansion are hopefully going to add a nice amout of ingame content. -The modding community itself acts as a hub of occasionally quality addons. -Current problems that do still exist in Arma 3 however, area the AI; environmental damage physics; and a lack of diversity in each factions arsenal. -Some pluses for the game are (as mentioned): the communities divotion to the series, the only other game I've personally seen with such a dedicated modding base recently is Skyrim. Another one of the points towards Arma 3 is the maps, not only are they massive in comparision to stock military games, but they also have similar amounts of detail where the developers saw fit. Finally, despite the occasional AI issues, the game really does give players a different experience everytime (once my friend and I fought valiantly against overwhelming odds and lost, we played again and won, again we got wiped immediatly, and again we saw the AI flip their IFV over which was funny (all on the same mission "Combined Arms")). *Old (Currently, Arma 3 is a 7/10 but depending on Bohemia's roadmap, Arma 'could' end with a 9/10.) *New; After Bootcamp and with the Helicopters DLC about to be released (not to mention the Make Arma Not War entries) so far the game is moving along and becoming better as was intended and my score for it has risen from 7/10 to a 8/10.
Snipar;-;You Couldn't even run this with the matrix.
Lord Ravage: Pussy Patrol;-;Great game for friends to play together with.
The Seductive Turkish Guy;-;Altis Life- Stole a helicopter, Took a man hostage, Landed, Got chased by the police, Got captured, Got charged with Grand theft auto, Evading police and rekless flying and got put in prison for 10 minutes... 10/10 Would take hostage again...
WhiteGoldHawk;-;This game has an better gamplay then arma 2 and its better, beautifull and big!
Scarecrow;-;if you like awesome army stuff then multiply by 100 = Arma3
Terminus;-;Feels wrong writing a review of this game now as its not finished. The engine alone is just limitless to what can be created. The online community is very active providing a mass of servers and different game types. Overall awesome game and can only get better.
bbf_3;-;Kind of glitchy but a load of fun and an insane amount of depth. If you are a fan of games with a good amount of tacticality, this is a must buy even at it's pricepoint.
Wonderchild;-;Arma 3 is an excellent war/army simulation game, great graphics, excellent gameplay. Was really impressed. What makes Arma 3 different form it's predecessors is the engine. Also it has a ton of fun and exciting mods like breaking point which is arma 3 dayz.
Juldez;-;This is the best military simulation game that there is.
Stenasx;-;Best Army Simulation in entire time then ill play games...wery nice work :)
Kronozzzzzz;-;Altis is love, altis is life  11/10
Robehod;-;All wars should be fought on ARMA.
PolpotQc;-;I shot a 120mm round at a guys knee... I never saw him again 10/10 would recommend
7./JG26_Martinjas;-;It could use some more content and an introduction to modding without having to go through endless forum threads, but it's a pretty solid game... probably the most fun game I've ever played. Once you get past the learning curve, it's really an amazing experience.
Callyboi101;-;Welcome to the best military simulator of all time, how??? I here you ask. Because unlike COD and BF4 you dont sponge a bullet to the face!!!!!!!
maczypka;-;One of the best simulator games i played!
Twixter;-;So much better than Arma 2. 9/10 for me
null;-;The newest installment in the Arma series has shown itself to be capable of becoming a valid successor to itself. The new features in this game can make an interesting urban firefight into a strategic and well-thought out plan. In Arma 2, there were very little options for infantry mobility, in Arma 3, consider that no problem. Enhanced moving capabilities make popping in and out of cover much more intuitive and conveinent than in Arma 2. Arma 3 is rapid growing game, with a lot of different gamemodes too. Worth every penny.
Juck [UK];-;Great game with endless possibilities
Pelmeshek;-;The best war simulator
Doc Holliday;-;Must have for any ARMA fan
[LpM] zane_slave_brian [LpM];-;good game iwth weapon resting mod. i got aids and lived to tel l this tale,
sgt.bubbles-McDiddles;-;WAR IS HELL. This game is so real its scary. 12/10 #swag
LadyBeautancus;-;Arma is how my hubby convinced me to join the PC gaming community. Couldn't say enough good about it! Can't wait to see how it evolves over the next few years. :)
Chaos_Mouse;-;Great game when played with the right group of people. Single player campaigns, while challenging, can be a little dull after a while, but this seems to be the way of life for games these days. EDIT 16/05/2014 - The new campaigns added since i left my review have made the world of difference. Changes have been made to the game itself and it looks, simple beautiful. There are lighting effects that make your choice of where you shoot from and approach your enemy critical. Arma 3 is simply awesome, and if you're the kind of player to expect one shot kills with an assault rifle from 100m, then go and play COD, because you will be sorely dissappointed. If, however, you`re after a genuine challenge of realistic warfare, then get this game, convince some buddies to join you, and get tactical!
saapas;-;If you like realistic war games, this has to be yours!!
Jeffaira;-;Massive, massive and one more massive improvement from Arma 2. I've only really played Muliplayer so I can't really review the campaign but if you're mainly after playing mods such as Battle Royale then you will be impressed by the improvement from Arma 2!
knee colas baked af cellar;-;This game is amazing
Jukebox;-;Great Game.So realistic!
Night515;-;Favorite game of all time. I am a huge fan of Bohemia's new work-of-art. I myself, love the futuristic setting they're going for. And Altis is a jewel. 9.5/10.
FungDong;-;One of my favorite games of all time you can build bases play campaign multiplayer all that good stuff i recommend!
CordingScroll17;-;love altis life awesome for FPS ppl and RP ppl your in for it too
Camel On Acid;-;Another great game in the arma seris, keep it up Bohemia because I'm not tired of this yet! 9/10
Ludwig Von Dickhead;-;Great military simulator and an amazing followup to Arma 2 8/10
TheVoiceOfFear;-;this is very amazing game! , you guys should buy it !!!
Walter Black-Computer Broke;-;why not
gHr-GetHyper;-;The Game Is Apsolutly Awesome Grapich,World.Its Bugged In 30 min gameplay Once.Second Best Arma Game
kodyd194;-;Arma 3 is not quite a first person shooter, it really is more of a "war simulator" overall. It is highly detailed and looks great visually but there can be a bit of a learning curve. The games strong point, in my opinion is the way it tries to do multiplayer, where you make missions and what not. I find this single feature what makes Arma stand out the best. More shooters should have the level of control Arma 3 gives players. There were a few "cons" to all of its "pros" though, so I will list my biggest as follows. 1. Multiplayer Servers (if not set up properly and efficiently) can make the game squat down and take a huge dump on your FPS (frames per second) 2. I feel the multiplayer user interface could use some work. making the game more accessible to new players. 3. Better single player. Arma may be best for its multiplayer but I think overall more work could be done making the single player experience more enjoyable. All in all I think Arma 3 does the "shooter/ war simulation" best, it may not be as popular as games like COD or Battlefield but thats not a bad thing. Imagine if it was that popular, then we would be dealing with those "guys"...
Clam Chowder;-;Amazing game, mus buy if into military simulations or the arma series!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
K0r0shi;-;Probably the most in-depth shooter game so far...
Drew;-;Best LIKE REAL gameplay! When you hear bullets pass over---- puts you in a place where you never think you be in.
HUSTLER;-;I can look around with my head.
coomba brianpc;-;this game has many modified servers making it worth every penny, and even though it has a full inventory of vehicles it is incredibly difficult to stop playing even if you change server it has details you will not find in most games of its kind. on different servers and on singleplayer mode it is not a walkover, and you are challenged with the full feel and suppression war brings with good graphics and huge map enviroments citys and towns to explore. i feel as this game should win more awards just for the playability and incredibly varied choice of things to do in game its quite simply neverending and the maps are very, very big. 20km what game makes you travel that distance and your still not quite where you want to be there is always alittle more to see with all the mods that are being done in multiplayer 20 this cost me on a pre release the best money i have ever spent so much so i bought 4 friends a copy of the game ....... and ive never done that in 30 years of gaming
Yeoman;-;Awesome game! I love it. Looking forward to the expansions and mods being released for this!
=[AKORN]=;-;Best game in history
a tree;-;With mod tools, lean, serious communities supported by dedicated servers, Arma 3 will satisfy veteran PC gamers used to all the amenities that so many franchises dropped, because the game stays true to its roots yet innovates in such a way that expands the possibilities, but does not limits them.
Quad-IOS;-;In brief: - If you're an Arma enthusiast, Arma 3 is a _must_! - If you don't know the Arma series, this game is a MUST :) ! Infantry simulator, with the ability to drive vehicles (Land, Air, Sea) with high degree of fidelity and real simulation. Physics, gameplay, story (for single players), graphics. The game is just awesome. Warning: if you're picky (might commit suicide on the first pseudo-bug encountered) or you like FPS action, John-Wayne-style, this IS NOT for you. This is more a simulator than a shoot-em-up game, where tactics, speed of wit and experience play an invaluable role in the missions. And sometimes, things don't behave as expected... But rarely... But it happens... However, if you like to zero up/down your sniper scope to compensate for the distance, if it makes you happy to carry a couple of weapons in your backpack, your magazines in your bandolier and night vision goggles on your combat helmet, if it matters for you to enter a vehicle and find most of the internals working (like speed/fuel/RPM gauges, mirrors, screens...), if you like UAV's and small drones that fit in your backpack, if you like to select your ammo type (tracer, belt, regular mag), if you find it awesome to play in an environment with kilometers of view-distance, if it engages you to play a game where there is no health bar, but every bullet counts (both the ones you deliver or receive), if you like to customize the game and create your own scenarios and campaigns and play them with your friends, if you like to play Zeus (yup, the Greek God, with the Lightning bolt)... If... If... If all (or most) of the above apply to you, well, this game is for you. This is one of the games I can't recommend enough.
Zozamex;-;tl;dr: Better gameplay, controls, sound & graphics then ArmA 2 however it has way less content atm. ArmA 3 is better suited for those who want a more "Casual" ArmA experience it's less of a simulator and more of a game this time and it shows with the greatly improved controls where it feels like you are playing a proper FPS and not a clunky simulator. The first part of the singleplayer campaign is the only good ArmA campaign i have experienced and i did play all of the ArmA 2 campaigns so they did a good job there and i'm looking forward to the next part of the campaign. Because of it's improved controls it's a lot more enjoyable to play it singleplayer then it was in previous games which means that you will have hundreds of hours of enjoyment just playing through all the singleplayer missions on the Steam Workshop. Because of the modding contest there will hopefully be tons of content coming up soon and i'm looking forward to the near future of ArmA 3. As to the multiplayer side of things there are already a ton of fun gamemodes and missions out there, however as always the best way to play ArmA is with a ArmA community playing on private servers. Overall it's worth buying man just get it already.
D4rk3nd;-;Great game. Awesome alternative to Battlefield 3, if you're looking for a slower paced more tactical game experience. Amazing visuals tempt me to lose track, and just fly around the map, to just explore. The main map of altis has over 200km of shoreline, with over 270 Square KM of map space. (arma 2, Chernarus was 225Km2) With the new Lighting and physics added to the Engine, Night conflicts are no longer a pain, but Great to play. Ragdoll Physics in the game are tastefully done, in my opinion. I recomend this game, the addition of the ease of modding, makes this game perfect to tailor to your perfect prefrences.
John SkyBomb;-;Very hardcore game for anybody who likes Mil Sims as much as I do, although, if you are nto used to the ARMA series I do not reccomend it to you, there are so many controls to remeber but you can still learn them! Def a 10/10 game
Cyane;-;This game is great if you want an advanced tactical shooter that is virtualy infinite.
zolop;-;I have been playing the series when it was first introduce under another name many years back as Operation Flashpoint all the way up to Arma 3. The game is a sandbox of which you can create any battlefield with any numbers of players or AI. IT has many vechicles to use from tanks to chopper to fixed wing military aircraft. The weapons in the game alsohave attachments that change the look and functions of the weapon. It is a very cooperative experence, from many team oriented aspects. You can have one team member flying a jet to provide air cover, to another team member operating artillery, to another team member giving fire support with his 50 cal rifle to a tank giving fire support far off in the distance. The game includes a editor to create your own mission and soon will have a Game master mode (FREE DLC Zeus) to dynamically change any mission while it is being played by many people. It also has a amazing and talented modding community to has been with this game series since its very early incarnations. The developer has also released all the DAta files from Arma 2 and its standalone expansion (Arrowhead and DLCs) to be used to important any of that content into A3. Bohemia Interactive has also provided the tools to use for this such as its 3d modeling software Oxygen. Possibilities The possiblities are nearly endlesss in this, any battle you can imagine can be created with the game in its locations and has far more gameplay depth than most shooter out there. It may be difficult to get used to the gameplay because it relies very heavily on planning, observing and teamwork, as characters and PC's in the game die pretty easily. Graphics 10/10 Sound 10/10 Singleplayer Story *Feel game is not worth $60 without one Multiplayer 10/10 Reviewers Tilt 5/5 10/10 NOTE*** Singleplayer story is coming episodically with each major update to A3. I feel the game at $40 USD it well worth the money, though at $50-$60 USD only worth it if you played a lot of Arma 2 / Operation Arrowhead and want a major upgrade.
Glintwing;-;This game is the best simulation FPS ever made. Sure it still has to expand. But even at this point you have unlimited hours of playing with super realistic challenges, mission editor, campaings, different multiplayer games etc. The game gives you a variety of options from squad commands to character and vehicle movements (you have submarines too :P). The shooting is as realistic as a game can offer you nowadays. If you didn't like Arma 2 don't think that Arma 3 is the same. You must check it out. In the end I think that you should buy this game if you like a bit more realistic FPS and want some real challanges to face. See you on the field soldier!
Coickid;-;A Brilliant, yet realistic Military Game. As expected from the Arma Series!
Freeiman;-;great game
tazmania720;-;This game is awesome!!!
Marc;-;Great game! Though, I do recommend to someone that is considering buying this game to have a 'somewhat decent' PC to play it. It's no fun playing a shooting game when you can barely even shoot accurately due to having bad performance!
chubbypancakes;-;This game. this game is ballayoloswag420
super cool special computers;-;Shot ten people with an LMG without any pants or shirt on 10/10
dolan;-;i can rub my  on the rug like my dog does 10/10 would rub again.
BradElixir;-;Great game.
Artan118;-;Absolutely fantastic game. You don't even need DayZ to experience the ultimate awesomeness that this game posesses!
J.A.F.O.;-;Awesome Game! Breaking Point is a great MOD for the game as well! Well worth your time and money!
[VR] Pieper;-;If you want a good feeling tactical shooter, this game is for you. I love this and have put in countless hours. A mod friendly game and a large community make this a double wammy beauty. 5/5
WhiteAssassin;-;Fun with friends.
Bachterazed;-;You think you good in FPS Game? Try ARMA 3!!
[NCE] Cman;-;This is sick! depending on the type of game, you can team up in wasteland, have an all out war in team death match, snipers are amazing, so many rifles, 3 rocket launchers with a laser guidence system, grenades, smoke, and mortors! i love it
WhiteCast;-;One of the most versatile game.
Princess Nadezda;-;+Nice graphics +AI of enemies +Catchy storyline so far, we will see in upcoming patches +Realistic weaponry +Realistic vehicles and aircraft +lot of servers and mods to play -Its killer if you dont have appropriate hardware -Could be too "hardcore" for someone -50 euros... be honest -Allied NPCs AI
Amanuense;-;besst game ever!!! I love BI provides the community with all the means to create custom content!
'Mr.Ward';-;Arma 3 is a good game, but it is still a Work In Progress. There are many bugs and glitches that will be punched out as time goes by, but that shouldn't keep you from buying the game. Look at Arma 2, it has become a huge success, mostly tahnks to DayZ but its RP aspect. Arma 3 is a truly Next-Gen game which is capable of doing so much. Buy it, don't ask any questions, just do it.
Solid;-;Just some words... Great Game but many bugs.
ilhero01;-;most def one of the best shooters i have ever played
Callum;-;"It was ok" 11/10 ~IGN
Grimshar;-;My hours on record should speak for the game itself, its only in beta and already is such a fun game, sure the AI are a little buggy but wasteland, coop, hell even just playing helicopter tag is fun. Its a sandbox game so you can spawn in stuff in the editor and create a mission and then play it however you want to. One of the greats of our generation going beyond anything call of duty, battle field, halo have done or probably will do I highly recommend this game.
Niconidas;-;A highly tactical kind of FPS, what with it being a mil-sim and all. This is a great game for those who want to take FPS at a slower and more calculating pace, and it definitely rewards you for being a professional player. That said, the player base that actually has groups to play with are very professional, regardless of age. I do recommend this game to those who seek a quasi-realistic experience at being a soldier.
Keldor;-;well if you can play this then go for it but dis game not optimizsedsed and not run good, my 2 gtx 780s can run this fine but with occasi0n4L proble,ms game pley is gud but sumtimes lots of running and driving but overall 75/100
Frank (Rendo);-;Too good....... well that was easy
Enemy RPG;-;Amazing game! Alot of different community made gamemodes available.
cjdjman;-;i LOVE THIS GAME 10/10 I love the guns and items and the user interface that's a big plus way better than arma2 why are u reading this go buy it now im going to buy that's for shore 10/10. :)
gruh;-;i shot a fish in the face
Zorkar;-;this game is awesome buy it
Fooshi;-;Much realism. Pew pew.
Erik/Bryan;-;Nice ! Best game ever !
Sketchy African Warlord;-;Moar realistic than real life.
Donrock;-;Great game if you like more than just your average reflex shooter. This is a war simulator not an arena shooter so it has a bit more of a learning curve but once you are into it there is nothing like it.
A Frosty Mug;-;It's like Skyrim with a bigger map
Java Awp;-;Other than the few glitches and bugs, this game is about the best simulator I have ever played. ITS YOUR CALL! YOU CAN PLAY IT SERIOUS such as RPG servers or even for fun such as Stratis-Altis- Life. The mods available are very fun and diverse! Top NOTCH!
BoxingcatHD;-;This game is so amazing, thats all i have to say.
jonn13;-;Where to start, ok on whole Bohemia games are just that little bit more special than most other games. The reason is not that they have the greatest graphics or smoothest game play, infact if you was judging their games on that alone then i wouldnt be writing a positive review. No the great thing ( and i used the word great as that is what Bohemia do ) about the games made by this Indie company have a very realistic feel to them. Granted Arma3 compared to previous Arma releases is way out infront iin the graphics stakes, but as i have already said, there is so much more to the Arma series than just graphics alone. Some of the mods made for them have gone on to be legends ( or rather A LEGEND ) in its own right. But even if you end up buying Arma 3 and never adding a mod to it, it is still worth every penny that your going to spend. I think its fair to say that these days spending under forty english pounds on entertainment wont get you much, Arma 3 breaks that trend. You will get hour after hour, day after day and if your not careful month after month of realistic heart pumping excitement from this game. Infact calling any of the Arma series a game is not doing it justice. Arma is not only entertainment its something a little bit special. If your at College i suggest not purchasing this until you are on a break, if you have a fulltime job then maybe now is the time to use those days off you are owed. And if you have a partner then tell them you think you should have a break for a while. YES IT REALLY IS THAT GOOD.
Chairman Meow;-;Poor optimization but overall very good game
Batman;-;i love this game#robin
Capt.Crispy;-;The Campaign: Firstly, I must address the "campaign" in this game. I have finally bit the bullet and played it. I did not enjoy it for a single second. The AI seems to be 10x smarter within the campaign. You would think this is a good thing because it would pose more of a challenge, but no, this is not the case. The AI seems to have X-RAY, Aimbot, and Sixth sense all in one. At times I am completely hidden and they will spot me instantly, not missing a single bullet and kill me within seconds. The First mission of Adapt is by far the worst thing Bohemia has ever created. You are one man vs. over 40 foot soldiers and 1 annoying chopper. You can pick up ammo from dead bodies that are generously placed about the map, but that won't do you any good once you are getting shot from every single spot you could possibly imagine. I cannot fathom Bohemia Interactive's thought process behind this thing they have the audacity to call a "Campaign". I advise anyone to steer clear of it if you ever decide to give it a go. Its not worth the 5 hours you will put into it. I regret every second. -- The Editor: By far the best thing about ARMA 3. Being able to put your own spin on the game creating the missions you want to play. Just a little note: ANY user made campaign is better than Bohemia Interactives "Campaign." The editor is what has led to me putting over 200 hours into this game; Its so fun to create a scenario to play your way. If you have a desire to create your own missions and even campaigns, ARMA 3 is the game for you. It does have a bit of a learning curve if you want to add tasks, complex waypoints, your own music, etc. -- The Multiplayer: I have also put a huge chunk of time playing the multiplayer. Whether its the ANNEX mission, or Wasteland, the muliplayer of ARMA 3 offers so much to do. The multiplayer is one of ARMA 3s best features. You can play online with I would say over 50 people at times on the vast 100km+ Altis and Stratis. Depending on the mission/game mode you play, you can easily waste away 20 hours a week on the multiplayer. -- Graphics: This game has beautiful graphics. An enormous improvement over its predecessor, ARMA 3 has luscious environments. Whether its at the depths of the ocean floor, or running up to the nearest hill, ARMA 3 has amazing graphics that you will notice straight away. The maps are so detailed and colorful with plentiful vegetation that makes the huge map of Stratis and Altis feel alive. Realism: This game is the best Military shooter to date. If you are an avid fan of Call of Duty/Battlefield, this game is no where near comparable. Its aimed to be the most realistic military sim in the market. -- -- Overall: I recommend this game to anyone who enjoys military simulators and doesn't mind a shooter being slow paced. This game requires a lot of patience. My final verdict is 8/10. This game is way better than its predecessors but still lacks a lot of things.
Turnip_;-;It's GREAT! Just, if you don't like those complex controls, then i wouldn't recommend it, but if you can get used to it easily, YOU'RE SET! Overall, Great game
SONOFCAT;-;meh its not bad
-TGP- Dan;-;Greatest game ever. Most hours played on any game! Got to know some awesome people because of this game
MoFooKiN;-;I recomend ARMA3 because ARMA2, ARMA, and the original Operation Flashpoint were literaly game changing games based on... you know what if you dont know what this game is about, you dont want/need it.. Arma 3 is an Alpha game.. The first I have ever been a part of and def the first time I have heard of paying to play an alpha version of any game... but its pretty good, and only going to get better. Best part about all the ARMA series is the modding comunity.. So many free mods your head will spin. If you want to see a few before DL, try going to "Armahollics.com"
minibricks;-;Wanted to break all my fps's on consol in half Wanted to break my console in half Spending 20 hundred on gaming pc to run the game on highest setting at 4k THIS GAME WILL RUIN YOU
Zippy;-;Arma tree
Bjrn Kjos;-;Great. MOM GET TEH MONEY
ChronicBanana;-;Arma 3 is a great open game with a lot of posibilities and things to do. Game modes such as Altis Life or Wasteland are fun yet challenging, but can also be quite frustrating. The servers always have a great staff to help out in case you need to report someone or just need help with the server.
Death2u455;-;this  so ing good cant stop playing thank you so much people who created this i hope everyone else likes it as much as i do
Morty Finkle;-;This game is good but there is bad optimization........wasteland stinks , but multiplayer 50 man coop is great....
Daniel;-;I feel that this a very good game, and is a very well worth the money. Great simulator as well as a good game to just mess around woth friends!
Dylan;-;This game is well worth the money, I can out countless hours of my time playing this. So far a good choice as I love playing Atlis life all the time.. and King Of The Hill.. Hopefully you can enjoy the game as much as I do.
kuke799;-;this game would be advisable to play with friends as gives you a more realistic feel to the game.
=TGB= Anderson;-;Endless fun, possibilties, and challenges! For anyone who likes the Arma series or likes to fight in a realistic enviorment, this is the game for you.
Reaper;-;i recommend this game its great when your in a team plus you have overpoch and the wasteland severs to play on
Evlo;-;Great Game
Krei'Daax;-;Call of Duty? Battlefield? What are those? ArmA is a simulator game compared to those pesky arcade games. Nobody can 360 you here, nobody can quickscope you either. This is the real MLG. Try to go on a rush and see yourself getting shot. It's all about tactics, how good your teamwork is and how efficient you play. Pros *Unimaginably good UI. Game gets every command as I want to transfer. No problem. *Good netcode. Even with 200ms, you hardly feel the lag. Most match lookups have no problem at all. *Stunning graphics. Yes, it can use a better thing or two, but it is a simulator game and gives you the simulating graphics too. Not to mention a large variety of adjustables for graphics. *Total realism. Okay well maybe except the magical first aid kits, rest is pretty much correct. *Brilliant single player campaign. Unique for me. *Multiplayer with mod support. Let it be EPoch or Altis Life, Zeus or whatever you can think of, there's a mod related to military. *I can count these up to infinite, but just get the game and see for yourself. Cons *Bad low graphic performance. or I have a really ancient GPU. Ge-Force 610M gets ~30fps with everything at lowest, 100% scaling with 768p. Drops down to 17-18 on really hammering areas. *Game's way too CPU intensive. I can go for a CPU stress test with this game. Maybe I should type this as a Pro. 2 in 1 program :P *Way too costly. 124TRY for vanilla version and 159TRY for Extended. Even with 50% discount, it felt like it was a full priced game to me. If you're not fan of ArmA series or really want to get this game, I can't recommend it without a discount. *A bit complex commands. Takes a few hours to get used to it, hell, it can even be days. Also not everyone can play this game. Takes a bit of extra buttons or few macros for quick responding to situations. Go and do your thing private!
Seventy-Two;-;Proper sick game innit bruv
DPz;-;Amazzing but need a good PC . :3
Duckling Gaming;-;Arma 3 is an amazing game but right now im having trouble with the workshop so if you buy the game and no workshop shows up its a problem with steam not arma
Ray ADD NEW ACC (SAME NAME, PIC);-;Great game, especially Altis Life!
KornCob;-;Can count to 3
usurp;-;There is no comparison
Karkarbink;-;Incredible.
boxychan;-;cool
#oldlegend;-;Needs less war
[59th] Aaron;-;Not as good as arma 2 but its alright i guess
PandaGamingOG;-;This is one of the Greatest game out I play A3L all the time is alot of fun.#LirikForLife
H3nryt11;-;hard to set up and get used to at first but once you get to know it you will love it!! :)
HEY THERE STALKER;-;Awesome game. If you played Bohemia's other games in the series, Arma 2 and Arma 2 OA, then you HAVE to get this. The graphics are beautiful (although you need a good computer obviously to run it well) the combat still feels a little stiff, but it's a huge improvement from the last games. They added an actual working physics engine and the features (inventory system, gun attachments, etc.) are top notch. The use of tactic and strategy is required so if you like that kind of stuff then you'll like this. It's still a pretty early release so I'm sure they will be releasing more vehicles and guns soon. Also, it comes equipped with the steam workshop, which is amazing considering steam's community is great at making modifications that make the game ten times better. Just get the damn game already!
Multi Colored Psychopath;-;Rammed into a jet at the Arfield with a Hunter going 100 km/h Flew 1.8 KM from the Airfield in a blown up Hunter. Rated Game: 10/10 http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=398382783
Pvt. A. Ageykin;-;This is the best military sim
Radec;-;A really fun game that is a great improvement compared to arma 2 when it comes to combat and animations as well as the variety of gamemodes. However, the game is a little "unfinished" or requires a little more refurbishment when it comes to general points such as audio and factions (combat audio such as firefight sounds including distancing of gunshot sounds is disapointing). However, overall, the game is a deffinate must buy and some improvements can be made with few simple mods easy to download.
Tacoma10;-;Really good game I give it a 10/10. After the heli dlc I havent been able to play it though it keeps crashing :( 0/10
CrabbedOhio8438;-;Arma 3 is a really good game. If you feel like a real army game, go and play arma, good tactics etc makes your team win. For the RolePlayer's out here, they are also at the right addres, arma has an RP mod called "Altis Life" this is fantastic for people who love RP with good graphics. I really recommend this game for actually every player who loves an army game and for people who seek real RolePlay
Razawais;-;amazing game good for pc gamers , fun and liitle bugs here and then but overall good game .
Juice;-;Beast
Sporgasmo;-;Best game of 2014 Award goes to this withought question!
Vaphic;-;While buggy at times, I throughly enjoy this game. It is an easy transition from ArmA II, and is a good buy for anyone who enjoyed ArmA II. 4.5/5
[7-75] Deist;-;The most polished, smooth ARMA experience yet and its still in alpha. The upgrade to beta then full release looks like it will only be more content as I have yet to find any bugs. If your an ARMA fan this is a must buy
Jamaican Party Clowns;-;Running around aimlessly through miles of durka-durka land squinting your eyes for multiple hours trying to find something that moves. Once you do, you find out that you need to reload your gun and you get shot a million and a half times. I like this game. It is Fun.
Lastman;-;I recommend this game to anyone who likes a more realistic type of shooter. This game also has a big modding community so there are tons of different ways to play the game. Controls are most fluid then Arma 2 and it feels more natural and less mechanical. It does still have a slight mechanical feel but that just goes with the genre. Every act requires you to take a second to complete that task just like RL. I didn't log many hours when i first got it but iv recently found servers that run the SC (Sector control) game mode and its fantastic. You gain levels by being in the target sector and money to buy new gear. Il keep this brief but its a great game and keeps getting better with every update.
DirtyFerg;-;Altis Life is dead dont even buy this game.
Mother Clucker;-;This game is definately not your standard cod run and gun type of game. You are forced to use tactics and the enviroment around you to gain the advantage and with all the multiplayer content as well as custom missions/mods you will never get bored.
Simbus;-;This game is great, especially with friends, Breaking Point also adds so much to this already amazing game! :D
Big Pappa Gunner;-;Absolutely amazing! Now, you will ned a beefy computer to play with graphics that are decent and a framerate that is above 30 FPS, but even on a laptop running it at 20 FPS with the lowest graphics possible, its still HELLA fun to play. One of the best military simulators out on the market.
Roverd;-;Is very fun
Allpack DANGER ZONE!;-;its a lot of fun how ever it needs a favorite server tab so you can find servers you like to play on easy but thats it
DaNieL<>;-;brilliant graphics and amazing military experience ! MEIN FURHER STEINER..........
Saxon;-;An Alright game, I recommend ArmA II: Combined operations over this.
SteijnSteiger;-;10/10 Would Play Again!
thumb/LFT;-;When writing a review on most games I dont really know what to say, this applies to arma. So i decided i'd just share my thoughts on the game. Arma 3 is amazing it has so much to do, although it's similar to arma 2 i still feel it deserves its own game. Highly recommend this game to anyone. All the hate towards arma is other you dont like this type of game or feel like arma 3 is in vanilla. I can agree with the vanilla part but i still enjoy the game. If i was to say any downside at all i would say that the dlc should be bigger and not 2 heli's that should already be in the game. Legendary game 10/10
EllmansWorld;-;YES! Aint got nothing more to say.
Joshua24842;-;Definitely worth the $60. Been playing it ever sense I bought it. 10/10 would buy again.
Nathan;-;Great game, good graphics.
IndytheBear;-;Arma 3 is the deciscive military sim for the hardcore military gamer. With excellecnt graphics and fun gameplay for hardcore fans, the 3rd iteration of Arma is a huge step in the right direction. However, the game suffers from poor optimization and bad ai. However, with a decent enough pc, any gamer can play. The ai however, cannot be fixed by a simple computer. They sit and dont attack, zig and zag instead of dive for cover. Overall however, I would give it a solid 7.5/10.
FM;-;To be honest ArmA 3 alone is good but the community mods for it are really what makes the game come alive in the mil sim community! Once you go ArmA you will never go back.
SpeedDemon;-;Hello, Very Good game if into Simulation and also it relates very well to real life, This game Is very mod flexible and there have been alot of mod releases latley e.g. Arma 3life Milsin units and all of that sort of stuff that takes the modding cabablilties very far with this game
Falken;-;Best military simulator ever.
Admiral. Poopy Pantz;-;This game is amazing. By far and as u would hope, the most realistic and beautifully designed Military sim game i have ever played. There are hundreds of amazing mods, still early in developement though of course. As well as the different game modes u can play in multiplayer such as wasteland is tons of fun. When u buy this game, u are really buying like 1000 different games in 1.
dallasfd;-;lol. great game, just get it already dingus
=EBS= Berkman Lord;-;This game has outstanding potential hidden inside it. Over ArmA 2 and Arrowhead, both graphics, features and gameplay has improved significantly. Unfortunately, cannot say the same thing about performance. Not only you need a beast of a PC to run it at a decent framerate on singleplayer, on multiplayer, that thousands of dollars worth PC won't help you, since it's completely down to the server hardware. Every AI unit you add to the battle might and will impact your framerate. If there are 30 units, kiss 10 frames goodbye. If there are 100 units, that will sum up to at least 20 frames. Engine itself, is heavily dependent on CPU and by that I mean it's clock speeds. At this moment, AI runs on the main game/server thread to combat any desynch in multiplayer in turn, tickrate hits the dirt. Considering game is not multi-core optimized at all, neither Hyperthreading nor Octacores will help you. If you do not have a Nvidia card and you are planning to run the game with a CPU that's a little better than what's recommended, don't bother, it will slice 10 from your frames, culprit, PhysX. Even with the top of the line CPU and GPUs in SLI, do not dream about anything over 60 frames on a populated CO-OP, Single Player or Multiplayer mission. You WILL get dips below 40 at times. Graphic settings won't impact your frames much, as long as you reduce CPU hogging settings such as clouds and drawdistance, you can run the game at ultra without much of an issue. Framerate impact is completely because of CPU under utilization. Mechanics are amazing, gunplay is exceptional. AI can be extremely clever and they communicate, flank, use supports and can make your life a misery if you aren't situationally aware. Single player is extremely interesting and mission editor gives unlimited content possibilities. On development branch, Introduction of Zeus DLC wasn't in vain. It's such a great addition. Consider it as a more user friendly mission editor that comes with the game plus, you can adjust EVERYTHING in real time. It will make you forget about the performance. For $35.99, it's a good package. But if you aren't really into such a game, I say wait for a better discount.
widow.nl;-;After waiting for so long, Arma3 has arrived, although it's an Alpha verion, the game seems so promising!
WiG_WaMM;-;Now this game is a complicated one to review. On it's own it's nothing really (and definately not worth 35.00) but with all of the mods made by the community, ArmA 3 has definately saved. The mods that I would personally recommend you get for this game are: ArmA 3: Breaking Point, ArmA 3 Battle Royal and ArmA 3: Life Mod.
grant0417;-;I would recommend this game at full price. Totaly worth it. I barly know anything about the millitary or fps' and I picked it up really quicky. Fun to screw around on Multiplayer and other Gamemodes.
teziN;-;An excellent military simulator, has a large learning curve and requires patience inorder to to become skilled at. Like most multiplayer games, Arma 3 works ALOT better with friends becuase it allos for you to have more coordination, which is a very important factor in Arma 3. Its fairly system intensive , but has gone through alot of optimiztion patches, but you should still look into the system requirements before purchasing. I would highly reccomend it, especially if you have friends to play it with.
Jem;-;Hours of fun and a good time... Worth full price
GuNnY;-;Awesome game to play
DarkstaR. Potato;-;Have you ever been kidnapped before? Well i'll tell you one thing it's terrifying. Me and my 2 armed other friends just fueled up our car and we started leaving the gas station. As we we're leaving 2 men in a suv parked they're car right infront of ours and told us to get out. We we're scared so we attempted to drive away. All of a sudden rubber bullets started flying everywhere. They managed to knock out my friends. I was still conscious but I was terrified. They tied us up with zip ties, put us in a suv and took away our phones. As we we're being kidnapped, I noticed a man hiding behind a building. We we're brought to a junk yard with a tall crane. They brought us all the way to the top. At this point I knew it was the end. They were gonna gonna kill us. All of a sudden I noticed a man at the bottom of the crane. Then I saw 3 cop cars driving towards the junk yard. The 2 armed men started shooting at the cops. As they were shooting I saw a helicopter flying towards us. I was happy and scared at the same time. Bullets started flying everywhere almost hitting every part of my body. One of the kidnappers started climbing down the ladder towards the bottom. Some how I managed to break free of my zip ties and I pulled out a gun and shot the armed man shooting at the cops. Me and my friends started screaming saying we we're the victims. One cop climbed up the ladder and told us to get to the bottom immediately. So we did and as soon as we got to the bottom we asked questions about the situation. We got pardoned of our crimes for killing one of the kidnappers. All of a sudden I heard gun shots flying everywhere. I noticed they were rubber bullets because I saw many cops getting knocked out. I looked up and saw the helicopter flying away probably requesting for back up. I looked back down and noticed everyone knocked out and tied up. The only ones who we're still free was me and my friend. My friend started shooting at the armed man. I tried to peek and see if could get a clear shot but as I peeked gun shots flew near my head. So I looked for cover. I saw my friend on the ground unconscious. I saw the armed man walking towards my friend tieing him up. I had the perfect shot, I aimed my gun slowly towards head and took the shot. I quickly ran towards the police and unrestrained them. They quickly unrestrained my friends. We ended up driving to Kavala in shock of what just had happened. We kept driving and never looked back. That doesn't just happen in any other multiplayer game. I thought it was all just a movie, a show or something. I never knew that could ever happen in a videogame. If you're looking to buy it YOU MUST DO IT NOW. If you ever want an expereience like that then this is the game you should buy. 11/10 -IGN
Blocksunshine [On iMac];-;Drove a car over chicken wire. Car broke. 10/10 would drive over chicken wire again
[SG] Silvertail;-;The greatest military sandbox I have ever played, Arma 3 is a lovingly crafted game, giving you an endless amount of scenerios to enjoy. Singleplayer gives you the option to screw around with the editor and either create the insane or the epic. It's a challenge to learn but well worth it. The main campaign can be frustrating at times, but overall is a very excellent experience. User-made content and scenerios add another layer of depth, and Zeus gives an easy integration of that and multiplayer. Multiplayer is by far the strongest point of the game, giving an in-depth experience in many a situation. You can play it as a roleplayer, joining Life servers. You can be a survivor of the wastes in Wasteland, or you can join in many user-made situations. The greatest of the options, however, is proper, team-based objective gameplay. With the right men, squads can work together to accomplish tasks against insurmountable odds. It gives a very strong sense of satisfaction to be part of such a team, and finishing the mission only solidifies that feeling. If you want a very-well made military simulator, offering wonderful graphics, processor-melting situations, teamwork, tension and combined-warfare operation, Arma 3 is for you.
DeWynter;-;First thing about this title, is that it may be called a game, but it is a simulator. There is a big difference. If you buy this looking for CoD or Battlefield type game play, you are going to be extremely disappointed. You cannot sprint around forever. Your equipment weighs you down and gets you tired. You can die of heat exhaustion. Running a kilometer and going prone doesn't allow you to shoot the wings off of a fly, you are going to have to wait till you heart stops pounding and your hands stop shaking. Guns use ammo, ammo which you don't get from running over the corpse of someone you killed. It needs to be the right caliber and in a mag that fits the weapon you are using. And that's just the beginning. The gameplay has evolved a bit since Arma 2, you can dive in the water now and there are a lot of different stances to help with firing from or getting behind cover. The inventory system has evolved greatly, but still not very user friendly to those not familiar with the arma series. The story so far is not the reason to buy the game, actually, the story is pretty weak. Where Arma 3 shines is the user created content. User missions, user mods. Arma is one of if not the most moddable game I've ever seen. From full conversion Fallout / Stalker type game mods, to dynamic user missions that pits you against insurgent activity and linked side missions that pop up all over the map. (IE stop an enemy convoy from getting from a to b, so that b's defenses are weaker, take out the radio tower so they cannot call for backup, kill the commanding officer to put the others in a state of chaos.) All in all, an ok game on it's own, but an awesome game because of the modding community. The one thing that I hold against it is that Bohemia has yet to release a working 3d editor for it. The community has made some awesome mods to make up for this, but that does not let Bohemia off the hook for not having a working one out already, especially since modding and editing is the only saving grace for this game.
-=SyOaRaN=-;-;Great Game Fun To play This game gives so much online game modes to play you will never be bored :D
Officer Tenpenny;-;Unless you've been living under a rock I'm sure you have heard of DayZ and how it is now a standalone game or a mod for Arma 2 OA. Arma 3 takes most the good points from Arma 2 and vastly improves on them whilst removing or improving some of the lacking features in Arma 2 such as driving, swimming and physics to mention a few. As will all Arma games they are best played with a close group of friends to form a team, this will greatly improve the amount of fun you can get out of Arma 3. Various game mode like: King of The Hill, Wasteland, Altis Life, Breaking Point and the new Takistan Life will give you plenty of options to play. Not to mention the huge list of custom games on the steam workshop. Arma 3 is the best triple A title I have ever bought. Worth every bit. 9.5/10
Lord Ewok;-;Arma 3 is a good game 10/10. In honest review i had been playing some wasteland with some friends and we started to build a base. We finally got the base running and stocked with almost everything, this was when the situation started to get bad... We were all sat in a tower just casually looking out into the wilderness when suddenly the opfor came for us; this was when the attack started. They came at us with everything. The attack started by a tank firing directly at our tower, at first we didn't think it was firing at use we just thought it was trying to destroy something else. This was when suddenly a tank shell came flying into the tower; it blew up magnificantly, bodies flying everywhere. After this we all spawned on the spawn becon. We came parachuting into the base. Helicopters flying all over the gaf. Me and one of my friends decided to stay in a building to get away from the shelling of the tanks and helicopters, but then suddenly all their vehicles and men moved in on our base they destroyed the building we were in so we tried to flee. As you could tell that went horrible but we luckely took out a couple of them. We then died and respawned back on the spawn becon. I came flying into the base trying to land on the hills surrounding. I tried flanking the AA tank that was there; it ended badly. After about 20 minutes of waiting we headed back to the base to see what was left. There was basically nothing left. After seeing the wreckage we decided to head out to a vehicle store. Whilst we were heading towards it we ran into a convoy which surprisingly was the people who just destroyed our base. We ran into the bushes and hid behind both rocks and bushes. After i had the briliant idea to start throwing smokes to throw them off our scent then finally saw where i was and made a crater where i was lying. After this experience i have to give the game 10/10 best experience i have ever had in a video game. Do get this game if you have the money and you can have an epic experience.
Henster38;-;This just sums up every ArmA game You've just joined in the ranks of the elite. The ranks of the El- What? Hey, look at me! Brave and tough! We're special forces and we want you on our team. Special forces? Me? Here's your weapon. And your stuff! You'll fight battles, and be all you can be! A cog in the machine! Is it brutal? As can be! You'll end up with acute PTSD! Prepare to get immersed! And do just what we say! And if you do it right, you will forget this is a game! Now, shoulders down and chin up high! And you can't jump, so try to vault! It's all so realistic! Wait, no jumping? Hey, that's not our fault! Let's have some fun! Now load your gun! And take aim at that man! DON'T SHOOT 'TIL WE SAY YOU CAN! If we can learn to do it, you can learn to do it! Once you know the basics, there's nothing to it! Follow in our footsteps, boot by boot! You can learn to do it, too! Now, Call of Duty, what a joke! And we got sick of Battlefield! I NEVER CARED FOR BATTLEFIELD! THIS GUY'S A GENIUS! Hey, how's it feel? Now plot a course! So, what's the plan? I say we run and gun! NO, BECAUSE THAT'S TOO MUCH FUN! If we can learn to do it, you can learn to do it! Take that arcade nonsense and simply screw it! It may all seem tedious, and it's true! But you can learn to love it , too! Next, you need to memorize the keyboard commands! The right mouse button makes you aim! And left to shoot! And Q to lean! And shift! It makes you walk or run! And left control to raise your gun! And pressing C will make you couch! And pressing O brings up your watch! The G key! Makes you check your pack! And pressing Enter views your back! If you can learn to do it, I can learn to do it but I can't wait to take my gun and actually shoot it! But it's realistic in a way, and that's the thing about this game! If we can learn to do it, you can learn to do it! Pretty soon you'll find that there is nothing to it! Fall in line behind us, boot by boot! And if you pull through it, there's nothing to it! Then ArmA is the game for you! And here is the Video that made this song possible. www.youtube.com/watch?v=Ig9z_hDSjuU
CluckCluckChuck;-;Very fun, tactical, realistic game. Multiplayer is nice, varitey of gamemodes. Singleplayer is always fun and has a nice storyline! I'd reccomend this to anybody who is thinking about getting Arma 3! Really looking forward to future updates and enhancements! Nice one again Bohemia!
GHotcakes;-;This game is many different ways to play it. This game isnt like COD or Battlefield where the are only very few different ways to play it. COD or battlefield that it just eventually gets old. Arma 3 has a great campaign and it allows you to take matters into your own hands. Arma 3 also has a great multiplayer category to pick from. Arma 3 has a great survival gamemode thats just like DayZ but without zombies. Arma 3 also has gamemodes like capture the flag and deathmatch and a few others but one of the best multiplayer game modes is coop which is really good to play with friends. The greatest thing about arma 3 is that it really allows you to get the feel of what real combat is like and the realism of the game is unbelievably great. If your looking for a game that is really realistic then Arma 3 is probabaly the game you could be looking for.
DockHimself;-;Best military sim there is...... or RP there is... just a massive game, the positives far outweigh the negatives on this one, Gotta say Battle Royale by player unknown is my favorite game mode in Arma III, start with nothing so you have to scavenge up some weapons and accessories so you can be the last man standing, love it! 10/10
STR33TRAC3R;-;awesome game if played with Friends
[55th_IB] Reaper6 [Col.];-;Fun to play,if you ever wanted a propper mission/operation team play simulation you got it right here!
Tekno;-;Very cool game, it has a lot of modes,and they are fun. i recommend to play this games when you are in a group :D.
Squashuux;-;Really nice so far.
TomorrowsCall;-;Huge Map Awesome Graphics Only in Arma moments Not recommended for those that want a fast paced shooter or dont have a reasonable PC Sweet game Thumbs up :)
Baj;-;Great game, especially enjoy the Role Playing servers. The only place someone will scream Bib;ical scripture at you and shoot out your tyres outside of the USA. 10/10
MattJoey;-;This game has it's ups and downs. It has greatly improved since its official release as it was extremely dissapointing (lack of Altis servers, Altis servers had no guns or vehicles or rarely any, no mods, campaign was not available at start (I did not care but to many they cared), and many optimization and bug issues)). All issues have been pretty much addressed and fixed, but there are issues that can still be fixed as they include an issues tracker in which you can report issues and recieve feedback from developers and users. Forgetting the few issues it has it is still a great tactical military simulator that you can enjoy with yourself, your clan, or your friends. This game definetly became an all-time favourite for me as the graphics look beautiful, even if you play on low, and gameplay is quite realistic to any other game.
An A10 Warthog;-;Great game, full of underwear.
Kolba;-;According me it`s the best game in the world. I love this game.
26th Infantry Division;-;I recommend this game to anyone who enjoys wide open world games. Arma 3 has one of the most amazing open world experiences to date.
jordanray99;-;Arma 3 is definatly easily my favorite game of all time, it produced an unforgetable experience, it showed stunning visual gamplay along with a brilliant engine that works very well with the game, It has a massive selection of weapons and vehicles. The community of Arma 3 is amazingly massive, there are tons of gamemodes and servers just waiting to be played on. It comes with a campaign that is entertaining and well developed. It also has a gigantic workshop community with new weapon skins, vehicles and all sorts being added each day. This game is simply fantastic and well worth every penny. 10/10
[MTA] Zazo;-;Arma 3 is a awesome very worth the price game it includes great graphics and fps it supplys realistic good gameplay that will make someone go to the edge of their chair constantly updated 10/10
Seduction|Jammyy;-;Mod's. Mod's. The things that make the game good. Oh and did I bring up the part where there selling us DLC Just to add some  go-karts and some half  helis? Well yeah.  off with DLC and just leave us alone. "You MUST buy the DLC to use this go-kart" Are you ing kidding me?
owan xXxNSiMxXx;-;ArmA 3. A 'tacticool' shooter. Sorry, that was terrible. ArmA 3 is an apparent military simulator. I'd personally call it a casual simulator, considering the bugs (the engine is riddled with them, but the devs are active on fixing bugs and creating new ones in the process). There are issues such as: - The movement system (transitions can be jarring- a sprint can becoming a walk just because the terrain is *slightly* steeper, which has got me killed more than a few times in the past, though it can be solved by running in weird ways up hills) - Over zealous stamina system (60lb of equipment will drain your stamina whilst jogging in a few minutes, 10lb will do so in a few seconds later) and issues like that. The guys I play with tend to disable it, and for good reason. - 'Futuristic' theme through the use of various real world vehicles and weapons - no AKs, M4/16s and countless other classic weapons we all know and love. Sucks, in my opinion. - Really dumb ai. Some improvements over the ArmA 2 ai - ai reacts faster and better, but can react a little... Overzealous. A single soldier in a good position can lock up squads by taking random shots, preventing them from being ordered around (units love to crawl when under fire), requiring a lot of micromanaging as a squad leader - if you're playing as Zeus or using High Command for squads, good luck. There are many others, but I can't think of them at the moment. But, now for some good news. You can install mods, fixing a large number of gameplay related issues. Sadly the first issue with the movement system can't be fixed (or hasn't, at least), but the stamina system has been fixed by a number of mods to be somewhat more realistic and more managable. Mods such as RHS: Escalation (the US forces and Russian Armed Forces parts) plus the HLC packs solve the lack of modern weapons - the two mods / packs are my faviourites for this sort of thing. Various realism mods around such as AGM and CSE also help improve the realism of the game. DLC is also free with the game, sort of. Similar to what they did in ArmA 2, you get the content but with some restrictions - so you can play with people who have it, though you may not be able do access all the features, and there may be some annoying notifications. ;p
[LWU] Enkidu's Curse;-;Have had a great time playing this game.
villep;-;With all the addon mission files, mods and different game modes, this game is like 5-6 shooter games in one. Can be a very different experience every time. Also there's skydiving.
TerrorFahrer;-;For all ppl who love military this is (for me) the best game you can find. Using tactics and strategy to win. I really enjoy the Tactical Realism Servers you need time for this but its just a great game. You almost think your in the fight ;) Oculus Rift and i think you have amazing fun and maybe some scary moments too :D Sorry for long review and Greetz from germany :)
Sectioned4Gaming;-;Good game cars break too easy though
Jacob;-;Amazing game! Especially if you play with other people and use teamwork! I haven't had this much fun on a game in a very long time! :D
Crabzzy;-;Love this game. Love it how it is set and everything!
Pcdrummer;-;Great game
Hannibal;-;Makes COD and BF look like sad shadows of military shooters. The quintessential military simulation experience. Buy it.
Mr-American;-;This game gave me PTSD 100/10
[FR] BranG;-;Great game overall ! Try it out if you haven't yet !
SmexYouUp;-;The best $60 I've spent. This game offers SO MUCH content for the money, it's ridiculous. Not only is the campaign challenging and pretty interesting, but the multiplayer game modes that come stock with Arma are a blast. But on top of this, it has incredible mod support where players have literally created their own new maps, brought maps like Chernarus from the original Day Z mod, added weapons that weren't in the game via Bohemia's addition, vehicles, enemies, etc. It is incredible. Whatever you want to do, as long as it's in the realm of guns or cars, there's a f**king mod out there for it. And that alone makes it worth full price, any time. This game makes all AAA titles charging $60 + more for DLC look like . If you think you can hang and stay aware of your surroundings, buy A3. It's fantastic.
CrossedCobalt;-;Best war simulator
The UMPlectrician;-;I recommend this game to anyone who craves for a slower-paced tactical simulator. About 80% of the time, you will spend travelling to the location you need to liberate or scouting the area for hostiles. Even then, you are not guaranteed killing anyone. You may get one or two kills if you are lucky. That being said, I love this game. I prefer it to Call of Duty or Battlefield because of the realism. The ballistics in this game is possibly the most realistic compared to most shooters nowadays. Many of the people who play the game are either in the military or military enthusiasts. That being said, prepare for the annoying 'support our troops' people. However, if you can get past them you will appreciate the game for what it is. A lot of the combat is mid to long range (unlike most modern FPS's). You will often witness your teammates shooting at 'nothing' only to zoom in with binoculars and realize they're shooting at hostiles a kilometer away. The game requires you to be on your toes most of the time and to be prepared for nothing. In the 5 hours I played this game (at the time of writing this), I experienced about 4 or 5 unique events that you could only experience in a multiplayer game. I was in a helicopter that had the engine shot from an enemy machine gunner. We crash landed in the middle of nowhere only to be ambushed by enemy troops. Myself, the pilot and two other guys were able to take out all the enemies and request evacuation from another helicopter pilot. One of our guys was hit and was on the ground bleeding so a medic arrived at the scene and patched him up as well. That may not sound exciting to a gamer that's used to the arcade-style shooters but the accurate physics and realism in this game is what makes it exciting. The very fact that this event occurred is rare (it only happens once in a lifetime, maybe if you're lucky). Anyways, enough chatter. Buy this game if you enjoy tactical shooters that have an emphasis on teamwork (ie. working as a squad, as a battallion and as an army).
michael08101;-;First time playing arma was unexpected to say the least. Classic king of the hill match. Im apart of a time of SIX guys in a ghost hawk with some stanger that came along. We enter the AO in the heli. We begin talking fire from both sides. One shot takes out the back rotter. All you hear is JUMP NOW! Only 3 of my group jump out and the rest blow up in the air. I land in a tree and my two other group members are no wear to be found. We meet up only to be BLOWN UP by a nade. 12/10 Nades
Cyanotic;-;This is my Favorite game the fun is endless and it never gets old due to the mods and the game only gets better as time goes on I would recommend this game to anyone who has a some what good pc to run it :)
GreenLightSaberz;-;If you're into simulator games, Arma 3 is for you. If you're into FPS games, Arma 3 is for you. If you're trying to live a life as a virtual military dude Arma 3 is for you. Who doesn't love a Military Caombat Simulator?? :3
Mirriban;-;Arma 3 is a really niche experience. It is refreshing to play an Arma game when the market is so saturated with MW type military shooters. To truly appreciate the realism and immersion of Arma 3 you have to find a good server to play on. I have not played a game in recent memory that provides the realism that this one does and the community is really the driving force behind that. The gameplay is solid, but the learning curve is somewhat larger than your average shooter. Combat is not in your face, but tends to be long range engagements that last a significant amount of time. The single player options are decent, and provide a good means for learning the game, but you should not buy this game if you are looking for a single player experience. My only other significant complaint is how poorly optimized this game is. It is a pretty game, very pretty actually, but it runs so poorly on even decent rigs that it can become quite frustrating. 7.5/10
Floof;-;Thought about buying this for a long time. Arma 2 was great, but i wasnt sure if this was any good. If you haven't played Arma 3, buy it now. You wont believe what kind of situations occur there.
my boby is ready;-;seems really cool
=AJSA= Dodge Ram;-;Got killed by a naked man carring a .50cal. 10/10
sage23;-;this game has great bullet ballistics , best I have ever seen in any consumer pc game... only thing. this game should have Linux support....
[CSG] Shabac;-;day 5: still have no idea how to shoot... 10/10 This Game... I love it
iM@S>LL;-;Decent game, although a bit graphics intensive. Uber-realistic. Have fun finding enemies...
ReZiiN;-;Arma 3 is a shooter that breaks the Arcade FPS paradigm, the versatility of this game engine and features presented therin are absolutely unmatched. Worthy of the title "military simulator" completely. Fly aircraft, drive vehicles, logistics with team strategy, tact, and disciplin this is the closest to a real combat environment you can get without selling your self to the man. Other big title shooters out there have gone the way of the "run and gun shoot em up" arcade styles and require very little forethought. If you desire an experience that will rock your fiber, and boost your blood pressure all the while training your brain? Arma 3 is the game for you!! Much recommended for sensible, mature players.
Viking2121;-;Great game, I like the King of the Hill mode, they seem to be improving it really well. just a lot of buttons, and the steam workshop is a nice touch. Only downside is this games horriable engine. The engine its self is from 2001 and its been pushed beyond what it can really handle on the clients side. Once you start to add about 20 AI or players the engine starts to use the CPU or Video card less and less cuasing a performance drop. I seen maybe 30% CPU/GPU usage on a 106 player King of the hill match with 30 - 35fps hile on armory I can pull well into the 80's with a few players. Thats my only gripe about this game. If they would fix that then I would have no complaints at all.
Taurus215;-;I found solitaire more fun 1. scopes dont zoom propely 2. multiplayer games are boring and have no point to them.. If you enjoy running around empty land gettin randomly shot by nothing and getting kicked out for no reason its great 3. No way to communicate with others in multiplayer and single player would be better if controls worked Jus glad i did the free weekend and not wasted 30 bucks like i was going to
michal - A2A;-;Best shooter ever.
Mike;-;Doesnt get more realistic for a military sim than this!
DimaS;-;Its the greatest game i ever seen in my whole life
^ ^;-;Lots of fun, definitely better than Arma II plays more like an fps, since it doesn't feel as clunky as arma II was. you can attach and remove scopes and ammunition without using ammoboxes, it is better trust me. ING AWESOME.
frecky;-;I have over 1500+ hours on this game...Thats all I have to say
Origin388;-;After playing this game for so many hours, i never cease to entertain myself! Whether it's fighting Hostile forces for control in King of the hill, Executing your enemies in wasteland or Fighting for survival in ARMA 3's very own version of DayZ. This game is great, recently DayZ was ported from ARMA 2 into ARMA 3, and must i say its exquisite it's a perfect port and Overpoch is a ton of fun. I was hooked on Altis life for a very long time, the roleplay in that gametype is amazing, if your unsure of what Altis life is, check it out on youtube there are plenty of vids showcasing it ;) Wasteland is where team tactics can really come out, You choose to join one of three teams which include the : Blufor (NATO), OpFor (CSAT) or the Independent (AAF). In conclusion this game is great! Even if you don't have any friends to play it with you'll make friends incredibly easy. Since Overpoch has been ported it's added even more to the awesome! Buy this, Enjoy it. Jadex Out
TheBushTickler;-;Graphics are outstanding... as realistic as it gets. Best military simulator of all time!!!
Tactical Burrito;-;Great gome to play with mates online and you have a thrilling singlr player too.
ahillel;-;Pros: Most realistic FPS out there as far as I know. If you want to get really into a battle like a soldier, that's the place. Cons: Oh boy. The AI vehicle driving model could be much, MUCH, better. Manouver of large formation looks so dumb. You can technically have dozens of units in your force, which is awesome, though they won't recognize good paths to move and will go just straight into anything in their way, including freindly infantry units (which will cause them injures). As a programmer myself, I can't figure what was the big deal detecting units in front of a vehicle and make them stop or go to other direction if this condition is true. Vehicles keep colliding each other. That's a serious issue, which again, I believe could be solved really easily. Also for some reason they can't drive back normally which is another major problem. You get into an ambush and your driver can't find how to go backward... Another thing is the speed of the armoured vehicles. They just go unrealistically too fast. Looks like this game was released with a lot of issues. I would still recommend it though because in general it is fun to play.
BratJaggesVlnd;-;Sooo good! Much play, much enjoyment!
reel_;-;fckn aye m8, been shootin 'em nemies with me carbine aw yee woman
BaronVonSlapNuts;-;ARMA 3 was listed as on sale until January 2nd at 35% off. Dec 31st it's at 50% off. I'm still recommending the game, as it's a lot of fun and looks great, but lowering a sale price two days early is aggravating to those of us who waited for the Holiday Sale to pick it up. I would have used that extra money to support an independent developer or something recently Greenlit.
pokokok;-;Play as syrian rebels against chinese soldiers, the story revolvse around "hank" a afroamerican spec ops soldier that kills grown men with is buttcheeks
BraveNinjapoop;-;Great Game, if your looking for a slow passed Simulator that will give you fun experince, this is it.
Green;-;Just like Human Centipede, this game is medically and scientifically accurate. Just like Apollo 13, you will have a lot of problems. Just like Shakespeare, it will end in tragedy. Just like NASA, you will not have enough funds to continue missions. Just like your grandma, you will end up as ashes. Just like Boy Meets World... except face first. Just like Die Hard: With a Vengeance... except no vengeance. Just like a Japanese Kamikaze pilot... except unintentional. Just like your girlfriend's virginity... all will be lost. Just like gay marriage... you will eventually get close. Just like an adopted baby, you will long for reuniting with mother moon. Just like a failed marriage, you wonder where it all went wrong. Just like an Islam extremist, you will scream prior to your death. Just like a cookie, you will crumble. Just like Selena Gomez, you will have one good hit, but can't replicate it no matter how hard you try. Just like a crazed sociopath Jebediah will ALWAYS smile, whether he's being thrown into the sun or on a fire-reentry back into Kerbin Orbit. - (Cobalt Lightning) Just like you have Alzheimers, you will forget your parachute - (Austin) Just like war, It never changes. - (Dr. Strangelove) Just like Peppi you'll use the boost to get through. - (Kodiak) Just like Falco there will be something wrong with the G-diffuser Just like Slippy, "Help me.....help me!" Just like a large burrito. It looks delicious, but always ends up a terrible mess. Just like a Stormtrooper you'll never hit your target Unlike Luke Trusting your instincts will get you killed Unlike Star Wars, the only force you need to be concerned about is Mass X Acceleration Just like a necromancer, you'll have absolutely no life - (Kodiak) Just Like North Korea, The Rocket will never launch - (Sir Panda) Just like a Space Marine, we call it Steel Rain - (Kill-Cam Celebrity) Just like Skyrim, your steed will only be able to fly for minutes at a time Just like SimCity, you'll quickly learn your building skills are  Just like a Scout, Jebediah runs fast and dies a virgin - (Kill-Cam Celebrity) Just like your mom's house, one mistake and you're out - (Kill-Cam Celebrity) Just like Russia. You can only love it or hate it. - (Selina Kyle) Just like EA, you promote it as a good thing, but it turns out to be a bad thing - (NOSCOPE) just like a Steam sale, you will use the funds that you don't have. - (Broccoli) Just Like Adventure Time, Grab your friends & go to very distant lands. - (Kanjzo) Just like IPhone 6, It will bend. - (Kanjzo) Just like this review, f*cking , dude - (Chris Atkins) Just like a bomb ... BOOOOM!!! - (Chasew) [very clever haha] Just like Star Trek movies, every other launch will suck. - (#SwagnarTheSweg) Just like a heart transplant, it was all going so well... - (Nigel Burke's Wristwatch)
T-DOG Da ELITE[S.C.K];-;this game gives you a dnokey boner when you attack dose dam greeks
StacyRect;-;Dear Bohemia you guys made a nice game, yes. The cons are easily noticable, starting witrh the beta ready engine, (we all know this but still love it) The fact that you're money farming people for helo's dlc's and seeing if it works. The fact you pander more for the life community side this time than the core fans. But hey, you take what you can get. It's still a good game if you can find a good unit to play with, and mods. Games legit worth is about $39,99 USD without the modding community. I recommend this if you are someone who has a vast majority of free time playing Army Barbie or just a kissless virgin who never touched a woman and spends it playing out a simulation of a real life. If you're a core fan. don't bother 90% of core servers are hosted on 4gb of RAM
wherewolf;-;Arma 3 is the most realistic military sim I've seen. You can find no other game that goes in such detail with weapons than Arma 3. Though there is a huge lack of weapons and the maps are dull, empty, and boring, it is a good all-around game. What you cant find in the game you can find in mods although it can be inconvient since the since the Arma 3 steam workshop only can allow 1 PBO and only 200 MB's of space. Anyway its a great simulator that needs few improvements and steam compatibility but a great game.
Kozlovka;-;Arma 3 what is there to do? There is many things you can do on Arma 3, here is just a quick list of things you can do and get... 1. There are role-playing servers 2. Wasteland servers where everyone fights to the death 3. There is a ton of mods you can get for this game 4. A lot of friendly people 5. Can make your own server for free!! 6. Not a lot of hackers because this game has top scripters who prevent them So there was a quick list of things you can do and get. Do I recommend this game? Yes I do because this game is top knotch it has incredible views, two big maps. fun game modes you can play, and tons of mods! Here is how you can create a server for free: http://youtu.be/E3ubmiGdPVs Thank you for viewing this review!
PAB94;-;Awesome game. Worth the money if you like strategic shooters.
Smokez;-;One of the best games i've ever played.
Exactkilla;-;Arma 3 is fun!
The Impoverished Gamer;-;better then pizza crust
musthavecake;-;Quite fun! Graphics are great and runs very well. Weapons and vehicles are amazing! 9/10
Fishcakes: Neubaufahrzeug VI;-;After 401 Hours on this magnificent game, I reccommend it to you. Edit: I have no life. If you doubt how good it is, check out gameplay videos or screenshots. Do eit.
Elihefo;-;This game is a really fun game to play with friends. I really enjoy King of the Hill and Wasteland. This game can get boring if you have no friends to play with or can't get into a group that works together. Over-all Best Helicopter Sim out there! o... wait.. Best Go Kart Sim! .. hmm... Ok, it's a great Game! XD
Rick0Shay;-;No other game offers such a high quality go anywhere do anything experience like Arma3. In Arma3 you can fly and drive any vehicle you can think of - or scuba dive, sky dive or just take a long walk and admire the scenery - whatever floats your boat or more likely sinks it. Graphics are some of the best in the industry and the size of the sandbox makes almost all other games look silly. You can choose to play it in an ultra realistic mode or just for enjoyment in casual mode and even if military games/sims are not your thing you can play one of Arma3's RPG's online - like Altis Life or Wasteland etc. There are literally 1000's of community made addons / mods and missions for you to play in either in SP / MP or Coop mode - check out Armaholic and the Steam Workshop. And the powerful easy to use mission editor is the benchmark in the industry. No other game offers such amazing value for money !
(O4V) Falcor23;-;War Simulator, not like Call Of Duty this is not fast paced. If you get shot you die.
djnephew;-;A solid update to a solid franchise.
sim0n;-;Selling kush to currupted cops in Altis Life ....
MD Tron;-;This game is amazing, so far its the best game all around I have played. It has amazing graphics, lots of differant simulations, and endless replay value. The main campaign is not part of the game at launch, but is a free DLC in 3 differant installments. The fact you can play this game in first or third person, increases the amount of people this game can apeal to. The learning curve is a little rough, but after a few times running around doing missions or just playing around, its super easy to pick up. AGAIN graphics, A++ if you dont have this game yet, its worth the money, I got the game during alpha, I got one for my wife in Beta, and now the full games out, and it just blows alpha and beta away with how amazing the game turned out to be.
Mr.Needlemouse Luffy;-;Amazing game, Altis life is the best. Just dont get caught farming weed on a mountainside.
Jarlek;-;Really good
Provocateuristic;-;Military helmet cam combat footage simulator kill / be killed
solidsniper29;-;it is so nuch fun and flying in a heli is awesome the plans are even better the guns are awesome all i have to do is hold down the trigger
JagzZ;-;One of the best militiary based games out there. Action packed and is worth the $50, Numerous amounts of mods aswell.
act;-;10/10 ruined my life. would recommend.
chiken;-;Great game 8/10 but servers are  as . Need optimization bad.
Faszer;-;Can your PC handle the awesomeness of arma 3? If so, put this awesome game in your library! (Get a steam key for 30 bucks on green man gaming.com)
Elik;-;Attention: I am NOT reviewing Arma 3 solo play. I am reviewing the online multiplayer in Altis Life and Asylum.. First of all, let me just say that a majority of the people I've come across in this game are complete s. They'll kill you, take your stuff, harrass you, etc; all while you have your back turned. HOWEVER.. the rest of the gameplay makes up for it. This is one of those games where you need friends. Don't have friends? Make some. It is so unbelieveably easy to make friends in this game and at that point you can actually have a promising team to get  done. You WILL NOT succeed on your own. Sorry, if you're a solo player, you're gunna need a team at some point. Altis Life is a game mode. It's fun, and there's no limit to what you can actually do. Be a cop - Check. Be a rebel - Check. Be a taxi driver - Check. Be a paramedic - Check. I love this game for the time I've played and I recommend it to anyone who's willing to die over and over, to eventually succeed.
slongdong69;-;This game really is quite fun. Despite the countless times that I have killed myself and all of my friends in horrific helicopter crashes, we still manage to have a good time in this game. The controls certainly take some getting used to if you are new to the series. Another thing worth saying is there is a gamemode for everyone's own personal taste; be it Life, Wasteland, CTI, or Secotr Control. This game is best played with some friends or at least voice chat, as it really does contribute to the experience to be able to communicate fluently with the people you're playing with. The only complaint that I have is the fact that in order to fly the dual-rotor cargo copters you need to fork over precious shekels. That said, this is still a very entertaining game and I look forward to many more hours of enjoyment from it.
[BW] Sirloin;-;With the full release of Arma 3 the modding community kicked into full swing releasing stellar mods like ALiVE and JSRS2. The game can be challenging and even frustrating at times if you're not patient, but rewards planning and careful engagement with an immersive and fantastic experience. The editor gives player the ability to create their own scenarios, from simple search and clear ops to convoy ambushes and combined arms operations, and makes this game infinitely replayable. I would definitely recommend this game.
Bluemicrochip;-;I ING CANT BE A COP BECAUSE IM NOT ING WHITE LISTED AND I CANT BUY A CAR
manzz0r;-;I love this game this game is my favorite game :D
gunlethal;-;this is the perfect game if you cant afford arma 3 it is very similar to arma 3 except less quality
Deimos CSGORiver.com;-;Amazzzing game ing mate love this ing  game great grafik and much more  LOVE IT
[Bright * Rmmr hs];-;"Arma 3, definitely one of the best games I've ever played!" Next to the game "Assassins Creed III" is "Arma 3" truly one of the best games I've ever played, and it is definitely worth the money! It has a lot of features and a huge amount of possibility's. I've played it for almost 70.0 hours now, and I only played in the editor for now, I didn't even started the campaign yet. First I thought that there whould be a huge difference between Arma 2 and Arma 3, but besides the grahpics (which are amazing) and the campaign, the game is almost the same as it's previous version. However the makers of Arma 3 did a great job by improving all the gameplay experiences and possibility's, Some changes between Arma 2 and Arma 3: - Customise your weapons. - Customise your player, like changing clothes and more. - Submarine and swimming underwater/diving suits. - Amazing improved graphics. But there are also some dissapointing things, In Arma 3 I really missed some airplanes and ships. However, I'm using some modifications right now like the "USS Nimitz" and the "F/A-18 Super Hornet". Those modifications really make the game more than perfect. A game like Arma 3 for just 44,99,- is just amazing, and will never be a waste of money, and time. It really one of the best games ever made, and you won't have much problems while playing. 10/10, AMAZING GAME!
SoulFox;-;played made owned servers of all kinds awesome game a mic is a must have for life servers
TherealScrable(Inaktiv);-;I've spent so much time(yes 200 hours are actually a lot for me) with this game and it is still fun. Why is it still fun? The community, especially the right community is the reason for it. Playing KotH, CTI and Coop. If you need an air strike, then call one, nothing is more epic then an A-10 fly-by, while shootings its guns and rockets at some pesky tanks. And with all these mods out there, you can actually always find something new. There is also a mod called ALive, which creates missions for you. You decide which scale, you decide which side and you decide everything. I can only recommend this game to every military simulator lover, even though it isn't as serious as DCS as example. But there is already A.C.E.3 in development. See you on the battlefield.
TTM~VeNoM;-;You will never know a real game till you play this and learn to play it . 8/10 on game play 9/10 on gfx. love the goame check it out.
Untamed Spyder;-;militey sim. probebly the best one out there. I love this game and when the whole game comes out with differnt servers and gamemodes, it will be amazing. if you dont have the game, do ur self a favour and but it right now!!!!
[SiN] Nobilis;-;Arma 3 is a great open world Simulation Military Shooter. It's not like your normal run and gun shooter. The game focus more on the realistic side where tactics and team work is key on being successful. Arma 3 give you a large variety and options, kind of like battlefield 4. Youre able to be just a random grunt or you can fly a helicopter (not as easy as other games) or drive a tank. Bohemia Interactive did a great job on the graphics of the game as well, it can be hard to find camouflaged players that are not moving unless you have thermal optics or what not. I recommend this game to more of the hardcore gamers who looks for a realistic game. I dont recommend it if your just trying to find a shooter to pop in and out like counter-strike.
Abbleploom;-;I had about 2k hours of pure awesomeness so far DLC Policy: If you buy it you get the little extras like gear or vehicles. Don't like or need those? Never mind then, you can still play with others who use them and still take a seat as a passenger. In regards to content the masses of Mods will provide for all your needs anyway. All players also get new developments on top. The Helicopter-DLC for example also comes with new physics and whole new difficulty level and even really nicely working sling ropes. Without buying the Marksmen DLC that adds some scopes and guns, you also now have weapon resting, usable bipods, improved weapon sway and exhaustion. And more to come - continued developement for free! Even replacing mods. The audio improvements are convincing, but of course you can prefer mods and still use those. And there so many more mods which will add countless more vehicles and weapons, maps, visual effects, uniforms, medic and player interaction systems, whole new scenarios of battle robots or dinosaurs... ArmA has so much to offer for everyone, casuals to special forces, it is worth every cent. It does take some effort to look things up though. The basic game is big enough already to overwhelm newcomers. The bootcamp mission takes care of that though and explains easy to understand everything you'll be confronted with. When it comes to mods you'll probably already be part of a group by then to show you how those work.
Why Not Bro;-;Stop reading reviews and buy the ing game already.
39Chrome;-;So much fun, Multiplayer is even better!!!!
RossJBD;-;Fantastic improvement on Arma 2. While it is a military sim, and I'm still not 100% how to play the proper game modes, theres plenty for the adverage FPS player to make the most of. Gun game and Battle Royale to name a few,
GburgSims;-;King of the Hill is life... Invade & Annex is life... Atlis Life, is life... ARMA 3 IS LIFE 10/10 would recommend.
kik112gaming;-;it is a good game i love it
GunsIE;-;Arma is not a game, in the same way that a word processor is not a document. Want to play Call-of-Duty-level stuff? It's got that. Want to play RPG stuff? It's got that. Want to play survival horror? It's got that. Want to play a flight simulator? It's got that. This software's so good it will convince you to strap things to your head for headtracking and that this is perfectly normal. However, you will probably find you get the most out of this if you play with a clan. From we-want-to-pretend-we're-in-the-army level of committment to the it's-saturday-and-we're-drunk-and-on-the-internet level of committment to the we-have-small-children-and-this-is-what-we-do-to-chill-out levels of normality, there are clans out there for anyone's taste and needs. And hell, if you're a misanthrope, the singleplayer fun is still pretty damn awesome. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=v1PXJduNQdg
SteF_RiGhT;-;Arma 3 is a great game if you are into shooters. It is a hardcore millitary game and experianced players will enjoy this alot!
Lynchpick;-;This game is not for those who believe Call of Duty and/or Battlefield is "realistic". This is as close to realism as you can get without actually going to war. This is a breath of fresh air to anyone who wants an authentic military feel in their games.
Chris Curbrick;-;A very fun game however the game itself has many things that need to be fixed; most of them are well known to majority of people who already play this game, the netcode could've been done better too. I do recommend this game however I would strictly wait until it's on sale before buying, not worth more than $20 in my opinion in it's current state.
Clif402;-;People's necks start glitching out in the back of helicopters. 10/10 would see a doctor again.
icey79651;-;Ran over a hill. Got shot by a tank. Got called a noob. 10/10 would noob again
AnttiStorm;-;ArmA 3 is clearly a step forward compared to ArmA 2. Interesting new mechanics and more smoother gameplay compared to the previous game. But still, this game could be complete  because all the bugs and d-sync. But all of the creative people who have made many interesting mods and missions make this game such a masterpiece. I have spent so much time playing this game. The community of this game is the best I have seen so far. ArmA 3's playerbase is like one big family. But then there are the s, but they are kinda rare nowadays. This game has made me laugh and cry so many times because the bugs and some epic and stupid moments. The only bad thing I say about this game is that it is getting less realistic compared to ArmA 2. ArmA 2 has mods that make it a REAL mil-sim. This game is more like slow-paced open world BF with some realistic stuff. I rate this game 8/10.
Duderino77;-;I am going to be short and sweet on this one: I have been playing and following up with Bohemia Interactive products since the very first release of "Operation Flashpoint". One warning: Don't get addicted ! :)
Ramloy;-;What can I say? I've been with Bohemia Interactive since 2001 when Operation Flashpoint was born. If you think Day Z or Arma has been laggy, how do you think I felt when I played OFP on a P4 800 Mhz processor with a 1 GB of RAM? Since the release of the latest update, the long awaited "fire your weapons from vehicles" has emerged and Arma 3 has moved one step closer towards it's completion. As for the DLC, first it was karts, then helicopters. The next installment is scheduled for Q1 of 2015 that will feature an enhancement for marksmen. But, that does not go without saying that Arma 3 will ever see a final update, for the game is very community oriented and new improvements are found each and every day. If you are a fan of any sort of realistic gameplay regarding war or vehicle physics, then Arma 3 is for you. Nothing excites me more than loading up a Blackhawk to it's gills and entering a combat zone with my friends and other real players only to delve out utter mayhem and destruction to our enemy. Arma 3 is my favorite game, and if you give it a chance and are patient with it's occasional shortcomings, then get on board and let's annihilate some targets!
TITANIUMSACK;-;9/10 buggy, but it's still to roleplay every once in a while
The0nlyGamer;-;Look at the hours i've played, a awesome step up from arma 2 with better graphics and a more intutive interface with more advance servers. Overall a great game to buy if you like military simulations or simulations in general.
Caesar;-;Bohemia is presenting you the best military simulator/experience once again with arma 3. I highly recommend this to anyone who is interested in an awesome game. 10/10, without doubt.
Kerel;-;Slow-paced and heavily strategic/tactical. It's a game that may not be "fun", but it can be very immersive and tries to give you a breathtaking experience. If you're one of those guys that likes hardcore realistic simulation, then this game is definitely the best out there. Also it's more than just a game, it's a platform that has plenty of mods to keep you busy when the original theme of the game is not quite what you're looking for.
Dusk Quill;-;Arma 3 is immersive: as one of the best (if not THE best) military simulators on the market, A3 surrounds you in a variety of breath-taking environments and puts you in the center of the action. You'll receive radio transmissions through bursts of static, hear the wind go by, feel the ground shake when a tank rolls by. Everything from the weather and lighting down to the recoil of the gun in your hand is so finely tuned and detailed, that the only closer you could get to realism is to enlist. Arma 3 is dynamic: it has an arsenal of mods just waiting to alter the game a little more one way or another. With a community thriving on creating more and more for the game, the sky is the limit for what can be done. No two missions will ever be repeated the same way. AI learn and adapt to situations, forcing you to do the same or die, and with a fully destructible environment, nowhere is safe until the enemy are all dead. Arma 3 is intense: you'll know this when you hear the bullets snap past your head and you're holding your dead teammate in your arms. The smallest firefights can shift the course of an entire battle. Life or death can be determined just from which way you decide to lean. Teamwork is tantamount to success, and unlike many modern shooters, there are no "lone wolf heroes", no one guy rushing the enemy line and winning the game for everyone. You work together or you die. There is no third option. Arma 3 is the game you want when nothing but the best will do.
Bak3r;-;Fun game, all the mods make it so fun to play.
BurningPenguinz;-;It's Arma.
Smelly Wet Sock;-;Arma 3 is a very fun, open world game. It has an extremely large modding community, and is widely played by those throughout the world. It contains a scenario editor in which you can create your own missions for you and/or others to play together. It has a unique scripting lanuage, which is difficult to learn at the beginning, but is very flexible once you learn it. The community has much variation, from player age, experience, heritage, etc. and is a great game for those who really like Combat/Strategy.
fuckmylife;-;Arma 3 is a game changer. Going from Call of duty, to battlefield, to this and it's on another level. Started it up, joined a server and met up with my squad. We rushed and invaded a small town where we were ambushed by tanks and snipers. One of my teammates was screaming through his mic as if this game was real life. After 20 minutes of trying to figure a way around the ambush we all got killed by a helicopter and respawned. Two thumbs up.
Ninja;-;I would say that the best way to describe ArmA III would be to say that it sends you to war. Be it through having your helicopter shot down in the first five minutes of you being in the game, and ejecting just in time to avoid death, then crawling to an outpost on your broken legs, to defend it to your death, or be it in having your Humvee hit by an RPG and having your commanding officer's head shot off by a sniper. The game is what you make it, but I will say this. This is not a casual game by any means. If you are a fan of games like COD or BF you will not be happy with this game. The hyper realism makes it often incredibly challenging to survive, but I can say from experience that when you do succeed, you will be as excited as ever. I would reccomend most players to start out playing online, because that is where most of the fun is. The multiplayer modes and the variety of them make a nearly infinite replay value. The game's sandbox nature make it a blast to play with friends, though it does lose something when playing alone. I would reccomend playing with friends. I give it a 8/10.
sinbin;-;this game has so much detail in it from the sounds to the look . As well as multiple levels of multiplayer gaming for you to play , well worth the money to get . So enjoy
Blackheartless;-;was alright, played very smoothly and looked amazing but when it came to flying/ learning to operate drones it was very confusing and not very well though out, also the online servers didn't work that well was ether glitchy or wouldn't work, or just won't load. if your looking for a multiplayer this would be good if it worked right for single player if you like cod you might like this.
tihi;-;this game is is the top military simulation (it is the only one). only problem for this game you must have high end pc standard to high graphic, in cod you will play at max setting. For ultra settings you need at least i7 and 2 gfx cards. i play on standard to ulta setings with 40 - 80 fps. What definitly need a big update and fix is terrain builder and other tools for making maps and mission. for game i give 9/10 need more optimization for editor 5/10 need a lot more work and better setup, guide and documentation... too long learning curve, hard to make decent maps without help from youtube and lots of forums reading and searching.....
lastmikoi;-;Probably the best military sandbox game out there. Quite a lot of bugs, might be unstable after updates, but the community is here, custom contents ("mods") are a gamechanger. Grab it, join a serious community, and enjoy the hell out of it.
I Got Unlucky;-;i dun played dis game it was fun it was lik de tim i shot jimmy
CrossedCobalt;-;Best war simulator
The UMPlectrician;-;I recommend this game to anyone who craves for a slower-paced tactical simulator. About 80% of the time, you will spend travelling to the location you need to liberate or scouting the area for hostiles. Even then, you are not guaranteed killing anyone. You may get one or two kills if you are lucky. That being said, I love this game. I prefer it to Call of Duty or Battlefield because of the realism. The ballistics in this game is possibly the most realistic compared to most shooters nowadays. Many of the people who play the game are either in the military or military enthusiasts. That being said, prepare for the annoying 'support our troops' people. However, if you can get past them you will appreciate the game for what it is. A lot of the combat is mid to long range (unlike most modern FPS's). You will often witness your teammates shooting at 'nothing' only to zoom in with binoculars and realize they're shooting at hostiles a kilometer away. The game requires you to be on your toes most of the time and to be prepared for nothing. In the 5 hours I played this game (at the time of writing this), I experienced about 4 or 5 unique events that you could only experience in a multiplayer game. I was in a helicopter that had the engine shot from an enemy machine gunner. We crash landed in the middle of nowhere only to be ambushed by enemy troops. Myself, the pilot and two other guys were able to take out all the enemies and request evacuation from another helicopter pilot. One of our guys was hit and was on the ground bleeding so a medic arrived at the scene and patched him up as well. That may not sound exciting to a gamer that's used to the arcade-style shooters but the accurate physics and realism in this game is what makes it exciting. The very fact that this event occurred is rare (it only happens once in a lifetime, maybe if you're lucky). Anyways, enough chatter. Buy this game if you enjoy tactical shooters that have an emphasis on teamwork (ie. working as a squad, as a battallion and as an army).
michael08101;-;First time playing arma was unexpected to say the least. Classic king of the hill match. Im apart of a time of SIX guys in a ghost hawk with some stanger that came along. We enter the AO in the heli. We begin talking fire from both sides. One shot takes out the back rotter. All you hear is JUMP NOW! Only 3 of my group jump out and the rest blow up in the air. I land in a tree and my two other group members are no wear to be found. We meet up only to be BLOWN UP by a nade. 12/10 Nades
Squashuux;-;Really nice so far.
TomorrowsCall;-;Huge Map Awesome Graphics Only in Arma moments Not recommended for those that want a fast paced shooter or dont have a reasonable PC Sweet game Thumbs up :)
Baj;-;Great game, especially enjoy the Role Playing servers. The only place someone will scream Bib;ical scripture at you and shoot out your tyres outside of the USA. 10/10
MattJoey;-;This game has it's ups and downs. It has greatly improved since its official release as it was extremely dissapointing (lack of Altis servers, Altis servers had no guns or vehicles or rarely any, no mods, campaign was not available at start (I did not care but to many they cared), and many optimization and bug issues)). All issues have been pretty much addressed and fixed, but there are issues that can still be fixed as they include an issues tracker in which you can report issues and recieve feedback from developers and users. Forgetting the few issues it has it is still a great tactical military simulator that you can enjoy with yourself, your clan, or your friends. This game definetly became an all-time favourite for me as the graphics look beautiful, even if you play on low, and gameplay is quite realistic to any other game.
Captain Party Beard;-;it's alright but costs as much as a patrick swayze shrine 7/10 no patrick swayzinator
The Wild Acorn;-;even at 10fps still fun, now that's saying something
Bare Minimum Rogers;-;Arma 3 is that type of game where its not just a Bloodshed battle but it has tactics and strategys that makes it realistic and fun
ReZiiN;-;Arma 3 is a shooter that breaks the Arcade FPS paradigm, the versatility of this game engine and features presented therin are absolutely unmatched. Worthy of the title "military simulator" completely. Fly aircraft, drive vehicles, logistics with team strategy, tact, and disciplin this is the closest to a real combat environment you can get without selling your self to the man. Other big title shooters out there have gone the way of the "run and gun shoot em up" arcade styles and require very little forethought. If you desire an experience that will rock your fiber, and boost your blood pressure all the while training your brain? Arma 3 is the game for you!! Much recommended for sensible, mature players.
Viking2121;-;Great game, I like the King of the Hill mode, they seem to be improving it really well. just a lot of buttons, and the steam workshop is a nice touch. Only downside is this games horriable engine. The engine its self is from 2001 and its been pushed beyond what it can really handle on the clients side. Once you start to add about 20 AI or players the engine starts to use the CPU or Video card less and less cuasing a performance drop. I seen maybe 30% CPU/GPU usage on a 106 player King of the hill match with 30 - 35fps hile on armory I can pull well into the 80's with a few players. Thats my only gripe about this game. If they would fix that then I would have no complaints at all.
Taurus215;-;I found solitaire more fun 1. scopes dont zoom propely 2. multiplayer games are boring and have no point to them.. If you enjoy running around empty land gettin randomly shot by nothing and getting kicked out for no reason its great 3. No way to communicate with others in multiplayer and single player would be better if controls worked Jus glad i did the free weekend and not wasted 30 bucks like i was going to
michal - A2A;-;Best shooter ever.
Mike;-;Doesnt get more realistic for a military sim than this!
DimaS;-;Its the greatest game i ever seen in my whole life
^ ^;-;Lots of fun, definitely better than Arma II plays more like an fps, since it doesn't feel as clunky as arma II was. you can attach and remove scopes and ammunition without using ammoboxes, it is better trust me. ING AWESOME.
NetherGinger;-;+One of the best war simulator games ever! +Very easy to install mods +Nice world interactive (about 80% of the buildings can be destroyed) +Nice maps +Cool Graphics -Many bugs -Hard to control by newbies 8/10
BadTrip;-;The interface, allthough improved, can still be overwhelming. I don't know how many times I have reloaded my weapon when I wanted to open a door or how many times I have thrown a grenade when I wanted to look in my backpack. It doesn't help that Bohemia changes the default keys for every installation of ARMA. However, this can be changed to your preferences of course. Another factor to consider is that it is HEAVY on your computer. Make no mistake about this if you want to view all the bling-bling it has to offer. It seems that it's terribly hard for Bohemia to optimise their engines. This is true from the first Operation Flashpoint to DayZ SA. You need spend some TLC on the options to make it run smooth and even with a beast of computer, ARMA3 can bring it to it's knees without sweating. With all this said, I have played all the ARMA games in the hundreds of hours per installment. And except for Operation Flashpoint, which had an excellent campain mode, the single player is not the reason for why I come back. Quite frankly, they might as well have left it out. No, it's in the multiplayer mode (being Wasteland, Life ,Zombie Nation or just a regular all out war session) that it really shines. It defines sandbox fun. Rarely does a game cause so much emotions and I frequently end up sharing "warstories" with colleagues and friend. It has the feature of drawing you into the gameplay and no other game gives me sweaty palms like the Arma-series. So, if you are prepared to spend some time to learn the game, you will have a gem that litterally has a mod for anything you can think of. Kill zombies? Sure. Want some stealth play? Sure. Want to live your life as a drugbaron? Of course. Want some chaotic all out tank/air/land battles? Definitely. And if it doesn't have what you can dream up, you can always create your own content.
Tigerlivs;-;The frames are not great but the mods for this game are pretty cool. Battle Royale is the best one in my opinion.
Snakiis;-;This Game... OMG Altis life is one of the best parts of the game. You and your friends doing jobs such as: Cocaine, Heroin, Weed, Diamond, Oil and Iron jobs and much more. Then going out to be a Rebel or be a Cop or just a normal Civilian. Me and my 3 friends are enjoying this game ALOT. And you will aswell. And if you dont want to play Altis, then you can also play the Campaign and that is really fun aswell, im not a big fan of it but you might be. This game is for every guy who likes the realistic military gameplay and realistic gameplay like the real world. You can also get the DayZ mod and the Battle Royale mod. I havent tried the DayZ Yet but the Battle Royale is REALLY good. Its a great mod and it should get into the game itself instead of being a mod that you can download. But this game is really all the money worth.
Gravity Lost;-;Hmm, I don't wanna say this but your DLC so f***ing expensive. 14 Dollar for 2 helicopters? are you f***ing serious? I can't use Mini Gun in helicopter 'cause don't have DLC, what the f*** is this? but gameplay not so bad. I got a sniper I see bipod when I'll use it. "Buy DLC Marksman" are you f***ing serious? I bought it 59.99 Dollar. I'll buy this helicopters? 14 Dollar? it's in your dream Bohemia.
Ghostly ;);-;Great game very tactical.
Hank;-;I am awful at giving reviews, and im really stepping out of my comfort zone here just because i like the game so much. Arma 3 is not a game where you have to be of a certain mind set to play, you just can't be spoiled. people who play call of duty or battlefield will just  their pants at the idea of this massive sandbox were anything can be done, but they will not enjoy the game for they have the wrong mindset. Arma 3 has 2 huge maps, these are not shoe boxes, you could play for years on years and still be finding new things on this map, because the 2 maps are big, it takes work to get to where you need to go and you will often enjoy the transitions. Yes the fun of arma 3 is the adventure you take to get to your destination, in what ever gamemode or mission you play, but once you get to that perfect snipers nest, or sneaking up on that perfect road where a tank is just going to drive by on your mine, or even if you stumble accross an enemy infantry fire team and got shot the  up, its the atmosphere that really captures you. Success to unsuccess its a game that requires time and effort, Not too much effort and not too much time, but the perfect blend that allows you to enjoy slight success and slightly understand why you failed. Arma 3 is more like playing hide and go seek with dog balls, every one hides and every one is able to be taken out, so when you do get shot in the head with no idea were the bullet came from, its more of a "Hahaha you got me" because killing in arma 3 is more based on position. Arma 3 is definantly the best game bohemia has. For those who were ripped off by dayz, even though they were made by the same company, dayz resembles nothing of the quality of arma 3, and the people who develope arma 3 are much more competent than dayz.
VirtualDoomsday;-;I personally just picked up on the Arma series, and it takes some getting used to but after awhile the game becomes incredible, and I would choose it over any COD and Battlefield. The only probably I have with it is mission 13 does not work for some reason :(
Raptor;-;I had a friend gift me Arma 3 and I always wanted to play it. Despite all of the negativity some people give it I enjoy the game myself. There is so much you can do in Arma 3 that sometimes it is hard to name them all. Having 893+ hours I think it is safe to say I would recommend to anybody. From super serious to very calm game modes Arma has it all. If you choose to get Arma3, see you on the battlefield.
Impulse #Movie Night;-;Epoch. Should I say more?
Tigris the CML-gineer;-;An infinite playground. Feel like some competition play? Boot up multiplayer and hop on Wasteland or TDM matches. Scenario play? Join one of the massive missions kicking around online. Extremely cool and unique singleplayer experiences? Hop on Steam Workshop and get one of the top rated missions. Want to goof around with your friends? Fire up a co-op mission. There's no game that offers you this much flexibility and this much room to stretch out in. If you're an ArmA vet, you know this already. Unlike the previous ArmA games though, despite some bugs, it's not completely inaccessible to the public. The server system is incredibly easy to use. Steam integration is fantastic. The player models and controls don't feel like operating heavy machinery (except when you're operating heavy machinery). Infantry controls are fluid. Helicopters take time to master but are a joy once you do. Tanks and armored vehicles are appropriately weighty (if a little low on torque and climbing power at times... I often wish I had manual gearboxes). Play ArmA III. You'll have a lot of fun.
RageBlazing;-;its all fun and games until a hacker teleports everyone into the middle of the ocean. RIP all 42 players who didn't have a underwater gun. 2015-2015
RiddleZ;-;This game is really good.
Gynesaur;-;This Game is just bout the most amazing thing I've ever played, and the Zeus DLC adds on tens of thousands of hours of gameplay onto the already huge playability factor... Some glitches, lots are pretty funny to witness in a subtle way... And the Modding community is crazily active. I would buy this again if I had to, steep price, but it is entirely worth what you pay. This game coming from people who have had contracts with different governments to make accurate virtual battle enviroments for training. ---GET IT---
amchec;-;What needs to be said, this is Arma, the penultimate of military games. If you are looking for a military game get this one, it's based off of actual US military simulations. It can't get much better than that!
SmexYouUp;-;The best $60 I've spent. This game offers SO MUCH content for the money, it's ridiculous. Not only is the campaign challenging and pretty interesting, but the multiplayer game modes that come stock with Arma are a blast. But on top of this, it has incredible mod support where players have literally created their own new maps, brought maps like Chernarus from the original Day Z mod, added weapons that weren't in the game via Bohemia's addition, vehicles, enemies, etc. It is incredible. Whatever you want to do, as long as it's in the realm of guns or cars, there's a f**king mod out there for it. And that alone makes it worth full price, any time. This game makes all AAA titles charging $60 + more for DLC look like . If you think you can hang and stay aware of your surroundings, buy A3. It's fantastic.
Premo;-;Easily one of the best shooters I have ever played. More Simlator then most claiming to be out there. Nothing like a "C.O.D" or "BF". Great Game Highly Recomend It.
Djohn.il;-;Best military simulation out there, period.
Frissiw;-;Amazing, forget my old review. This game is gold. As a Arma lover, I was super hyped about the game. The reason I hated the game was because I only played Watseland and Altis Life. But I joined the more war servers. And damn it's fun.
Saint;-;The Arma series is one of the greatest I have ever played and it continues to be my gaming choice. The game is for hardcore FPS tactical shooters, it is seen as a milsim and a sandbox game. Remember slow is fast and fast is slow...
Tursky;-;One of best experiences in multiplayer in my life. Most of times i do mil-sim coop so this game is worth all money if you don't expect cod or bf like gameplay
WolfChaos;-;what i can say ,Arma is always Arma ,the ultimate war simulator ,if we make a difference with Battlefield ,well....BF is for casual and arcade player
Color;-;Really fun, especially if you play Arma life or altis. Its a little hard to run so make sure you have the PC for it.
Cyanotic;-;This is my Favorite game the fun is endless and it never gets old due to the mods and the game only gets better as time goes on I would recommend this game to anyone who has a some what good pc to run it :)
GreenLightSaberz;-;If you're into simulator games, Arma 3 is for you. If you're into FPS games, Arma 3 is for you. If you're trying to live a life as a virtual military dude Arma 3 is for you. Who doesn't love a Military Caombat Simulator?? :3
Mirriban;-;Arma 3 is a really niche experience. It is refreshing to play an Arma game when the market is so saturated with MW type military shooters. To truly appreciate the realism and immersion of Arma 3 you have to find a good server to play on. I have not played a game in recent memory that provides the realism that this one does and the community is really the driving force behind that. The gameplay is solid, but the learning curve is somewhat larger than your average shooter. Combat is not in your face, but tends to be long range engagements that last a significant amount of time. The single player options are decent, and provide a good means for learning the game, but you should not buy this game if you are looking for a single player experience. My only other significant complaint is how poorly optimized this game is. It is a pretty game, very pretty actually, but it runs so poorly on even decent rigs that it can become quite frustrating. 7.5/10
Floof;-;Thought about buying this for a long time. Arma 2 was great, but i wasnt sure if this was any good. If you haven't played Arma 3, buy it now. You wont believe what kind of situations occur there.
SINGSONG1;-;heck yeah
DYL4N;-;Favorite game in some years, definetly recommend it. Lots of content with: Campaign Scenarios Sector Control Wasteland Battle Royale Great game however I wish that multiplayer performance lag-wise would be better optimized.
Shadehockey21;-;Fantastic, only issue i have are the overly complex controls.
incognegro;-;this game is the most broken and buggy piece of  but i still love it so much
dOx;-;It's a good game ! ( OverPoch to dayz mod is so awesome ! ) BEST BUY
Misha;-;I would totally recommend this game for those who have the money :P
@EagleNetGamer;-;10 -10 Full paced action packed real good graphics military simulation deffinatly would recommed for people to play :)
Disco;-;BR is one of the better Mods
Mellis;-;Like most of the reviews of this game on steam, this games first 30 hours will be the most painfull time spent trying to learn the basics. With that in mind, I highly recomend this game to those who played the first two games in the ARMA serise. While the learning curve for the game may take some new players days to learn, it is a game that can not truly be judged by how difficult it can be. When first getting into a game you will realize that the games controls can be extreamly difficult to learn, but upon playing for 30+ hours, you will learn all of the in and outs of the complex controls. Many would be quick to assume that this is just like any ordenary shooter were you run to one objective to the next shooting everything in your path, In ARMA 3 this is simpily not the case. Getting into your first only match you will realize that there will be some situations that may take you 10 minutes of sitting there and waiting for the enemy to make the first move. Needless to say this game is extreamy hardcore, and should be part of your library if you enjoy stratigic games that require communication with other people to win. What is good: Graphics Gameplay Online Gameplay Community What Sucks: Learning curve Server-Side lag Large system requirments My Score- 87/100 -A must buy for those who love stratigic 1st/3rd person shooters. - 170hrs of playtime at time of review.
SM;-;Incredible Co-op. Good community. Best fps game I ever owned.
Johnny Paper;-;IF you never played operation flashpoint, arma 1 , arma 2 , day z mod , day z standalone, or any other military shooter this game is not for you and if you have, this is the best military simulator ever made.
jbrazier;-;love it simple as that. :)
HDatom;-;played a little bit and its just, mehh, just ok
Koto;-;- Start Arma 3 - Join Altis life server - get Zubar and 9 mags - travel to Kavala - goes to police station - shoots officer - he's invinsible - run out - see man already arrested - go behind house - man offers me 300K to cause "distraction" - run to the mans friend - shoot a few rounds in the air - get tazed - after a while only let off with a warning - runs off to office building - see's 2 people - trys to make friends - 1 runs off - talking to last guy he says he is a "ultimate noob" - i run out of building - the first guy shoots me in the leg - i hop off to the roof - 1st guy says to 2nd guy "Run, just run!" - they both go in diffrent directions - i come out - shoot the 2nd guy in the back while he runs up the street - guys name was "dougal" - climb to roof and fall off ladder and die - spawn in again - find 1st guy - tell him i killed dougal - he says "oh, i was trying to rob him anyway" - we laugh - i ask him if he wants to be a team - hits me in head with gun - shoots me in the head - "thats for killing dougal" 10/10 would altis again
Charlemagne;-;This game is the best open-world military simulation ever. ...just gotta love this game.. :D :D
Echo | FACEIT.com;-;A beautiful looking game, with realism at it's finest. Great Gunplay, and well polished campaign. Multiplayer is incredible. Tons of Mod Support through Steam Workshop, and countless support for Third Party mods like Battle Royale. It's worth the money if it's on sale, and I couldn't recommend it enough.
BossMan;-;What Call of Duty wished it was. What Battlefield strives to be. What Arma already is. Czech Republic/10 Two developers got wrongfully arrested for taking pictures at a Greek air show because of this. If this game can spark a coupe then you know it's good!
ostemeister (trade);-;best game ever i love it but dont buy the game if you dont hav a high end pc ;)
benbot16;-;Excelent simulator game, really fun if you are a military type.
|BDB| andrometer98;-;Do you love 10 FPS? Do you love bushes that can blow up trucks? Do you love buying DLC that is overpriced? THEN THIS IS THE GAME FOR YOU! Welcome to Arma 3 a game that can give you hours of fun while making you ask yourself why you paid $60 for the game and $15 for the DLC. This game will give you so many funny memory about how you drive on a rockwall with a tank and exploded and hit a bush with a truck and your wheel broke. I have a top of the line graphics card, processor, and internet but I still can't paly this game on high/ultra and get about 25 FPS. Best war simulator 2014.
gunnergarrett;-;I've played dayz and this Game totally beats it. With the customization available, there is really nothing bad about this game. There is occationally lag spikes and fps drops but thats probably just me. GREAT GAME!
Stickofish;-;After 200 hours into this game and playing in the aplha i would still reccomend arma 2 there isnt as much in arma 3 as its counterpart way more items in arma 2
YourFriendLoke;-;Amazing military sandbox game that lets you create anything you can imagine!
ACTION GAMER;-;great game there is a alot mods
ReficulDrol;-;beautifull, extremely well designed now that the mod community has gone completely bonkers with solo, co-op and multi maps and missions this game is beyond measure. please do not go into this blindly. Arma3 is a patient game, a game requiring a very nicly oiled pc and players that play the solo missions to learn the controlls before throwing the nubness at the pros. this community is patient to an extent, and rightly so. this game deserves you to give it respect and time. learn its kinks and you will be greatly rewarded by being apart of victory earned by all, not by one.
PandaGamingOG;-;This is one of the Greatest game out I play A3L all the time is alot of fun.#LirikForLife
H3nryt11;-;hard to set up and get used to at first but once you get to know it you will love it!! :)
HEY THERE STALKER;-;Awesome game. If you played Bohemia's other games in the series, Arma 2 and Arma 2 OA, then you HAVE to get this. The graphics are beautiful (although you need a good computer obviously to run it well) the combat still feels a little stiff, but it's a huge improvement from the last games. They added an actual working physics engine and the features (inventory system, gun attachments, etc.) are top notch. The use of tactic and strategy is required so if you like that kind of stuff then you'll like this. It's still a pretty early release so I'm sure they will be releasing more vehicles and guns soon. Also, it comes equipped with the steam workshop, which is amazing considering steam's community is great at making modifications that make the game ten times better. Just get the damn game already!
Multi Colored Psychopath;-;Rammed into a jet at the Arfield with a Hunter going 100 km/h Flew 1.8 KM from the Airfield in a blown up Hunter. Rated Game: 10/10 http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=398382783
[] Niko @ Army duty till 17th;-;This game is so realistic, I love it. This is the game you're looking for if you search for mature players
Napster;-;Game of the year!
HippoFingers;-;you can kill people without knowing anything about them and you still do it because you're a mother ing American
[rg] Catz;-;Brandon is silly for not buying this game. It's a fun game. You can go diving, who doesnt want to go diving.
Daghalbit;-;Great game, still new to it, and enjoy it so far. Has bugs in it like all the other arma games out there.
lolipopzzY;-;I recommend this game if its on sale, but if it isn't, its not really worth 49.99 euro. But it's still fun andreally great looking.
Alexandru;-;This game is full of action, even when commanding.
GAMMEL SMURF;-;its the best game ever i want all to buy it
Leipe Salvaged;-;Best game ever not so fast paced as BF4 or COD*
DEranking;-;Best games ive played in awhile.
Turbo Nozomix;-;The SP missions are exciting and very challenging. I haven't played online yet.
Geralt of Rivia;-;Greatest military game ever
BlazinJ77;-;My friend shot me in the foot and left me to die. 10/10 But in all seriousness, ArmA 3 is a beautiful game and is tons of fun. There is a lot to do with this game, from booting up the editor and having you and a group of friends do a mission, to helicopter flight practice. Playing ArmA 2 with the Dayz mod has really gotten me into ArmA, and I enjoy it.
Meat Grinder;-;Best Game to Waste Money one period
Epic Turtle;-;Epic Game take your time in learning the controls and gamemodes. Many Mods and countless hours of Fun
[GG] BloodMonK;-;fuken climb in the bushes m8, shoot the biches get the girl, alright
Prince Matticus;-;ARMA III is not a love hate relationship, it is a relation comprised of ruthless, and merciless defeat and frustration. This game made me pour hundreds of hours of my life, into a virtual world, where i only die. I could not recommend this more to someone who wishes to experience what it's like to be a complete failure. Playing arma, is like when you swap from COD to Battlefield, except you are being constantly reminded, that you are vulnerable. 10/10, would bearing 000000
Koul Fardreamer;-;First off, this game is amazing. It has something to suit everyone, even though it is a military simulator. This is because of a dedicated community of modders. So if you don't want to be a soldier, get on an Altis Life server and fish or something. If you want the fight a gladitorial battle to the death, try Battle Royale. If you're into zombies there Breaking Point or Overpoch. If you want a strict PvP mode that plays similaryly to BP or Overpoch, get Wasteland. There is so much that this game has to offer that I couldn't begin to list it all. This game like every other is not without flaws, however unlike many games, the dedicated community of modder also takes care of that with their own patches and fixes. Seems like Bohemia Interactive did everything right with Arma 3, and the opposite with DayZ Standalone.
Jacob;-;Amazing game! Especially if you play with other people and use teamwork! I haven't had this much fun on a game in a very long time! :D
Crabzzy;-;Love this game. Love it how it is set and everything!
Pcdrummer;-;Great game
Hannibal;-;Makes COD and BF look like sad shadows of military shooters. The quintessential military simulation experience. Buy it.
Mr-American;-;This game gave me PTSD 100/10
[FR] BranG;-;Great game overall ! Try it out if you haven't yet !
Misfit;-;ARMA that is all
MUZ;-;Great game. DL the Breaking Point mod.
JoJo;-;Stairs and Heights are your worst enemy
Toliver;-;This game is so mutch fun. Even with out the mods that most people play.
Alex;-;Simply the Best Militry Simulator on the Market, even if you don't like that aspect you can play the famous mods like Wasteland and Altis Life. You don't even need a Mod Manager for that (Arma 2). It's defently an improvemend to Amra 2.
envious ' weeds;-;Best game in the world !
AOD_MOOVOh;-;Was a great leap for the engine, beautiful lush lands await you. The AI needs improvement (constantly being fixed). The overal content of the game is there (with some bugs) along with the supporting community. You will get lost for hours in just about any server catering to a plethora of gametypes/individuals.. whether that be realism, passing time with friends, or just flying around to enjoy the scenery. This game helps build good relationships with other players through teamwork and roleplay, as well as provided likeminded people with a place to call "Home". R.I.P. DIS.
Sanchez^;-;One of the best Military games I've played so far! Alot of fun and always on your toes. Never let your guard down, enemys could be anywhere in Co op missions. Playing this game with JSRS: Dragonfyre makes the sounding of the battle even more realistic it will make you think you're actually there! Overall rating 9.5/10 Overall Great game and recommend any player who loves tactical shooters to get this. - Stay Frosty, See you on the battlefield -
Bostonwicked;-;Arma 3 is one hell of a game the shear possiblites are limitless you can kill and be killed in so many ways i give this a sure " Thumbs Up."
SovietMofo;-;Such an awesome game !,.....myself, i like wasteland mode the most :D,..But i hate life mode -_- because i have no idea what to do on it,....
DoritoKush;-;It's a game.
Jwolf;-;died and became a seagull, living the dream 10/10
Valadain;-;Arma is pretty well the "everything" simulator. Want to shoot some terrorists? Want to shoot some zombies? Want to shoot some dinosaurs? Want to run around town and get harassed by cops? Want to make some drugs and sell them? Want to build a house out in the woods and do inappropriate dancing all night long? Sure gameplay can be frustrating at times, but a fair trade-off for near infinite replayability.
Skeletor;-;Stole a cop car of a squeeker hooned around town and pulled poeple up 11 out of 10
{FITH} Evel Knievel;-;Worth every penny. Fantastic military simulator.
RNPC;-;The free weekend trial was enough to convince me to buy this game.
Dezai;-;This game blew my mind. It is hard as hell, but fun at the same. It's nothing like CoD or some easy  like that. The game where you actually have to concentrate on what you are doing. Rating 10/10
VojtCZech;-;The most played game from my library. That's says it all.
Extreme Encounter;-;I don't even have the game but it's allowing me to write this. I win.
ThatSlyGuy;-;10/10, most fun I've had in any Steam game.
Smelly Potato;-;The* best military simulator on the market. It's the only game where one or two bad guys at the right time, and in the right situation, will get your heart pumping. My go-to game. Highly recomended to anybody who has played a military shooter and thought, "I wish I could do X, and Y." Doesn't matter what X and Y are, the majority of the time, you can do it in ARMA.
FilbilPL g2a.com ROAD TO PROLAND;-;This is realy epic game. You can play in Altis Life, Patrol Ops and the best of all is Breaking Point (something like DayZ but on arma 3). :D
am1ty;-;Love It, Amazing!!!
PhantomGamerz;-;Awesome game here it has so much more potential than games such as cod or battlefield which are mainluy liniar games on arma theres no straight line thinking its like a giant sandbox with huge maps and vast mods and gamemodes to suit everyone. I would suggest this to anyone thats on the fence about the game or prefers a break away from Cod and battlefield a solid 10/10 from me
Wilson;-;very good game with good graphics and its worth getting
JamaicanMeSomeCookies;-;if you are looking for a harcore tactical pc gmae. Look no further arma 3 is the shizzle
Lynchpick;-;This game is not for those who believe Call of Duty and/or Battlefield is "realistic". This is as close to realism as you can get without actually going to war. This is a breath of fresh air to anyone who wants an authentic military feel in their games.
NiNJACQUES;-;Difficult to master but awesome to play. Realistic army sim.
Kevin;-;Best game on steam
XtremeCashier;-;The closest you'll ever get to real combat in a video game. Be prepared for slow paced gameplay compared to other shooters (because that's how it is in real life). Once past the initial learning curve, Arma 3 provides some of the most rewarding gameplay out there. Community mods increase this game's value tenfold.
Morgan Freefarm;-;I don't even own this game. 10/10 i'd play it again
[GMG] Kenny;-;Good game. Can do almost anything thanks to the modding support. I strongly recommend Altis Life, A3Wasteland, and possibly Arma 3 Epoch when it gets out of alpha.
SurpriseKH;-;I give this game a 10/10 I have 400 Hours on this game 350 of those hours I've played. Other 50 hours went to AFKing. It's well worth the money becasue you can use mods on it and run different missions the re-playableity is endless. Now I only played wasteland, but there is more things like Life and stuff. Now I have played Arma: 2 Free so I know how to play the game. Only thing I don't like about it is the lack of firearms, cars, Helis, and Planes. If you look past that though it's a great game over all. It's quite social.
diGix [no Monitor];-;Hands down best Sandbox.
Patterson;-;This is the best game it's just gets boring when you dont play with friends.
Lo0py;-;This game is freakin' sick! Just buy it people!
Syrsa;-;Something for people who like Tactical Realism, not for the CoD fanboys, sorry CoD fanboys. ^_^
BigDog;-;The pre-eminent military simulator. Multi-player and the mod community are where this game shine. Incredibly deep and sometimes frustratingly buggy, persevering lends a rich experience.
Aces 52;-;Absolutely incredible game, a sandbox more than anything else with practically limitless possibilities. Whether you prefer to role play, simulate actual battle scenarios or simply blow stuff up with advanced modern weaponry this game can cater for it all. Whilst you do get some performance issues, especially on lower spec systems they are really nothing which should put you off. I recommend this 100% to any gamer.
[TOG]Kazin;-;Great game. I bought this after playing DayZ standalone and having never played the DayZ mod or Arma 2. The most realistic combat game I ever played. A must have. 9/10
Veqgaz | De-Uprank;-;You liked Arma 2? You'll love Arma 3!
sKem_;-;yes i recommend
SpoiL;-;First of all, THIS GAME IS AMAZING. If you like military games, realistic stuff, vehicles, big map, pvp (There is much more). This game is for you. If your bored of doing missions, you can always go and play other gamemode like, King of the hill in which there are three teams and one town and the team who can hold off the town for the longest wins. There is altis life in which you make money by selling drugs/ mining etc. and then spend the money on stuff, you can rob people, gas stations and become a cop (RP). Its a really fun game to play. I would rate it 9.5/10 because of some fails in the game's mechanics, its still a really fun game to play with friends or alone.
Ekin;-;Nice game, controlls are a bit ed up but you get used to it :D
The American Soldier;-;This gane is just awesome.... Nothing else needed!
BoneCrusher;-;Got banned from my favourite server because of accidentally using voice chat in global... <3 10/10
Squaids;-;Has its bugs here and there but the fact its crafted for modular addition gameplay is what i love about it.
hauNt_;-;The latest in the ArmA series, this is the best military simulator out there, and it sure does live up to the hype, with a fantastic graphic upgrade. Apart from just upgrading the graphics, it has created 2 new maps for you to go crazy on in this sandbox military simulator where quite literally, the sky is the limit. Engaging Close Quarters Combat, entertaining infantry combat with a load of other people and AI with vehicles to back you up, the amount of scenarios you and your friends can experience is endless, due to the thriving community that has come from ArmA 2 and Operation Arrowhead, to make these games even better. Whilst even without any mods, this game still lives up to the standard that is expected from Bohemia Interactive in this long running series of military simulator/sandboxes. They added new movement, new weapons, new vehicles. Whilst no classic weapons like the M4/M16/AR15 series don't make a return, along with the AK47/74/74su, they are replaced with new weapons that are more towards the future. The game itself is set in 2035, when the Republic of Altis and Stratis is facing a civil war, NATO comes in and attempts to help the AAF in the war against CSAT, they are turned on and the AAF teams up with CSAT to destroy NATO forces in this gripping fight between yourself and loads of tough AI. In this futuristic settings, along with new weapons, new toys have been added to your arsenal to mess about with. New vehicles include submarine type transport vehicles, amphibious armoured personnel carriers, and scuba-diving equipment. It all totals up to a crazy sandbox experience with a load of missions and scenarios from the community, from Altis Life to Wasteland.
Cinnamon;-;This game is so amazing. It's made to be a fun, military simulator but its so much more. There are game modes for every kind of person, or all people. Let me name a few: RPG, Zeus, Big team, Wasteland, Epoch, and much much more. The community is great. There is nothing wrong at all to say about this game. Just go ahead and buy it. Okay, I have a cool story just to tell all of you guys. This isnt my only one, I have alot. Me and my friends are in a gang war with some enemies and have been searching for them throughtout the map or an entire hour. We eventually decide to do a drug deal with them because the drug traders arent safe. We go to the airport and I set up in a tower to watch over while my leader is outside the building and my frends are outside. All of the sudden our leader gets taken out and to guys go over to loot his body. In the meanwhile, they've got a heli flying over and guys infiltrating the building my friends are in. I immediatly take the two guys out from the tower and move to a different position. One of my friends was shot in the building and the other took the enemy out. We eventually clear out the building and the heli flew away. I hope this helped. You really need to gett this game its worth well over how much they price it at. I also wanted to tell everyone that this game isnt about the gameplay. It's about the experiences you have in the game. 11/10 Would reck a squeker again
OhFersure;-;This game is okay, said no one ever. This game is boring, said no one ever. This game is too much like call of duty, said no one ever. The mods in this game are awful, said no one ever. This game is awesome, said everyone ever.
outlander;-;Just purchased Arma3 on the 50% of sale. I have to say I am a huge Arma2 fan, but I was blown sky high when I started playing Arma3. The reviews somehow just did not do it justice for a big Arma2 fan. I actually did not know if it was that much different form Arma2. I was so wrong. Arma3 is better in every way so far. Weapons, graphics, sound, player interaction, UI menus, etc. etc. I have only had it for one day now, and it is by far my best PC purchase in a long time. Also, I have bought into all of the survival games on EA to which even though I am happy to support the games i chose to support, none of them have become fun to play for me. I like DayZ Mod and let me tell you Breaking Point for Arma3 is the answer! You get a zombie game plus all those vehicles and weapons! The Epoch servers are also so much fun in Arma3, vehicles everywhere on some of them, planes, helis, tanks...etc. So much fun. Good Job Bohemia Interactive and Good Job to all the modders out there!
tutmeister;-;ArmA 3 does a good job at improving many aspects that were lacking in their previous versions. Most notably, in my opinion, is the ability to dive underwater without dying. Helicopter flight dynamics seem to have improved, although they are still not realistic. I would like to see vortex ring state (now implemented with Helo DLC, thanks!), limited power during hot/heavy/high altitude operations, and a wider ability to slingload realistic loads (partially implemented in Helo DLC, thanks BI!) into battle.
chaz69;-;If you're looking to implement tactics, this is the game by far. I highly reccomend this game to anyone wanting to escape the mundane FPS genre.
Have 1 Eye Open;-;Arma 3 is awesome! Especially BattleRoyale, if you dont have this game you need it!
Permedix;-;I recommend this game to everyone that is searching for realism and authentic experience!
Sora Toriyama;-;This game is fun in it's ways being it is a new ARMA from the series which sold so much on ARMA 2 R.I.P but anyway. The game will keep you entertained if you are new to the game series, if you are a returning vet from it then you know what to expect. My first impression was this would be a whole new game not the old one mixed with new mechanics. Such as new graphics, new units, new nations, and a fun moderator twist you can create units basicly be god, but the game nation to play that (only in multiplayer and editor) Zeus. Yes i said it Zeus, the game makes it funner. Why? I will tell you why. In editor i used to have to create units and when they were dead i would have to abort and restart, where as in Zeus you can create new units on a dime such as if a tank of mine died in an unfair way i could enter Zeus and put another. WARNINGS ABOUT THE GAME The game for me is very buggy, at some times crashes in random fights, ones even only having about a squad and it does it. The controls are also hard to get used to, it took me a good 2 hours to get used to the feel from the switch it does from ARMA 2 The Story you start out in a island run by NATO and the AAF (new indipendent nation) mainly AAF, and you have basicly a coup de etet or easier versions goverment overthrow, where the AAF are crazy and you have to survive and link with other units on the island (all major bases on it were destroyed) you start as a young (so i think anyway) Sgt. named Kerry he goes through losing his commander well, his squad leader anyway. that is the basics i am not going to spoil the rest ;) The main Conculsion I love the game but it needs work, i know it has been out only a few months but it needs major work. In my opinion i would wait until it is on deal or it lowers price a few $ it is not worth $60 but YES i would recommend it.
CPL C. Burn[10thMD];-;ARMA 3 IS A GREAT GAME BUT NEED SOME FIX BUGS IN THE GAME
Mothersheep;-;Authentic.
Death By Snu Snu;-;love this game!
Black Elsa;-;I ran into a rock and broke my legs. I fought battle without pants on. I drove a car at over 250 Km/h down a hill, hit a rock, and then flew over 100 Meters into the air. If you like glitches, times where you question your existence, and you also like to see what it feels like to sprint into a full-scale war without pants, then this is the game for you. There's also realism too... Arma 3 9.5/10
TheGamingJaker;-;best army game ever 10/10 trust me must buy!
proco;-;Want a game you can play for years and have no limits to what can be done with this game? 275 hrs and counting and I still find new stuff to do all the time. Only cons are as always with arma, optimization blows. But quite honestly, I probably would've paid $200 if that's what they charged, it's that good.
Noruas;-;i've pondered purchasing this game many times over the last year. i've never played an arma title. i REGRET not purchasing it the first time it crossed my mind.
Obama Robot Bin Hitler XX;-;This game....Ooooh this game...Is amazing. It's a first/third person realistic tactical shooter. If you are a person who plays Call Of Duty and think you can run into a room witha sniper rifle and "G37 Th053 SW33T YY360QuIcKS20p3S 1adDerSTA1ls", then this game is really not for you. The campain is "meh" but the multiplayer is where the fun comes in, you have Altis life a sort of rpg gamemode, Patrol Ops (My favorite) where you look for enemy encampments or chemicals and deal with them, teamdeathmatch, and tons of others. If you have played previous ArmA games you will know that the controls are a bit...odd...Well, in ArmA 3 they are still kinda odd, but they are better. There is an entirely new mechanic in 3 called the "stance system." Basically, if you are standing you have four different poses that can help with almost each and every situation, same goes for the four crouching, and four prone. There is a decent range of weapons and atachments and no limit to clothing options. The one big, and noticable problem with Arma...is it's optimization...The game doesn't run well on some systems for seemingly no reason.
The Spicy Chicken Quesarito;-;Went on the breaking point mod, (Dayz) and I was instantly hunted down by 6 men in a chopper. I ran to the first house I saw picked up an axe and axed the first man to come in. I then proceeded to grab his gun off him but was shot in the head. They then proceeded to say the only reason this is happening is because I had a brown player model. 10/10 Would brown player model again.
HP Zalak;-;This game needs a good pc but its worth getting one for it. Being a sandbox moddable game its less of a game and a engine for tons of games. Once you mod it has every option to play from super realistic (as much as a game could offer) to Halo type games.
ArcticAnubis;-;Awesome!!!! Enough said...
Mark;-;Wow.. This game. This game is like marmite, and personally I love it. When I play this game I can play it for months and months. I can also leave it for months and months and then happily return to it. The sheer amount of things you can do is incredible and the amount of user made content is amazing.
Ununiqie;-;'Played the beta not the full game' Badly optimized and bad engine like Dayz but its really fun.
Luke;-;excellent game, 10/10- excellent graphics and gameplay if you get this you must try altis life and king of the hill they are both excellent gamemodes and you get alot of action from them, Would recommend this game to anyone
Ced [IG:Stphane];-;Amazing. Best game I ever saw! It's a must in the video games world!
=GonTar=;-;So HardCore my pc melts down after playing it for a couple of minutes... So Cool that everytime you watch the trailer it gives a chill effect... So tatcital it can be considered a strategy game... So wanted that my friends tryed to stole my pc to play it... So innovative and accurate game mechanics that CoD looks like kids playground... -Its =ARMA 3= Gentleman, one of the best and most Realistic MIlitary Simulator title out there. I wish my pc could handle its awesomeness to play it...
GBM;-;Noice game
Zodiac;-;While some may disagree, this game I find it a whole lot better, the physics of the bodys and the whole interface is quite realistic as to were in Arma 2 they all had the "all hail" death animation, and while being a little glitchy'. The game is super optimized, so if you run Arma 2 on medium or high, expect to run this on ultra with very similar preformance (disable some of the Anti-filtering). This I would give a 9/10 its a GREAT game and will be sure to waste some hours of my life in this game, all in all BUY...IT...Just look at the graphics and tell me this game dosent look SEXXAYYY!
Pablo Perez;-;Really Good Game. REALLY recommend playing Role-playing mods, They are SO MUCH fun.
Chewieeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeeee;-;If you plan to have any free time after buying Arma 3, forget it, way too addictive. Brilliant Game. Many hours spent so far, many more to come....Highly recommend this game 11/10
PlayerPlaysHD;-;Its a nice game specialy when they did arma 3 dayz mod prob lots of players should join
twitch.tv/leromaniandude;-;in 2 hours we bougth a car a boat managed to die 50 times drive my car into the sea then turn into a knagroo (somehow i managed to fly away with my char jumping like a kangoroo! That's what my friend told me after we played this game (altis mode)
hurjak;-;Abosolute must! This game is so fun in so many ways! You should definitely try it!
AddMeFor Boosting;-;Arma 3 has a lot of potential and im hoping it will be devoloped into a beautiful game just like arma 2 is/was. I havent played all the mods /yet/ but King of the hill and battleroyale is looking verry promising. Really do like what they have done and love the feeling that u get when u are shooting and getting shot by somone, i mean like the sound is just <3 <3 <3 ... 8/10
[]Jack--;-;its gay you idiot why make a game which is gay
Luke Bailey123;-;This is the best game I've every play for 20 years. ARMA 3 10/10 ;)
Juicy;-;it is the best game i have ever played and i am glad to have it.
Epicc;-;Really fun to play with friends Epoch and overpoch are fun waseland aswell if you are thinking of buying make sure you have friends to play with
Slinzer;-;'Twas good to play a very nice FPS game with good mechanics, graphics, sound and design. Always adored the ArmA series for its fair realism. Only thing I have against this game is the fact that the enemy AI has pinpoint accuracy and includes a bullet sponge feature, while your squadmates have absolutely no accuracy compared to the enemy and they seem to die as fast as the player. Then again it might just be a quirk that I haven't caught up on. Great piece!
MatthawK;-;dis game is duh best  game ive ever played. i got butt  multiple times duing my play
ZombieUnit;-;a must have game
Barragwanus;-;Arma 3 is an improvement over the previous generations, but the game still suffers from a clunky interface and lackluster AI. For an Arma fan like myself, though, it is the best Arma so far.
Awarw90;-;wud reccommend 10/10 wud sex this game
SlashMan;-;BEST GAME EVER..... HELICOPTERS CAR ATV A VAST RANGE OF WEAPONRY
callofdutymaster;-;its lots of money for shure but graphics are up to date and sound so yeah i recommend :D
rafiekarto;-;first downloaded it, then i thought after 1500 hours with friends LAN and in the editor: this is a great game i should buy it. BEST DECISION EVER!
Jack| TotalRevolutionGaming.com;-;Amazing game, Amazing graphics, Amazing Price I am totaly recommending this game!
Azor Ahai;-;LOVE HOW IT CRASHES EVERY 5 MINUTES. WANT $60 BACK
Shifty18402;-;Game is amazing! Definetely recommend it to anyone into shooter games although there is a lot of other cool things to do in the game, along with all the fun multiplayer lobbies. Makes this game a ton of fun! Rated 10/10.
"Cadence" Decibel;-;Great game, love the cover system, love the editor and Zeus. Only problem: crappy servers (can't find ones with people in my area). Would recommend, as I do already.
nEXaus;-;ARMA 3 is one of the best simulators EVER. Better than GTA and Minecraft. The game has amazing textures and is extremly good. Favourtie gamemode is Invade and Annex
DJ Khaled;-;Brilliant military simulator, much better buy than other 'similar' FPS games. Both campaign and multiplayer are diverse and immersive! F*** the AAF also...
SmilingBumcheek;-;Could be 3 million times better but its still fun with a couple of mates.
-DL-;-;I just love this game!
BlazeIt;-;Great game, you should really consider getting it. :)
EEKaMOUSE;-;Make Arma not War!
SkilpadS;-;Yes with over 20 guns and 12 vehicles I r8 8/8
Kansiov;-;Despite it's flaws, the infantry combat is two steps up above ArmA 2, adding much needed fluidity to once an extremely clunky interface. That coupled with the inclusion of Play withSix granting users an easy way to access the hundreds of user-generated content (a requirement), makes ArmA 3 worth getting at full price.
AdmiralJohnsten;-;Absolutely great game, you can do pretty much anything.
RedOnyx;-;Good game, Good game, you know what a mother ing good game. 9/10 for gameplay 0/10 for people with bad comps cause you can't run this  trust me. Join a group and do events lots o fun. Yeah. Swag?
Dunkstein;-;Great gameplay, fantastic graphics, and amazing player made missions lead to hours of gameplay even without the full single player campaign.
AceTheGreat;-;Hard, and glitchy. Get the hand of it and you'll have fun. Remember, most Arma games aren't complete until about 2 years after release.
batSHITenergyDRINK;-;Amazingly beautiful graphics, and Breaking Point is one of the best game mods I've played. I really enjoy the King Of The Hill game-play, in Arma 3, too. The only downside is you need a very rad computer, mainly CPU, to play this without horrible lag. I recently upgraded to a 4th gen i5 and a GTX 750ti which has greatly improved the playability of this game.
Major Shake;-;Anti-Tank simulator. Fences are the main weakness to every vehicle in the game. Remember this. Also trying to jump over a trash can will instantly kill you. 10/10
Skymea;-;Very nice, fixed what ARMA 2 had problems with. Still has some small problems. -Physics -FPS -Lag But really? Its Arma, get over it.
TheAllGameGamer;-;This is an AMAZING Game with many game modes, a bit of d-sync but its amazing, i love the multiplayer and so many mods, import mods, to mods the compleastly change the game and need ARMA 3 as a button, Altis Life ARMA 3 Is a fun multiplayer mission, you can join the Altis Police Department (APD) oor join the Rebelion ! and if you are a fan of mods, ARMA 3 Life will be the mod for you (still work in progress for 2014) And well, the missions and the: Helping You Out Mission thats just the cherry on the cake for this game, i recomend you buy it whiel its in a sale, or just buy it anyway, thanks for reading, Enjoy The Game
FschJg. AntiAlligat3r;-;This Game is Truly Amazing. Definatly worth the money. The Campain is dinamic allowing you to go on patrols or scouts after every mission and the story line is amazing , not gonna give too much away but you are Cpl. Kerry from Bravo Squad stationed on the island of Stratis staying behind to make sure all NATO elements evacuate the island , unfortunaly things go south and they get attacked by *** forces (Independant) and leaving Kerry alown with his Sgt, they get saved by a British squad who moved onto the island and fight to recontrol the island, and i am not saying anything futher exept for that the Editor has been redone , looks alot more fancy and the customiseation options in the game are well done . ZEUS is the best thing i have seen in ARMA 3 and i truly love to use it . Now if you still reading you havent bought this one hell of a good game
Resident Emil;-;The long awaited follow up to Arma II. A lot of stuff has been improved upon; graphics, inventory, stances, physics, AI and more. Still we need to fight the somewhat cumbersome interface and sometimes strange performance dips. But for fans of military simulators, this is an obvious buy and you will have a lot of fun in this amazing sandbox.
Captainskepy;-;This game is a lot of fun, with a great set of multiplayer game modes.
androkk;-;I wish I had someone who knew how to drive a car.
Creeperfox99;-;One of the best games I have ever p[ayed I love this game
The Magic Ruskey;-;While i would reccomand this game... I am dissapointed in bohemia interactive for making the game more arcady then the previus ARMA 2 Game. While the controlls ware refined and improved. the graphial fadality is amazing. The game lacks in content. And optimization. A major issue being the fact that if the server host is experiancing 8 FPS. So will you. no matter how many nividia TITANS you rig together. And how many I7's you overclock to . While ArmA 3 is alot more complex. engaging. And immersive then olther tittles out there. Such As Carl On duty Black cops. And Battlefield. It is indeed a thinking mans game. Where map reading. Team co ordination. And communication are key. It does not acheve the level of immersion and simulation that ArmA 2 With mods such as ACE and ACRE acheive. I defenitly reccomand the game to newcommers to the arma series. But ArmA veterans may be dissapointed. To newcommers. ArmA arma allways had quite alot to take in. To learn. to unlearn things you are used to doing in first person shooters. It requires them to learn to use their compass to alert friendlies of contact. How to operate as a team. And even how to operate their weapon system in a proficent manner. Accounting for distance and target movement. But somethings will be new even to arma vets. Such things as the Stance Adjust system, And the awful arcady grenade throw. bound to G. To any arma 2 Vet trying to fiddle with his gear. Thats bad news.
The act of glory;-;THIS is an AWESOME game to play. The developer team is really caring about the community. The workshop and map editor helps you to do a LOT of things that no other games can. The hardward requirement is pretty high and you will not get the best experience if you can only run on low or medium. PLUS, if you one of those people who play COD or battlefield a lot, you may need a few hours to L2P this game. ARMA 3 is seriously an simulation game, any gun can pretty much 2 shot or 1 shot you at any distance(and the AI is pretty good at aiming). Stay in cover, move quick and you will enjoy this war on the island.
Technocolor;-;Let me start off by saying this game is great and the workshop makes it 20x better. But in order to give a good review I must give both sides of the story. This game is very complex and can be intimedating for the noobie, but one of the greatest parts about this games loyal comunity is that no matter how stupid a siduation might be, they will still role play it out. That is partially why this series seems so realistic, the community is great. Of coarse there are always those people who would rather complain about how bad someone is instead of helping them to become better. But most people are willing to help with anything you might need. The next thing is to learn the controls. It will make your life so much easier, there may seem to be many controls, but you only use a few of them unless you are a commander. Also this game is beautiful and usually runs desently well on a mid range pc. Now I must give the downsides. The campaign is ok but it is not arma 2 quality. That is the main theme here is that it is not arma2. I dont know why but this game is missing something that both arma2 and arma cwa nailed. It seems more directed and controlled that previous installments of the series. One will need a mid range ish pc to run this game. All in all this is a great game with a wonderful community and it has endless mods from the workshop so if you are debating weather to get the game or not, let me make the decisioin for you. Get the game.
Avz91;-;The Best war simulator I ever played! Worth to buy.
Sgt_bacon_1;-;its a good game :)
Professer Mystic;-;this game is a ultimate military simulater
Puffnpass92;-;i have never had a game i played more than this one. this game has so many mods and game modes
Mega Mike;-;The Graphics was actually Good.
Tea_Sold;-;best dance simulator in history
Vhkyl;-;Jog endlessly accross vast landscapes and get killed by people you never saw. Reminds me of all the things that sucked in the real Army. The Community also emulates all the retardation that surrounds the operation of Armed Forces. If you want tedious hours of boredom, unforgiving gameplay, a friend circle of maniacs and so forth, then yes, please do purchase this game. Great game, I love it. A must have.
D.B. Cooper;-;Arma 3 teamwork and the AMAZING spotlight Had a blast last night working together with my squad and never knew how deadly the spotlights on heli's could be... During the first round of king of the hill, there was only about 30 players total, so I took to my beloved Hellcat chopper to help spot the enemy for my squad. Another teamate flew a Pawnee with rockets and guns and as I found targets hiding in Kavela I would call out thier location and within 15 secs or less our Pawnee would come in and lay waste to the enemy. We dominated everyone that round. It was daylight so spotting was pretty easy and if the Pawnee couldnt get to them, our ground forces would move into the area to flush them out. The entire team was working together calling out targets waiting for the incoming rocket barrage!! The next match was even better. Same map but night time with almost no visibility on the ground...this is where it got really fun. I switched on my giant spotlight finding and hovering over targets waiting for the Pawnee to swoop in and take em out. We must have gotten 30+ kills this way. I felt like the police going after criminals spotlighting enemies as they ran from building to building, cover to cover trying to hide form my spotlight. After a while they figured out they needed to hide from that annoying heli pilot shining a giant light in thier faces. So many times I would find an enemy on rooftops trying to hide where I would come in and light the whole building up. They were getting soooo mad, would either have to run and hide or would try to shoot my light out so they werent so exposed, which of course never worked out in thier favor. Many times I would follow with my light the enemy from building to building, across the city tracking them until our forces could kill or flush them out. In 20 years of gaming this has to be one of the best gaming experiences in my life. The pawnee pilot even mentioned he felt bad for killing them after I would spot them. The enemy knew if that light found them they were done for. Its funny something as simple as a light could be so fun and deadly...10/10 for Amra 3!!!!!!! Here's a quick video on how to get to the AO faster than your opponent gaining an advantage during the entire match. View it on Youtube in your regular browser for HD. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=whZPLF5wBmU Another in game dropping guys off https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=fees1RcjsBY
The Winter Wolf;-;Gourgous game, 10/10 would eat cupcakes with
TheEvanCat;-;Arma 3 is perplexing, actually. On the surface, I find I tend to sit around and do a whole lot of nothing when playing. Standing around and driving from point A to point B is the norm. However, there is a certain quality that makes it terrifically addictive. I don't know what it is, but I enjoy the game thoroughly. There are plenty of exciting moments and when you're done with a match (that often takes hours to play) you're filled with a sense of accomplishment. I don't even need to mention the community around doing mods and such. It adds to the game immensely. 10/10 would play again.
BillyTheKid;-;Bought some LSD in Altis Life, ran from the cops when they noticed Purple smoke coming from my Truck. And hired a getaway helicopter only to find out I didnt have the Helicopter DLC. I got arrested and went to jail for 1:10:00 minutes. The guy in the Helicopter tried to break me out of jail. I only then realized that u cant get in copilot if u dont have DLC. I am not a wanted fugitive and have 3 bounties of 10million on me. 100/10
TheOtherTaylor;-;So you're laying behind a rock listening to bullets crack by and looking out a few feet to your side at the body of your buddy wondering if he's just passed out or if he's been killed like the rest of your squad was. Suddenly all you can hear is the roar of the A-164 cannon as it screams overhead and the sky goes red with the fire from explosions. You peek out at the burning remains of the enemy forces and breathe a sigh of relief for the first time in the last hour. Those moments are why you play Arma.
Dio;-;Extremely fun and a bit of an adrenaline rush at times if you are playing wasteland or KOTH, recommend playing with a crew and get some comms up for the ultimate experience! I plan to spend more time pew pewing baddies and taking their loot! Quite and amazing amount of detail in the game, sometimes im amazed at the littlest things I see in game.
SoloSynth1;-;This is not you usual run and gun shooter. You've been warned. Be expected to die and walk. A lot.
mini_samurai;-;This game is a whole new meaning of Awesome. The succesor of the very fun Arma 2, Arma 3 is beautiful and lively yet at the same time can become a giant battlefield of fun and thats why i love this game. If this hasn't convinced you to get this amazing game, well you're missing out.
sQ;-;Most realistic game ever.
XenoPuff;-;yea This is amazing if you like blowing  up flying  driving  killing
Minute;-;Very entertaining but has some problems such as some of the worst optimization and lack of content that they try to sell to us in dlc but is overall a good game
HDWizzard;-;This my first ever game review so, I'll try my best. Basically, what you get with ARMA is open-world warfare. The size of the maps and locations in ARMA bring it to life more than a simple Call Of Duty Map. The graphics are beautiful and show off the true extent of PC Gaming, Simple things such as the movement of smoke whilst flying through it with a helicopter or jet pay off big time. There is a huge extent of weapons and vehicles to choose from to explore the vast world. Multiplayer is fantastic with there being many "Altis-Life" servers out there such as EUGL or Darkside Gaming. These online servers give you the oppurtunity to make it big as a drug smuggler or serve Altis in the Police Forces and work your way to higher positons. My only let downs with the game is the driving/flying/boating physics and controls. It definately isn't the best game when it comes to vehicles with the steering feeling delayed and sloppy and the damage can be sometimes, ridiculous. There was a time where I drove a vehilce into a tree at around 10 km/h and it blew up. Then another where I crashed a heli out of the sky and everything was fine besides the rotors. So to sum up the game, if you are looking for an open-world warfare with a great multiplayer community you should definately give it a go, Even though I have never played this as a single-player game it still gets an Easy 8/10 from me.\\ -HDWizzard
Mothersheep;-;Authentic.
Death By Snu Snu;-;love this game!
Black Elsa;-;I ran into a rock and broke my legs. I fought battle without pants on. I drove a car at over 250 Km/h down a hill, hit a rock, and then flew over 100 Meters into the air. If you like glitches, times where you question your existence, and you also like to see what it feels like to sprint into a full-scale war without pants, then this is the game for you. There's also realism too... Arma 3 9.5/10
TheGamingJaker;-;best army game ever 10/10 trust me must buy!
proco;-;Want a game you can play for years and have no limits to what can be done with this game? 275 hrs and counting and I still find new stuff to do all the time. Only cons are as always with arma, optimization blows. But quite honestly, I probably would've paid $200 if that's what they charged, it's that good.
Bigger Boot;-;Ill write a review later I'm busy playing Arma 3!
The Brad;-;Such a great game! I'm thoroughly enjoying the campaign at the moment but I love the different multiplayer scenarios and stuff, 10/10!
SiknessMints;-;So far i have put hundreds of hours into Arma 3, I spent most of it on a game mode called Altis life which i am sure most of you have heard of, It is incredibly entertaining but that is not all that comes with Arma 3. I recommend the campaign for its interesting and fun story alongside some awesome gameplay you wont see outside of the campaign, there is also wasteland you can try as it offers constant pvp while aiming for interesting objectives, and i also recommend battle royale that you can download from Play with six. Over all this game is absolutely worth the money, I personally spent 20 on this game when it was on sale and I do recommend purchasing it for around that price, as 35 is a bit much and if you got to sites like  you will get it for a nice price, So yes please do yourself the favor of purchasing the game as it will bring so much more to your gaming experiences.
Nukem;-;Excellent graphics and fantastic team play. If you want a game that is realistic and fast paced then this is the one for you. There are also chances to go solo in several multiplayer servers if thats your style!
chiefchaz;-;I THINK IT IS A EPIC GAME
varnova;-;If you love military simulators or just plain out love the military this game is by far the best out of any other game to play. I have played Arma 2 and OA and ever since Arma 3 came out I have not touched arma 2 or OA. This game has a learning curve but ask people in multiplayer or play the campaign for help. Overall 10/10.
Juandiaglo Black Dood;-;Awesome game, major improvements, especially the voice acting because in ArmA 2, it was horrible to listen to. Although there is plenty of random crashes, this is afterall alpha so it has time to be improved, but just from the alpha I've had a great time.
Freshscene;-;Always a fan of the arma series and i love to support their games and continue to be a supporter for a long time. Keep up the good work! <3
Spectre15Q;-;Having played ArmA 2 for almost two years before ArmA 3 came out, I had high expectations for ArmA 3. Now, Before I get into specifics about the game, I have to say ArmA 3 is one of the best games you can get without having to buy any DLC to enjoy a full experience. ArmA 3 is an amazing first person shooter that involves a bit of strategy to win. Whether it means inserting into an enemy camp via SDV or hiking it across altis just to take an enemy helicopter for a spin, You have to come up with a plan to have a successful mission. Now, ArmA 3 isn't just about objectives and killing virtual entities. ArmA is about a massive multiplayer community made up of players, Mod Makers, Scripters, Cinematics Creators, and many more. If you think vanilla has an extremely large amount of content, Wait til you get a look at all of the mods and missions created by just the player base. Pros Extremely fun and adrenaline pumping gameplay Crazy amounts of mods available Extremely large and diverse player base Very well made models and objects High end graphics Not very many hackers Large amount of servers to choose from Lots of updates Cons Physics can sometimes be a bummer when attempting unusual missions or actions Can be hard to run for some people Can be a little hard to learn how to play Again, Physics Overall, I give ArmA 3 a 10/10. This game has exceeded my expectations. I can replay this game everyday for a week and still not want to put it down. If you are looking for a first person shooter that involves a crazy amount of strategy and content, This is the game for you.
molanlabe;-;Even better with the steam workshop addons. Highly reccommend.
Field Marshal Erwin Rommel;-;Arma 3, Where to start? -Amazing Modding community -Huge Multiplayer (Milsim Communities eg ShackTac) -In-game Mission Maker -ZEUS! -Advaned Flight model (New to the game) -Firing from vehicles (New to the game) -Nice Campaign -2 Maps (But the modding community have more) -Tactial game, Long-range firefights -Really Realistic, Not like COD or Battlefield! It has really Unique gameplay. Good Game 10/10
biohazard3420;-;this is an amazing game as a fps as well as enabling the player a truely immersive realism experiance the multiplayer experiance of the game is truely second to none with community members contributing maps and missions to the steam workshop as well as community modders hard at work the potential for this game is quite limitless
=7CAV=SPC.Greene.G;-;If you have to read a review of Arma 3 to decide whether or not to jump in, buy the game.... Seriously.. You've played shooters before I'm sure, and you've thought to yourself "I wish you could do _______" Enter Arma 3, where doing _________ is what you do.. Whatever you can imagine, you can do... If it doesn't come out of the box, someone has probably made it. Mods, team play, and strategy is what it's all about.. You're not usually playing AGAINST other players... Instead you play WITH other players, against some of the most realistic AI I have ever seen.. All Arma games to date have been amazing, but ARMA 3 takes a leap, simplifying the controls, while providing more and exciting options for the seasoned player.. It is truly the culmination of all we've wanted in a decade of ARMA... Buy it.. You'll love it.. There are too many features to list here, but let's just say, you'll get in, and you'll never get out...
phoon;-;I love this game but i think alot of people underrate it.
Cheek;-;Game is worth $60
Kelpie;-;I love this game... Its the best game has everything you want in a game and is just so much fun to play with your friends.
ZCA_Scarface;-;This Game is for dedicated gamer for first person and 3ed person shooters. its a highly realistic and srategic game. it simulates real army combat and physics. if you just give this game a chance like i did you will fall in love.
Divine.USMC117;-;I have put about 500 hours into this game. that speaks for itself in so many ways.
[OW] MrXanadu;-;I hardly play Multiplayer, in any game, dunno why I just don't....ARMA 3 is one of the three games I player multiplayer in. Here's a story that As part of a PMC team I deployed into a contested area to eliminate an HVT. Our chopper got shot up EXTREMELY bad, to the point where one pilot and both gunners were KIA and the remaining pilot was struggling to get it on the ground. We proceeded on foot and got savagely attacked, only after twenty minutes of trying to not die did a jet arrive and rake the area with bombs. Once the area was cleared we verified the HVT and stole a luxury car to escape. Just...insane. The realism of ARMA 3 coupled with the fact that I was fighting alongside guys halfway across the world who were just as invested into the mission as I was made our plight that much more intense. As a veteran of the ARMA series I can attest to the progress Bohemia has made in ARMA 3. Almost (ALMOST) everything I griped about in previous games were fixed...including some that actually made me stop playing for a while. I was a little  at the lack of units at first, but then I remembered the crap-ton of user-made addons avalible in the Workshop and on Armaholic. I now have units from the cold war up to the Vanilla units of the future. I can play any war that I want and I can't think of any other game that can do that. The island of Altis is HUGE, Stratis is pretty big but meh...it's a fruit fly compared to the Budgie of Altis (look up the difference, it's a suitable comparison...don't you judge me). There's a lot of space to destroy, with a variety of different areas allowing for different combat. You can do anything from marching across a shallow river to an intense firefight in a city. The variety of fighting is outstanding. Being able to fight as a soldier, then go to a tank commander, then a gunship pilot, and a plane pilot, then to a special operator....it's outstanding. I've played in user-made campaigns where you literally cover every aspect of the war. To sum it up, it's like starring in a dozen war movies on your own. If you've got patience and a desire to learn you can take a spin at the mission editor. It has a STEEEEEP learning curve, it'll require some serious investment to get good at. I've been playing these games for a while now and I STILL haven't mastered the editor (I'm good but I can't do some of the insane stuff others have). This allows for almost unlimited replayability, once you're done with the vanilla campaign and whatever custom ones you downloaded, you can simply hop into the editor and make your own! Now time for the gripes There's some aspects of the game that are...difficult to cusp, mostly in the editor. I feel like the game is actually all that finished yet, I won't go into detail about this but there's features that don't seem all quite there yet. I also don't appreciate minor DLC's being thrown out there with only a bit of content. I liked it better when Bohemia released a DLC with an entire new army and several new maps, like Operation Arrowhead (which was actually stand-alone), British Armed Forces, PMC, and Army of the Czech Republic. I haven't sunk any money into them because I'm holding out for "ARMA 3 Pan-Asian War" or "ARMA 3 World War III"...or, something of that strain....something with new armies, maps, and weapons instead of just a few new features. (To specify, I'm not saying that the DLC's are bad but I'm not willing to pay for them until something monumental comes out). All in all this is an outstanding game without peer (say all you want about CoD and Battlefield, I love both franchises and have sunk many hours into their various incarnations, but they don't hold a candle to the glory of Armed Assault). If you're a serious gamer, this is your game. Military fan? This is your game. Modding fan? This is your game. Micro-transactions to restock energy and make moves? SCREW OFF AND GO BACK TO YOUR PHONE. You're not welcome here and we'd prefer if you kept your micro-transaction covered fingers out of our bowl of Steam. Score, for those of you who like numbers and slashes (they get my motor running, something about it just really gets me riled up) 9/10 PS For those of you who had ARMA 2 there's a lot of ported content on the internet. I personally have the vanilla maps from ARMA 2 and its expansion packs. It's pretty damn cool going back to Takistan and Chernarus with the updated engine!
Jaeger(ReCalled);-;I got DayZ SA... Wasted over 500 hours! Got ARMA3... Drank tea with God for 50 hours!
Ladible;-;I Love this game.
Uber D.O.G.;-;It is really a great ecperience with friends and foes It gets my vote that is for sure
Happy Philiper;-;Thaught me how to use a grid properly, failled miserably due to lack of understanding of geometry. Education has failed me on geometry.
Steve (   );-;Found a tank Killed a naked guy Made millions :D
Johari bin Zulkifli;-;I love this game and have played with it for almost a year, i do recommend for anyone who is into tactical and teamwork based fps
Sid;-;Probably one of the best FPS, military simulator, with endless user add-on and mods I have ever played in my life. It's to the point this game is the only one I still play. It's far from Call of Duty and sort of reminds me of the old Battlefield games but better. I give it a 10/10 not for the game only but the the continuous community and their mods.
tempast2003;-;I can't complain, this game delivers on what I was exspecting. I have all other games in the Arma series aside from a small few of the Arma 2 expansions. I love the ballistics, you get a more realistic feel for how a real firearm operates. There is much more to take into account than your simple fps. The series is great and worth a try, the controls can be intimidating but they are managable if you invest some time in training and getting a feel for it. This is a simulator so things are gonna be alot tougher than your typical war game. The AI friendly AI could use some more fine tuning and tweaking, I have had to put a few bullets into a couple insubordinate AI team mates for laying fire on targets a 1000 meters away thus helping bring more aid and attention to the base we were originally assaulting. The game is not without its bugs, and it is also a heavy on your processor much like Arma 2 was but indeed it is definatly a step up in graphics. It could use a larger armory, but there is a great mod cummunity that works on things like that to help the process along. Can't wait to get my Saitek x55 Rhino pro H.O.T.A.S. to be able to enjoy the helicopters alot more.
Arcenist;-;I absolutely love this game mainly for the mods to it. I really enjoy playing rounds of Battle Royale. It is even better with a few teammates. It can get pretty intense at times. I do like their Breaking Point mod. It can get pretty intense. 10/10 gameplay experience
Slatts2;-;The most dangerous things in Arma 3 are as follows. -Stairs -AI -Rocks -Teammates -The car you are driving -The Enemy
ToySoldier;-;My first game on A3 brought me the most horrific experience I've ever had in any game, ever. We're on our way to the objective, a small dump east of a town occupied by enemy forces. I'm leading a team of 4 men. We come to a crossroad and I sprint across, telling my men to hold back. I cross a few more times, trying to get a response from any snipers. Nothing. I run, my SAW gunner runs, my medic runs. But I kept my Marksman on the other side to make sure we'd make it across. Anybody seen Full Metal Jacket all the way through? Remember the sniper scene? The marksman takes a round in the leg as we're running and goes down. He then takes two more in the chest. The kid who was playing had some mad acting skills, he played it up to 11 here. He screams as he's being shot. Crawling, drenched in his own blood. "SARGE? YOU AIN'T LEAVING ME OUT HERE LIKE THIS, RIGHT? I-I WANNA GO WITH YOU GUYS! C'MON SARGE, H-HELP ME! C'MON! PLEASE DON'T LEAVE ME!" he died after that. I cried and he respawned. I would recommend getting :)
Spanking The Monkey;-;Drove an Atv while laying down, only super elite combat units can do this. 10/10 its like skyrim but with guns. - ign
-CML-ChrisKyle;-;dont hesistate buy it!
Tensta;-;One of my all time favorites. Game has come a long way from Operation Flashpoint and it doesn't disappoint.
Joe xX_DODOKILLER_Xx;-;best game. cause theres no other words to describe this.
Knight Artorias;-;Arma 3 is a very diverse game with many different games modes and mods. Some of the popular gamemodes are King of the Hill, Battleroyale, and Wasteland. There are also many co-operative mission you can do with people if you choose to do so. You can instlal different mods like guns, vehicles, missions and other things. Then theres Breaking Point a mod that involves zombies (be warned it is a very big download like 20+ GB) it can be hard to survive people and most people will try to kill you so be warned. Last note is there is going to be a Arma 3 Epoch Namalsk map coming.
Xetorak;-;This game is one of the rare game that has always something new, the community is big and has a lot of modders. You will always find something to do, but I warn you it doesn't run smoothly often and for me this is the only problem. I hope you will consider buying it if you are looking to play for tones of hours and fun! See you on Arma!
Mr.StealYoHndin;-;This Game is a fun open world game if you have money and you like military play this GAME
ben2009ben;-;I need help i got a big lg tv and on arma the fps gose down i was thinking if i get a pc screen would that help the fps im playing on a lg big tv but every time i look up at the sky the fps gose up to 50 i get 30 fps on very high so what u think if i get a pc screen would that help the fps ????
Pimmie24;-;Great game! I always loved the Arma Series it begon with OFP First Arma and the graphic's of this game are stunning! but i don't like the future vehicles ect but its awsome with mods :D
^1Ole^7Ho^4och;-;this gotta be one of the best games i have ever seen
Dr.Rimpac;-;It's one of the most accurate action/mil-sim game i've ever played. There is nothing else like this out there. 10/10
Violent Chicken;-;From riding in a go-kart attached to a helicopter to stealing peoples organs for money(not that i do that :P). One of the best games ive ever played!
Savagery;-;Awesome game if you like arma 2 you will love arma 3 despite the amazing graphics it plays pretty well and there is a ton to do. I'd say buy this game but at a risk of you may not be able to run it considering its such a cpu intensive game I hope you enjoy It like I have though Have Fun!
Nativeman;-;very good and fun army simulator. Never get bored.
AWPtimusprime;-;It's really cool, like I really like I played the demo and it's really cool make a update where you can shoot threw a door :)
Skytek;-;SO much fun playing the game along with friends. The Single player has alot of fun working with players to take down your enemy.
SmashYoFace;-;fantastic game love every minute of it.
Laka Reece;-;I personally don't know what to say because writing a really long review is stupid. But i highly recommend this game, by far one of the best games i have played in my lifetime. The great mod support, the variety of gamemodes to choose from. Its just simply great. Buy it
LakuPope;-;It's ARMA II with better graphics, don't get me wrong, that's not a bad thing. + Looks great, the graphics are excellent, sharp textures and nice lighting. + Real Virtuality 4, a better engine. + Mod support, this is what makes the ARMA - series unique. + An okay-ish singleplayer. + Multiplayer, Battle-Royale in particular :) - The futuristic setting doesn't feel futuristic at all, it feels boring. The RHS-mod fixes this, but still... - A little variation in the weapons, all NATO guns look and feel the same, a on of bullpups in the game aswell... - Multiplayer issues, the server's performance affects the player's performance, meaning if the server runs like crap and is filled with script, expect your framerate to tank, a lot. - Clunky animations. - Vehicles are like paper. Not much bad things to say about this game. The mods will keep this interesting for a long time. 9/10
flt;-;Very nice game and very good!
HaxoN Ra's al Ghul;-;Very fun game and good mods !
Bloodwolfe45;-;I really do love this game. It's great when you have a group of people to play with, but not so much for solo play. It lacks a wide range of weaponry, but the mods help fill in the gaps left by BI. Recomended if you have friends toplay with.
FookinDookin;-;There is nothing more to say about Arma III than WOW. Ive been an owner of every single installment in the franchise from the days of the original Operation Flashpoint. The leaps and bouds that the developers have made over the course of the years is astounding. Arma III is absolutely astonshing as an improvement from the rest of the series. Its far less buggy than its predecessor and is updated very regularyl. The multiplayer capabilities are awesome and you can lose many hours with your friends developing all kinds of scenarios. If you were a fan of any of the previous games this one will not dissapoint.
PlagueBearingRodent;-;If you liked ARMA 2, then you will love ARMA 3! Because it is ARMA 2, with better graphics and less content. I bought it, so should you. 10/10, will have to create your own game to enjoy the game you just bought.
Killed Cat:Crank [ATEDIN];-;This game was a bit frustrated after Counter Strike, but after a few hours of playing, I realised, it is not so bad. It is a totally different, and I must learn how to play this game. After a while, I understand, the flow of the game, so now I like it much better. I recommend this game, for those, who like open area combats, and slow gameplay compare to Counter Stike. It is more like real world.
Fire Bear;-;Don't mistake this game for an FPS, some people enter into this game expecting COD ...it's not. ARMA is a full battlefield simulator which it does well at. In ARMA you're not meant to feel invincible, if you don't take cover you'll die, if you don't communicate with your squad you'll die. It has an insane learning curve that will take most people a long time to get used to, but only makes it very satisfying once you finally figure out how to fly or use artillery or...anything. The complicated controls at first can seem annoying but once you're used to them you'll be grateful you can stick your head up just enough to see an enemy out of a window without exposing your whole body. The games mod-ability makes it possible to play an infinite array of game modes making it difficult to get truly boring. While there is a battlefield like mod called king of the hill the size of the maps alone makes the game vastly more complex and that's saying nothing of the array of vehicles that can completely alter the game from just one player knowing how to fly or range a sniper rifle. Unfortunately the ARMA engine is well known for how glitchy it can get, Most of this has been ironed out and the presence of hackers ruining servers has been greatly reduced since early access. At times clipping through a wall or falling through the floor of a building still happens but it's not so common that it ruins things. At the end of the day the game requires being patient and on your toes while communicating what you see with teammates. The different mods and game modes give the game infinite potential but the glitches can create issues sometimes. ARMA 3 is a military sim not "insert FPS here" don't get attached to scores and if you find yourself complaining over global that someone using a plane is "cheap" or a "noob" close the game and reevaluate who you want to be in life.
dvn;-;Really Good game, with a large number of mods! Buy it and play it!
Fiesta;-;Fun and open world game with really good gamemodes and lots of fun, Make sure your Pc can Handle the game before you get it though.
ReptilianBrotherhood;-;Great game, they should add a Runescape mode so I can mine and cook my way to level 420! 99/10 ing  m8
2/75th M.Mantia;-;The most realistic FPS military simulatior around. The ability to mod the game makes for an endless amount of ways to enjoy the game. I have stopped buying other games on Steam sale because I find in the end I don't play them because I spend all my time on Arma!
Conor;-;Great gane, definately recommend this. I like playing RP servers and being a rebel. So much fun. Great Millitary sim as well.
Reinhard Heydrich;-;Arma 3 is an incredulous display of what THE REAL VIRTUALITY 4 Engine is capable of Graphically, and in sheer Scale. There have been massive improvements to the game The sound engine, animations, and even tree generation have been revamped. Also who could forget The implement of PHYSX and DIRECTX 11. Yes the netcode is still being worked on. Yes there are bugs in the gameplay. "Arma" is always going to be "Arma," most of the "problems" we experienced in Arma 2 are almost completely gone or un-noticeable in Arma 3. Bohemia Interactive is heading in an outstanding direction with the Arma series, Let's keep it that way.
Miller;-;So I have played many hours and 'I like it a lot': So have you: Ever wanted to run around while looking at your feet making it look like your sucking your own ? Brake dance? Shoot a guy in the knee and laugh at him because he can't run anymore? Run in to battle in your undies? (Note: theres a bug that doesn't allow you to go naked) Do a back flip in a chopper? Get into a tank LAV and go down the highway at 100km/h then hit a rock and go flying. And a lot more! Who said this was a war simulator you can play this game your whole life and not need to shoot one bullet? Remember Men Play ARMA! BTW: Lots of people won't like this game because they don't know what to play on it. find what modes you like or make your own!
Khris;-;Simply the best Military Simulator/FPS/Strategy game out there.. Stunning visuals, immersive gameplay and endless hours of missions, mods, addons and DLC's Some people may experience problems on older machines with FPS and lag .. but majority of people will experience nothing but gaming pleasure and a game that will continue to expand and develop over the coming years.
XenonFlash;-;Friendly AI took my group command and killed me as I was plotting to kill him! 11/10 HAL 9000 AI, must buy
Lord Horndog;-;10/10 real life simulator in a third world Country.
[REF] Jonny;-;Fun game, I find it better when playing with other people
Sputnik;-;Dont play any multiplayer. I got my A3 key stolen and BattleEye wont help in anyway. However it is a great game and I recommend buying.
Sabre Wolf;-;I don't even have the game yet....No clue why it gave me a reason to review it. Anyway, the game looks ing awesome! Can't wait to buy it...eventually.
Brandon;-;Desync is real, get swallowed by metal fence's and brick walls and rocks resulting in death .......
STALKER|E.T.T.|;-;Best Military Simulator on the Market(It's A MUST buy!!!)
Chaz;-;This game looks gorgeous on Ultra settings and is great for benchmarking, this game requires a hefty rig to run Stable 60fps 1080p which is a big factor on whether you take a risk on purchasing the game if you have a low end system, the multiplayer is very CPU intensive and could lead to unexpected drops of frames even on the most beefy of PC's. This game however is packed with singleplayer content and a large variety of multiplayer modes, the game also features a mission editor so you can make your own missions or download them off the Steam Workshop. With the peformance issues in mind this still is an amzing game and is worth a fullprice purchase if you have friends which can play with you on it. 9/10 Great game but low-medium end rigs or even pc's with a not great CPU be weary.
Pandaman20;-;Great game  myself over the graphics
SGT [508th_PIR] Grey;-;Oh, Arma. You treat me like dirt, yet I still want to be in you. Walking the thin line between love and hate.
tyty;-;Great game !
What;-;Good game. Similar to South Park The Stick of Truth
Rob-UK;-;An incredible creation for those with right tools, I simply cannot reccomend this more to those of you with a good amount of RAM and a half decent graphics card, otherwise you are in for a hard time. I like to look at games on how good they can be, not how good they are on a crappy little e-machine. On ARMA3 I have had some of the best memories in PC gaming thanks to the great community that plays it and the ahrd work Bohemia Interactive has put into this masterpiece. Pros: -Active modding community -Great graphics/attention to detail -Engaging and exciting storyline with memorable characters Cons: -You will need a beast PC to have an enjoyable experience -Pricey DLCs -Some issues with FPS (BI says it is related to the engine and will be optimized) Overall I really do reccomend ARMA3 to the military enthusiast to the casual FPS gamer:) Enjoy.
[UK] Manic;-;One of the best games i have played a must get for anyone with a PC. Also one of the scariest games i have played to, as the campaign made me feel like the character and it felt like i was actually fighting for my life.The multiplayer is one of the best parts of arma 3 as there are plenty of servers which are completely different so the game is never repetitive which means you can spend hours and hours without getting bored. The community are amazing in this game, before when i was a noob pilot a guy taught me how to fly and he also helped me if i had any trouble by taking over the controls
scared;-;gr8 gme, luv gettin sick killz. careful tho, easy 2 die. be safe.
Ace  Rocket League;-;Watch the showcases, (they're old but you should be able to find them) they're about 14 minutes long and show off lots of cool features, including disguises and much more. This game is NOT finished and needs to be updated still.
Kawaii*;-;Arma III is a great game, very buggy at times but at its core still very fun. Wasteland and Altis life are probably some of the best parts about Arma III they are super addicting to play, especially wasteland! Would definatly recommend the game
famousbasic13;-;The most amazing military simulator game out there! Also a great game un-modded as well as modded. This game has brought many players together through communities and clans! 10/10 No Doubt. Well done Bohemia!
[JoS] Ace of Chaos;-;The little time i've had in ARMA III, really goes to show that this is a very heavy Milsim game, and is amazingly fun, highly realistic, with great and smoth controls that never get in the way. ARMA III fixed ARMA II's more clunky controls, and added different stances besides, standing, crouching and prone. This adds a new dynamic to the game, and allows for things like cover that would be useless at the standing, and still realvealing at crouching, you can "Crouch-prone", or crouch very lowly, much lower then normal crouching, which makes combat more dynamic and much more fun. The only thing in ARMA that is a killer is stamina, because it its a milsim game, stamina will always be your number one enemy, and more of the threat in a fire fight then the guy shooting you, because you cannot steady your aim.
Simon Prime;-;Super graphics and multiplayer very big map and a lot of technique and a lot of weapons, Arma 3 the most realistic game I put it 10/10
DLF;-;It's the Best.
a sheep;-;This is a game where you can do what ever you want. Make it a FPS by playing TDM or make it a Role playing game by playing mods or 'life' no matter what age you are you will enjoy Arma 3. The best one out of the series and I would buy this game for my friends! (Just make sure your rig can run it though otherwise it gets a little less fun!)
YUK_MICHEAL;-;its good
Heman;-;I have just started to get into Arma 3 and I have found it exclent, But you are going to need a really high end system to run this game I would recommend at least 8 gigs and an i5, and gtx 750 ti and above.
Kxot;-;Battle simulator like no other. It is as realistic as possible. Massive modding options, which gives many different game options. Want real warfare simulation? You have it. Want faster more like BF gaming style? Go with King of the hill game mode. Want to fly, shot people with tanks, coordinate strategy? You can choose all that and more.
-=(DR)=-[SATPG]aj;-;if you like war simulaters this is your game
CuddleKins McGee;-;Arma 3 is a tricky game to review, but heres me trying it anyway. The reason why this game is so hard to review lies in the sheer size of the game and the variety of things it may or may not offer for the player. I take Arma 3 for what it is first and foremost: a platform. What you get is a good looking game with a solid (would be great, but you have to do some optimization to boost your performance) engine, two amazing maps (Stratis and Altis, which is probably the most impressive map Ive seen in any open world-ish game) and the prospect of near endless new content from the community. What you dont get is an easy to get into mil-shooter with CoD sized maps and a quick pace. If youre in for uncomplicated, fast paced PvP gameplay, you should probably look elsewhere. If youre sick of that, however, Arma 3 might be just your thing. The strength of the Arma series is freedom (**** yeah). You are free to mod the game into almost anything you want, create any type of mission and make your very own gameplay experience. You have to invest some time into the game, but once you got into it, the opportunities are endless. Want to play huge adversial or coop maps with a hundred players or more? Arma is just your thing and there are big communities (in many different languages) that will help you find that epic experience. Want to play singe player? Well, if you expect strong single player content with interesting characters and storyline and so on, then Arma 3 isnt the game youre looking for. Or is it? Right now Bohemia delivered one part of a three part campaign  those missions are challenging, offer a solid variety of infantry gameplay but dont expect a good story or interesting characters. But as mentioned before  the huge amount of community made missions and mods offer hours and hours of playtime. Personally I prefer small cooperative missions to play with friends. Already the steam workshop has countless missions for 2-5 players. So, should you buy Arma 3? Well, Id certainly recommend it, if any of the things I mentioned above sounds fun to you. It is to say though, that this game is not something that everyone might like, so stay away from it if you are not willing to invest some time into it. I hope that this review helped some people to decide whether or not they should by Arma 3. Please note that Im not a native English speaker, so the language used in this review might seem a little odd for some.
|Madroz|;-;Without a doubt the best milsim-game ever made.
Kronprinz.FriedrichIII|6TH|;-;Just... get it... Just get it.... You NEED this.... 10/10 no doubt
KNEIV;-;This is not your basic FPS. It's a military simulation, with great graphics, good logic (not like have a health bar, or heal after getting shot and like nothing happened), nice gameplay, cool campaign and multiplayer, amazing mods, etc...
tomditch;-;one of the best sim games ever made
Ironman71;-;,    .  ,   , ,    -    .       .   .  ,     ,   -  Call of Duty  Battlefield, .
Blackbomber200;-;Hello potential buyer looking through the reviews. Why should you buy Arma III out of all the first person shooters, when COD has basically destroyed the genre. Well let me tell you why you should buy this game. Arma III is a realistic military shooter that simulates every real life thing you would experience in real combat, realistic physics, bullet drop, Weapon Zeroing, fatigue, every little item simulates real life combat. This game is in my opinion one of the best Military FPS shooter out there alongside Halo, Battlefield, and Battlefront. Arma III is first person and third person and features 40 weapons (Assault Rifles, LMGs, SMG's, Sniper Rifles, Marksman rifles, but alas no shotguns yet) last time I checked and over 20 vehicles (Tanks, APC's, Transports) and helicopters. It features several weapon attachments and several body armors and uniforms to choose from. The game is stunningly beautiful you wont find a more beautiful detailed game, the developers put a lot of work and time into graphics and boy did they give you what you pay for. It features 2 large scale maps span across 274 km of terrain (1.6 million placed items)(50 towns and cities). With such high detailed really requires a good computer, I have a ASUS republic of gaming computer with a Geforce GTX 860M and It usually runs Arma at a smooth 60 fps in almost all places including heavy combat and cities, but my computer doesnt work well when it runs high detailed mods/missions from the community. So if you dont have a good computer you probably should wait till you have a good computer. But fps and graphics aside its a very beautifully detailed game when your computer made for these types of games. I have rarely ever ran into any graphics bugs or any poorly textured items, aside the random long necked marine in a helicopter or the pure white eyes of marines. While the game's story faces criticism I think its a well planned thought out story a story you would expect from a war between NATO forces and the local CSAT and AFF forces in the year 2035, the storyline is split into 3 Acts and each is extremely long so youll be sure to get a few days out of it, I wont go more into just so I dont spoil it. The game features showcases and a boot camps so you can learn and play with the basics of the game weather its ground combat, air combat, or showing off new things in the game. Boot camp helps introduce you to the basics of the game. Before I go into the controls let me say about one of the things that greats Arma III great, the Steam Workshop community allows you to download missions and mods that adds some really great stories to continue and add some really great and new weapons or uniforms and some really great maps some like wasteland and remakes like WWII and remakes from Arma II & OA. The community in Arma III is helpful and not once have I ran into some angry little child like I would in COD most people are mature and friendly players who help out and dont yell at you or trash talk. The community is great and friendly and the developers and game makers listen and help the community out unlike some other games. Moving onto the controls and game play, to put it bluntly this is not a friendly game to new players you are going to have to spend hours and hours learning the controls and learning how to play because of the realistic gameplay every single thing you do needs to be carefully planned out and played. The controls are complicated and you will take a long time to learn and play them and when you do play you will use almost every key on the keyboard while playing the game. This game will beat you up if you dont learn the controls or try to run and gun. This is not Call of Duty there is no running and gunning, to survive youve got to move up cautiously, use cover, pick out targets and control your accuracy, which can be controlled with Arma's 19 different stances to improve concealment and accuracy. So if you want a fast paced shooter where its easy to play and just shoot people and they die, Arma is not the game. Arma requires patience you have to work to survive and get those most wanted kills but when you do you will be filled with satisfaction. Tanks and APC's and helis also require skill, communication, and the same caution used in ground combat. And Air travel is no easier, as much as I want to do a cool Strafe run with an attack helicopter I cant cause Ill likely get shot down. The multiplayer really makes this game, Bohemia really put their heart and soul into and boy did they make it great, Arma III has one of the most largest diverse multiplayers of all the FPS's. The servers are great and plenty of ones to choose from, one of the ones Ive been playing the most is Invade and Annex made by someone great who I cant recall (feel free to comment the maker of that great game mode and be sure to check it out yourself) However the AI in this game still need improvement, Enemy AI can either be dumb and take 50 bullets or shoot you dead center in the head and kill you. The Friendly AI are a bit smarter but usually rely on you to hold your hand and kill your enemies. However they are usually very helpful and smart when they want to be, but usually work best under well with a good a squad leader. The enemy AI can be deadly and coordination but are sometimes stupid so you must treat them just like you would any other real player. AI will most likely see improvements in the future and possibly personality traits such as feeling when over run or less likely to stand still and take bullets or savage bodies or take abandoned vehicles. I understand that $59.99 is a lot of money to pay for a game that's been out two years, but trust me I can say without a doubt every dollar and penny is worth it, the developers and game designers spend every penny and dollar improving Arma III and they regularly update the game, However if you are struggling for money just wait for Arma's regular sales, Arma III will fall to $30 and Im sure after long enough it will drop into the lower twenties and even lower. The DLC however is a different story. I got both DLC's with the recent sale and saved some money. While I like the new helis and guns in the marksman and helicopter dlc I believe that they could have already have been in the game. Its overpriced I can agree and youd be best off either not buying it or waiting for sales. Hopefully more ground vehicles and possibly shotguns will be included and hopefully wont be as expensive. On a later note the Zeus DLC is very fun and really adds new gameplay to the game unlike others, to put it bluntly think of Battlefield's Commander but with more power and control, way more.... So as a returning veteran from Arma II and OA I can say without a doubt and confidently that Arma III is one of the Greatest Military Shooters out there, Equally standing up there with Halo, Battlefield, and Star Wars Battlefront. This is Arma III one of the most visually realistic military shooters of all time. You make the stories, you fight the battles, you decide the out come. Will you stand defiant with your team mates and tell your stories, or will you become another causality of the Battlefield. I give Arma III a 9/10 or on another scale a 95/100. Survive, Adapt, and Win. (This review will be updated as time goes on.) For previews or perhaps a better outlook on the game go here -> https://youtu.be/ph1mm2KKSv0
Benbo Baggins;-;really good game all my freinds must get this fun game
KeyleX;-;Really good game to play with your friends. Although I was playing on a server and it seemed to have max players on it (There was 2 servers) and my browser seemed to stop working after a while.... so i had to restart the whole game then refresh a couple of times then it would stop again. Thats really the only probelem, the co-op is amazing - It almost reminds me of Planetside 2 when you have a squad and there are mortar strikes and everything works out... Anyway, I would recomend this game to alot of my friends :-)
EceHuH;-;I have to turn out everything what I said, It took a little while to change my graphics settings to good, and now I just can say that this game is a very ing good, but I just hope that this game will be optimized better to pc..
Inky;-;fire yo
Doctor Senpai;-;It reminds me of games with guns. It is a good game with guns.
AHomelessWalrus;-;Huge learning curve, but once you get it down you can basically play any game in the series. The editor is immensely difficult to learn to use as well, but offers more options than any other game I know of. I would say probably about 400-500 of my hours on record were spent editing game modes.The only huge issue I can really think of off hand are the animations, which are inexcusably sub-par in my opinion. It gets annoying when you shoot a soldier and see him begin to slump to the ground, only to have him instantly snap into the upright position (it seems Arma doesn't have any animations for when soldiers take damage, so it instead opts to ragdoll the soldier into a death animation for about a half a second before setting back to the "healthy" state). This is very annoying as it makes confirming kills difficult, and unlike Arma 2, where semi-automatic weapons were ideal, you now need to spray at your targets to ensure they are actually dead and haven't just begun the death animation and will soon reset to the ready position. Other than that, for the most part the game is very well done.
My Mixtape;-;I met my first boyfriend through a match. We met after and had hot, tasteful anal. My  creamed with the force of a thousand Ron Pauls as he pulled his thick, greasy  out of my . Oh, the game is fun also.
(RFAI) Darkness;-;Great game, played on free weekend, runs well and great graphics, only wish I could've kept it longer.
MikaiL;-;good for altis life i met this asian and he pick the lock on the po po car so much fun very cool
SOCKS;-;LOVE this game people. The base game is awesome a bit buggy but great. And if you want more fun with the game you can download a -ton of mods to make it what you want
paulius.paulaitis;-;Wow, it really looks superb. Difficult, but very reallistic.
Modestep;-;A very goog game.Thx Bohemia
jiveturkey42;-;Likes: scale, graphics, visual realism, detail, immersion Dislikes: poorly optimized, tacky script and cliche dialogue, awkward soldier controls, price for a two year old game
Ramos Caoliki (Sgt. Rooney);-;If its on sale buy it, if the dlc are on sale too buy the marksmen one but dont pay full price :/
KoozwoN;-;This game is extremely detailed and fun, If you want a good game to play with your friends, this is the game for you.
CodyCorp;-;side chat spam effectiveness !0/10 spending the whole day progressing just to be shot back to the bottom 10/10 goes on sale 3 days after you buy it 10/10
[WQ] Vertigo;-;Great game! Would recommend to anyone who loves to play war games. 10/10 Would buy again.
Slinzer;-;'Twas good to play a very nice FPS game with good mechanics, graphics, sound and design. Always adored the ArmA series for its fair realism. Only thing I have against this game is the fact that the enemy AI has pinpoint accuracy and includes a bullet sponge feature, while your squadmates have absolutely no accuracy compared to the enemy and they seem to die as fast as the player. Then again it might just be a quirk that I haven't caught up on. Great piece!
Sp00ky;-;A really great Military Simulator. The amount of content and detail in this game is great and will give you hours of fun to have! From a great SP campaign to a diverse and intense MP along with CO OP missions with friends, there is endless content in ArmA 3!!
AT0M1CBR4V0;-;Incredible game, love every bit of it, it's worth the money!! The AI are better than what I experienced with Arma 2 and Arma 2 Operation Arrowhead for sure, the physics are incredible!!!
Dumb.Dumb;-;Operation Flashpoint was good, I bought it three times. Arma was acceptable, I bought it and its addons. Arma 2 was excellent, I bought it twice and I also received it as a gift over Steam. but frankly, arma 3 is completely disappointing: In 2035, rocket launchers are utter  and the art of guidance systems has been completely lost. In 2035, IFVs are going slower than tanks and flips magically for no reasons. In 2035, your occular implants shows you full screen advertisings for having been a passenger in an helicopter that no one cares about, added in a DLC. In 2035, Weapon zeroing is made en masse over advertised values for ammo (ie: if your ammo is made to leave the muzzle at 800ms and actually leaves it at 920(as for the Katiba). then you will definitely not hit your target beyond 500 meters because it will overshoot it. In 2035, AA rockets are tracking the target as soon as they leave the launcher, good luck if the target is going downward because your rocket will go downward too. In 2035, Westland Lynx are equiped with rockets, not guided missiles. In 2035, the Fennek is an MRAP, but on the plus side, the retractable periscope is funny to use. In 2035, aircrafts and game engines are so badly designed that even if you have above the recommended specifications, you will have 9 FPS. In 2035, players will be so stupid that you will want to kill them all, even your teammates, because they will join the strongest teams. In 2035, AA radars are the most useless stuff ever created, only usefull for single targets, and on the ground, what happened to the Operation Flashpoint scanner ? In 2035 you will finally be able to go underwater, too bad theres nothing to do there. and finally: in 2035, you can forget about usefull vehicles, here MRAPS do not have AT launchers, and AA tanks have a ridiculously short range, bad accuracy, useless radar, and only 4 rockets which MAY allow you to shoot down one helicopter hovering and not using countermeasures. In short: the future SUCKS. for the record I have 976 hours of play time on arma 3 at the time I write this. This number is still bound to increment, but I can not recommend the game for anyone until they fix their engine, and the future.
Waifu Stealer;-;ArmA 3 is really good but the mods for it are disgusting and bad
Blitz;-;This game is incredible its a military nerds dream. With an engaging singleplayer, character customization, multiplayer ranging from RPG gametypes to full on Military Sims and an overabundance of player created content and systems for you to create your own content. This game and its community really create something special.
Foxer #Fallout4Hype;-;+The best military shooter I've ever played. -Engine is trash -multiplayer runs bad and a lot of desync
dEZ;-;Totally worth the 45 euros. Its an incredible game with or without friends..You can have so much fun and never get bored...You could choose any mod and altis life is AMAZING. The bad thing is the performance from the servers...They are really bad. You cant play with 60 fps...Doesnt matter what setup you have. Anyways, i think its still pretty good...Buy it!
Kyuu;-;UNMODDED: Oh god it hurts. Ignoring  LP bait mods like Altis Life, Wasteland and DayZ. Arma 3 modded is one of the most enjoyable milsims out there and I fully recommend it as long as you don't mind spending first few hours hooking up mods and scenarios which make the game infinitely more fun with huge amount of replay value.
CERE4LKILLER21;-;yes i red rconnend it but its not working on my computer it was a waste of money
SPECTRE;-;Aside from being horrendously CPU bottle-necked, you wont find another title like it any where else. If combined arms is what you want, look no further.
YUK_MICHEAL;-;its good
DLF;-;It's the Best.
a sheep;-;This is a game where you can do what ever you want. Make it a FPS by playing TDM or make it a Role playing game by playing mods or 'life' no matter what age you are you will enjoy Arma 3. The best one out of the series and I would buy this game for my friends! (Just make sure your rig can run it though otherwise it gets a little less fun!)
[eTx] Scumbaguette;-;I just reached Mach 11 with a submarine, in the air. #WORTH
Dark Shark;-;WOLD BE GOOD IF I COLD ING PLAY THE  GAME!
Nikolai Belinski;-;This is a great game for strategists and military sim people and would recomend to those with a strong affection towards realism.
gixicoN;-;very chill war simulation
M. Vonel;-;ArmA 3 is an amazing Military Simulator that treads a line between ultra Realism and Arcade shooter. While the strange controls and not so easy to adapt to type of tactics may seem intimidating. Don't let that put you off. this is an amazing game. with a very powerful editor and tons of multiplayer and singleplayer scenarios on the workshop and with the game you will have a lot of fun.
Noros;-;This game is extremly good. I recomend it to anyone that like roleplaying games.
Slip;-;They did some cool things in this game dont get me wrong. (2000+ hours ARMA 2) The MASSIVE ISSUE that I have with this game is they have put in DLC (go figure more band wagon devs). But its not so much that they are charging an outrageous price for the DLC, its the fact that they water mark your screen to the point that its not fun to play. As if that didnt get their point across, before you can quit the game your in you are forced to look at an advertisement for their DLCs that you cant skip and will be unable to leave your game until its finished. Very very poor model for doing business and I will never buy another game from this company. The mods make this game what it actually is. Which are developed for FREE from the community.
AnGeL-X;-;The Best Millitary Game Now-Days !!
General Granola;-;10 out of 10. Best of its genre. I highly recommend checking out Gaming-Asylum.com }><{{{*>
Molbo Cheeze;-;Arma is a great game. There is so many game modes it is like 20 games in one. King of the hill sort reminds me of Battlefiled and altis life is obviously GTA. It also has a great well made missions. I got this game from watching videos on wasteland and already played wasteland in arma 2 I thought I must have this game. You love the way you look... I guarantee it
fenixzenn;-;I never liked shooters and I can't stop playing this game.
Twitch.tv/BINGEmoose;-;Great game. Great graphics.
Stethan;-;Best and most realistic Military Simulator. I died so many times so i quit. But its fun and i am a newbie
Viles;-;The name of the game is in the aim of the game and that aim is to only play MODDED SERVERS... If your Aussie then SIn City FTW! Otherwise Altis Life or King Of The Hill. Also you get to drive the batmobile which they have renamed an ifrit for some reason 10/10 For Multiplayer. I didnt even know this game had singleplayer.. You wont regret it. you will however regret playing against cheaters n "hackers" which seems to inject for smack then a 80s heroin dealer. Njoy
Crane;-;To explain this game in one word is imossible, it just simply is. Ths is becuase Arma 3 is the only way to describe the game. "But Crane what does Arma 3 mean?" Well, its not one meaning. Its shooting in intense realism, its flying with only what can be described as perfect elegance and precision, its role play like no other game can deliver and its mods, which in its self is a whole other topic... The game is expensive, but the issue with that word, "expensive", is it applys to the quality of the product. If its expensive for what it is, it's not worth a second thought. But if it's researched, watched and reviewed as it is, the price tag is a mere penny compared to the thrilling, nail bitting and frustrating "War simulator". "So, Crane, is it worth it?" Well, it's not is it worth it, its are you ready?
xXRJoeXx;-;Very glad they had a free to play weekend, as well as an awesome weekend sale. Got into boot camp and being a hardcore battlefield player i was hooked immediately. wow, i'm looking forward to some really good tacatical game play with my friends.
_[D]uGGeRz_;-;cant recommend this game. you'd think bohemia would of learnt from arma 2, but its still just as buggy, poorly optimized, and probs wont get fixed. they will just release an arma 4. game is great, dont get me wrong. but the game is ruined by the completely poor performance!
rv;-;Kicked by battleye: Script restriction #47
NarwaliaTheThird;-;This game is absolutly amazing. it took me about 2 to 3 hours to figure out how to play and everything but dispite that this is a really fun game and if you are looking for a Military Sanbox RPG with stunning graphics and amazing gameplay then this is the game for you
SmashingToaster;-;Great Game, But I want to get it so i need it to be cheaper
GrapefruitBaguette;-;Good, apart from the framerate. If a GTX 770 is normally only just managing 30 FPS (This is rare, normally in the 10-35 region,) you are doing something wrong.
You've CAT to be kitten me;-;In altis life i got to collect drugs and my liences for it but i ran out of time because the server went restarting. 10/10 would collect my drugs right before server restarts again.
An English Muffin;-;greate for team play
BIG-BANG-BEN;-;I've always been a fan of the Arma series, right the way back to Cold War Assault. Arma 3 is a brilliant step forward, and there are some good improvements since Arma 2, which I was very happy with. I am able to play this on my laptop (HP Pavilion g6, Intel Core i3) and the graphics are very good. I would like to upgrade to be able to enjoy the higher end graphics. However this game is still incredibility realistic. Overall, very enjoyable, very realistic, and lots of fun!
BoyvdBosch;-;Realy good game, lots of gamemodes and lots of RP servers. the downside of the game is that it has FPS problems, but some times it not the game but the gamemode if you play a 70 player RP server then YEAH the fps sucks but if you play a deathmatch with 20 player (like battle Royal,its a mod ) its not that bad. and it has a lot of nice workshop content. 10/10 would like to kill some one again !
john.d;-;Same ole Arma, if you enjoy the series, its worth a buy. Active multiplayer community
Paranoia-2MB;-;Being a big fan of Operation Flashpoint from way back when, this game is a great replacement for it. If you are tired for the arcade style, casual, fast paced and no skill requirment of modern games. (IE: COD and BF) and want something that requires, skill, timing, know how and realism. Then this is the game for you. Must like OP:Flashpoint, it isn't for the faint of heart at start. Lots of keys, lots of actions you need to know. But with like anything else, put the time into it and you can do it. Huge Steam Workshop community, lots of add ons which means more FREE content. Don't like something? Make it yourself. This game is great fun, though it may not be for all, it's great for most. Think of it as the Eve Online for shooters. Nothing beats playing MP and being a good transport pilot to get your troops to and from battle or respawns. You can actually make a difference.
HeftySack;-;This is a really really great game and worth every penny, very enjoyable with friends.
Dr. avocado;-;A game filled with f*cking campers, watching the gun store with sniper rifles. Killing unsuspecting players traveling to meet up with their friends to do the same thing. Also, there are people yelling on sidechat on sector control, which is also another camping ground for snipers. There are also no shotguns and you will be bombbarded by jets and arrowplanes.
Morts;-;A game which I have clocked nearly 1000 hours on, and have still not gotten bored of it. Have had it for a few years now and because it is so open to the community to modify it always has something new. 10/10
Kyuu;-;UNMODDED: Oh god it hurts. Ignoring  LP bait mods like Altis Life, Wasteland and DayZ. Arma 3 modded is one of the most enjoyable milsims out there and I fully recommend it as long as you don't mind spending first few hours hooking up mods and scenarios which make the game infinitely more fun with huge amount of replay value.
Internet Explorer;-;High quality stuffs.
GoD_IsTWIZTED;-;great game.
The Canadian Beaver;-;i love killing people and selling drugs in this game awesome game 100,000,000,000/100,000,000,000 great game who ever the hell made this
Cpl Sandshrew;-;Big difference over arma 2. Very fun, and can be challenging. Online play is amazing!
HolyKrep;-;Before playing this game you should ask yourself - what military operation would you like to play? Do you want to be a sniper? Do you want to be a part in a big combined arms operations? Do you want to ride a tank? Helicopter? Kart? Do you want to be a civilian and simply role-play your wild dreams? Do you want to play as a god? Really, there is not much to be said about ARMA that has not been said - yes, there are bugs, yes it is still a bit laggy, but it gets better. And it will get better because developers still update game and listen to fans feedback. You can have hundreds of mods, do whatever you want to do or simply follow missions. It is all up to you. This is main difference between other military shooters - it is a sandbox concept, which means you are buying lot of games in one.
Dat1Kid;-;Great game, so many game modes its hard to get bored.
pop3132;-;Its awsome you should try it
ChickenLord crimson.gg;-;Great mods great game 9/10
bishop;-;If you prefer a slower paced, methodical, tactical shooter this is for you. There will be hiking, driving, flying, recon, firefights etc. If you are put off by the pace / style of other shooters like counter strike or call of duty, this might be for you. A couple things to mention. The graphics are phenomenal, but you will need a decent rig to max out every setting and it still might not be worth it. Also noteworthy, there are some AMAZING mods for this game. Tons of custom missions and whole new game types, like Epoch mod and Altis life. My only complaint is that the DLC's are very questionable.
Jaguar;-;Only one word can describe this game in one word: Life. Now that i have yor attention, Id like to talk about something very important: Counter Strike awareness. Counter Strike sucks complete balls and many people become addicted to it because it transmits a   inhibitor. Please help spread awareness and click the donate button below to donate to   Treatment Centers. Thousands of helpless people around the world contract this horrible disease and need your help. Please, donate with the button below... >>>Donut<<< In the case you feel you may have contracted this disease, call 1800-RDI-HELP. If treatment does not work, throw your computer out the top of a 10 story building.
Scotland;-;i love arma 3 its the best game ever
[IRNBRO] Griffthebandit;-;Reaching my 200th hour on this game made me decide to write a review. To start, this game has hooked me for 200 hours of tactical combat over the last 4/5 months or so. (Yes I did buy it at Christmas, so what.) I came to this game from its prequel. I mainly played Wasteland but did a bit of Domination. I loaded that game up on Christmas day and the main menu music already had me hooked. I browsed for wasteland servers and oh boy did I find one. Started up as BLUFOR and noticed my teammates were actually not shooting me, which was a variation from the prequel. Also the UI wasn't  and navigating felt more logical. I soon discovered 77th JSOC and then I have spent all of my free time on that. Wibble, if you're reading this, never let that guy in the AMV-7 again, he TK'd my whole squad. :( ing great game and HALF DECENT community. But the bugs. Plenty of laughter to them, and they're no longer game breaking. Play this game. Or I will forever hate you.
MTGunslinger;-;I enjoyed this game immensly and found it to be immersive, realistic, and a good simulator of war. 8/10 Review. ARMA 3 is an open-world, tactical shooter video game developed by Czech studio Bohemia Interactive for Microsoft Windows. It was released on September 12, 2013.[3] Arma 3's storyline takes place in the mid-2030s during the fictional Operation Magnitude, a military operation launched by NATO forces fighting in Europe against "Eastern armies" referred to as CSAT (Canton-Protocol Strategic Alliance Treaty) led by a resurgent Iran with a coalition of other Middle Eastern and Asian nations.[4] Set more than 25 years after the events of ARMA 2, in 2035, NATO forces deployed to islands of the Aegean Sea are trying to hold off a massive CSAT's offensive from the east. During the singleplayer campaign, the player takes on the role of a US Army soldier, Corporal Ben Kerry. Initially, the player must survive on his own after friendly forces are defeated in a failed NATO operation. During the campaign, the player will face everything from lone wolf infiltration missions to the commanding of large scale armored operations. The player will be able to choose different objectives and weaponry (such as UAVs, artillery, and air support) according to their play style.[5][6][7] ARMA 3 takes place on the Aegean islands of Altis (formerly Lemnos[8]) and Stratis of Greece, in the Mediterranean Sea. The islands feature photo-realistic terrain and water environments. Altis is the largest official terrain in the Arma series with ground area covering approximately 270 km2. The smaller island, Stratis, expands over an area of 20 km2.[9] The islands also feature over 50 villages with buildings that are both penetrable and destructible. In 2030, civil war erupts on the Mediterranean islands of Altis (formerly Lemnos) and Stratis, killing half of the civilian population, rendering thousands of them homeless, and causing a refugee crisis. Under harsh conditions, NATO peacekeeping forces deploy to the region to secure peace and establish joint NATOAltian Armed Forces (AAF) bases on the islands. Five years later, with NATO investment in the Aegean dwindling, the Canton-Protocol Strategic Alliance Treaty (CSAT), a military alliance of eastern hemisphere countries, begins subsidizing the AAF and mobilizes its own forces in the Pacific. Facing political pressure to withdraw at the end of their peacekeeping mandate, NATO begins reducing their forces causing tensions to rise between AAF and NATO forces.
Yopoman;-;Easily the best, most polished installment of BI's Arma series. I've been playing BI games since 2001's Operation: Flashpoint. It's amazing to see how the same engine (Real Virtuality) has evolved over the years, errrr decades actually, wow it's been a while - now I feel old. So, in summary, Arma 3 is a complex and realistic simulator that allows players to realize the rapidly impending date of their last breath, to know that every second that ticks by their billions of cells die just a little bit more, their neurons demyelinating, and their arteries incrementally hardening. It's a firm unyielding grip that death has upon us, he authoritatively clutches the keys to the universe in one bony claw and simultaneously our hearts and souls in the cold phalanges of the other. Thank you Arma 3 for revealing the terrifying reality of my mortal existence. In death we are infinitely alone, no one to hear our trembling wimpers as we rock back and forth in the dark corner of an unending void of pure, sterile, black nothingness that warps us further into catatonia. Score: 10/10
MARSE ROBERT;-;Arma is my life. there really isnt anything better if your looking for a fps, dogfighting and cas missions. or a massive tank battle. this game is for you. will arma again for the rest of my days. thank you bohemia. this game raises and surpasses the bar of excellency.
MeowRingGaming;-;great fun. make sure u have friends to paly with ;)
Duchvelka;-;I have put over five hundred hours into ArmA 3, THIS GAME IS ING FANTASTIC.
Capitaine Luu;-;Arma 2 with less guns.
BiaSelt;-;Fun and Addicting game.
GenralCookie;-;Great Game got me addicted love it its a must get.
PvtSplodingPies;-;Very Enjoyable game, with a HUGE variety of games, mods, players, and etc. None the less, the game is entertaing and itll suit about any player if they find their "community" Greatest Game I've Played Yet.
jgwm01;-;Great game shame its hard on laptop cpus but seriously good fun
Bearded Fury;-;Can be awesome if you can get ahold of some of the great mods AND a good group of folks to play MP with. Other than that, you probably won't have much fun. I've been playing ARMA titles since Operation Flashpoint came out.
Daslup;-;One of the best game ive played in the past couple of months
AHappyNewBie;-;Good game, I would recommend to players who are into military simulator. This game includes variety of guns and vehicles.
novaldemar;-;Arma 3 can and will be frustrating to start out with; rest asured it is amazing you just need to do the following: 1. Look up Dslyecxi's guides to Arma 3 - Particularly the movement and shooting guide: https://youtu.be/G8vrbzNYEwM?list=PLQEd6zRLOafWtrQ4EAYKl6z23hvCLYgW6 This will give you an overview of how awesome movement can be in arma when you understand it. 2. Dont start in the campaign. At least dont get frustrated if you find the campaign hard to start with. 3. Instead I suggest going on a Domination server. Particularly if you find one that has infinite sprint. Most if not all will let you test out weapons and play on a team of other players against AI. You will quickly get a good feel of the teamwork in the game and you can ask players ingame if something isnt working for you. Most importantly if you are stuck far away you can respawn at a base and start again without the tediousness of walking simulator that Arma 3 can be. 4. When you get better branch out and try more hard core version of missions. There is hours and hours of fun here to find. You will eventually love walking simulator 2014 :)
[eTx] Scumbaguette;-;I just reached Mach 11 with a submarine, in the air. #WORTH
AverageNavy -;-;A game to play with friends, could see the game becoming boring if you were trying to play on your own but this game is all about teamwork and tactics.
Enderman564;-;i have the following specs and can run this on medium settings A10-5750 quad core 3.5 hrz 8 gigs of ram AMD radeon HD 8650G graphics 4206MB graphic memory so far ive played 6 hours of this game and i got it on sale for $30 and the key binding are simple with a PS3 controller and every one in a while i have to reach over to the keyboard but otherwise 9/10
[TFV] K. Hollar;-;Awesome game. Very detailed, and good for any one wanting to learn military tactics.
Leoniditron;-;Get this game...Hands down amazing
itsjustadz;-;wanted this game for a while but didnt like the price, then it was free for the weekend and in sale, so i bought it. i wish i had of bought it months ago. its a cracking game absolutely loads to do and the visuals (apart from explosions) are fantastic. campaign isnt great but it got me used to the buttons and a brief understanding how the game is played. now online is fantastic, wasteland is a brilliant mode pairing up with a couple pals time fly by working together spending 20 minutes just to kill one guy lol in a real life situation i know id feel safer with a few dudes who play arma then a few trigger happy kids who play cod! if your not sure whether to get this believe me your missing out.
WobWobz;-;Buggy, but fun...sometimes
INFILTRATOR;-;Amazing Game But its Have Alot Of Bugs
Ghostman229;-;Really fun game to play with friends
Bot;-;too high cpu usage in multiplayer needs cpu like 4790K
[DVGE]Lieutenant Thomas;-;I love arma 3 but since they updated the game mechanics i cant play anymore do to the fact that i cant bind the key R-mouse to run forward. It's hard coded into the game .. SOO any old school gamers out there, heed my words! don't buy it, unless its cheap then they probably will patch in the future ..
Darkspeed294;-;welcome to arma 3, where anything and/or anyone tries to kill you! - fence -> Dangerous!!! - stairs -> Dangerous!!! - houses -> Dangerous!!! but still, amazing gameplay and graphics! ow, and your cpu will fry! 9/11 will fly Jet again!!!
asdf pigman;-;Very fun with friends and without friends. be sure to play the Epoch mod and Breaking Point its hella fun!!!!
Robert7301201;-;Waiting forever at the Terminal to get a squad to head to landing zone. Found a squad, went to landing zone. Asked if I had explosive charges. I said yes. Asked if I had mine detector. I said yes. Squad leader decided we would blow up radio tower. So we went to the radio tower. We spot a few enemies on hill but don't engage. We finally get to the fence of the radio tower. I check my inventory. WHERE IS MY MINE DETECTOR?! I then realize I accidently left it in a crate back at Terminal. I considered telling them but didn't want to be the one who ruined the entire mission. So I headed into wire surrounding radio tower and luckly the engineer with us actually had a mine detector so I could see some of the mines. I somehow make it to the base of the radio tower, plant an explosive and get back ALIVE. We hide behind a rock, I set off the charge. We hear the explosion. Then nothing. The radio tower didn't fall. So then I get to go back and place more. My luck has by now run out and I get blown up by one of the mines. I'm dragged out of minefield and saved by medic. So then I get to go back again. KABOOM. Dragged out saved my medic. Squad leader yells at me to be more careful. I reply "I'm doing my best." I head back in for the third time. I'm almost to the radio tower when I hear a strange noise. Then I realize, I can literally hear my heart beating! The whole situation was apparently very stressful for me. I somehow manage to get to radio tower then and plant 2 explosive charges. Then I also got back out alive. We blew it up AND IT FINALLY FELL DOWN! I was rewarded with a large notification in the top right corner saying "Enemy Radio Tower Down, They cannot call for CAS." I thought it was going to end there but nope we got sectors to capture. We were leaving when we got fired at by enemies on the hill. Our marksmen was shot and we engaged the enemy. I tried to take cover behind a rock but unfortunately was shot. Time to wait for the medic to revive me again. So after that everyone was alive and ok and we went to go take over some wind turbines. We got to the hill where the turbines were at and more enemies were on the hill. We exchanged fire for a long time. Our marksman got injured again so we had to drag him back. Then some luckly enemy got a headshot on me killing me instantly. Before the medic could revive me I lost connection and my adventure was over. Moral of the Story: Check your damn equipment before you leave the base.
=TGB= Anderson;-;Endless fun, possibilties, and challenges! For anyone who likes the Arma series or likes to fight in a realistic enviorment, this is the game for you.
HyperJizzMatic;-;Arma has a love hate relationship, but overall is a fantastic game.
Goatroach;-;Terribly optimized graphics engine, but still VERY fun to play. High frame rates aren't too necessary in this game, because your typical encounter is a much more realistic than BF4 distance, which is usually 300m or more. Since bullets actually kill fast (like in real life) when hits are scored, close quarters encounters are short and deadly (clearing a building is actually dangerous unlike BF or CoD), and usually there's no lateral tracking to be done since people move slow compared to the absurdly unrealistic BF or CoD games. So 24 fps actually is quite playable in Arma 3 (I can play GTA V on near ultra settings on 1080p at 110 fps, to give you an idea of how poorly Arma 3's graphics are optimized). As for gameplay, the game has a great story mode, and awesome multiplayer. Dogfights in jets aren't the stupid 60 mph dogfights like in BF4, but rather you're doing 300-400 mph while trying to stay on his tail. I've actually damaged my plane (and pilot) taking a nearly 9-G turn to dodge 4 incoming missiles after I ran out of flares (yes, aircraft have realistic quantities of ammo and fuel, as they should). If you plan to fly anything, you MUST have a mic, and most servers require Teamspeak (which is lame, since the game already has global, side, command, group, and vehicle channels, along with direct communications (proxy voice). There is no need for TS, unless if you're a brain-dead  who doesn't know how to utilize the in-game channels. However, you will find yourself short of servers to play on if you don't respect the admins, most of whom play nothing but Arma 3, and have a God complex. Stroke their fragile egos, and all will be well for you. Weapons aren't balanced, which is nice because they aren't balanced in real life. In real life, weapons are designed to be the best at the role they were meant for, and that's how the weapons in Arma 3 are coded. the only "balancing" is the weight penalties. Ammo for a .50 cal or 12.7mm AMR is freaking heavy in real life, and so it is in Arma 3. If you want to be a sniper using those big guns to score 1-shot-kills from 2 Km away, you can, but if you weigh yourself down with ammo, you will become easily fatigued, and your movement will be dropped to movement slower than an over-encumbered Elder Scrolls character. That brings us to the map size of the most popular map, Altis. Altis is big. B-I-G BIG. HERE [40.media.tumblr.com] is a to-scale illustration of Altis compared to other well-known large maps. I used to try to describe Battlefield maps to CoD players by saying an entire CoD map would fit into a BF home base. Well, Caspian Border fits nicely into the NATO air base on Altis. The little island-like peninsula on the southern part of Altis is just a bit smaller than Skyrim. Yeah, Altis is big. 270 square kilometers of land (167.77 square miles), and a total playable area that supports gameplay on land, air, sea, and under water of 1,000 square kilometers (621.37 square miles), making Altis bigger than FUEL's map. Yeah... it's bigger than FUEL. 'Nuff said. So I'm getting bored of typing this, so I'll wrap up with saying this game is awesome if you like huge open-world simulators that openly supports modding. Speaking of which, there is a Hao mod. That's right, you can play Halo in Arma 3. I know you can play as ODSTs and UNSC marines, but I'm not sure about Spartans and Covenant, as I only just got the game and I haven't tried the mods yet. I give this game a 8/10, loosing 2 points due to graphic limitations.
King Wombat;-;Some what lacking in content, But! great game with a good campaign (so far). Map is massive, fire fight are unique, and vehicals are upgraded from the previous. does have legacy content (animations really). I still wish that they had given us the ArmA III from E3 2012.
Eva;-;0/10 mechanics 10/10 fun
Reaper;-;i recommend this game its great when your in a team plus you have overpoch and the wasteland severs to play on
Derpfestor;-;First time: Went into a wasteland server, spawned in shot a guy found a car and went to a town found a guy watching a dead body in the sky he got shot . I tried to use a medpack... but i "accidently" clicked gut. He got a little angry... 100/100 can gut teamates
Xylodrin12;-;My mother would probably scorn me by saying this about any media related to war, but... This game is magnificent, beautiful, epic and brilliant. the sound-track is not too bad either! I absolutely love the way the game controls, especially compared to the stiff nature of its predecessor, Arma 2. This is particularly noticable when focusing on vehicles. In other words the vehicles handle like a dream due to the improved physics model (PhysX). apart from the third party physics engine implementation, the engine seems to have seen new additions and reconfigurations, such as the improved AI (still not perfect, especially when driving). The textures are decent, considering the scale of the game, but definatly an improvement over Arma 2. Animations are miles better. The details of objects such as weapons, vehicles and various common geometry scattered around the large expanse of the two vanilla maps (Stratis and Altis), are great! I find great delight in oogling at such a realistic landscape, which in the case of the vanilla maps, apparently are modelled from real locations, Agios Efstratios (Stratis) and Lemnos (Altis)! There is a lot of content on offer with Arma 3, notably the ZEUS gamemode which is really exciting to play. Its when a player takes control of sort of an RTS perspective, defending, attacking and messing around with spawning objects and AI while other players run around as normal soldiers, adapting to the unpredictability of ZEUS's actions. It's quite a fun game mode and no two sessions are the same. There are a load of other standard game modes along with the ability to play scenarios either made with the editor, workshop or built in ones such as 'Escape from Altis', which is one of my favourite scenarios provided by BIS, its great to play with some friends. In fact, with a clan or a load of friends this game is a lot more fun. Don't get me wrong the Single player content which is similar, is also really really good. Speaking of the single player experience, one of the most notable additions to this iteration of the series is the decent campaign. missions are good and diverse, making use of the space it has to play with. As well as the good voice acting, which seems to immerse me into the war torn greek islands of Stratis and Altis. Despite all the good things in the game, of course it has problems. One that sticks out like a sore thumb to me is the performace relative to the hardware. Also the fact that the game does not seem to spread the workload across all four of the cores my CPU has to offer; The AI only take one thread, causing servere framerate loss when trying to play with lots of troops running around. Which is what I enjoy doing in sandbox games like this, most of the time. Servers seem to have problems, too. As connecting to a friends, has failed on multiple occasions, seeming to be randomly stubborn towards other players joining your server, despite inviting them. This is no casual shooter. This is a military simulation. This is ARMA.....3.................puts glasses on, gets up, walks off into the distance. <obligatory 10/10 ign mlg 420 reference>
Carl the Cat;-;It's very very good. If you're not a total ing scrub, that is. Look at the tips at the bottom of my guide to not be wrekt. Here's an overview of your multiplayer gamemodes: Altis life: It's like Darkrp from Gmod, but much more tedious and boring. Drive for 40 minutes to go get some peaches then sell them and buy a gun and commit highway robbery. There are sometimes fun setup but mostly is just boring. This game is for REAL combat not dumb pistol fightouts over fruit. Oh, and the s, theres lots of  and "Rdmers" King of the Hill: Theres lots of  servers for this one, try to find a smaller better one thats not so popular. Level up your soldier dude and buy vehicles and guns and  to destroy the noobs. Wasteland: My favorite gamemode, very simple actually. You buy guns and vehicles to capture cities and get money to buy tons of stuff. Takeout money shipments by working with your team to get money to buy tanks or whatever. Theres 3 teams, blufor, opfor, and independent. Opfor and blufor have teams that work together. (Most of the time) Independent creates very small groups or just lone wolf and kills everybody. Usually just for campin' a hill killing both the defensive and offensive teams. It's the real combat gamemode. Play altis map, it's much less messy. Tips: Dont use third person, unless your like looking out a window for your enemies or something. You cant be accurate in this mode. USE COVER. Don't go rollin' around in the middle of the street like an idiot, you gonna get CAPPED! Shoot from cover and then go back into cover. Also beware of what you're using as cover because some stuff can get penetrated through depending on what caliber the 's carrying! Get cozy, maybe "camp" a little. Campin' aint no shame because it teaches losers not to run in the street. Don't be a  about it, though. (Like camping THE ING GUN STORE !) Or you can use tactics using cover to find your enemies who are sprinting in open plains of grass. Oh, don't run too much, youre not sonic. You will become tired and inaccurate when you finally spot the idiot you wanna kill. Also, use machine guns if youre new because they puts lots of bullets down range and it requires skill to shoot accurately. Finnaly, watch videos and  on how to do stuff. Use vitural reality thing to help you as well as editor to teach you how to fly, drive, swim, run, shoot and etc. BUY THIS GAME IT'S SO MUCH FUN THANKS FOR READING MY DUMB GUIDE I TOOK TIME TO WRITE FOR SOME REASON. If you wanna support the developers, buy their dumbass ing dlcs. It probaly helps them or whatever. I bought the kart thingy so i could look cooler. But thats 2 dollas. The helicopter is like, 15. But again thats only 2 dumb helicopters. Some servers have ways to bypass their dumb dlc things.
RednBlu2;-;I run with a military sim group called Phoenix Down Gaming and even though Arma has it's bugs, we mod the hell out of it and enjoy some great military ops. 11/10.
azerbijon123;-;Good game, runs extremely well on my i7 4790k!
The Old Gamer;-;Arma III is a so vast game that 100 pages would not be enough to describe it properly. Suffice to say this, then: Arma III is not a military simulator. Arma III is THE military simulator. Of course, there are still many small glitches and bugs that need to be fixed, but overall we are faced with a product extremely better than Arma II and any other military game ever released. In a word: masterpiece.
craig flax;-;highly addictive with lots of content, worth every penny
lesbian;-;Great game! love it.
TheSFire;-;Have I played this game enough? ..... Nope
JoKeR44 ZA;-;hey devolpers i dont know what is up with this big update sorry if this isnt bothering you but 8.3GB really or is it just the game that is reinstalling please need help!
Peakz;-;This game is one of the most fun games i have ever played. This is just a normal shooter you say... You are very wrong. It is a TON of other Gamemodes within arma 3 wich you can download to get a even newer experience.... Look at my hours.. you wont regret buying this game ;)
wilson.christine24;-;this game is the ing best so get it peeps
MatthawK;-;dis game is duh best  game ive ever played. i got butt  multiple times duing my play
ZombieUnit;-;a must have game
Barragwanus;-;Arma 3 is an improvement over the previous generations, but the game still suffers from a clunky interface and lackluster AI. For an Arma fan like myself, though, it is the best Arma so far.
Awarw90;-;wud reccommend 10/10 wud sex this game
.FD;-;Just Buy It
DeltaOneSix;-;I recommend this game only if my brother, Tommy plays it. :)
DirtySyX;-;tbh, i havent expected that arma 3 ever get in a state that its playable. but now, nearly stabil 40 fps on Invade&Annex and a lot of fun. Buuuut.. atleast its a BI Game, so wait for a Sale cuz its not worth 40$ ... sry BI iam just honest <3
Nimfix;-;Supports the new Unreal Engine 4 with best bugs ever and flying spazzing cars with rollercoaster effects you have never seen before. YES
sirlogan;-;Simply the best game ever. With all the mods and expansions, I don't see how wanting any other game is possible. I wish I would have bought this before buying DayZ to save myself the money.
GuT.v2K;-;get the hang of this game, and you'll have the time of your life. (if your into the military sim, genre)
Bananahead35;-;This is a great game for anyone with experience with first person shooters. You might not want to buy this as your first FPS game becasue of the steep learning curve and the amount if controls. but after some time it becomes a lot of fun. i have had a lot of good experiences in this game that i dont think i could get from another FPS. It has many cool features that you just cant get from other games, like for example the ability to make use of any vehichle around you and use that as an advantage in the field. or maybe get a laser deignator off an enemy body and use that to mark targets for your friends. there is even gamemodes for roleplay. like altis life, and arma 3 life which can be fun if you like to roleplay with other people. I think the possibilities in this game are endless. you can make your own missions and submit them to the workshop for other people to download and rate, etc. I have had more than 500 hrs in this game and i think every one was a lot of fun. 10/10
Voe;-;I absolutely love this game. Wasteland ftw!
J McCoy;-;Astonishing war simulator 9.5/10
Sneaky Fish;-;2000+ hours on all accounts, tasty game.
ToastyGhost;-;I've played this game for hundreds of hours. It's an amazing game. I have hopped onto this UK Altis Life server, where if you were to get ran over you would not die. So I ran up the street into Kavala and noticed a truck was heading out of Kavala. I ran into the street and screamed at the truck, the truck then lost control and flipped over and then blew up. I rate this 8/8 M8 would play again. IGN 9000/5 stars.
Ephrael Wilson;-;Not bad, but not good by any means. The Helicopter DLC literally is 2 helicopters and mechanics that should have just been included in the base game to begin with, LITERALLY the epitome of a ing money grab. Stamina system is wonky, having played Arma 2 previous where your guy could sprint for the same time as in Arma 3 without being literally out of breath, could still aim, and actually felt like he had gone through training. But Arma 3's stamina makes me feel like my guy was drafted and beforehand smoked 7 packs of cigarettes a day. Bullet damage leaves somewhat to be desired honestly, 6.5 and 5.56. I've hit people does on center mass and in the neck with both rounds and it took atleast 2 more to even down them. And I've yet to encounter a mod that fixes this. Honestly might just be me on this one. Also back on the stamina thing, it literally kills aiming down sights for me at all, when I do reinstall to play I just use hipfire and can honestly hit more than with sights after moving short  distances. It's asinine. Was ing around with my friend and popping shots at him, and the moment I stopped aiming and just used hip fire it killed him. Honestly wish there was a middle ground option for recommending, so I'll just go with a 4/10 just based on gameplay honestly. Everything else is alright. They've made water inserts actually useful, beefed up the stances, but fell so short in other places for me.
connortodd2112;-;Just an all around great game.
ZombieHD;-;This game is the definition of greatness. The graphics and physics of the game are amazing! Though the game is not easy to get used to, this game is a must play for anyone that like brutal unforgiving combat and realistic gameplay.
Chainsaw Bear Fist;-;This game is possibly one of the most realistic military shooters on the store at the moment. This game has all types of mods that can be installed but just the gametypes you can play from the stock game are truly amazing. There are role play servers, team deathmatches, deathmatches, zombies survival games, ect. The only issue with this game is the occasional animation glitch. Overall, beautiful, realistic looking game and a true must have for your Steam library.
freexavier;-;This game is great but I expect more thoe, but anyways its a great game. I haven't tried the other mods yet and this game is still greate. So this game has a lot of content, but not as ArmA 2 combined with the DLCs and OA. Also its sad that it the DLCs are a bit overpriced for the content it offers. Also one of the things I don't like about ArmA 3 is that they didn't use real names of weapons and vehicles. Even has fake guns like the MX Rifles. Considering this to be a Military Sim, I expect real weapons and vehicles.
Mark Burns;-;Great setup, just wish it was a bit more realistic in the avatars movements etc... Other than that, pretty great game.
Scarecrow;-;I mean it's ok.....
Kappa;-;When I screamed "I play COD" a lot of kids ran to me . but . When I scream "I play Arma 3" I get all the es
Gundahar;-;Best tatical shooter / military sim out there!
GD61;-;Arma has always been in my mind after i bought arma 2 and arma 2 operation arrowhead. theres a lot of features u cant get in other games than arma 3 so 9/10 would put my money in to this!
Ethan;-;I bought it expecting my PC to handle it. It couldnt take 41 hours of island life so I went back to arma 2 for now. Real review: Make sure your computer is good, and no the one recommended to you by the best buy geek squad for 4000 dollars wont cut it. Just build your own like me but make sure your price range is over 700 dollars, gl.
Pathfinder82;-;Game is all well and good. But I really hate the fact that they put the game this far in the future! The weapons are absolute crap! I'm shocked that they didn't just say to hell with it and give you ing lazer guns. I love the addition of scuba options and implementing body armor and customizing your own outfit and the campaign is interesting plus voice acting is much better than ARMA 2. Id give this a 6 out of 10 because I am not happy that I am gonna have to download a  load of mods to play the game with equipment and vehicles that should of been implemented in the first place.
Lakelurks;-;The game is absolute garbage. I thought it would be fun, I guess not. Stick with Arma 2: Operation Arrow Head if you want better experience!
Zsavage1;-;Can't say enough good about this game, So much more fun than the run and gun games. I enjoy making missions and playing them with my friends, The Mod community has to be one of the best ever... other than some bugs here and there which I know the game is constantly being improved upon makes it one of my favorites, If you are tired of the generic run and gun shooters and want a game that actually makes you have to think , ammo count, health, team members, this is the one. I got tired of the others. (won't mention their names ) they kept tweeking them and wrecked the games for me. So you could say I got tweeked right out of them. I am a little over a half century old and have been gaming for many many years. The Operation Flash Point days were a blast, and to see this evolve into what it is today is just great. If I could add anything to this game, It would be the ability to jump, and maybe a flame thrower tank. and the ability to put C4 on a small drone :) I recommend this game for FUN
Bubbles;-;this game is really fun on all the game modes but the best one that i have played by far is the epoch mod .
MyStErY;-;This game is one of the best Military shooters. It requires a clear head and patience. 10/10
R00K;-;This is a fantastic combat sim that has as much or as little depth and complexity as you would like. It's a shooter for grownups. Going back to COD et al will seem like a big step down to an arcade shooter. The learning curve is fairly steep with all sorts of key bindings and responsibilities, but boy is it satifying when you actually achieve something. Great game.
malachi05wht;-;good game but not for bad pcs good for gaming pcs it runs fast for me i recommend this game
Eluwien - Veriveli;-;I has so many bugs its horrible, but somehow I can't stop playing the mods. By far easily to best FPS game, the graphics are breathtaking, the realism (which is possible) is top par and the game mods create so much value for so little money. +1 , would play, would pay, would suggest for friends.
xH3ADSH0T;-;11/10 Ran away from the cops for smoking weed.
James Bond;-;this game is top notches provides real statistics a must have for all millitary Gurus its worth it
CustomsOS[649];-;Arma 3 is basically GTA 5 with a military mod. 11/10 for the GTA 5-ness.
jacobfx777;-;Well, this game took over my life... No ragrets... 10/10
Tinn117;-;this game rocks!
simon322;-;This is my most favourite game to date , I love it ! , the new DLC is great in particular the new Opfor Heli but it seems a little expensive , What I really would like to see is a return to the the old days with Maps like Fallujah and Takistan etc and the more familiar vehicles such as Abrams Humvees and British Challenger and Jackals included rather than be downloadable as a Mod . The Altis and Stratis maps look super but they look more like a Holiday Resort as opposed to a war zone and they lack the Atmosphere of the A2 maps . I would glady pay for a more for an "old style" map, I'm sure I'm not alone with thoughts on the direction Arma is going ( With Altis Life and such almost more popular than Arma Military Sim) they are more suited to the A3 maps and there popularity is understandable. Lets get back to WAR !
DcDeathscythe;-;The ArmA Series has always been the best military simulator to date with the most realism I've seen. With ArmA 3 they have out done themselves again. The game is so well optimized that it barely puts any stress on my system, and the graphic quality, and sound realism is unparalleled. You can play for hours in Singleplayer, then jump onto Multiplayer with your friends co-operatively work through a mission or against each other as enemies. With the steam workshop so tightly knit into the game itself, you can download other player created missions be it Single or Multiplayer. There is no end of fun to this game!
Arnold Schwarzenegger;-;Great Game For anybody that likes Simulation type gameplay!
MontyPizzle;-;Its a decent game, however not worth the $60 WAY too expensive, Arma 2 is the exact same game basically... and cheaper
Cricket;-;What's not to like about a true military tachtical First Person Shooter. ARMA 3 delivers a excellent game that does just that. This is not your typical run around killing spree like most FPS games lead people to beleive. With it's extensive maps, ARMA 3 gives gamers a vast variety of landscapes, dynamic scenery including day to night trasistions. In ARMA 3 you need to slow it down and take your time or your self dead with no chance to respawn. NO RESPAWN? that's right, realism is a real as it gets. But don't worry, respawns can and do exist. But sometimes it's better to wait for a medic, if one is available. Trust me when I tell you that ARMA 3 is as real as it can get.
FriKenas;-;Better then CS:GO.
GramMan;-;Best Reality Game
Cricket;-;What's not to like about a true military tachtical First Person Shooter. ARMA 3 delivers a excellent game that does just that. This is not your typical run around killing spree like most FPS games lead people to beleive. With it's extensive maps, ARMA 3 gives gamers a vast variety of landscapes, dynamic scenery including day to night trasistions. In ARMA 3 you need to slow it down and take your time or your self dead with no chance to respawn. NO RESPAWN? that's right, realism is a real as it gets. But don't worry, respawns can and do exist. But sometimes it's better to wait for a medic, if one is available. Trust me when I tell you that ARMA 3 is as real as it can get.
Kai;-;Great game for some tactical gaming.
Mark Burns;-;Great setup, just wish it was a bit more realistic in the avatars movements etc... Other than that, pretty great game.
akapanda;-;ArmA 3 is my favorite game of all time. Out of the box ArmA offers an immersive, deep and tense military simulation experience that can't compare to any other videogame. The feeling of being under fire with your life-that's-worth 2-hours is so immersive that I often scream of fear and fun. But to only play the base game is not understanding ArmA. ArmA is a platform for content. There are literally hundres of mods for ArmA 3. Most of those mods are of top-notch quality. Do you want to play on a tropical island? During world war 2? Naval Warfare? Transform ArmA into a flight sim? You name it, it can be done thanks to the amazing game structure bohemia interactive provides. That said, ArmA is not for everyone. But everyone I have recommended it and with whom I've played it (about 5 people now) loves it to death (literally). On top of all ArmA looks the best of almost all pc games. Not because of all the pretty bumpmaps and lighting effects, but because of the scope - one moment you are underwater in a submarine while on the other you may be riding in a tank and firing on detailed bases and enemies while using thermal vision or picture-in-picture. You do need a 1000-dollar rig to even attempt to play this game, but then again: this game is not for everyone. If you've ever wanted to go to war without risking your life or destroying other people's, go buy this game now.
Kats;-;The Mods make this game more amazing.
my_zero_sum;-;If I got stuck with one game only in my library it is this. The possibilities it offers and the community that support it make it a winner. That said it has it's issues. Needs a strong CPU and decent to perform very well, going against the rule of thumb in modern pc gaming. Additonally there are lots of bugs and issues that still need address. Unfortunately a lot of them have existed in previous titles too. There is positive development progress all the time though. Arma 3 aims for and achieves something which no other game does.
Bossmund;-;Great game ! its a must buy for everyone who has some time on their hands !
Arpeojus;-;This is one game franchise ive stuck with since the start. Back in the OFP days. The game has always deliverd with the best game play/simulation of any other like it. Arma is worth its full price. Sure it has some bugs, but the amount of fun this game can bring is well worth a few problems.
shgun *GosuGamers.net;-;This might seem incredibaly dull and difficult, but after the frst time you and group of friends get pinned down in a village while in convoy, and your friend expertly lands a Hummingbird right in the street and you all pile in while round whizz past your heads, and you soar into the air to safety, its almost indescribable (especially since the whole thing is unscripted). It can be one of the most rewarding experiences in gaming, but its what you make of it. Don't be expect to hop in and instantly enjoy yourself. The game only gives you the tools, and you make what you want with said tools.
Edvard;-;Ooh you get DLC:s coming nice! Ooh I have to pay for those :( What OVER 10EUROS FOR ING CONTENT THAT SHOULD HAVE BEEN IN THE ING GAME FROM THE START? Aah you got expansion coming nice... How much do we have to pay for that? Let me guess... If you own arma2 and arrowhead you will get some % off? NO CAUSE  YOU! WE DON'T GIVE A FLYING  IF YOU PLAYED ARMA2 and pre ordered ARMA3! WE ARE HERE TO MAKE MONEY AND  THE CUSTOMERS! Still recommend this game if you like Arma at all. Good Work Bohemia! You have become full BS  YOU http://i.ytimg.com/vi/9jpk0_oDRhA/hqdefault.jpg
[syrp] one man genocid;-;This game has been great all the way through. You start the multiplayer completely lost in the number of controls, people running in the base and the helicopters flying overhead. It is a good thing the community if very understanding of this and helps new players get oriented all the time. Playing singleplayer is fun but the real stuff is in the multiplayer. Once you get tired of the vanilla game then go and try some mods. Play with six is a mod manager that works great for it. Most of the mods I have run into are highly detailed and work amazingly. It adds a completly new side to the game as it gives the option for players to get new gear, new weapons, new vehicles, new maps and even new missions. All of which can be used on certain multiplayer servers. 10/10 You will get your moneys worth Cons - hackers (decent server admins deal with them often enough) - some tkers here and there but the majority of the community is good. - game bugs and servers go down (I feel it just acts as a signal I should finally take a break) - You cannot play for just an hour. You will play for hours on end. (not something you can just pick up)
Welkon;-;This game is extremely well-made.
OveyOfficial;-;ArmA 3 Is a great continuation on the ArmA series. ArmA 3 combinds all of the features of its predecessor and adds various UI Improvements, such as being able to add and remove attatchments to your weapon and adding the ability to change various parts of your clothing, Overall it is well worth the money. Iv'e put in well over 1000 Hours and still have the desire to play it. Pros: Large Worldspace | Modability gives 1000's of hours of content | A complex Mission Editor | Realistic Combat. Cons: CPU & GPU Intensive | AI can become predictable at times.
Victorious;-;Really fun fps. Enjoy it much more than Arma 2. The DayZ mod here isnt that great, but you gotta make do with what you got.
Houda;-;Love the game but it could be better, mechanics are flawed sometimes which can lead to frustration but otherwise a great game
Skaze;-;The game overall is really great if you like military simulations, but sadly the perfomance is really, really bad. What this game needs to get a postive review from me: - a 64-bit Client - Better implementation of multithreading - Better netcode Warning: If you have a rig similiar to mine, you'll only get about 40fps ingame, no matter, which settings you use Inter Core i5-4690 GTX 970 8gb ram
Willdell *SteelSeries?;-;Takes some time to learn the controls but once you learn them you're good to go! This game has amazing graphics. The physics are great. What else could you ask for? This game has its challenging times that make it so much better than most FPS games. The world that you play in is HUUUGE!
The_killerz_64;-;Well arma 3 is a great game really realistic BUT after you play 400 hrs+ it gets REALLY boring. Still would get it..... great game great graphics .....................................................................................................................................................................................
Senpai;-;love this game
Force;-;When i play I play for a long time because their is a lot of actions and I meet different people and derp around and set mines under our feet and go WTF, I will play tomorrow
Kiba;-;In Arma 1-2, you can crawl, walk, run and now in Arma 3 you can swim... Yet you still can't ing jump. 8/10. Would be 10/10 if you could jump.
NJOverclocked;-;Don't expect much from the campaign. But wow, if you have a good PC, the multiplayer and mods (like Arma 2 did) will quite possibly change the way you look at video games.
Tangnco;-;Amazing. Graphics are very realistic. The Game play itself will be hard to grasp at first however after you have gotten the hang of it, it can indeed be very rewarding as well as realistic. Overall in general i would recommend arma to anyone who wants a true sandbox playground to engage in different military situations and other community made missions.
MrFun;-;THIS GAME IS AS GOOD AS MY DAD,,,,,,101=44A I LOVE IT IN THE BUTT!! YYYYYYAAAAAASSSSSSSSS
uriel432;-;The battle royale mod is one of the reason it makes it great
GramMan;-;Best Reality Game
DabsBudowski;-;Love this game. So many different things you are able to choose from. if you havent tried it, you are sadly missing out!
Niggl;-;I played like 450h ArmA then i thought about scripting and that is the moment when ArmA becomes a tool not a game. Just awesome everything you can imagine is Possible.
Devenom;-;Breaking point make this game 10/10
angry_lizard;-;Have you ever felt like running 4km with 40kg of gear only to get shot from 1km away? Have you ever felt like balancing 24 different factors before firing a single shot in an FPS? Have you ever felt like knifing noobs just doesn't cut it anymore? (pun intended) If you answered yes to any of these questions, you may need treatment in the form of Arma 3, an open-world, simulation FPS. Arma 3 (short for Arma 3) is the crux of over a decade of refinement by one of the most dedicated development teams out there - and it shows. Visually, it is stunning (of course depending on specs), aurally it is surreal, and when it comes to RPing and simulation, there is no better option (except maybe VBS made by the same people; but that costs $$$$$ and is used by actual armies so yeah maybe not...). Need more incentive? As well as a dev team that updates news for the fan base weekly and is STILL improving the game (and plans to continue doing so), there is also the modding commmunity for Arma - which is second to none. Arma 3 can literally be anything you want it to be - even a taco. 11/10 would die 12,008 times again.
[CC] Diplock :P;-;Operation Flashpoint with better graphics and the same AI xD unfortunately the only ground war simulator who exist. Buy it there is no alternative if you search for a good war game.
ZynovFTW;-;10/10. Hands down my favorite game right now. The mods are just amazing.
Risk08;-;Really good game to be honest. If your an army fan boy it's for you. If you like fps games it's also for you. Runs well on even budget systems and if you have any crash problems there is plenty of information online. The singleplayer is OK but i'm for the multiplayer.
MassacreGaming;-;Got global banned for no reason LOL GG battleeye now i cant play DayZ or other BE games...
PolarSkillz;-;this game is the best military simulator ive ever played
Savior;-;ArmA III is an amazing game by itself, but when you start trying out some of the community mods that is when you really see it's potential. Mods like Altis Life, King of the Hill, Epoch, Overpoch and so many more turn this one game into an entire game bundle w/ plenty of different game styles. I have been in the ArmA community for years and have contributed whenever I can. I love the game, love the community & love the new CQ Mod for Arma 3 set to release very soon! My opinion on the CQ Mod may be a bit biast considering i'm on the dev team, but i still know a good mod when i see one. Check it out for yourself; CQ Mod Gameplay video https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=3wEUajuUqDY CQ Mod Armory Selection System https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=mU1KSAjHaIM
leebas;-;This is a good game of realism of wars which make sense over a realistic view This game is a have to buy, great community groups, good gameplay
shutupandfish (trading);-;Great game, only if i didnt buy it one day before before 50% off :(
GhostDog;-;This game is a fairly realistic war sandbox
HaZe Moose;-;Great Game Very Realistic And amazing
Veseran;-;Amazing, best shooter I have ever played.
masonmccloud;-;Great FPS!
zer0 | popflash.site;-;There is no reason to not get this game. If you like Military Shooters, this is the masterpiece you were missing from your collection.
MrLuke82 -ARK ADMINS NEEDED-;-;AWSOME GAME with many MODS :D
feasega (AWAY FOR 18 DAYS);-;i boat this gamma fur 60 donalds
Sledge Hammer[MVP];-;ArmA rating as a game-6/10 ArmA rating as a sandbox-11/10
Curtis Proasheck;-;Amazing game, Better with friends. Even though Bohemia has made the game unfinished so modders can expand on i. its still the best game possable without mods "That is the closest ive ever been to being back in a warzone" ~A ex-military friend 11/10 Would ArmA again (ive already got 380 hours on this too!)
Ghost CSGO-RAFFLE.COM;-;Best game ive ever played.
Gas Powered Stick [TTG];-;Scares the crap out of me when im being shot at
-QRF-DukeSemperFi;-;Amazing game. Endless game modes with mods and diff types of game play. A must have for FPS lovers. And with the EPOCH mod thousands of hours of fun are to be had.
SuperNinjasInTopHats;-;An amazing game, full of content and fun. One of the best things to do is to download mods and mess around with frriends
CSGO Virgin;-;This game has ups and downs. The up is that Arma has a huge modding database. Com is that you need a good peice of hardware to run it. Overall I recommend this game just for it's realism and simulation.
DexxozGaming;-;Well, after a short time in this game i could instantly see that it's rubbish, tho i gave it a couple of minutes of more testing and while it was enjoyable.. i can't find a single reason to give this game even one more minute of my time.
sakjdbasd;-;DON'T ASK ANY THING ! JUST BUY IT!
Idomass;-;This is the best game ever!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! i did everthing that you can possiably imagine in Arma 3
Fluit;-;Great military simulator. Even better with mods that improve immersion.
Senpai;-;One of my favorite games. There is soo much different game modes and mods to play. 10/10 -RiNOFocus
C. McHellsten;-;If you are looking for something to do. If you are bored. If you like some resistance. If you really like teamwork. If you don't like teamwork but can be around people. THIS IS THE ULTIMATE GAME!!! You will always have something new to learn, fix, repair or just curse with this game! In game, you can create what the duck you what. Trying to install mods, it takes time and is super complicated and rarely every functions properly, but in the end it's worth it. I have yet to see a more complicated but fun game to play with people. Even if you are a lone wolf and just wants to sit on a hill and shoot people while your friends are running Rambo in a town. Just saying... 2000+ hours in A2, 1000+ hours in A3, and I never feel like giving up on arma. I would marry this game. Because I would have the same complicated arguments with a wife as with this game. 12/11.9 points!
BRASSZERKER;-;awsome i been playing on the free weekends its come out i dont see anty thing wrong with it
A FAT DONKEY 55;-;This game is the best Arma game in the entire series it is truly an amazing game. The graphics are suprisingly good and the gameplay is very fun especially if you like realisic war games that takes teamwork and strategy to stay alive. But I would not recomend this game to the daily Call of Duty fan boy guy, this game is slow paced and takes LOTS of strategy and teamwork, unlike Call of Duty's run and gun and lone wolf type of game. If you are familiar with Arma 2 this is everything you love with better graphics and physics, for example. Arma 2, you shoot a man he stands there for a sec then falls down and dies with no blood affect. Arma 3, you shoot a man he realistically falls (some what rag doll physics) and there is a realistic blood affect. Overall I think the game is great and I give it a 10/10.
Jarv;-;It was just a normal day in Invasion and Annex (A coop gamemode entirely community made that teams up the whole playerbase against AI, usually 50 as the player cap), I had taken Explosive Specialist and I was waiting at base to get teamed up with a squad. And holy I couldnt of gotten a better one. First delpoyment was a cakewalk, so we decided to just get dropped off near the objective without ressuplying at base. "We will take an airdrop" they said. So we half-resupplyed along the way. The next thing we know, we have been pinned down and holding our ground by literally all of the enemy forces in the point since the other squad wasnt doing a good enough job. Our medic got killed by a granade launcher, we ran out of first aid kits. So we threw some smoke and dragged the wounded away while me and our machinegunner covered, it was chaos. We held for about 20 minutes until ing base finally decided to send in medical evac. But not even that, instead of a chopper to get us out of that ing place, they sent another medic. At that point, I had ran out of ammo and was borrowing HE granades from the squad leader to use as mortars for targets that were 500 meters away. Somehow we managed to push into the village, kill everything, and evac. I dont think a game has made me consistently feel knees deep in  for 2 hours or so. If you like to get shot down from the sky by AA guns and having really ing cool scenarios, get this game right now. TL;DR enjoy being pinned down by troops for hours while you have no supplies and your allies back at base are circle jerking. Buy it.
'Murican Chicken;-;One of the best Mil-Sim games out there! You like shooting, flying, driving, blowing stuff up or just taking in the scenery; this game is sure to suprise. Plus there are several great mods and missions to explore.
Anthony210;-;The best war simulation game out there. You can do pretty much anything. The numerous mods and user created contect only make the game even better.
Falladis;-;In Altis life we found a cop repairing his vehicle. Me and my friends with ghillie suits got out of our stuck and told him to put his hands down. My friend hand cuffed him and stole his kidney. We lock picked his police truck and took the keys. My friend shoved him inside the car and we decided to try get him into the city to show off to everyone that we managed to capture a cop. On our way there my friend crashed the car into the wall going 100 km/h and the car exploded and killed us all. 11/10 IGN would bang again.
Warhammer;-;I wanted to rewrite my review, since my prior review didn't give this game justice, and honestly makes made me look 8 when I wrote it. First off this game is amazing in the right mind set, you need to enjoy running 3 km, and then dying to someone 1km away, its can be a pain, but its fun if you now how to play. I love the aspect that you can create and play your own missions, and I think this really can bring a community together. One of the biggest aspects that make this game as big as it is modding, Dayz was the biggest breakthrough in modding for Arma 2 and it created a whole new chapter in Arma, and what it would become. There is so many mods you can play such as A3L, Dayz, Wasteland, Dom, Battle Royale, And those are just a few mods that the community could create My Pros and Cons: Pros: Great Community Modding SinglePlayer COOP Missions Weekly Updates Good DLC Cons: Terrible FPS Anti Cheat is flawed Servers tend to not show up Joining on friends is a pain Things I'd like to see. I'd like to see a COOP aspect added to singleplayer, playing alone is kinda boring at times. Ability to turn off fatigue in single player, The AI's tend to get ahead since fatigue can really mess your player up. Fixing Fps, This has been a recurring issue in Arma games, the fps is terrible (You can check my specs, its not my computer) I hope this gets fixed soon, but I don't have much hope.
[BST] COCK MERCHANT WATEREMLON;-;It's a really good military sim. It kinda better then Arma 2 but still have a little bit of bugs.. But, beisde that... THIS GAME SUCK! JUST KIDDING! Arma 3 is where it is at! BEST MILITARY SIM OUT THERE! KEEP UP THE GOOD WORK, Bohemia Interactive! I LOVE YOU FOR MAKING ARMA! When, I first saw Arma in a gaming magzaine.. I always wonder would I ever play this game. Got a PC played Arma 2 free version boom fell in love with it! Three days later brought Arma 2 and Arma OA loved both of it. The Mods, the game, the capaign, and etc! ONE I HEARD ARMA 3 CAME OUT! IT FELT LIKE I WAS HAVING AN ! I WAS EXCITED! THANK YOU AGAIN, Bohemia Interactive. FOR MAKING AN AWSOME GAME LIKE ARMA! I really hope great things will come out from this game in the furture. :)
Horde;-;I'm former US Army and after seeing this, its makes me feel good that someone can simulate the experience of running around in full battle rattle and feeling the heat.
KDUBZZ;-;Awsome game... buy it
dooz3;-;Fantastic game, from casual to hardcore sim this game can and will fit your needs in a game. Only thing i dislike about the game is the price of the DLC
ColeSmith;-;This game will take you life but it is worth every week you put into it.
M. lli;-;This review is a Yes and a No, but mostly No... Can I start off with saying that this game is unoptimized as crap, it's so difficult to run, even on updated components and high end PCs... There are not many gamemodes. I wish there were more large gamemods that you could play with a lot of people, but there are no point in making those gamemodes because the game is so unoptimized with tons of people. If you try to go in the most played gamemode on Arma 3, the RP servers, it's toxic as hell. To cancerous... Now, the good things. - The combat is amazing, I love the player vs. player combat, 7/10, better with realism mods. - The mass amount of realism mods there are for missions. Mods are a big part, and the game is bland without them. - The missions on the non-default Arma 3 maps are amazing, ecspecially with realism mods. OVERALL, you have to have mods to have fun on the game...
Kneox;-;Best game I ever bought 10/10 love it :)
Alexandros Mavros;-;I don't even own this game. lel
I Sexually Identify as a YF-23;-;Like Euro Truck Simulator 2, except with guns.
JamesQ-Q;-;Awesome Game, played over 400 hours! Definatly worth the money. Its may take sometime to get into, but when you do its amazing!
anchor;-;It's worth <#
[S]ensei Kyuu;-;Would play it 24/7 10/10 .. Just buy it.
miotti;-;possibly the greatest game ever made....
wotm8;-;It gave me countless hours of entertainment
rzeeryp2;-;This game will test your computer's CPU. But feels like a good game, until I get off it, then I notice...I haven't done anything in the game. lol
Zkrii;-;One of the best tactical shooters I've played since Arma II. :)
Rexy The Foxy;-;I'll go ahead and say that I've played this since the Alpha stage of the game and I have to say that ArmA III has come a long way since then. ArmA III is a great way for you to explore a more detailed tactical shooter. This is more than shooter with pretty maps and sights. This is more than just a "Shoot 'em up and knock 'em down" kind of game This IS a simulation, a simulation of what armed combat can look like in reality, unlike the movies and shows. YOU are down there, boots on the ground, standing shoulder to shoulder with your squadmates and fighting to either seize a town or fighting for your life when you're the only one left. The sounds are down right amazing and the detail on the rifles are wonderful. When you are with friends and fighting alongside others, communication is KEY to succeeding and achieving victory! Communicate with the people driving the tanks or any armored vehicle and combine arms to tackle enemy armor and air units, as well as communicating with the ones flying attack helos and jets. Combine all of those elements and you've got yourself an unforgetable experience of awesomeness. And all of this gets better if you find yourself a Mil-Sim unit! You can specailize yourself in any MOS (Military Ocupational Specialty). From Rifleman to AT Specialist, helicopter and/or fighter pilot, you can learn all of this in this game! Of course threre are mods which alters the realism of this game to a more hardcore level which I highly recommend you doing. Ladies and gentlemen, if you are looking for a detailed Mil-Sim tactical shooter, then ArmA III is for you, remember, communication is the KEY to success! Good luck, fellow virtual soldier!
Zapness;-;I have played 24 hours in the past two days. That means that half my time spent awake has been playing this game. What does that tell you about how good it is? Play it. Now.
albertmoebius;-;best milsim on the market
Cheesy;-;An in depth, difficult to learn but very fun warfare simulator. Plenty of gamemodes to keep you occupied, and has an amazing, supportive community with plenty of user made content waiting at your finger tips. Single player missions are very difficult, but the satisfaction of finally finishing a mission keep you entertained and wanting more. 9/10, highly recommended for anyone who enjoys shooters, but wants a more realistic and challenging version of your average tactical shooter.
gadessa;-;its ok
ANThRiDe;-;An amazing FPS, Action, Multiplayer game. With Sick Graphics! ArmA 3, a game like no other, buy the game and experience Ground Combat, Air Combat, Artillery, and so much more! It also comes in with a group of Gamemodes, like Wasteland, Epoch Mod, Overpoch Mod, Altis Life, ArmA 3 Life, etc. Buy this game! You won't regret it.
Kebbs;-;It's great! It's like sex, except I'm having it!
Brax;-;Review: Arma 3 This is an Honest Review PROS Super Detailed.  Realistic Military strategies.  Singleplayer AND Multiplayer.  So many weapons and vehicles.  You will never run out of things to do. If you so desired, you could dress up as a civilian and go to the beach with your friends.  Vehicles and air vehicles handle OK. CONS The engine is very poorly optimized. Getting a good FPS is tough in this game.  Most servers aren't the best.  Can be very confusing for new players, as there are many keys you need to know.  The community isn't the greatest.  The players can take the game very seriously. If you mess up or fool around, you could get banned. MY RATING: 7.5/10 DO I RECOMMEND IT: Yes!
Blue Dragon [BoW];-;Loveing it with 800+ hours on it mre content PLEASE
CombatWombat;-;The closest you can get to a battlefield without putting yourself in danger.
fry;-;This game is great. Unlike most modern shooters, Arma 3's engine and combat mechanics are complete poop. This leaves the most strategic player the victor instead of the player with the best twitch reflex. Rewarding strategy over reflex in a FPS is refreshing.
Blade #nvm;-;you can shoot snakes
Pean GE Hype;-;A must have game if you have the pc to run it!
Raxyn Shadowthief;-;This review was immediately after finishing the Game Over mission, the last mission of the offical Campaign. 30 hours of a campaign just for me until I finished. And something that long of dying many times and having to recreate my own plan or try new things to win, was proper and worth it. This was the most dynamic FPS game I've played for now. You could command your own squad, Pilot UAV vehicles, Pilot vehicles, & Customize weapons (rather poorly in campaign of course). Storyline showed much, and that was good, it was quick and started getting into the combat and ideal of what was happening. Every time you started a mission, a quote was shown from, "history" of the real world. They were good meaningful quotes... The gameplay is nice; however, it's a FPS, just average killing. It let's you go third person, but you always need to look down the middle of the gun into the scope just to get something properly. When your flying a heli or plane, it's hard at first, so a bit of practice will help. Depending on land vehicles, being a tank or vehicle that has a gun is just easy. If you can get in a vehicle period, just run the enemy over... It's funny and sad to see the AI, even the AT which have Rocket Launchers get run over even when they're supposed to shoot at you. They don't even run away from you, they just stand there accepting it. Welcome to, "War"... No reason to bother about graphics, it looks good, besides, it's a (1)FPS, the more (2)FPS you have, the better (3)FPS you can play. ( 1 - First Person Shooter. 2 - Frames Per Second. 3 - First Person Shooter. Cause... FPS? has meanings! Right?) Skipping that anyway... I would recommend this; however, like all games... It's going to get boring, and there will be no reason to play it other than making your own missions.
Steve French;-;Great Military Sim. That being said, way too many people under 18 which really hurts the maturity level of the game. Lots of stupid stuff to deal with in Player Vs. Player. Ovearll I would recommend to anyone looking for a realism many other FPS can't give you.
zeeb;-;I have never before felt so engaged in combat, best FPS out there. The only problem is DLC, you need them and they like to milk you, do not expect to just buy 1. Without DLC milking I would honestly give 10/10, as of now it's 8/10. I pray Arma 4 wont be having DLC issues. COD is for kids. BF is for teens. Arma is for adults.
NexusNZ;-;rip fps 10/10 would rage over low fps again
Snow Piercer;-;This is the best Army-Stratgy-War game you will ever find trust me. you NEED to GET THIS
K1eaner;-;By far the best sandbox shooter to ever come out. The game is enriching and engaging, there is no shortage of mods and the game keeps getting better by cnostant developer updates and the community contributions. Everyone in their right mind who claims to be a PC Gamer should play this game.
Alpha Husky;-;Better than Battlefield. Better than Call of Duty.
7-Eleven;-;its da bomb....is good
[TCG] Jinxx The Wolf;-;SUPER fun game with friends, and still a really fun game without them. Good Graphics, Realistic sounds, all and all just one hell of an amazing game would recommend to anyone that can run it
KanColle;-;Too many controls for me Good simulation though
andrew;-;this is one of the best war simulator in the world
hubertkenobi;-;Where is my Deluxe Edition Extra content that I paid for???
Saddam[LTU];-;This game is huge. It has endless possibilities. It COULD provide lots of fun but what happens in the end, is the absolutely poorly optimized engine which completely fails to deliver smooth experience. I own a 980GTX + i7 and 16gig of ram and no matter what settings I set up, I always get 20-30 fps, and in intense firefights it slows to a miserable 10-15. The game was launched back in 2013 and it really hurts to see Bohemia fail to deliver a smooth experience for everyone. Its a joke, really. Almost two years and we still have these problems. Shame.
inquisition6;-;A fantastic game, easy to get into, difficult to master. Best tactical combat game out there, bar none.
XxREDxZON3xX;-;This game is probably one of the best simulation shooter out there. Team work is key and just playing this game is gonna be a one to master! If you like the most realistic tatical shooter than this is the game to get and play! Its not battlefield 4, but hell it has many steam work shop items to simulate real events like the Osama Bin-Laden simulation that you can play amongts with other people. Just a great game overall definently pick a copy up when its $30 or lower for sure!
rustie;-;Great game, great mods, great community. This game has so many possibilities I couldn't even give you an estimated guess. The pseudo-realism in this game is absolutely fantastic, and can make for some pretty clever shenanigans when put to the test. With modern graphics, gameplay mechanics, and a hearty helping of (good, although somewhat over-priced) DLC, it definitely has a top spot contender in my book. In single player, the campaign missions are beautifully paced (something which we rarely see in this genre). While playing them, I felt very engaged and felt a very present sense of urgency. This sense of urgency really helps to propel the first chapter, because you feel as if the world around you is slipping away- right as you and your comrades fight to take it back. On top of that, there are some very interesting mechanics and side missions you can do during the campaign, one of which will let you do a sort of "freeroam" mode where you can complete various "user-generated" missions. These missions will pop up out of nowhere, as you are running along on your ATV, deep into enemy territory as you suddenly come upon a military checkpoint with heavy armaments. You can either choose to systematically take the sentries and those pesky LMG carrying grunts, or you can choose to rush right in and take it for mother russia. But you could also just run around it, seeing as how you have an ATV, but alas, how much fun would that be? This game has some of the best gamemodes and user-created mods that I have ever had the pleasure of playing and competing in. With such smash-hit game modes as Wasteland, King of The Hill (just to name a few)- and my personal favorite, Breaking Point, the fun almost never stops. However, I did definitely have the most fun on Breaking Point. A Day-Z esque master piece, with a beautiful blend of PvP and PvE. Battling zombies is not as cumbersome as they may be to a low-gear player in DayZ, and I think it for the better. When you have low level gear, they are just something to avoid as you survey the outskirts of town on the large, 300km map Altis, or the many other maps that the mod offers. While playing with a group on this mod, as well as other game-modes, I have had some of the best online gaming experiences I have ever had. And that's hard to beat. All-in-all, I think that this is a must-have for anybody who loves to play with a group of friends on a saturday night and have fun killing a bunch of noobs military-style!
DatGhilliedGuy;-;Okay so this is my first review. I have played the game for a while now, and i really do enjoy playing, I came in not having really any simulation experience, and this game, well it got me hooked. This game can cater for everyones needs, it hosts a variety of mods to enjoy and much more. I started out buying the game, downloading and got straight into the action i played invade and annex, a mission where you have to complete tasks with a squad you get assigned to. Everyone is normally very friendly and i admitted straight away im new, and got help by a very friendly group of guys and they truly did help. Next i played something that was blowing up at the time, Altis Life, i had one friend, and at the end of 2 or so nights, i left the server with an extra 4 friends who i still am in touch with, Arma 3 is a brilliant game/sim that truly does bring people together. The game itself, is breathtakingly stunning, the graphics are incredible, the physics are good and sometimes just funny. The sounds are immersive and everything forms a package of awesomeness. Obviously like all games there is always going to be bugs, but on this i havent run into many. So from my POV Arma 3 gets a solid 9/10 GG Bohemia
Raio Boss;-;As always, this still is the best military simulator in the world! ArmA keeps affascinating me for its realism. I really suggest you to buy the game if you're a "fan of war", real war. The maps are really detailed and the AI is really ! Actually, too much but there are mods that can help you resolve that problem. Anyway, if you buy this game, PLAY IT WITH A CLAN. Arma 3 really makes you cooperate with other people in order to survive and complete your mission. if you're a CoD fan, you rather change side or forget about ArmA. They are completely different, and ArmA itself is usually not liked by "shoot and run" fan boys. However, ArmA's editor allows you to create your own missions in every detail. Actually, it's not too simple making them, but with some commands and other stuff you can start making some nice missions and enjoy the game with your friends. Furthermore, there are tons of forums and people that can help you improve your editing skills providing you with commands, suggestions, and scripts. ENJOY.
Jarv;-;It was just a normal day in Invasion and Annex (A coop gamemode entirely community made that teams up the whole playerbase against AI, usually 50 as the player cap), I had taken Explosive Specialist and I was waiting at base to get teamed up with a squad. And holy I couldnt of gotten a better one. First delpoyment was a cakewalk, so we decided to just get dropped off near the objective without ressuplying at base. "We will take an airdrop" they said. So we half-resupplyed along the way. The next thing we know, we have been pinned down and holding our ground by literally all of the enemy forces in the point since the other squad wasnt doing a good enough job. Our medic got killed by a granade launcher, we ran out of first aid kits. So we threw some smoke and dragged the wounded away while me and our machinegunner covered, it was chaos. We held for about 20 minutes until ing base finally decided to send in medical evac. But not even that, instead of a chopper to get us out of that ing place, they sent another medic. At that point, I had ran out of ammo and was borrowing HE granades from the squad leader to use as mortars for targets that were 500 meters away. Somehow we managed to push into the village, kill everything, and evac. I dont think a game has made me consistently feel knees deep in  for 2 hours or so. If you like to get shot down from the sky by AA guns and having really ing cool scenarios, get this game right now. TL;DR enjoy being pinned down by troops for hours while you have no supplies and your allies back at base are circle jerking. Buy it.
Jman5991;-;Arma 3 is a great millatry simulator it is very in depth and i had a lot of fun with this game! One of the things that was a buying point for me was Altis Life it is a gamemode like cops and roobers where you can do anything from smugle drugs acrros the border to stealing cars or robbing the bank! However The main point that i like the most is how you can acoplish your objective in your own way for the campaign and the multiplayer, you want to go in head first guns balzing you can, you want to go with a stealty helicpoter insercion and some sniper support you can. This is hands down one of the best millitary simulators, and i strongly recomend this game!
Jon Snow;-;Server waiting simulator 2020
Blaze;-;Very good. Good graphics and Realistic but....if you haven't played any ARMA games yet then it might be hard to get used to the controls and gameplay/gamemodes. My Rating: 8/10
BRASSZERKER;-;awsome i been playing on the free weekends its come out i dont see anty thing wrong with it
Vasily Zaytsev;-;While it may lack a bit of polish, overall, Arma 3 provides an entertaining combat sim.
A FAT DONKEY 55;-;This game is the best Arma game in the entire series it is truly an amazing game. The graphics are suprisingly good and the gameplay is very fun especially if you like realisic war games that takes teamwork and strategy to stay alive. But I would not recomend this game to the daily Call of Duty fan boy guy, this game is slow paced and takes LOTS of strategy and teamwork, unlike Call of Duty's run and gun and lone wolf type of game. If you are familiar with Arma 2 this is everything you love with better graphics and physics, for example. Arma 2, you shoot a man he stands there for a sec then falls down and dies with no blood affect. Arma 3, you shoot a man he realistically falls (some what rag doll physics) and there is a realistic blood affect. Overall I think the game is great and I give it a 10/10.
Your Best Friend;-;It's pretty neat stuff. I find it to be a pretty big improvement from Arma 2
Senpai;-;One of my favorite games. There is soo much different game modes and mods to play. 10/10 -RiNOFocus
C. McHellsten;-;If you are looking for something to do. If you are bored. If you like some resistance. If you really like teamwork. If you don't like teamwork but can be around people. THIS IS THE ULTIMATE GAME!!! You will always have something new to learn, fix, repair or just curse with this game! In game, you can create what the duck you what. Trying to install mods, it takes time and is super complicated and rarely every functions properly, but in the end it's worth it. I have yet to see a more complicated but fun game to play with people. Even if you are a lone wolf and just wants to sit on a hill and shoot people while your friends are running Rambo in a town. Just saying... 2000+ hours in A2, 1000+ hours in A3, and I never feel like giving up on arma. I would marry this game. Because I would have the same complicated arguments with a wife as with this game. 12/11.9 points!
Andre|LxL;-;Best war game out there
Delta97;-;Best Military game out there so far!
XCTM912;-;This Game was fun has some bugs online but not to much with 3, more with 2 i cant even get online im stuck with singleplayer after paying all my poket money. But this game made me forget about it as so much better with graphics, and gameplay more involed and more adds, and updates as you play this game threw the years to come.
iCut;-;This game is fun ::)
TJKANZLER;-;Best FPS on the market.
allahu akbar <steelseries>;-;It has a play style for everyone, except for call of duty players. I definently recommend buying this when its on sale as there is no other game in the market like this!!!!
TheSFire;-;Have I played this game enough? ..... Nope
Peakz;-;This game is one of the most fun games i have ever played. This is just a normal shooter you say... You are very wrong. It is a TON of other Gamemodes within arma 3 wich you can download to get a even newer experience.... Look at my hours.. you wont regret buying this game ;)
wilson.christine24;-;this game is the ing best so get it peeps
Kriss;-;Arma 3, where should i start.. The game is awesome to be honest, being arma 2 player, never tried the first one, i bought it in hopes of having realism, roleplaying and teamwork, and i got it all. even tho ragdolls at somepoints look silly. i love this game, if you want realistic war simulation then this is the game for you. if you want roleplay as an officer, criminal or a mindless civilian then this is also the game for you!
JoKeR44 ZA;-;hey devolpers i dont know what is up with this big update sorry if this isnt bothering you but 8.3GB really or is it just the game that is reinstalling please need help!
SentientPhil;-;The worst score-whoring, re-spawning, FPS-game ever. Which makes this the best tactical military sandbox, on Steam, ever! 10/10
MysticalMoonMan;-;Pros - This is by far my go to PC game of all time. Are you looking for a gaming experience like no other? Then go with Arma. I've been an Arma veteran for awhile, and don't regret any minute I've put into the game. Yes you do need a somewhat powerful PC to get the best Arma experience, but the community and the people that you will meet while playing the game are what makes it amazing. Check out the video I linked below with some "Wasteland" gameplay with friends I've met through playing the game! Hope this helped! https://youtu.be/EZHJVrx7wX8 Cons - Controls are , and not as optimized as it could be.
Scumbag Judo;-;It's like killing people... but in a military sim way. I've been here since the beginning, supporting BI for so long, and they have completely failed me with Arma 3. Just some questions for you guys: Why are the vehicle physics so awful? Why can't you move around inside large, open vehicles? Why are the movements and animations so awful? Why can a player press v and step through walls? Why can't you jump, and why does the step up function just move you straight through the object you want to step up onto? Why does a 1 meter fall kill people? How hard is it to fix the "simulation" aspects of your game? Why do you think I would pay for a few extra guns/skins/helicopters IF YOU HAVENT EVEN FIXED THE GAME BREAKING BUGS YET?? WHY DO MODDERS SPEND MORE TIME WORKING ON YOUR GAME THAN YOUR STUDIO???!?!
Hunter *Gone For A Week and 1/2*;-;Do you like explosions? Do you like open world games? Do you like games where you will spend your entire life playing? Do you like games with endless scenarios and gamemodes of what you can do? Then Arma 3 is for you! Arma 3 is one of the best games I have played to date. If you think of it. You can do it in Arma 3. Do you want to Roleplay? Build bases? Or just hangout with friends and explore Atlis. I would recommend Arma 3 to anyone who has played the past Arma games, Any FPS game, and Any Open-World game. 10/10.
Pl1zya5;-;I get to play it for three minutes before it crashes 10/10 IGN
[TD] Dawg;-;Who dosent want to get this game.... Flicking amazing out of the series so was arma 2. This is just BIG BOOTY ES MATE RECOMMANDED 10/10
Mia Khalifa;-;This game is 10/10 worth getting nothing will go to waste on this game. If you get board of some of the game types you get mods to play never ends.
.Zero;-;This is a really good game but dont get me wrong when i say this but this game breaks quite a bit i dont really know if its just me but besides that the game is amazing so many things you can do in it. 10/10
Swag Goat;-;More complicated than an instruction book from Ikea.
lesbian;-;Great game! love it.
Mathew;-;ArmA III is a military sandbox game, aiming towards realism and authenticity. ArmA III thrives in these aspects. ArmA III does, however, lack in official content. It seems to me that your enjoyment is based on a few simple factors: your ability to distinguish quality community made content, you joining a quality community or playing with a couple of friends, and finally your ability to work as a team with those friends to accomplish those missions. The biggest standout missions are the official support modules and the cummunity made DUWS.
EazyDozer;-;Holy  this game. 9.5/10
Marrow;-;Have had a blast playing Epoch, Breaking Point and most recently Wasteland. 1000 hrs and still going. Can't get enough of it.
Squints;-;Great fun game!
brillo_pad  Inhaler_of_food;-;For a Military Game/Sim this is looking second to none. Huge Enviroment mixed with almost limitless posibilities. From a modding point of view this game is INSANE. Not only does it have an intuitive Editor but also a dedicated community providing a stream of free content which is now managed via the workshop part of steam. a must have for any Immersive/RPG gamer. Next Stop Altis.
Rill;-;Don't bother playing in Multipayer if you have bad Internet connection ,
Kojou;-;arma 3 good, but not best, arma 2 best
[SRAT] Fox;-;Although I like Chernarus much more than Altis and Stratis, the game itself is highly improved over ARMA 2, physics being the first thing, but not limited to it.. Movement is much more natural, and so are voices.. Would I recommend it? yes.. But it lacks the love I used to feel for Chernarus itself, the landscapes and environment in general
KenBet;-;Nice graphics,game,a real simulator with a amazing multiplayer, a sin to not have it. Amazing game!!!
LCPL.Jake;-;This game is the most amazing game I have ever played! I do not usually post reviews, and if I do they are usually for negative feedback but arma deserves any and all posative feed back.
Screwby;-;I wrote a review for this game quite a long time ago, but by now that I think about it I like playing Arma for none of the reasons that I had talked about. Previously I had talked about the mechanics that Bohemia had put into the base game, but I've now come to realize that Arma has become one of those games that are instead defined by the people that play it and mod it. You can take my word for it that Arma is well worth your time if you get a group of talented players/scenario creators, but if you need more proof then allow me to ramble on about a particularly rememberable instance that was thanks to the group I happened to have found, if for nothing else but to write a 'love letter' to people so gratious enough to let me tag along. The scenario of the day was as follows: Me along with the rest of our group of about six were highered by the powers that be within NATO and the US (cus reasons I assume) to go to some base on some island to find something. Don't worry, we would know it when we see it. They gave us an A-10 and several helicoptors of sorts so it was expended to run into a lot of unfriendly locals. We were also told not to take anything larger then 7.62 or Homing. So we ended up with a pilot on call, a Squad Leader, MG gunner, a guy with a handy dandy target designator, a medic, and myself. Given that I often times opt to do medic duties I was lost for a role, so I just picked up the highest caliber, semi-automatic sniper I could find, slapped a suppressor and scope on it and went with everyone else to the helicoptors. The pilot checked the helicopter to make sure everything was fine, while we sat in the back making jokes. "I went to Chasington once," someone yelled over the helicoptors rotors. "It was like this!" After an uneventful ride to the forested area we were to land, we make our way up a small hillside to overlook the adjacent valley. Directly in front of us we find a small house surrounded by troops and an armored car. They seem to outnumber us. We each pick a target, mine being a man barely visible behind a window. The fight would begin on the SL's word. After a few seconds he stands up from our position and lets loose a grenade towards the truck, followed in quick succession by my rifle shot and the MG to finish up the rest. In a matter of a few noisy seconds and some well placed shots we clear the house. Then another group on the hillside opposite ours tears into us for tearing into their friends. Immediately we lose our Designator, along with the MG and myself taking a round while we all retreated to a rock for cover. The SL gets on his radio to talk to our Air while me and someone else fire back at the two guys shooting us. We both drop them after a minute, and our very frazzled selves make it to yet another hill that overlooks the base, bringing the armored car with us. I will say this about Arma, they manage to make some impressive views when it comes to scale. When we crested the hill we could see for miles across a sparsely wooded valley with a town and military base at its end. The base was our target. And next to our target was a very scary, and very operable Self-Propelled gun guarded by some troops. We all collectively  a brick foundation and the SL gets on his talkie to radio the A-10. The pilot tells us he'll be there in five minutes and to keep the tank lazered. Good thing we grabbed the designator off our dead guy. To pass the time we muse about the tank, how many people are in the valley, and what the A-10 run will look like. I hobble over to the guy holding the designator and ask him for the range to the infantry. I provides a number and I range the rifle. The A-10 begins to swoop in and we can barely hear it. We can however see two bombs drop from its wings and impact the tank. The plum of fire reaches forty meters in the sky. We all cheer a bit and plan our next move off the hill and to the base. The pilot tell us there are dozens of guys in the base so we decide to hang back for a bit. "Hey, can I take a shot at those guys by the tank?" I ask our SL. "Go for it." With immeasurable glee I grab up the new designator guy and make him my spotter. He constantly gives me the distance to the group of guys running to the tank. I take aim at the lead man and fire off a shot that explodes on the guy's upper body, sending him backwards. As the designator makes a comment about the hit I take aim at the second guy and fire off three more shots. One of them impacts the guy in the leg and he falls to the ground. Satisfied, and with new orders to get in the truck I stop shooting. Unbeknownst to us there are atleast fifty people coming up the hill at us after that airstike. In the interest of time lets just say that we got pretty shot up and retreated back a ways with three out of the original five that landed. After quite some time we get some reinforcments and grab another, much larger helicopter to take us right to the base. Apparently we were running out of options. Its me and the newly spawned Designator dangling over the Chinooks back ramp, our SL and MG gunner on the two guns and our medic in the center. Halfway to the base our medic 'falls' out of the helicopter and manages to safetly land somewhere with a parachute. We have a laugh about it and start to fly over the base. Round start to ping off the sides of the heli as our pilot yells for the side gunners to shoot back. The sparadic firing escalates to a full on machine gun barrage right up at us. Round start to ping around the rear ramp and into the cargo bay. The guy next to me on the ramp takes several rounds and falls out of the back. The pilot yells that we have a fuel leak and we rapidly descend towards the dirt. We impact the ground and thankfully don't explode. Yet. The pilot yells for everyone to get out. We spread out and deal with the few stragglers that are still shooting at us. We weight our options and decide to just walk into the base. As carefully as possible we sneak into the base, taking a round in our direction here or there. After entering the main gate we are greeted by the rotting welcoming committee. In the base's assembly area are about fifty dead bodies and some blown out vehicles. Thank god for air support. We move up to the building and assemble at the front door. Someone inside fires a shot through the door and we rethink our decisions. We decide to throw every grenade we have through the door to the hiding troops. Afterwards, me and the pilot charge into the house and double tap the guys inside. We then start to look around for whatever it is we were supposed to find. They were right, we would know it when we see it. We grab as much of it as we can each hold and haul  out the way we came. We leave in such a hurry no one notices that our MG gunner takes a shot and dies a little ways from the gate. We regroup near some trees on our way to a car nearby. We look back to see where our gunner is, but a round hitting the tree by us convinces us to leave on the car anyways. I jump into the driver seat with the pilot in the passenger spot and the SL riding in the back. I haul  down the road to get away from the base. After awhile we slow down, have a laugh about everything, and the pilot directs me back to base. For continuitie sake the mission apparently ended as follows: the people who hired us said they weren't gonna pay us for finding their package, but our SL threatned to tell on them about what was actually inside. They shut up, pay us, and we go on our merry and blood-soaked way. A funny end to a great time of a scenario created by the pilot. Since then he's made and found a lot more. Sometimes in these scenarios I'm on a .50 cal covering a squad, sometimes I'm defusing an IED in the middle of a crowded street as people watch me, and sometimes I'm even leading a squad. However, thanks to the group I play this game with, it is never dull.
-silentium-;-;This game was terrible in Arma 2 it hogged your computer, it destroyed your computer if you had it on HIGH all around. The devs fixed that! They added more content, a brand new DLC pack coming out, servers with variety of gameplay, scenarios and ideas. The editor is fun to mess around with, the singleplayer is coming to a great story. Zeus is going to make the gameplay massively expanded! Think of everything peopel can do. Thats why this game is amazing.
AllOuT;-;Best military simulation ever made and probably will be for the next 10-20 years, if you have the slightest liking of any military branch, you should totaly get this, its worth it. The controls may seem tricky at first. Very good to play with a team, communication is key, alot of things go boom. So if you like boom then you should think about getting arma 3. 9/10 There could be some less glitches with the mods like, dropped items dissapearing and other minor things.
SUPERGIRL;-;Brilliant tactical warfare simulation.
Traitor;-;10 out of 10 cuz i can :P
yxpoh;-;A really interesting sandbox. Basically build a story on your own, or play other player-made maps... Includes normal deathmatch, coop story games and anything that can be made with your imaginations(requires some level of programming though) Only for those who are willing to learn how to play and not just point and kill, like counter-strike. Recommend to play as a group.
12;-;Awesome only if you play it with friends
Rude Dude Rad Tude;-;THIS GAME IS GOOD I PLAY IT ALL DAY
jordanduc;-;Coming from a very extensive flight sim background, I generally expect too much from games these days. Having the whole planet at your fingertips flying from city to city, country to country... High fidelity aircraft systems correctly simulated.. It sure sets a high bar! But Arma 3 leaves no part of me unsatisfied, the immersion factor is brilliant and playing with the right people very professional! I definitely recommend!
EnderNess;-;Improved version of Arma 2 but the map isn't quite as good IMO.
Reyja 187;-;ARMA 3? Should you get it? That Depends. What is it? A Future War Simulation game. Pros: Large Maps Large Weapon Selection Fully Upgradable Weapons Large Vehicle Selection Large Community Large Variety of Game-Modes. Cons: Goes from very slow-based action to sudden moments of speed... It can be disorientating. You will die many, many times. You will rage many, many times. Your game will bug out many times. You will randomly disconnect from servers, many times. You will have no-idea what you're doing, many times. You will accidentally crash your car and burn to death, many, many times. You will spend 90% of your time customising your character only to die and have to repeat it.
james;-;i likes that it was combat based and had all war vecles the only thing i dilikes was the lack of maps to play one but i know this takes a long time to build maps so i would still recemend this to my freinds as a good game otherwise this is the best well built war game ive ever played not laggy
Jahova;-;Love the game!. Havent had as much fun playing a game as I have this one in a long time. The multiplayer mod servers are where you will have the most fun at!.
AV8R;-;I highly recommend anyone in love with the previous ArmA series games to get involved with ArmA3Alpha and provide feedback to make this game as good as the previous series. Together, we can make it awesome!
Vedo154;-;Arma 3 is a really great game. I loved Arma 2, and I love this game too. It's really awsome and fun to play, the graphics just look amazing, the gameplay mechanics are better then in Arma 2 ( a lot better ). I don't like the DLC thing that they are doing, I mean Arma 3 got so much less weapons and vehicles then Arma 2 + expansions, and the idea of charging us 10-20 for simple dlc like marksmen or helicopters that should be part of the main game ( beacuse there ain't much weapons in the game, atleast compared to Arma 2 ), I understand that you want to make money but atleast make the DLC 3-10 MAX! It's just not worth spending 13 on a simple dlc that adds few guns and a full ghillie, or few new helicopters, or if you are going to make expensive DLC's make them atleast bring much new content with them. ~Ratings~ - Gameplay: 9/10 - Graphics: 10/10 - Story: 7/10 - Multiplayer ( best part ): 9.5/10 - Price: 6/10 ( beacuse of the expensive dlc but if i had to rate the price of the game without the annoying dlc: 8/10 ) ~~My overall rating is~~ 8.5/10... why? - The game is worth buying, but as I said above, it has expensive DLC with not much content in it and it makes it hard to play the game without it ( mostly if you play mp you won't be able to acces the new weapons / vehicles and you are kinda in a disadvantage ). - Sorry for my english, it's not perfect but I'm doing my best :) -
LetoTheSecond;-;This game is pretty bad.
GDUBMX;-;Simply put, this game is like a hot women naked, awesome. Add some nice sexy knickers (mods) and it gets even better!
k.;-;Makes me feel insecure about my pc hardware /10
TheLittleArtist;-;if you want a game game where teamwork is the only solution to any problem, then look no further.
LoneWolf;-;This game is cool
yxpoh;-;A really interesting sandbox. Basically build a story on your own, or play other player-made maps... Includes normal deathmatch, coop story games and anything that can be made with your imaginations(requires some level of programming though) Only for those who are willing to learn how to play and not just point and kill, like counter-strike. Recommend to play as a group.
12;-;Awesome only if you play it with friends
Traitor;-;10 out of 10 cuz i can :P
lilmisschloe;-;Arma 3's campaign is a big, powerful, deeply engrossing thing, but there is one disappointment: its lack of vehicular missions. Since the story focuses on one not particularly interesting character who is ultimately a grunt, there are no tank missions, no helicopter missions and no jet missions. I can understand why, to a point: Arma's vehicles, especially its airborne offering, take time and effort to learn to control. Moreover, in these kinds of games infantry combat tends to be more enjoyable anyway. On the other hand, Flashpoint offered plenty of vehicle engagements during its campaign without any issue, and it's frustrating that, 13 years on, Arma's campaigns still lag behind it in terms of breadth of experience. If you want to get familiar with Arma's military machinery, you'll need to look to the showcase missions, download one of the many community-built scenarios out there, or jump into the enormous multiplayer. There are a vast range of multiplayer game modes to take your fancy. King of the Hill challenges three teams of 16 players to wrest control of a particular objective using small arms, tanks, helicopters, the works. If you're of a more co-operative bent, there are a range of developer missions that require teamwork to beat the odds, including the enormous Escape From Altis mission, which tasks your plucky group with safely reaching the coastline while avoiding the sights of a vastly superior enemy force. Yet the most interesting of Arma's multiplayer modes stem from the community. Wasteland is a survival mode in a similar vein to DayZ, but without the zombies and with considerably more military equipment. Altis Life, meanwhile, eschews the focus on soldiers in favour of a cops-and-robbers scenario, where players tired of making money through picking fruit or mining ore club together to perform elaborate bank heists and player-police hunt them down. A lengthy paid alpha followed by six months of staggered campaign releases has given Arma 3's multiplayer an extraordinary range. This is largely thanks to the fantastic foundation that is the island of Altis, which makes every mission, every multiplayer match, every combat engagement feel unique. There's something about Bohemia's world-building that inspires people. Importantly though, Arma 3's vanilla content now stands on equal footing with those third-party inspirations. It's still a little rough around the edges, but it's a darned impressive package nonetheless.
Isaac.Prickett;-;this is a great game. only got it about a week ago and ever since ive been playing it nonstop... great animations. only question is how to download Takistan Life?
tim641;-;Awesome game. Already played it for 1200 hours, and it doesnt get boring ;)
Sir. Nicolas Remington;-;Arma 3 Is the modern combat simulation of 2013-2014. Actually that was a lie. Arma 3 is anything you want it to be. A First Person Shooter. A Role Playing game... Arma 3 fits all genres. If you want something and have the means to make it. You can. All because of the new Arma 3 Engine. Personaly I think Arma 3 knocks Battlefield & Call Of Duty off the board. Even if most people think the faces on Arma 3 look like total crap compared to other shooters on the market. Graphics don't matter, it's the content of the game that's most important. Plus Arma 3 is open world. No scripts, no dumb game barriers, no seeing through walls crazy AI's. Everyone's game expirence is different depending on their actions. I mean Arma 3's Maps like Altis and Stratis are just plain MASSIVE! I 100% reccomend buying this game regardless of the type of computer you have. Well obviously you need to meet minimal requirements to even play the game. Also people who have Intel HD Graphic's Mobile. You may face some difficulties. Get Ready To See Real Warfare.
Screwby;-;I wrote a review for this game quite a long time ago, but by now that I think about it I like playing Arma for none of the reasons that I had talked about. Previously I had talked about the mechanics that Bohemia had put into the base game, but I've now come to realize that Arma has become one of those games that are instead defined by the people that play it and mod it. You can take my word for it that Arma is well worth your time if you get a group of talented players/scenario creators, but if you need more proof then allow me to ramble on about a particularly rememberable instance that was thanks to the group I happened to have found, if for nothing else but to write a 'love letter' to people so gratious enough to let me tag along. The scenario of the day was as follows: Me along with the rest of our group of about six were highered by the powers that be within NATO and the US (cus reasons I assume) to go to some base on some island to find something. Don't worry, we would know it when we see it. They gave us an A-10 and several helicoptors of sorts so it was expended to run into a lot of unfriendly locals. We were also told not to take anything larger then 7.62 or Homing. So we ended up with a pilot on call, a Squad Leader, MG gunner, a guy with a handy dandy target designator, a medic, and myself. Given that I often times opt to do medic duties I was lost for a role, so I just picked up the highest caliber, semi-automatic sniper I could find, slapped a suppressor and scope on it and went with everyone else to the helicoptors. The pilot checked the helicopter to make sure everything was fine, while we sat in the back making jokes. "I went to Chasington once," someone yelled over the helicoptors rotors. "It was like this!" After an uneventful ride to the forested area we were to land, we make our way up a small hillside to overlook the adjacent valley. Directly in front of us we find a small house surrounded by troops and an armored car. They seem to outnumber us. We each pick a target, mine being a man barely visible behind a window. The fight would begin on the SL's word. After a few seconds he stands up from our position and lets loose a grenade towards the truck, followed in quick succession by my rifle shot and the MG to finish up the rest. In a matter of a few noisy seconds and some well placed shots we clear the house. Then another group on the hillside opposite ours tears into us for tearing into their friends. Immediately we lose our Designator, along with the MG and myself taking a round while we all retreated to a rock for cover. The SL gets on his radio to talk to our Air while me and someone else fire back at the two guys shooting us. We both drop them after a minute, and our very frazzled selves make it to yet another hill that overlooks the base, bringing the armored car with us. I will say this about Arma, they manage to make some impressive views when it comes to scale. When we crested the hill we could see for miles across a sparsely wooded valley with a town and military base at its end. The base was our target. And next to our target was a very scary, and very operable Self-Propelled gun guarded by some troops. We all collectively  a brick foundation and the SL gets on his talkie to radio the A-10. The pilot tells us he'll be there in five minutes and to keep the tank lazered. Good thing we grabbed the designator off our dead guy. To pass the time we muse about the tank, how many people are in the valley, and what the A-10 run will look like. I hobble over to the guy holding the designator and ask him for the range to the infantry. I provides a number and I range the rifle. The A-10 begins to swoop in and we can barely hear it. We can however see two bombs drop from its wings and impact the tank. The plum of fire reaches forty meters in the sky. We all cheer a bit and plan our next move off the hill and to the base. The pilot tell us there are dozens of guys in the base so we decide to hang back for a bit. "Hey, can I take a shot at those guys by the tank?" I ask our SL. "Go for it." With immeasurable glee I grab up the new designator guy and make him my spotter. He constantly gives me the distance to the group of guys running to the tank. I take aim at the lead man and fire off a shot that explodes on the guy's upper body, sending him backwards. As the designator makes a comment about the hit I take aim at the second guy and fire off three more shots. One of them impacts the guy in the leg and he falls to the ground. Satisfied, and with new orders to get in the truck I stop shooting. Unbeknownst to us there are atleast fifty people coming up the hill at us after that airstike. In the interest of time lets just say that we got pretty shot up and retreated back a ways with three out of the original five that landed. After quite some time we get some reinforcments and grab another, much larger helicopter to take us right to the base. Apparently we were running out of options. Its me and the newly spawned Designator dangling over the Chinooks back ramp, our SL and MG gunner on the two guns and our medic in the center. Halfway to the base our medic 'falls' out of the helicopter and manages to safetly land somewhere with a parachute. We have a laugh about it and start to fly over the base. Round start to ping off the sides of the heli as our pilot yells for the side gunners to shoot back. The sparadic firing escalates to a full on machine gun barrage right up at us. Round start to ping around the rear ramp and into the cargo bay. The guy next to me on the ramp takes several rounds and falls out of the back. The pilot yells that we have a fuel leak and we rapidly descend towards the dirt. We impact the ground and thankfully don't explode. Yet. The pilot yells for everyone to get out. We spread out and deal with the few stragglers that are still shooting at us. We weight our options and decide to just walk into the base. As carefully as possible we sneak into the base, taking a round in our direction here or there. After entering the main gate we are greeted by the rotting welcoming committee. In the base's assembly area are about fifty dead bodies and some blown out vehicles. Thank god for air support. We move up to the building and assemble at the front door. Someone inside fires a shot through the door and we rethink our decisions. We decide to throw every grenade we have through the door to the hiding troops. Afterwards, me and the pilot charge into the house and double tap the guys inside. We then start to look around for whatever it is we were supposed to find. They were right, we would know it when we see it. We grab as much of it as we can each hold and haul  out the way we came. We leave in such a hurry no one notices that our MG gunner takes a shot and dies a little ways from the gate. We regroup near some trees on our way to a car nearby. We look back to see where our gunner is, but a round hitting the tree by us convinces us to leave on the car anyways. I jump into the driver seat with the pilot in the passenger spot and the SL riding in the back. I haul  down the road to get away from the base. After awhile we slow down, have a laugh about everything, and the pilot directs me back to base. For continuitie sake the mission apparently ended as follows: the people who hired us said they weren't gonna pay us for finding their package, but our SL threatned to tell on them about what was actually inside. They shut up, pay us, and we go on our merry and blood-soaked way. A funny end to a great time of a scenario created by the pilot. Since then he's made and found a lot more. Sometimes in these scenarios I'm on a .50 cal covering a squad, sometimes I'm defusing an IED in the middle of a crowded street as people watch me, and sometimes I'm even leading a squad. However, thanks to the group I play this game with, it is never dull.
LiViNGSTON #Cloud9;-;Great for Milsim!
dan;-;Breaking Point mod is better than the vanilla gameplay 10/10
OverTime;-;If you have a Pc that can run this game at atleast medium settings 30fps. Best 60$ you have ever spent.
El Vato's Bro;-;Amazing Game! Defintitely would recomend! Expecially during summer sale!
-silentium-;-;This game was terrible in Arma 2 it hogged your computer, it destroyed your computer if you had it on HIGH all around. The devs fixed that! They added more content, a brand new DLC pack coming out, servers with variety of gameplay, scenarios and ideas. The editor is fun to mess around with, the singleplayer is coming to a great story. Zeus is going to make the gameplay massively expanded! Think of everything peopel can do. Thats why this game is amazing.
Gully;-;loving the epoch servers... check out doubletap.com
Pearson;-;One of the best games out if you ask me. If you love military shooter games and love to actually play as team and not just play some type BF or Call of duty where you just run around shoot  you will enjoy this game. Campiagn is a decent lenght(if you play on the hardest settings it will take you weeks lol) but the MP is where the game shines. I personallly play on co-op servers that run Invade and Annex or Patrol Ops and its almost like playing a real war(I highly recommend the 7thcavalry co-op servers). You do get the MP servers that run stupid  like Wasteland(dayz rip off but worse) or Atlis life( Sims ripoff) but thats not what this game is about. Do you love the thrill of hearing the bullets fly past your head or want to pilot a transport helio or attack helio giving the ground forces some cover and take out the armor or maybe you want to jump in a tank to lighten up the enemies forces or a artillery vehicle and use the VIOP to have the forces closer to the fight mark or even use there laser guided scope to spot targets and light them up. This game has finally fillled the hole in my heart for a REAL war shooter that I have been begging and praying for the last 20 years. This is the closeest game you will get to the real thing! I HIGHLY recommend getting this game.
CharlieBPlays;-;Two simple words.... ING AMAZING
Tehsuperassassin;-;nvm this game is pretty cool with friends
TETTRIC;-;Would Recommend. Includes moments where you flip your Car for going a little to Fast on another player.
AwfulRob;-;I've never died so much, nor so often
ChubbyKitty Comp :) [TRADING];-;This is one of the best games i have ever played!!!
Javatar;-;Great game with alot of freaking mods Best game ever Great work keep it up
Zsghu;-;Best realistic shooter of all time.
Sir.Smith;-;Very good game recomend it to other mill sim players
Niz;-;Arma 3 is really cool. Improved graphics over Arma 2 as you would expect with a newer version. If your looking for a war sim check this out. Mods are also available to extend the gameplay.
Ali-Sigma;-;Its the best computer game in history!!! Arma 3 really sends you to war. it has a big terrains,massive multiplayer mods an thousands of addons that makes it perfect.Just mess with Arma!
SoapyWater | Give Me Your Kneef;-;Arma 3, The best Mil-Sim games out. Arma 3 is an amazing game, it brings it to a whole new level with the game being open to mods meaning theres is a huge modding community in the Arma franchise. I recommend to all. ~Soapy
Uncle Rusty;-;I waited to play this after release because of some issues and not having any friends to play it with, I started playing it now a couple days ago and it is fantastic. The mods available for the game give unlimited content. Best shooter out atm imo.
Mrachd;-;Arma 3 is a great RPG & shooting game. There is multiplayer like Altis Life, and mods such as Arma Life. There are great communities to join, as well as new friends to meet. Highly recommend buying this game, however you must have a good computer that is beyond the recommended requirements.
Silent John;-;This game is hands down the best shooter ever made. It is a very immersive game that has features that make it feel like real life. You get injured and if you heal you will walk slower, carry too much and you won't be able to move, realistic stamina, etc. The amount of weapons and vehicles is nice but nowhere near the competitors. Yet those few weapons have the most realistic damage and ballistics of any game I've played. Now after seeing that you are probably asking why I didn't suggest this game to others. Well the game has a lot of cool features and is very promising in all the different ways you can play. But the game is unplayable at times and is very unreliable. In single player a $2000 dollar computer will run at 40-50 fps on all maxed out video settings. (That being one of the major faults of the game itself; a game shouldn't require two to three thousand dollars for a computer to run single player at subpar frame rates.) That same single player also has one of the worst AI systems in a game. If you're in the line of fire prone with your group of guys they will shoot you to get to the enemy. This happens more often than you would think, and its such a problem your squad mates will often kill each other. The enemy AI is far superior in combat and you will find yourself leaving your AI squad behind so you can actually accomplish missions because they tend to get the attention of the enemy AI which seems to target you first no matter what. The enemy AI can see you through bushes 800m away crawling through the 3ft tall grass. So if you want a stealth shooter go somewhere else. In fact if you want a better AI and squad experience go buy the original Ghost Recon because it had a better AI and squad system than this game. WHO CARES ABOUT SINGLE PLAYER JOHN! Ok then, so you give up on the single player and you go to multiplayer expecting a similar experience without having to worry about the AI. You'll start up a moderate sized 40 man server that has a ping of 30 when you join that is about full and your system will bog down to 10-15 fps. You go around a corner checking for enemies in a town and you won't be able to move your gun fast enough and you'll get owned over and over. If you try to be in a vehicle with a person who has a junk computer, good luck seeing anything. All in all, great features on a horrible performance platform, and to make up for it you need a server for a computer.
Autistic Toast;-;The Sims of fps-me A good concept ruined by dlc that should been in the game since launch or free.
Nic_man (Solus);-;Its really hard for me to give this game a negative review. I love ARMA so much, and I still love this game, but it has so many issues and is lacking so much content. I played Arma II for years, I would still play arma III now but I would never pay full price for it again. The AI can be completely braindead, as in cant drive in a straight line prepare to edit your waypoints in the editor at least 40-50 times before they still don't really drive/walk/act properly. Yet this totally braindead ai can spot you crouching in a bush from 1200 metres away and hit you 6-8 times with his small rifle. You will be getting shot at in a lot of situations where you cant even pinpoint a shots direction, and if you do you'll literally never be able to hit the AI like they snipe you, generally even if you have a good weapon (Unless of course you set the skill to being nearly completely untrained that is) The DLC's though were honestly a little bit of a betrayal, so after that huge early aplha time you give us what, two jets? A few vehicles for each faction? Then we get DLC's that REALLY should be inluded in the base game and honestly aren't worth more than 2.99 each, then when karts was released it waved its  in your face by allowing you to place karts assets, and then try and get you to buy the DLC IN-GAME when you try and use the assets.. Arma II, amazing. I will never get tired of the town capturing gamemodes (that aren't in Arma III...) and the huge amount of content for all factions. If arma II was updated with some of the new stances/smaller features of Arma III, it would be an absolute masterpiece. I just cant reccomend paying this price for this game, its not worth it, the DLC's shouldn't even be excluded.
Tebone552;-;Well what I like about it is that it is a Military Simulator and that it has so many different game modes. But what I really hate about it is that the price is to steep. I would recommend lowering the price down to $30-$40 or somewhere in between for about a week. That would really boost sales and I know I will buy it.
SoapKat;-;Good game to meme with your friends. If you want to have fun and meme, play this game.
I live in poundland;-;How to play Arma 3: Step 1: Run through field Step 2: Get shot Step 3: Flinch like an autist on crack because of gun shots Step 4: You die Step 5: Go on editor Step 6: Make it litteraly rain men Step 7: Your comr dies Step 8: R.I.P
theconquerorworm;-;I asked for a refund onteh game becasue it wouldn't load. Specs on PC are fine for all games and I run everything just fine. This game however wouldn't work and after several days of asking for help (forums, ARMA trouble reporting, ect...) and trying every work around I cared to, I was basically told to try re-installing... =/ I didn't buy this game to insta-mod/patch the game just to work. When you buy a game it should just work. Luckily the otehr games I bought worked just fine so my first purchases on Steam weren't a total loss and turn off.
Lead;-;This is the best FP(Tactical)S by far, I don't think there is any real competition out there. Unlike most other FPS's, this gem of a game has longevity. Yes you have a Campaign Mode and other SinglePlayer/Multiplayer scenarios {made by an ever growing army of fans} which you can download from the ARMA III Workshop but you also get to create your own missions in the Mission Editor/Creator, I don't think there are many(if any) other FPS's that offer that much depth in their games.
Rakshasa;-;Oh, so you are soldier ready for some action ? Avid sniper ready to take souls of your enemies from kilometer away ? Helicopter pilot inbound to support your troops ? Nope, you have to buy DLC for that, an overpriced one. Bloody Bohemia, you own best milsim franchise out there, one of the most popular survival games, and you are telling me I need to support you with these DLCs which are just basic content ripped of game. Don't take the path of Ubisoft or EA, you can do better. I think 45 is more than enough for full content of game. Game 10/10 DLCs ripoff 0/10 Get your margeting together.
Dragon Slayer Sniper;-;it's a Great Game love the grathic Details and also the game Engine and i really am impressed with the items and guns that was put into the game it self.
mrsotko;-;First off, I'd like to say that I have invested over 500 hours into Arma 3. It is easily my top favorite shooter / military simulator ever...aside from goldeneye 64 of course. This game is realistic shooter, where you have to adjust and zero your weapon to the distance your enemy is at. the combat takes place up close, and sometimes over 1-2 thousands meters. lots of weapons, a few different factions, tanks, night vision, thermal, long range combat, bombs, jets, helicopters, all the good stuff. this game isnt a call of duty type game where you are locked in a small map or situation, like a boat. this game is played in the open world, where you can go prone, hide from enemies, snipe them, bomb them, anything! Arma 3 is more of a game engine. There are game types involved that have different gameplay mechanics. some of these types are as follows, but not limited to. Wasteland - Wasteland is just how it sounds. its an open world game where you spawn in with nothing but a pistol and must survive against 60+ other players. find guns, stay alive by finding food and water, make a cache of weapons, team up, and conquer the map. if you die, you respawn, with nothing again. very very fun. King of the Hill - koth is massive battle with 3 total factions trying to seige and capture one city. anywhere between20-40 players on each team fight for a town, the faction that keeps more players alive in the town slowly wins. tanks, helicopters, lots of weapons, and jets can be purchased with money you accrue from killing other players. combat sometimes occurs at 2000 meters between tanks across the landscape. another very fun map there are many more types availible to play, like altis life, breaking point, and day z mod. too many others to name Pros: - game view distance is easily the furthest one can see in any game ever made. but...itll kill your computer lol - lots of cool stuff to use, jets, tanks, helicopters, weapons, and vehicles, - moddable lots of cool stuff to do - realistic. bullets drop over distance, zeroing of weapons, realistic combat distances, - big! the maps are large and big enough to accomadate lots of people Cons: - bugs. the game consists of various non game breaking bugs and such that never seem to get fixed - unoptimized. the game is unoptimized period. i run it at ultra with dual 980's and get 15-35 fps in multiplayer games. changing the graphics to a lower setting helps little, it just runs slow...there is no question to it My youtube channel shows the game and a few of its mods. check out my video on the wasteland mod https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=BJOE9xZRiIg
KingDuffy;-;Fantastic game, As an Arma II player, seeing the new advances in ArmaIII is quite outstanding and provies for a more enjoyable expierence.
Chandler;-;Bought this for Battle Royale 100/10 people killed (its the modern hunger games)= Forbes (Prepare for the same  engine except this time it doesnt look blurry af)= IGN (This is better than Dayz Yet Dayz has had more development time and money put in)= Bob Barker overall this should be rated 3 out of 4 armas Maybe arma 4 will be more unoptimized. But i still love it "our games are  but you'll still buy them" -with love Dean Hall Buy this game its the most fun you'll have in awhile
KillerAussie;-;I have been playing arma 3 for quite a while now and thought I might share my thoughts on it for those planning to buy it. Arma 3 is a great game and with the massive amounts of community addons, it never stops delivering something new. If you wan't to run around and kill other players in a massive bloodbath you can do that on the King of the hill(KOTH) mission, If you wan't to run around and role-play as a civilian in a deprived country you may do that also on Altis/Stratis life and last but not least If you wan't to fight AI in a team of players you can do that also, there are many missions for this gameplay. What I am trying to say is that I have been playing this game for a long time, 1700+ hrs and I am not bored yet. If I am not bored of this game yet then that is saying something. The game is definetly worth buying and it will always be so in my eyes. Thank you to those great people that made this game! :D
Lawzy987;-;Love this game, the best game ever wayyy better then those cod games, and yet when you get a 360 no scope in a tank, then you know you are good in cod.
yahya;-;so good game i love this game :)
facelessbrush;-;Sexy game, must play!
MK-E;-;This game is "ok".
Liberty7i7;-;i Recommend this game :)
Zed;-;>Be me >Get banned on Day Z Standalone for no reason >Arma 3 bans me without even loading up the game >tells me b/c I got banned on Day Z, I now get banned on Arma 3 >Curled up in fetal position and cried >I want my 60 bucks back >Cries
Snake Beater;-;its awesome controls are weird but once u get used to them its excellent
Mac and Cheese;-;It is a game for 3 year olds and up
Fynn;-;Played a few hours, its ok i guess. <3
Zephyr;-;11/10. One of the best military sims out there (In my opinion.) Plus the controls are better compared to ArmA 2. :P
SanguineSpirit;-;Great game. As one of my most played games I own this game never has gotten old for me. There are gamemodes for everyone if you like roleplay there is altis life or if you like PVP there is wasteland. Literally this game can never get old for me this was well worth my purchase.
FIREXTREMESLAYER;-;Very good game with endless possibilities as well as mods but lacks good optimization. You'll need a very good CPU as well as GPU to run this game on ultra with a stable 60 fps.
Ch1ck3nMax;-;+Realistic +Fun +Huge Modding Community +Better Than Call Of Duty -Not Easy For Beginners 11/10 ,MUST PLAY.
A_Big_Hairy_Guy;-;This game is freking awesome
Sergeant Reckless;-;bugs bugs !!!! o and crashes
DannyUK;-;Been playing this game for about 8 months now and thought I'd publish my review of this game. When I first started to play the game I was new to Arma so didn't know the controls, it was quite tricky to figure out all the different controls but after a week or 2 I got to grips with most of it. If you like real battles and the strategy of it then I would buy this game, you will enjoy it very much. The game is more in depth compared to other games like Battlefield for example, it's more realistic which is why I started playing it. The graphics in game look amazing and the way they made the maps are very good also so if you have a good graphics card you will see the benefit on high settings. The best thing about the game is there is many different mods you can play which I never realised before but i've had so much fun playing different ones. Really you are buying this game but getting several of them for free as the mods are totally different to the others but still the same weapons and such but it feels different in how you play so buying it is very worth while it's mainly all I play it's that good.
sargentdj;-;awsome what more is there to say
DIRTY WATA;-;ArmA 3. Supposedly my best game I have ever played. Many things to say, but I want to make this a small and quick review. I will first start off with the community. Bohemia Interactive is depending on the community to make missions for the game, and I feel that that is the way to go as they did this with many other games and turned out succesful. The community lets out mods, addons and such for the game from Singleplayer, to coop missions for your friends and Multiplayer missions such as Invade and Annex. Addons to the game like weapons such as M4's, G3's, SCAR weapons and much more, because in the vanilla game there is not much of a diverse amount of weapons in the game as there is and assault rifle and a carbine version of the weapon. I am glad to see that the community members actually take their time to make amazing weapons that can not only be used in singleplayer but also multiplayer if it is allowed. Ballistics. Oh dear god. If I talk about this subject you would think twice about hiding in cover and picking the best looking vest like the strap one for example. The larger the caliber the bigger the penetration. Hiding behind a wall may make you unsafe to the 7.62mm round for exaple. If you were to be shot with 5.56mm round then it wouldn't hurt as much (I am not an ammuntion genuis, this is from my own experience) Vests have a big role in ArmA 3 as they may mean life or death to you. Picking a lightweight vest may make you a quick target but very vulnrable to bullets but if you were to choose a plate carrier over a strap vest for exapmle you may be a slower targer but not by much adding to that, that bullets wont penetrate the plate carriers very easily. In my personal opinion pick the Plate carrier vests as they make you a hard to kill target. Weapons. Weapons functionality and reliabilty in combat depends on the ammunition. 5.56, 6.5, 7.62, 9mm are just some of the ammunition. the most effective sort of ammunition would be the 7.62mm as it is used currently in alot of modern weapons today and would be the most destructive and effective out of all ammo in ArmA 3. The 5.56 and the 6.5 would be mostly used on assault rifles and be effective at close to medium range (Meduim range would be 300m) Pistols and SMG's would use the 9mm. 9mm ammunition would be a larger sort of ammo but not as destructive or damaging as the greater 7.62 ammo, better of using the greater assault rifles. Veichles. Land, sea or air. They all exist. Armed helicopters, jeeps, armored boats and more. Some mounted weapons on veichles could be a HMG or a grenade launcher. Each of the factions have speacial veichles, Nato uses the Hunter which is an MRAP, it comes with mounted weapons and is mainly used for recconissance aswell it is a mine resistant veichle which not many of you know. CSAT use the Ifrit which is the same sort of reconnisance veichle as the Hunter which is also mine resistant. AAF use the Strider, not many of the player know this but this car is amphibious. Helicopters come in 3 categories I put in my mind. Light, meduim and heavy. Light helicopters would the the Hummingbird or Littlebird and they come in unarmed and armed variants. Meduim helicopters would be a Hellcat which is an armed transport heli aswell as an Orca. Heavy helicopters would be the Mowhawk. Each of the weights affects the manuverability of them. Boats. Boats main and sole purpose is; reconissance of the sea. Your main job is to provide support from the sea and scout for enemy activity along the coasts. There are not only military boats but aswell as recretion boats. Some boats come with a light machine gun some of them come with a grenade launcher some come with both, some can come with none.
I live in poundland;-;How to play Arma 3: Step 1: Run through field Step 2: Get shot Step 3: Flinch like an autist on crack because of gun shots Step 4: You die Step 5: Go on editor Step 6: Make it litteraly rain men Step 7: Your comr dies Step 8: R.I.P
SoapKat;-;Good game to meme with your friends. If you want to have fun and meme, play this game.
Tebone552;-;Well what I like about it is that it is a Military Simulator and that it has so many different game modes. But what I really hate about it is that the price is to steep. I would recommend lowering the price down to $30-$40 or somewhere in between for about a week. That would really boost sales and I know I will buy it.
Dicilion;-;Amazing, Authentic, Arma
incompl;-;really good game. If you liked ArmA 2... You Will Like ArmA 3 Better!
Jobs;-;Love this game, so realistic, so many different game modes. I dont think i'll ever "Finish" the game.
Lion of War;-;It's okay I guess,played for a few hours.
Sultan ZerByan;-;Best game i have ever played i have more than 2,000 hours on it and i enjoyed all of it..
Reconik;-;The graphical beauty of this game is incredible and the game is among the most realistic combat games out there. However don't be mistaken this is by no means in the same catagory as other gun games out there. This does not play like an FPS at all, which in many cases I like. My only complaint with the series is how rough the game is with almost everything you do. Not going to rant on about it, but anyone who plays this can't deny that nothing you do flows very well, getting in a vehicle or doing something like hopping over a fence isn't quick and smooth. It almost feels like it stops the gameplay or combat... gets in the vehicle ...then it resumes. (hard to explain this given that makes it just sound like every other game but trust me when I say it isn't the same) NOW TO MAKE UP FOR THAT COMPLAINT, the game is fantastic, you really do feel like a soldier, and the range of gamemodes you'll find on servers etc. is endless! Finally to wrap it up they give you two massive maps that allow for very fun fights.
Electrolux;-;Unparalleled realism. Amazing graphics and sound that take advantage of higher end machines. Gameplay so intricate and suspenseful - the only true war SIMULATOR. The modding community shines, with great missions from specifc PvE sets, to PvP battles, to full on RPG's. It might not be the most fast-paced shooter - but when a well cooridinated assault kicks in, the fireworks can make the most over-the-top blockbuster shooter sequences look like cartoons. The suspense of being killed with one shot, of not knowing whether or not you've been spottted, or trying to overwhlem an attacking or defending force provides tangible investment in your gameplay. The realism of the weapons, vehicles, and physics simply has no competition. If you want real, and NOT arcade, this is the ticket. This game thrives when playing with other communicating humans, and therein provides a war game experience that is addictingly engaging and entirely unique to ArmA.
I'm dead ;-;;-;Bohemia Interactive says i own this game But i don't own this game
[OCN] Bradford1040;-;Owned this game for some time. I absolutely love it! I play at a steady 60fps with vsync on. Running an old X58 system with a GTX 680 Classy! The mod "Breaking Point" has really made the game more enjoyable! I mean I never finished the campaign as I had to reinstall windows and progress is not saved from one OS to the next via steam! If you have the money it is very worth buying! VERY!
Reconik;-;The graphical beauty of this game is incredible and the game is among the most realistic combat games out there. However don't be mistaken this is by no means in the same catagory as other gun games out there. This does not play like an FPS at all, which in many cases I like. My only complaint with the series is how rough the game is with almost everything you do. Not going to rant on about it, but anyone who plays this can't deny that nothing you do flows very well, getting in a vehicle or doing something like hopping over a fence isn't quick and smooth. It almost feels like it stops the gameplay or combat... gets in the vehicle ...then it resumes. (hard to explain this given that makes it just sound like every other game but trust me when I say it isn't the same) NOW TO MAKE UP FOR THAT COMPLAINT, the game is fantastic, you really do feel like a soldier, and the range of gamemodes you'll find on servers etc. is endless! Finally to wrap it up they give you two massive maps that allow for very fun fights.
I'm dead ;-;;-;Bohemia Interactive says i own this game But i don't own this game
[OCN] Bradford1040;-;Owned this game for some time. I absolutely love it! I play at a steady 60fps with vsync on. Running an old X58 system with a GTX 680 Classy! The mod "Breaking Point" has really made the game more enjoyable! I mean I never finished the campaign as I had to reinstall windows and progress is not saved from one OS to the next via steam! If you have the money it is very worth buying! VERY!
Electrolux;-;Unparalleled realism. Amazing graphics and sound that take advantage of higher end machines. Gameplay so intricate and suspenseful - the only true war SIMULATOR. The modding community shines, with great missions from specifc PvE sets, to PvP battles, to full on RPG's. It might not be the most fast-paced shooter - but when a well cooridinated assault kicks in, the fireworks can make the most over-the-top blockbuster shooter sequences look like cartoons. The suspense of being killed with one shot, of not knowing whether or not you've been spottted, or trying to overwhlem an attacking or defending force provides tangible investment in your gameplay. The realism of the weapons, vehicles, and physics simply has no competition. If you want real, and NOT arcade, this is the ticket. This game thrives when playing with other communicating humans, and therein provides a war game experience that is addictingly engaging and entirely unique to ArmA.
Mrachd;-;Arma 3 is a great RPG & shooting game. There is multiplayer like Altis Life, and mods such as Arma Life. There are great communities to join, as well as new friends to meet. Highly recommend buying this game, however you must have a good computer that is beyond the recommended requirements.
[MBOM] Booker;-;Deffinatly recomend this game, ive spent over 800hrs on this and have loved every bit of it!!!!!!!!!!
Jobs;-;Love this game, so realistic, so many different game modes. I dont think i'll ever "Finish" the game.
Rest In Peace;-;Spent a whole mission patching up my guys as a medic. Next mission I was dead in 2 secs. Definitely recommended for people who want more than the scum that's called battlefield and call of duty
Mitsu;-;Only one way to play this game. A million mods, a stable, mature community and COOP only. PvP is terrible, vanilla is terrible, singleplayer is terrible.
[Based]Shazaming;-;If your familiar with the Arma series, this shouldnt be hard to become used to. It has greatly improved graphics, reduced bugs, amazing stance/cover system, and now a large variety of vehicles and weapons that can be added to via the great modding community. The best part of this game shows in multiplayer, featuring the most realistic experience ive ever had. Highly recommended to any military enthusiast.
potatoe boner;-;Absoulutly fun and amazing game to play w/ friends
Neonwolf;-;My cars go slow uphill.
[PG]-Shadow-;-;Joined altis life, got ran over by some dude who was singing. 10/10
[PG]-Shadow-;-;Joined altis life, got ran over by some dude who was singing. 10/10
Kiska;-;Kayzar thinks I play this game too much.
'Erb Garden;-;Breathtaking graphics, fantastic gameplay, and a superior feeling to the controls since Arma II. The Mod community are already blowing up on this. For those who enjoyed Arma II this is a must buy. For those new to the Arma series, jump straight in on this, get mod'ing, get building scenario's and i guarrantee you'll never play CoD or Battlefield again.
=GTA=T-Virus;-;Best War game out there
\/alvE42;-;Run over a police officer for a ticket 10/10
Narcissistic Black;-;GREAT....but the for online if you wanted to do anything besides....Grunt work then you need teamspeak or the server admins will rage bann you...all of them....
Aussieness;-;It's almost as if it's real.
Eidren -errybodi lorvs me;-;Ear  people by setting default microphone to Stereo Mix. Play Caravan palance - Dirty Side of The Streat 999/10
Goose;-;ArmA III is quite different from most other first person shooters. As to be expected since it is a military simulator. With it's clunky UI, desync problems, unexplained gameplay, complicated controls, and many other bugs, it is clearly not perfect. However, when you get past the UI, and have played the game long enough to understand how it works, ArmA III offers some of the best experiences in video gaming. There's nothing quite like a 100 vs 100 match that turns the colossal Altis map or the still giant Stratis map into a war torn battlefield. The true heart to this game is the mods, and boy are there a lot of them! To start, I would suggest checking out Altis Life, Battle Royale, and Wasteland. These mods add so much life to the game. Many of these mods feel like complete individual games themselves. In short, though there may be some bugs and a steep learning curve, there is no doubt that ArmA III offers arguably the best multiplayer experience in video gaming. - 9/10 would glitch again
Bonezkiller1;-;love this game and all of the gamemodes/mods if you dont own it buy it now your missing out
WOLLE;-;Well, after more than 450 hours on record, i have to say, it is THE best game in the last years! There is so much to do with it. Seemingly unlimited ways to modify the game or to make own missions with nearly unlimited access to everything you need! It deserves just one word: AWESOME!
ElephantOnAHill;-;GREAT GAME. If your into the Arma series or simulation, buy this.
Kromwell;-;Awesome game, there is so much you can do here, everything from sandbox to tactical realism. Both the multiplayer and singleplayer areas have huge playability levels. Plus new content is being added weekly so you never get bored. Awesome game, one of my all time favorites. Highly recommend.
Hammer von Smashnrape;-;ArmA 3 is a must have for any shooter fan that enjoys open-ended possibilities. With several mods now available (hence the reason I'm changing my review) there are just so many things that you can do it's not even funny. Co-op missions are fun, getting with a larger group and doing an MCC or Zeus mission is just ridiculously fun, and the campaign is still solid. If you prefer PvP, there are a lot more modes out now than when I originally wrote the review. King of The Hill is the only one I've really played and it's not really my jam, but hey, if it is yours then go for it. The game is fairly well optimized at this point, but really poorly optimized MP servers are extremely noticable and when bad scripting is done, it's even more noticable. This game on an SSD is a pretty intelligent decision. With or without mods, there is just a ton that you can do with this game. If you're at all into large scale operations or even long-lasting missions on a smaller scale, you NEED this game. Point blank.
Yari;-;I shot a guy in the head with a 30mm cannon at point blanc and he didnt die 10/10
_koKsa_;-;I m going to be honest, It isnt such good as arma 2. Despite better optimization,graphic and Zeus ( zeus is really good but its hard to use unofficial addons to run zeus correctly) is more drawbacks what i have to say. It wasn't fell like arma anymore, but like CoD or BF, unreal weapons(ammo, units, vehicles), body armor system ( the biggest problem at all in my opinion , it was probably mented like good think, but if you shoot soldier twice in chest, he cannot be able to return fire, ok, he MAY survive but that should be all). Positive think is FREE bootcamp ( but it doesn't fully support addons) what is sad... virtual arsenal loadouts re not able ti share in zeus. (when I said is positive, it was because its free, what is not common in nowadays). But you can as normal add addons and mods in arma, what makes it playable again. In result : Arma 3 is worth to buy for common player only because Zeus, nothing more have any value. If you re arma enthusiast (like me) and you are going to play arma 3 with mods and addons its good improvement after arma 2 (more support, more mod and addon makers, bigger maps).
Guts4;-;For an Alpha there are so many aspects of this game that are already better than Arma 2. A purchase now equals less to pay for when the full title releases.
=AhG= Chairborne;-;One of the best military games available. Its sandbox style and modding/customizations allow it to become almost anything you want. Co-operative military simulator, role-playing game, survival horror, you name it. It offers so many possibilities it has an endless replay value. What this game is to me is a military simulator, it has a numerous amount of upgrades from the previous Arma 2/Op. Arrowhead, most importantly the infantry handling and animations that now offer much more flexibility and greater control over your character. Vehicles none the less have been upgraded, the new PhysX 4 engine gives vehicles a much more realistic feeling. Lights and scenario rendering have been not only upgraded, but made even LIGHTER for your pc to run, as opposed to the incredibly heavy Arma 2 engine that would put an incredible amount of stress even to the most high-end gaming rigs. The downside however is that as of now the game doesn't offer much sandbox content as in vehicles and weapons but the developers have already announced future free DLCs that would address this and add some other cool features. In conclusion i think this game offers infinite possibilities to those who can take advantage of them but it still needs some time to grow and reach its full potential, what we'll have then will be a game that is going to put to shame all the other commercial FPSs.
Tippy;-;Good game but there is no shotguns :(
[DOAB] Brandon;-;by far one of the most expensive games i bought (lel). besides from that it is also one of the funnest. Atlis Life is best. Love love love. iz like sperm
TheAivons;-;Got arrested for stealing apples from police in Altis Life, then Police game me drugs as punishment. 10/10
Missing Content;-;Well, i could play it for only 15 hours, which means i could play on 15th anniversary and 26.10.2011. the game is AWESOME. but seriously guys. if you are a CoD lover, dont get that thing. i hate cod already. but that's more realstic from battlefield too, because that's a MIL-SIM. you can't jump. if you can't play with different controls, you are wasting your time here. but that's better than most games. there's everything i tried; +i tried the prologue campaign, played until a glitch on a mission named damage control, which doesnt allows me to continue. +survive campaign. i could continue untill maxvell's save bravo team mission. i could drive a drone on the virtual reality training, but i didnt know what to do with it on bravo campaign, i couldnt pass. +challenges. i werent succesful. +showcases. they were very hard. i couldnt pass most. +bunny infestation scenerio. wtf was that!? +multpilayer roleplay. what a fun it was! +arsenal. scientist uniform with default face. (white guy!) +vr training. couldnt pass placeables. dammit! +map editor. i had a experience because that i played ofpr. i spawned a plane in air which was me. a-10 was very easier! -i couldnt get any addons because of my limited time. +or- before forgetting. i was playing when the time ended. i still was playing! and when closing, game said a hour left. closed, steam said 2 hours left. a hour later, it still was 2 hours. today i cant play.
The creatcous;-;I like this game because it feels realstic and feels like your actually in the game.
Titanium Ace;-;One of the best Military Simulations ever to be released, very good features of future warfare and some freat moments of laughter with community made gamemode. Great game for having a fun time with your friends or want to try real tactics for a change of gameplay. Thank you BI!
8bitfrenzy;-;So here's my story on arma3, but before I tell you that I would like to say that don't buy this game if you're not okay with it running horrible because the dev's are lazy as  but that's besides the point as I need to tell you my story. I started the game and then found a tank, within minutes I find myself destroying the entire base and then get banned after being called a little low-life  10/10 would get called a  and banned again.
Quack's Son CSGOFAST.COM;-;Well i had it then Steam took it away from me. :(
Alexander Mahone;-;There are several types of gudeg; dry, wet, Yogyakarta style, Solo style and East Javanese style. Dry gudeg has only a bit of coconut milk and thus has little sauce. Wet gudeg includes more coconut milk. The most common gudeg comes from Yogyakarta, and is usually sweeter, drier and reddish in color because of the addition of teak leaves as coloring agent. Solo gudeg from the city of Surakarta and is more watery and soupy with lots of coconut milk and whitish in color because teak leaves are generally not added. Yogyakarta's gudeg usually called "red gudeg", while Solo's gudeg also called "white gudeg". The East-Javanese style of gudeg has a spicier and hotter taste compared to the Yogyakarta style gudeg which is sweeter. Gudeg is traditionally associated with Yogyakarta, and Yogyakarta is sometimes nicknamed "Kota Gudeg" (city of gudeg). The center of Yogyakarta gudeg restaurants is in the Wijilan area to the east side of the Yogy
Brother Judas;-;There's not much to say about Arma, so many crazy stories come out of it. Once me and Two other friends were scouting around in some woods near some buildings, we were loaded up with weapons and some good backpacks. We spot a building we wanted to check for loot, except theres already about 3 or 4 guys in there from where we could see in the hills. So my friends decide its not a good idea to go down there, I had a grenade on me, I took off my backpack and left my sniper in one place (So my friends could take it for me if I died), Took a grenade and a Pistol. I launched the grenade high into the air where it exploded confusing the enemy, I went Rambo into the building with a pistol and took all the guys out. So Yeah.....10/10. GET THIS GAME!
Sith Wick;-;I've just now only started playing this and I must say it is AMAZING. "Best Military Sim" YES. 100x YES. The realism in this game is something out of a movie. It feels like you're there in the moment, like you're in the shoes of a soldier on the field. The campaign is short but has potential, the tutorial explains things minimally, but does suffice. Now to the fun stuff, the Multiplayer. My god, if you're someone who's wondering whether or not to buy this game solely based on it's Multiplayer, go right ahead and buy it. The people you meet online are so diverse it's crazy! I've met countless people on ARMA that were put in my situation and we learned the ropes together! It was quite the mess getting yelled at, but eventually we got it down. I'm in to shooters, but not really into sims, (Yet I love DayZ, whut) but this game really is something else. Fans of "DarkRP" from the famed GMod will find the ALTIS RP to be quite the upgrade from that, when playing it you can really feel the nostalgia from the DarkRP craze. Lastly, if you noticed this was made by Bohemia and think this game is as broken as DayZ, please, PLEASE, understand that this game is in no way shape or form like DayZ. The actual game is playable and so hard to put down when started. If you need help deciding on whether or not to buy this let this review help! Hope to see you in the RPG servers!
Tippy;-;Good game but there is no shotguns :(
[DOAB] Brandon;-;by far one of the most expensive games i bought (lel). besides from that it is also one of the funnest. Atlis Life is best. Love love love. iz like sperm
TheAivons;-;Got arrested for stealing apples from police in Altis Life, then Police game me drugs as punishment. 10/10
Missing Content;-;Well, i could play it for only 15 hours, which means i could play on 15th anniversary and 26.10.2011. the game is AWESOME. but seriously guys. if you are a CoD lover, dont get that thing. i hate cod already. but that's more realstic from battlefield too, because that's a MIL-SIM. you can't jump. if you can't play with different controls, you are wasting your time here. but that's better than most games. there's everything i tried; +i tried the prologue campaign, played until a glitch on a mission named damage control, which doesnt allows me to continue. +survive campaign. i could continue untill maxvell's save bravo team mission. i could drive a drone on the virtual reality training, but i didnt know what to do with it on bravo campaign, i couldnt pass. +challenges. i werent succesful. +showcases. they were very hard. i couldnt pass most. +bunny infestation scenerio. wtf was that!? +multpilayer roleplay. what a fun it was! +arsenal. scientist uniform with default face. (white guy!) +vr training. couldnt pass placeables. dammit! +map editor. i had a experience because that i played ofpr. i spawned a plane in air which was me. a-10 was very easier! -i couldnt get any addons because of my limited time. +or- before forgetting. i was playing when the time ended. i still was playing! and when closing, game said a hour left. closed, steam said 2 hours left. a hour later, it still was 2 hours. today i cant play.
The creatcous;-;I like this game because it feels realstic and feels like your actually in the game.
gffermari;-;Ridiculously realistic movement, aiming & shooting. Ridiculously realistic representation of Lemnos & S. Stratis. It's worth buying it just for the choosing of these two Greek islands for a battle terrain.
(GOG)Mach2k3;-;Awesome Tactical gameplay, If you enjoy simulations, This is NOT COD or BF4!!!!
Issei "Green Eyes";-;I love the fact that the maps are so large, it barely crashes, and its soooooo tactical
KITTY TACOz;-;this game.........wow. its far more improved than arma 2. If you have the extra money, its well worth it. 8.5/10 ~ gameplay
Quokkaa!;-;It opens the door to a new world of video games through which the player is more than just immersed!
Safhari;-;Shooting dudes is all that keeps me sane.
Synfule;-;Love it! Though I wish I had a better graphics card (gt 750m).
inet-pwnZ/;-;Good but CPU havy
Static;-;Best gamemode to play is Altis Life Highly reccomend this game. :()
Ophyzarr;-;A vast improvement on the previous titles. ArmA 3 delivers on so many levels. Many mechanics have been wholly reworked and large steps have been taken to make the game more intuitive and accessible to players new and old. One of the most striking leaps in development is the new stance and infantry movement system which along with the new ArmA 3 control scheme makes it a whole lot easier to control the player. As with any addition to a game series, the graphics are usually updated and the visuals are absolutely stunning with ArmA 3. The environments look lifelike and have meticulous detail put into them, the detail rivals games which have no-where near as vast of a game world as Altis or Stratis. There are drawbacks with the game such as a lack of content (weapons, vehicles and aircraft get boring quickly), but with previous titles in the series (ArmA 2 most notably) there was a huge drive in DLC and mods providing potentially endless amounts of fun in the included sandbox and level editor. Optimisation has also drastically improved, I receive much higher frames on higher settings than in the previous title, which is a real game-changer. All of these improvements have made it so much more fun to play the game. There is nothing comparable to playing this game with a large organised team. It's my personal recommendation that if you were ever interested in the ArmA series, now is the time to purchase and that it is 39.99 well spent.
Godlikem;-;Good game fixed most of the arma 2 bugs, has its own bugs but ehh :l something this big of a scale is going to be bound to have its bugs, Lags on lower end users and gives advantage to users with better graphical settings. my opinion the game deserves a 7/10.
Slice;-;Slice aproves this.
N. Rabbit;-;good game, totaly aint tryin to get the community badge thingy by doing all there is there
Aussieness;-;It's almost as if it's real.
Eidren -errybodi lorvs me;-;Ear  people by setting default microphone to Stereo Mix. Play Caravan palance - Dirty Side of The Streat 999/10
Kiska;-;Kayzar thinks I play this game too much.
'Erb Garden;-;Breathtaking graphics, fantastic gameplay, and a superior feeling to the controls since Arma II. The Mod community are already blowing up on this. For those who enjoyed Arma II this is a must buy. For those new to the Arma series, jump straight in on this, get mod'ing, get building scenario's and i guarrantee you'll never play CoD or Battlefield again.
=GTA=T-Virus;-;Best War game out there
\/alvE42;-;Run over a police officer for a ticket 10/10
flack;-;Sudden Death Simulator 2013
krimzoN;-;Good game, played it for the free weekend. Nek minute I put my cd key in and I had to reinstall the whole game... 10/10
Cat;-;This game is SOOOOO COOL Love running around in Atltis life gaining money and robbing people :D SO fun 100000/100
Narcissistic Black;-;GREAT....but the for online if you wanted to do anything besides....Grunt work then you need teamspeak or the server admins will rage bann you...all of them....
Regoto;-;Verry fun many bugs
Lone Wanderer;-;This is a great game it has beutiful graphics good gameplay. It makes me fell like im actuall in a real war.
samuraimark3;-;Easy to love, hard to master. Best enjoyed with the highest fps your rig can manage. I suggest lowering visibility for largest improvement.
Kokoro[EN][DK];-;It does have a better physics engine than Arma: 2/AO, but this is somekind more a "For fun, not to serious about war". It does have a lot of mods, but it does not seems that they are that good. Like, seriously. A go-kart, in a war. Does not seems to realistic, but i do like the zeus addon. I would give it 8/10, because it does not have the war feature i want. Well, i would recommend this to clans and stuff. Who want's their own server, and make some war!
SharkenGuard;-;yes play it
FinTs;-;This game is awesome! I love <3 Militarty games!
Peter;-;Tank hits rock, tank flies, tank shoots, tank flies even faster. Water try and stop tank, tank bounce, tank flies happily ever after. tank/10 would fly again.
][-][OLLOW;-;recommend this game HAVANA6 screw betafail4 or 5
Caliaton;-;Once you reach the level of patience that this game requires, and you're playing with a coordinated squad that knows how to aproach an intense dangerous situation, you will enjoy this game for what it truly is; the most epic unscripted online experiences you will ever encounter.
FistoGames;-;This is one of the most interesting and expansive games out there. The current storyline and background is a bit unrealistic-The Republic of Altis and Stratis has a super-advanced military but the nation has under 50,000 people in its population. The population also is Greek, but for whatever reason all speaks english-even the armed forces. Nonetheless, the mission editing is superb compared to Arma 2, the mechanics are mostly improved (animation and AI needing a bit of a change for realism) the voice acting for British and American English as well as Farsi is superb. Iran has a huge presence in the game, however it is never mentioned and instead goes under the quite unrealistic banner of Canton-Protocol Strategic Alliance Treaty, or CSAT. I really wish that BIS would at least include the Iran flag above the CSAT insignia on the uniforms, for it looked absolutely amazing when this was the case at E3 2011. Physics in the game are great, however the fabled ragdoll physics are a bit dissapointing. All they seem to do is make units die in a more unrealistic-looking way. NATO is portrayed as completely bankrupt which really bothers me-unemployment is at freaking 50% in the US. It is interesting to see future interpretations of the US Army, which use the new multicam pattern in their uniforms. I am bothered by the lack of ANY, yes ANY authentic equipment in the game. This is perhaps my biggest problem, for it gives the developers an excuse to make fantasy content for every upcoming Arma game. Yes, it saves on lisencing, but the developers just launched a 650-thousand dollar modding contest. A fraction of the money could have been spent on making the weapons and vehicles authentic. With a host of friends to play with, some mods, and an open mind, this title is one of the most awesome games I have ever played. The simulation of the vehicles is amazing, with support for almost every joystick, controller, or other external device you can think of. The game fails to provide an immersive atmosphere but is a fun and engaging way to play COOP with friends, strategy being completely necessary. The graphics are in my top 10 games ever, and the performance is better than with Arma 2, especially if you plan on making Youtube videos like I do. (check out my Youtube channel: FistoGames :D ) Go and buy it. With some DLC's that bring it back to where Arma 2 was in scenario, it will definitely be an amazing game.
CaptJack94;-;This game is worth every cent. It is extremely realistic and has provided hours of fun for me and my friends.
BannedByGates;-;Arma 3 brings so much different game types to the table. From Altis Life which is a crazy GTA Online style clone that is better, to full on war simulator with ari, land, troops. There is so much to do in this game. If you can't find something to do in this game then you need to get to a Doctor quick... cause you might be dead. :) Enjoy.
Ruthful;-;Love the instense battles, Graphics in this game. Arma is always a must have
Wake Up Dead;-;Best game, really good.
Tallahassee;-;Get this game! It's amazing!
Frodo the Mlg/Esl pro no scoper;-;First play session, join a random multiplayer server called altis life or something. get kidnapped by some form of terrorist group, they take me to an island and tell me to hide in a house, the police come and save me, they give me a car to go back to a town, have the car confiscated by the cops that helped me due to speeding, run for about an hour to the nearest town, get killed by a guy in his underwear and a fedora screaming about being mlg, leave game. 11/10 would play again!
ARTdrakon;-;Optimization needed.
Billy The Blind Kid;-;10.0. The graphics for this game are amazing, but you may need to turn it down in case of lag. The Co-Op is awesome and its great to play with friends. Also on some servers it will get extremely laggy and hard for you to enjoy the game. Do research if you can run it before you buy it. Not a waste of $60.00.
Inso;-;Good army game, you can actually kill vehicule with rocket unlike Battleshit 4 where you can heal tank with electrical screwdriver that are more powerfull than rockets. 9/10
Meeka5795;-;Thanks to the community, this game is allways a pleasure to play. Not for noobs, but for mature players who'll enjoy a hard challenge.
Joe;-;Yeah I highly recommend this Game to All people who like Realistic type Shooters And if you Have played Arma 2 Im Sure you would also Like the massive improvemnts and features added. And this Game has many Fan made mods like Altis Life, Wasteland And king of the Hill to get stuck into. The delevlopers have Made it very easy to mod In new Models, weapons etc. This is a great game and im looking forward to future DLC and features. :)
Detergent;-;There are no servers in Asia but the game is pretty enjoyable nonetheless.
DovahDan;-;ThIS GAME IS SWAG
Bat Buns;-;Wow, such realism. Much bullet drop. So tactical. 10/10 would simulate again.
Nickprovs;-;Good game. 1/1. That's a perfect score.
BobbyBottleService;-;1. Run cocaine wit ur boi's 2. Love your mother 3. Make money 4. F**K Bi**hES 5. ?????? 6. Profit
Mr.Skellington;-;Great Game, Great Modding Platform, Great Community. if you liked Arma 2, you will most likely like Arma 3. Modding Community is really busy, Mod Content is nearly limitless.
IllMakeYouSoup;-;If you like military shooters and realism, this is your game. Only complaint is the MP as its not overly optimized at the moment.
{Op4}Gurky;-;Best military simulator out there for the civilian market. Game is extremely moddable, and options and different styles of gameplay are plentiful. Great online experience for players who prefer to work tactically and cooperatively with other players. As close as you'll ever get to combat.
NvM.Spengbeb;-;Top notch game,especially with Altis and Wastelands. 10/10 would recommend again.
SnakesBlood;-;Simulation, Military, Tactical, Realistic. Then add mods. OOGABOOGA +1000
Snuffy Fuckaluffagus;-;We made a convoy. I like convoys 11/8 Would convoy again
Death_Lies;-;great game!
Cat.;-;Hella realistic, quite boring if you're into fast action, but fun if you like slow strategy.
RainbowPilot;-;ARMA 3 is a solid military simulator that really gets its legs from the modding community. Many ppl are familar with the ARMA series for one reason alone and that is the DayZ mod, it's even a well known fact that the game ARMA 2 sold more copies shortly after DayZ was released than it had since it's initial release. Not having played much single player besides a few short training sessions this review is going to be mostly focused on the multiplayer mods, gameplay and engine in general. First of all I want to say that this game may not be for those with underpowered PCs ESPECIALLY IF YOU ARE PLAYING MULTIPLAYER. While the engine performance is dramaticly improved over ARMA 2 unfortunently it seems that in multiplayer performance will suffer especially with high player counts due to a combination of server performance (running an ARMA server is very resource heavy especially cpu) and netcode shortcommings. The graphics have been improved over its predecessor as well as performance allowing for even greater view distances than I was able to pull off in ARMA 2 while still having playable framerates. Lighting in my opinion seems to have been improved the most leading to many atmospheric moments when I would find myself taking a screenshot. Models have all been improved quite a bit with the character models receiving the greatest leap in graphic fidelity, I can almost feel the stubble on the manly mans face sitting next to me in the attack chopper its the future I tell you. As you would expect in a military simulator there is a huge variety of boom sticks and vehicles to play with and not having a knowledge of military equipment or really a lot of experience with ARMA 2 I won't go into what guns/vehicles are new or what is more or less realistic. The gun and vehicle models however have seen a fantastic improvement in overall texture detail and resolution and the animations in general are a giant improvement over previous ARMA games with many of them appearing to be motion capped for that sexy smoothness. Gameplay has shown improvement in equal lengths with my favorite additions being the character stance positions, revamped inventory system, and much more natural feeling to movement in general. This is partly due to the fact that animations in general have been improved but also because mouse acceleration and smoothing seem to have been fixed. Combat feels solid and realistic the effects and sounds of warfare do well to set the mood and convince you that you are really blowing the  out of someone or really in the . The positional audio is fantastic and you can tell the approximate distance of gunshots based on their volume, and trust me the sound of a gunshot travels a long long ways. I also want to mention your characters sound effects, visual effects, and ambient animations, I love these and they really pull me into the experience. I have been walking for nearly 30min and I have finally made it to the cocaine fields but someone saw me comming. Oblivious I stand collecting the leaves when I hear something and my heart sinks, the rustling of feet and whispers in the bushes. I panic and turn the way I came bursting into a full sprint as I hear sirens begin to blare out and helicopter blades begin to spin. I'm sprinting at full speed now and the edges of my vision blur as I run blindly into the darkness. I'm breathing more heavily now and my vision is more tunneled than before, the color seems to have melted away slightly and I can't focus my eyes. Still running I'm breathing so heavy now that I gasp for air at times nearly choking on the air i'm attempting to breathe. The sirens are now far off in the distance and the whirling blades of the helicopter have nearly left ear shot, I gasp for more air as I slowly regain a normal rate of breathing. I wipe my brow to remove the sweat and my vision finally clears, I can see the boat I rode in on still there waiting for me I feel much better now. It's these little details that make an experience like that feel personal and real, this was an experience I had playing the mod "Altis Life". Everything in the right situation really comes together to bring you into the game experience and this is somthing ARMA 3 has pulled off well. Now the mods are where I think ARMA really shines as they provide infinite replayability assuming the community continues to develop for the platform. So far I have to say I am very impressed with the creativity of the mods and the scope of the mods in general. Want to recreate a historical engagement, maybe survive the zombie apocalypse, or perhaps selling fish and smoking weed is more your gig? You can do it all with the vast array of mods already available, but I want to talk quickly about my new favorite mod Altis Life. Altis life is a roleplaying mod were you must choose whether you are a civillian or a cop and you must live out you life however you choose. Civs must make a living whether legal or illegal it's you choice and your options are vast for how you do so. The cops must keep the civs in line and enforce the laws, if you are running around smoking weed and yelling F*ck the police you are probably gonna get pulled over, beaten, and arrested. Play it cool and do the speed limit maybe you will get away with that trunk full of heroin and get rich quick. Or maybe you just want to pick peaches, smoke your weed, and claim its for medical purposes when the cops pull you over its your choice and it is really great fun. There is so much more to say about this game and the potential it has with the fantastic modding community but I've written too much here already and i'm tired so i'm going to bed. On second thought maybe ill just do one more run to the poppy fields.
Samdreus;-;Well if you like COD then gtfo cuz this is arma 3, by far the best game i have ever play (with dota 2 in close second). it is a must have and is #DOpE
EpicGuitar;-;This game, it might sometimes be glitchy and bugs might arise everywhere and you might look dead when your really not, but it really does come down to how epic this game can get, full scale tank battles with air support and noobies everywhere with overpowered rocket launchers... that's my vision how of epic this game can get. But that's how I like it, you make it what ever YOU want. Being a sandbox only limit is no nukes, ;D but that would be way overpowered, just imagine n00bies setting off like 100 nukes.. i don't think anybody would enjoy that. :L 10/10
Echoflictiing;-;FORWARD, FAST. LEFT RIGHT LEFT STOP BACKWARD. FORWARD FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST FAST STOP.
Strand;-;The best game !.. Ever ..! the best money I've spent on steam and it's all worth it. =) out of 5 stars i can give Arma 3
frozenrouse;-;Great game!! :D
Gangsta Jesus With A Gun;-;Best game ever shoot many enemy wow. Get apc sshoot many raket for enemy i like 5/5 only noobs and  dont recommind this game #yolo #sweg
shark;-;Dont get it for full price, it isnt worth it. Not at all.
FrostyFeetTV;-;The game is great, its very glitchy and needs to fix bugs but overall is one of my favorite games.
Grim_2o0o;-;Ever wondered how it feels to be a muscular, hard- operator? Well too bad, you're a scrawny ing toy soldier with futuristic gadgets which does all the fighting for you so all you get to do is walk around in your undies while in base. I want a refund, this isn't what I payed for, even for an alpha. However, BIS sure nailed that underwear buldge just right. 9/10 average rail-shooter.
sm0;-;Arma 3 is a game, with simulation elements. It's not a simulator. It is also a game for a specific type of gamer that prefers large scale warfare, instead of playing casual fast-paced shooters like COD or BF. If you enjoy the experience from briefing and planning , and executing a plan , no matter how it plays out, the game adapts to any playing style that fits your style. Run & gun still works, but you need to have some uber micro skills.. If your mission fails, Arma allows you to retreat and get out alive, or gives you the oppertunity to get it done in another way. That's a nice touch compared to games that usually let the game end right after a fail. (SP) A bullet in the head will kill you, a bullet in your ballistic helmet might save your life, get shot in your legs and you're have to crawl your way out of there.. Things you have to consider in real life come close to the decisions you have to make in this game. Playing multiplayer with a group of people make the experience even better, but this game isn't really 'finished'. While the tags say it's a full release, Bohemia keeps working for years on these games to improve and add more content. They've done the same thing to their previous titles. If you really care about Multiplayer, I suggest Arma 2 :CO. Pro/cons : + Mission Editor Large scale warfare Mods (Armaholic & Bis forums) Steam workshop - User Generated 'Mission' Content (Mods in future?) All kinds of vehicles (Air, Cars, Armor, Support, and so on) +270 km2 map to explore - Multiplayer performance still crap. AIR vehicle (MH-/AH-) lost turnspeed, please add a slider to have us configurate our own speed on pedals. Setting sensitivity to high, still have slow pedal movement >_< Those small choppers are able to quickly rotate , but now it's a slow , long and horrible turn. No co-op in Campaign?. (Co-op game plox!) AI moves unnatural (They behave like androids)
SimpleSimon;-;Updated review: I have been exploring more features of Arma 3 and I love it! I have been playing a bit of the standard Arma 3 features which are fun, but the sheer number of mods and workshop missions is unreal! This game is so flexible. My most favourite mods and missions I have been playing are: Altis life: think along the lines of GTA, but everyone ever where is a real player, the police, military, bandits, civilians, criminals, everyone. It is a very immersive mission where you do what you want, whenever you want. Earn money through doing legal jobs, or become a criminal and traffic drugs, rob banks, rob other players, do whatever you want to survive, but beware your actions could get you on the police wanted list. Buy food, weapons, vehicles, licenses and so much more, it is a great experience when your on an active server. Escape Altis: an online coop game which can also be played single player, your goal to escape the huge island of altis. You will encounter AI enemy`s in all kinds of locations, choose how you get through, stealthy? Or guns blazing? Do it your way! This mission is very challenging and lots of fun, best with mates! Breaking Point: Think Dayz but on a bigger map, less glitches and now a choice of 5 factions to choose from. Each with their own perks, rules (or none depending which you choose), and appearance. Breaking point provides 5 maps, Altis, Stratis, Thirsk summer and Thirsk winter. The thirsk maps are PvP orientated with survival thrown in for good measure. Stratis is bigger than than Thirsk maps with a bigger focus on survival against zombies and other players. Altis is just huge! While breaking point is still in its infancy, the dev team is working really hard at it and adding new features and maps frequently. Vehicles in this mod are fairly rare, so expect work to be done finding them, you will also have to fix them up to get them working to. I love the Arma 3 engine, it is so flexible and allows for so many different ways to play, it just never gets dull. I highly recommend it!
Goozankle;-;The best in mil-sim-harcore-sandbox-ing-around-with-shooty-guns-and-tanks-games around.
EL Erik;-;When I started my first mission in coop I ended up dieing in the first few seconds. Little did I know how to fly a helicopter but I wasn't going to have anyone hold me back! took down 10 guys..not sure if they were on my team. 10/10
Pure Clark;-;Got shot for and apple. 10/10
Lord Sheogorath;-;Fun times to be had. Ignore all the issues and play the game. When you get down to it killing hapless peasants at range with a 50 cal and thermal optics is just as fun as gunning them down from across the street with a LMG. This game is at its best when you are on your own behind enemy lines with nothing but Abdul the condenscending Persian and your T-100. You can fire from behind a house or in a hull down position at the backs of unsuspecting armor, infantry, or the occasional aircraft. Fall back and repeat while the smoke fills the sky and peasants burn to their horrid deaths. In the end the game has some flaws but thats to be expected in a game this size, regardles of that; I love this game. 9/10 Would use as trophy wife.
Tywyllach;-;Amazing game so far and it's only an Alpha! Updated and improved on so many things from previous Arma games. If you like miltarty simulators this game has you covered; infantry, boats, vehicles and aircraft. Huge maps (20KM) and you can pretty much go in to any building now! In short, pre-order this game :D
[SSA] Slumpdog;-;This game is hours of fun!
K6rs;-;Good war simulator. Has some glitches.
jeremy;-;it ok till u hit fence then gota walk 20k
Rebba Roo;-;I rate this game 2 raisons
Tortas De Jamn;-;Now, this is a story all about how My life got flipped-turned upside down And I'd like to take a minute Just sit right there I'll tell you how I became the prince of a town called Bel Air In west Philadelphia born and raised On the playground was where I spent most of my days Chillin' out maxin' relaxin' all cool And all shootin some b-ball outside of the school When a couple of guys who were up to no good Started making trouble in my neighborhood I got in one little fight and my mom got scared She said 'You're movin' with your auntie and uncle in Bel Air' I begged and pleaded with her day after day But she packed my suit case and sent me on my way She gave me a kiss and then she gave me my ticket. I put my Walkman on and said, 'I might as well kick it'. First class, yo this is bad Drinking orange juice out of a champagne glass. Is this what the people of Bel-Air living like? Hmmmmm this might be alright. But wait I hear they're prissy, bourgeois, all that Is this the type of place that they just send this cool cat? I don't think so I'll see when I get there I hope they're prepared for the prince of Bel-Air Well, the plane landed and when I came out There was a dude who looked like a cop standing there with my name out I ain't trying to get arrested yet I just got here I sprang with the quickness like lightning, disappeared I whistled for a cab and when it came near The license plate said fresh and it had dice in the mirror If anything I could say that this cab was rare But I thought 'Nah, forget it' - 'Yo, homes to Bel Air' I pulled up to the house about 7 or 8 And I yelled to the cabbie 'Yo homes smell ya later' I looked at my kingdom I was finally there To sit on my throne as the Prince of Bel Air
spooky Archer;-;it's arma.
Theero;-;ArmA 3 is THE most detailed combat simulator you can find for a PC . There's much improvement from ArmA 2 , including smarter UI, more natural feeling movement and so on. Community support is excellent, with mods and scenarios created by the day, keeping the game fresh for a long time. A must buy if you are looking for a more "serious" shooter than your average Counter-Strike.
[TR]TheCapulet;-;When you look at most of the customer reviews on typical games, you'll generally see anywhere from 2-8 hours of playtime. Looking through the reviews for Arma 3, a majority that I see are over 100 hours and quite a few over 300-400 hours. I think that speaks for itself.
KeiLovesMe;-;i just love playing this game!! :3
dobbs3x;-;Very cool game, love the campaign and the mods avaialble are limitless.
lebun;-;Great game bro
FIVEpoint9;-;The greatest accomplishment a game can have is to leave lasting memory with the player. I find that this is especially true for memories that you can share. ARMA 3 can provide these in abundance. It is easily one of the best sandbox games I have ever played. Ill never forget escaping from a temporary prison with a handful of friends, spending hours slowly and stealthily making our way to a heavily guarded communication tower, taking out an entire platoon in a surprise attack, and finally making contact with friendly forces for extraction, only to be told to rendezvous on the opposite side of the island. Of course, the enjoyment of these games is also dependent on the people that you play it with, so be sure to pester all your good friends so that they can play this with you. For as graphics and physics heavy as this game is, it handles surprisingly well. Gameplay wise, you will have to relearn everything youve been taught for FPSs. If youre not extremely careful and working as a team, youre going to die swiftly and painfully. The number of player made missions is amazing. This game has a bit of a learning curve, but not nearly as much as the previous titles in the series. Please, if you want to have some fun with friends, get this game.
Vargs;-;Very nice game
Flash Grenading Teammates;-;Like Skyrim with robots that have grenade machine guns & decimate the entire server. 9.5/10 "Above average" -IGN
TSM Solomon;-;If you have friends, this is a great game to play with them. If you don't have any friends, this is a great game to play alone. If you don't have the game to play, get money for it. If you don't have the money for it, get a job. If you don't have a job, rob a bank. If you get arrested robbing the bank, at least you tried.
Grim_2o0o;-;Ever wondered how it feels to be a muscular, hard- operator? Well too bad, you're a scrawny ing toy soldier with futuristic gadgets which does all the fighting for you so all you get to do is walk around in your undies while in base. I want a refund, this isn't what I payed for, even for an alpha. However, BIS sure nailed that underwear buldge just right. 9/10 average rail-shooter.
sm0;-;Arma 3 is a game, with simulation elements. It's not a simulator. It is also a game for a specific type of gamer that prefers large scale warfare, instead of playing casual fast-paced shooters like COD or BF. If you enjoy the experience from briefing and planning , and executing a plan , no matter how it plays out, the game adapts to any playing style that fits your style. Run & gun still works, but you need to have some uber micro skills.. If your mission fails, Arma allows you to retreat and get out alive, or gives you the oppertunity to get it done in another way. That's a nice touch compared to games that usually let the game end right after a fail. (SP) A bullet in the head will kill you, a bullet in your ballistic helmet might save your life, get shot in your legs and you're have to crawl your way out of there.. Things you have to consider in real life come close to the decisions you have to make in this game. Playing multiplayer with a group of people make the experience even better, but this game isn't really 'finished'. While the tags say it's a full release, Bohemia keeps working for years on these games to improve and add more content. They've done the same thing to their previous titles. If you really care about Multiplayer, I suggest Arma 2 :CO. Pro/cons : + Mission Editor Large scale warfare Mods (Armaholic & Bis forums) Steam workshop - User Generated 'Mission' Content (Mods in future?) All kinds of vehicles (Air, Cars, Armor, Support, and so on) +270 km2 map to explore - Multiplayer performance still crap. AIR vehicle (MH-/AH-) lost turnspeed, please add a slider to have us configurate our own speed on pedals. Setting sensitivity to high, still have slow pedal movement >_< Those small choppers are able to quickly rotate , but now it's a slow , long and horrible turn. No co-op in Campaign?. (Co-op game plox!) AI moves unnatural (They behave like androids)
SimpleSimon;-;Updated review: I have been exploring more features of Arma 3 and I love it! I have been playing a bit of the standard Arma 3 features which are fun, but the sheer number of mods and workshop missions is unreal! This game is so flexible. My most favourite mods and missions I have been playing are: Altis life: think along the lines of GTA, but everyone ever where is a real player, the police, military, bandits, civilians, criminals, everyone. It is a very immersive mission where you do what you want, whenever you want. Earn money through doing legal jobs, or become a criminal and traffic drugs, rob banks, rob other players, do whatever you want to survive, but beware your actions could get you on the police wanted list. Buy food, weapons, vehicles, licenses and so much more, it is a great experience when your on an active server. Escape Altis: an online coop game which can also be played single player, your goal to escape the huge island of altis. You will encounter AI enemy`s in all kinds of locations, choose how you get through, stealthy? Or guns blazing? Do it your way! This mission is very challenging and lots of fun, best with mates! Breaking Point: Think Dayz but on a bigger map, less glitches and now a choice of 5 factions to choose from. Each with their own perks, rules (or none depending which you choose), and appearance. Breaking point provides 5 maps, Altis, Stratis, Thirsk summer and Thirsk winter. The thirsk maps are PvP orientated with survival thrown in for good measure. Stratis is bigger than than Thirsk maps with a bigger focus on survival against zombies and other players. Altis is just huge! While breaking point is still in its infancy, the dev team is working really hard at it and adding new features and maps frequently. Vehicles in this mod are fairly rare, so expect work to be done finding them, you will also have to fix them up to get them working to. I love the Arma 3 engine, it is so flexible and allows for so many different ways to play, it just never gets dull. I highly recommend it!
Goozankle;-;The best in mil-sim-harcore-sandbox-ing-around-with-shooty-guns-and-tanks-games around.
Death_Lies;-;great game!
Kor;-;:D worth $59.99
_koKsa_;-;I m going to be honest, It isnt such good as arma 2. Despite better optimization,graphic and Zeus ( zeus is really good but its hard to use unofficial addons to run zeus correctly) is more drawbacks what i have to say. It wasn't fell like arma anymore, but like CoD or BF, unreal weapons(ammo, units, vehicles), body armor system ( the biggest problem at all in my opinion , it was probably mented like good think, but if you shoot soldier twice in chest, he cannot be able to return fire, ok, he MAY survive but that should be all). Positive think is FREE bootcamp ( but it doesn't fully support addons) what is sad... virtual arsenal loadouts re not able ti share in zeus. (when I said is positive, it was because its free, what is not common in nowadays). But you can as normal add addons and mods in arma, what makes it playable again. In result : Arma 3 is worth to buy for common player only because Zeus, nothing more have any value. If you re arma enthusiast (like me) and you are going to play arma 3 with mods and addons its good improvement after arma 2 (more support, more mod and addon makers, bigger maps).
Trapped_With_Ackbar;-;I came from FPS games like Call of Duty and Battlefield, those games are fun but in the end they are arcade style, they don't offer you a real taste of what it is really like to shoot a gun or being hit by a bullet. Red Orchestra 2 came a little closer to real combat, but Arma 3 is the most realistic military simulator ever. Despite the fact that it requires great effort to even kill someone with a gun (recoil, sight, stability, etc), it is fun to play this game. At least you understand you can't run across a map for 10 minutes straight, get hit by 10 bullets and still regenerate. This is the real deal. It's not too friendly to new players but the challenging aspect is intriguing enough to keep you going.
WOLLE;-;Well, after more than 450 hours on record, i have to say, it is THE best game in the last years! There is so much to do with it. Seemingly unlimited ways to modify the game or to make own missions with nearly unlimited access to everything you need! It deserves just one word: AWESOME!
shark;-;Dont get it for full price, it isnt worth it. Not at all.
SMKN;-;Arma 3 is an AWESOME rpg just buy it
Snuffy Fuckaluffagus;-;We made a convoy. I like convoys 11/8 Would convoy again
krakr10jak;-;love this game i keep spending all my hours on it
Regoto;-;Verry fun many bugs
Lone Wanderer;-;This is a great game it has beutiful graphics good gameplay. It makes me fell like im actuall in a real war.
samuraimark3;-;Easy to love, hard to master. Best enjoyed with the highest fps your rig can manage. I suggest lowering visibility for largest improvement.
inet-pwnZ/;-;Good but CPU havy
SyphilisFox;-;got spawn killed by a man with a handgun, then he hunt me down just to take my clothes and dignity. 10/10 would play again
Kromwell;-;Awesome game, there is so much you can do here, everything from sandbox to tactical realism. Both the multiplayer and singleplayer areas have huge playability levels. Plus new content is being added weekly so you never get bored. Awesome game, one of my all time favorites. Highly recommend.
Yari;-;I shot a guy in the head with a 30mm cannon at point blanc and he didnt die 10/10
KoopaTroopa old acc;-;This game is really good. I would give it a 9/10 and the reason i give it such a high rating is because there are endless things to do. Such as altis life or maybe tactical missions but my favorite part of the game is flying. There is the standard flying which is sorta like a arcade flying but still has some realistic features then there is advanced flying. But besides that this game is just great before i had this game i was a lone wolf on arma 2 but on here i met a awesome group of people that i play arma 3 with every night we even have are own altis life server.
JCaal;-;The game is great! It is a very realistic war simulator that I highly recommend. It makes Call of Duty look like dog poop. There are a lot of mods that are fun to play. You can do just about anything in this game, fly helos, drive quads, trucks, tanks, shoot people, and much more. It just makes me mad that I bought it for $59.99 three days ago and today it is on sale for $29.99. 11/10 Would pay full price again.
Juan Deag The Assassin1020;-;"Oh DLC, meh, not a big deal, I can probably take the weapons off dead bodies or maybe use them for a while as a trial." *Gets in game* "Sweet, killed a guy, better snatch his sniper rif-." *PURCHASE DLC NOW TO USE THIS WEAPON!* *Uninstalls game* This is what I get for supporting these guys for years. Way to go...
Country Heights;-;this is a very good game...
GrieferMadness;-;Let's see... I have put 530 hours on ArmA II and 230 on ArmA III... Is this a good game? Yes. It is a military shooter that focuses on scale. There is some realism and some not, its a video game so of course there will be reality breaking moments. Do the sounds of rifles crack? Yes. Grenades that explode near you, will shake you up and be loud. The sounds in this game are amazing. From the hum of the chopper as it starts up to the rumble of your tank, you will feel like you are in this breathing world of military hardware the moment the game starts up. The graphics are amazing. There are times when I simply stare off into the horizon, in awe at how large the map is. You can customize your character for a more immersive feel in game. There are mods and various game modes. From Deathmatch to King of the Hill and DayZ Epoch, there is something for every FPS fan. The gameplay mechanics and controls are deep. Be ready for about 8 different key strokes for how you can take cover, but it works in its favor as you want to have the most concealed firing position yet be able to hit your target so peeking around corners, from low to the ground rocks and more make combat from mountains or Close Quarters dynamic and fresh. Piloting a heli or driving a tank is easy to pick up and rewarding when you master it. For airplanes, you may find the controls difficult as having a stick is the best and easiest way to effectively pilot (some players only pilot and use only the joystick in multiplayer). There are really cool workshop game modes you can download and play solo or with friends. 10/10 I highly recommend this game due to its gameplay, controls and graphics. If you enjoyed the ArmA series you will love this game and if you like military shooters with some realism, you will also enjoy picking this game up.
Potat;-;Arma 3 Gives me a hard on whenever i open it.Just the smell of the cover makes me want to murder a puppy and  on a newborn baby with cancer like cause iam just so indie like that. Its like the love of my life i dont need a girlfriend because i have my Arma 3 by my side. My non indie Friend Rory Evans hates this game cause he is not Indie like me. It gives me more to do around the house other than thinking bout ways to kill myself or How to make the news with the next big mass school killing.
G.l-l./-\.Z.!;-;one of the best games ever. u need time to learn how to play and more to master. the best mods are wasteland and altis life and its keep updating by community. there's more mods like breaking point and epoch wich is like dayz. 9/10
Moinky;-;Why is my game crashing so much Why do I only get 20fps no matter what I do Why does none of this game make sense Why are we using 1980-1990's tech in 2035 Why are all the tanks the same Why is everything so boring Why is the MX so  Why is the editor so  Why Why Whyyyyy Overall 10/10 would buy 2 copies of again with the hope that my game doesn't crash anymore.
Sith Wick;-;I've just now only started playing this and I must say it is AMAZING. "Best Military Sim" YES. 100x YES. The realism in this game is something out of a movie. It feels like you're there in the moment, like you're in the shoes of a soldier on the field. The campaign is short but has potential, the tutorial explains things minimally, but does suffice. Now to the fun stuff, the Multiplayer. My god, if you're someone who's wondering whether or not to buy this game solely based on it's Multiplayer, go right ahead and buy it. The people you meet online are so diverse it's crazy! I've met countless people on ARMA that were put in my situation and we learned the ropes together! It was quite the mess getting yelled at, but eventually we got it down. I'm in to shooters, but not really into sims, (Yet I love DayZ, whut) but this game really is something else. Fans of "DarkRP" from the famed GMod will find the ALTIS RP to be quite the upgrade from that, when playing it you can really feel the nostalgia from the DarkRP craze. Lastly, if you noticed this was made by Bohemia and think this game is as broken as DayZ, please, PLEASE, understand that this game is in no way shape or form like DayZ. The actual game is playable and so hard to put down when started. If you need help deciding on whether or not to buy this let this review help! Hope to see you in the RPG servers!
Euchole;-;I started up ARMA 3 yesterday with my mate, we were playing on a wasteland server for about 2 hours, we got lots of loot and it was awesome. He had a ghillie and I had a scuba suit, we swam to an island but he was slower in swimming so I went down to the bottom of the sea to get him a scuba suit (We saw 2 down there) and while I was doing this, I noticed that one of the suits moved. Both of them got up and started shooting us underwater, we died and lost our loot. 10/10 pirates took our booty hole.
Neo;-;I think that a lot of people are afraid of this game because they see the ultra-realistic warfare videos made in this game on YouTube but you really shouldn't be. This game isn't just for those realism enthusiasts, this game is also for those who like sandbox games. You can create your own scenarios to play with friends or alone. The editor is very great in this game right off the bat, but if you take some time to learn the more advanced options of it you'll be able to create some really neat scenarios. You can create a hostage rescue mission, a go-kart race course, and many more. This is really fun to play around with by yourself if you don't have friends that are into this game. The game is very well optimized, taking a huge step from Arma 2. There's a lot of free content being put into the game such as new guns, vehicles and many bug fixes every month. The game is constantly being updated to provide the best experience. Online gives you a huge variety of scenarios, from zombie survival to Battlefield-style conquest, even to regular deathmatch in small to large areas. There are lots of guns in this game that can all be customized with various scopes, magazines, flashlights and more. The gameplay/controls take a while to get used to because they are so weird at first but eventually everything will make sense and feel very natural, though you will have to re-learn it if you take a long break from playing the game like I did when I stopped playing for a month or so. Overall the game is very great, especailly with friends on your own scenarios. I'd reccommend this game mainly to lovers of sandbox games for how easily moddable it is and how easy it is to create scenarios. 9/10 my favorite in the Arma series
CalamityClams;-;Fantastic game and beautiful in every way if you can hit good frames on ultra. Otherwise unfortunately it's pretty computer hungry so I'll have to hold off from playing this until I can afford a better GPU. -Fantastic realism -Massive environment -The community online is great most times -Big learning curves if you're into that The only thing that I really wanted was an ability to put on some Creedence on while flying towards our AO
Trapped_With_Ackbar;-;I came from FPS games like Call of Duty and Battlefield, those games are fun but in the end they are arcade style, they don't offer you a real taste of what it is really like to shoot a gun or being hit by a bullet. Red Orchestra 2 came a little closer to real combat, but Arma 3 is the most realistic military simulator ever. Despite the fact that it requires great effort to even kill someone with a gun (recoil, sight, stability, etc), it is fun to play this game. At least you understand you can't run across a map for 10 minutes straight, get hit by 10 bullets and still regenerate. This is the real deal. It's not too friendly to new players but the challenging aspect is intriguing enough to keep you going.
Kor;-;:D worth $59.99
SMKN;-;Arma 3 is an AWESOME rpg just buy it
JamieFLUK;-;My Quick review. Arma 3 is probably the most user friendly entry into the series. Not to the mention the best looking, and in my opinion the most fun to play. Now, thats not to say doesn't have issues. CURRENTLY, not as much content as the previous entries, but that said, BIS is working on more and its soon to come. Obviously the modder community is working feverishly away. Steam workshop support for missions is great, and as soon as they add support for full Mods, everything will be even better. The game plays as one would expect. Its a tactical simulator, so that means the average expericance wont be a firefight every few seconds. Tehre is waiting, there is walking, but if you're of the right mindset, it all adds to the experience and build up. Knowing only a few shots can kill you make it quite tense. Key points- -The new stance system is great, a variable height and lean, means you can make the most out of any cover you find yourself in! - The maps are huge and varied, with the scenario editor you can quickly whip up any type of engagement you want. - The game is better multiplayer, if your more of a Solo player, I wouldn't say you'll have no fun, but I think it'd be more limited. - So many mods on the horizon, all will add up to be the experience you want, tailored to you. So, all that said, I love this game. Devs are continuining support with regular updates and additions. Join a multiplayer community and prepare to have a blast!
krakr10jak;-;love this game i keep spending all my hours on it
Jadeia;-;I'm not a massive FPS gamer, but then, I don't really count this game as a FPS. It's not like Battlefied, CoD or any of those types of titles. This is a combat simulator, and I have been immidiately impressed with the single player campaign (which I normally don't play!). The game doesn't feel as responsive as some newer titles (BF4), but it's realism to me, seems excellent. I don't know of course, I've never been in a war, and hope I never have too - but playing this game makes me feel about as close as I'd want to get. I only started playing this game really after playing DayZ Standalone, and will definately be continuing the explore it further.
Death Angel;-;An amazing game with incredible potential!
Alistair Burden;-;While there are still a few bugs, it really is a great game, MUCH better than ArmA 2. Highly Recommended!
Frags;-;This game.... is good. 999999/10
SyphilisFox;-;got spawn killed by a man with a handgun, then he hunt me down just to take my clothes and dignity. 10/10 would play again
AlmostLethal;-;I could not recommend this game even if I wanted to. Download is horrible, way too many gigs of space used for a game that is pretty choppy, decent graphics, and just a mess over all. The tutorial is fair enough, and the prologue is fine. But the campaign is horribly tedious and that's if you don't keep dying at it and having to respawn from autosave because they don't allow you to save for yourself after a certain point. Be prepared to die so many times your fingers will feel it. I'm glad to not be buying this and uninstalling it after I finish typing.
Rob;-;Bohemia Interactive's Arma 3 is the lastest iteration of a long-running series of realistic military sandbox titles, where the common themes have consistently centred upon player freedom, flexibility of action and movement, an expansive open world setting, an impressive degree of virtual realism and a passionate player community. Set in the near future, Arma 3 presents the player with the sprawling, high-fidelity terrain of Altis, a war-torn Mediterranean island in the Agean Sea caught up in the building tensions between NATO and the growing influence of an eastern military alliance known as CSAT. This simmering geopolitical state of play serves as the core backdrop to the title's 3-part singleplayer campaign and persists as the central theme and justification of the game's simulated conflict. The island of Altis itself is an immense, detailed and truly immersive canvas upon which the player is free to realise practically any military scenario of their imagining; where the journey from point A to point B can easily encompass many kilometres and where topography and geographic features can collude to radically alter player tactics. Based loosely upon the real island of Lemnos, Altis is able to achieve a uniquely natural feel to its coasts, rolling hills and forests and stands as a great testament to the skill and dedication of Bohemia interactive's map designers. Even while pinned under withering enemy fire, one cannot help but be struck by its beauty and authenticity. Arma 3 also offers up a plethora of near-future military hardware; from various firearms, transports, logistical supports, infantry fighting vehicles, main battle tanks, helicopters as well as fighter jets and boats. The assets are generally very well modelled with distinct individual characteristics which make driving a quadbike a very different experience from that of a lumbering metal behemoth. While the helicopter flight dynamics are driven by Bohemia's optional, challenging but immensely rewarding advanced flight model, fixed-wing aircraft in Arma 3 remain the begrudging recipients of a comparatively rudimentary flight model that is perhaps a reflection of the series' traditional focus on ground-centric gameplay. Given the near future setting, it is pertinent to note that much of the title's military assets are modelled upon real-life prototype weaponry, as well as a few present day variations met with a degree of developer artistic licence and fabricated designations. This notable departure from the well-established and popular modern day armaments that featured so prominently within previous titles in the series is undoubtedly a bold move by Bohemia, and one that still remains a divisive point of discussion within the player community. The sounds of Arma 3, traditionally a less impressive facet of previous titles in the series, has undergone a marked improvement in this latest offering. Sustained post-launch updates to sound attenuation, super-sonic bullet cracks along a general reboot of the veracity of weapon fire in general have improved Arma 3's soundscape immeasurably, ensuring that the aural experience of its virtual warfare remains an authentic, often terrifying but ultimately satisfying assault upon the senses. Arma 3 also comes bundled with an incredibly powerful mission editing suite which places the player in complete control of the entirety of the game's imposing asset list. It is in this mode, perhaps more so than any other where the title truly shines as a sandbox experience. With a little practice and experimentation, the player is able to construct fully realised military scenarios of varying complexity, for themselves, their friends or the community at large with objectives limited only by the bounds of the author's imagination. This uninhibited freedom, a cornerstone of the series, remains wonderfully present within Arma 3's core offering. It would be almost criminally irresponsible to discuss Bohemia's flagship franchise without a brief mention of Arma's imperious modding community and the staggering host of improvements, fixes, overhauls and tweaks that this vibrant collection of talented indivduals provides. Whether one seeks to reintroduce real-life armies and modern-day weapon sets to their virtual arsenal, to aquaint oneself with a fresh new terrain upon which to wage war, or to apply a simple yet powerful overhaul to realism, the impressive array of user-made mods make this possible. Player created content has persisted as an important keystone of the series' appeal and longevity since its debut and continues to form an integral part of Arma 3's broader experience. Players new to the series may find themselves understandably intimidated by the sheer bredth and depth of the content on offer, not to mention some of the more unforgiving aspects of the simulation. Thankfully Boehemia Interactive have introduced a host of means to facilitate the familiarisation process in the form of an in-game field manual and hint system, an introductory campaign, a Tron-esque virtual reality terrain and even providing the means for more experienced players to act as 'drill instructors' to teach newer players the ropes online. While a handful of frustrating AI, user interface, animation and optimisation/stability querks persist, Bohemia Interactive have created what is easily the most accessible title in the franchise to date. As a reflection of Arma 3's flexibility, this is a title that has come to mean many different things to its expansive playerbase and one that can be played in a huge variety of different modes and playstyles. As a result Arma 3, perhaps more so than any previous iteration in the series, has seemed to grapple increasingly with the fallout of its own versatility. Attempting to establish a consensus on exactly how the game 'should be played' has become an increasingly tenuous prospect and one that is arguably unnecessary. In the creation of Arma 3, Bohemia Interactive has taken upon the unenviable task of treading the fine middle-ground that exists between sustaining the high degree of realism that the series is famous for, while attempting to preserve fun and engaging gameplay for newcomers or those unacclimatised to a realistic simulation experience. 'Realism' itself, has proven to be an immensely subjective term within a virtual setting, and one that invariably means vastly different things to different players. The finer points of the title's realism with respect to certain game features remains a continual point of contention within the player community and one that appears unlikely to abate any time soon. Arma 3's greatest triumphs then are to be found in its versatility and impressive open-world gameplay. Players are offered near total freedom, a staggering choice of armament, and a mandate to pursue their objectives however they see fit employing tactics entirely of their own design. This is a hugely layered and expansive sandbox title offering the player a unique gameplay experience and a gaming platform that has earned the rightful praise of many loyal fans.
Rabbit;-;Fell 50 meters out of a chopper in multiplayer, didn't open my chute and lived. 10/10
Sakarula;-;The game needs some polishing, but when it is done I think the result will be damn good :) worth a buy
Revo [Pale Horse];-;It was the only game i played till i had 140hrs on it. O.o
squalityctrl;-;Fun game all around worth the money!
Robert Pickton;-;Very strategic and requires skill more than anything.
Arock;-;If you like playing games you'll like playing this game.
dragonSLO;-;the beast :D
<font face="Segoe Script">Adieu;-;Perfect short-distance graphics effect & nice weapon mods,but distant view seems a little simple... prety much tactical options for players and much funny veichles , particularly the helicopters,and the karts! ahahaha somehow the multiplayers mode its hard 2 connect for that evry server needs sm  addons . and  CNS internet,which makes hi ping.
Eddie;-;Playing this game on a public server with random people will make you hate this game. Playing this game on a private server with a chosen few will make you love this game.
MrHuachuca;-;Well, Arma 3, Arma 3. Personally this is my favorite War game and maybe even my favorite war game of all time. Reason being is due ot it's heartbeating intense firefights. Espicially when you get along with some freinds and mods and completely make Arma into a full on Military Simulator. I honestly think Arma 3 campaign has a great story mode to it, every special part of the campaign made me want to not quit it! Intense scripting and story line for sure! Graphics wise, i think arma 3 has AMAZING graphics for a computer game, however the bad thing is you need a really buffed up computer to do it. Need a new graphics card/video card, and maybe even a new motherboard or CPU will help! Arma 3 multiplayer is OUTSTANDING, it's one of the best multiplayer communitys out there for it's great teamwork players and amazing gamemodes like Altis Life, Wasteland, and Invade And Annex! If you love battlefield, call of duty, or any other war FPS/realism war games this is the game for you and it's worth the money!
No_Scope_Only Kappa;-;great game would r8 8/8 m8
conley2222;-;Damn good game. So many mods, so little time.
#GQS +=TaZeShOoT;-;very nice game lots of weapons maps based in greek islands but if you dont have a friend to play with dont buy it and also very nice edditor mode where you can make yor own missions
=7Cav=CPL.Romney.H;-;Got Killed through a wall of smoke from 700m away by a 9mm. 11/10 would get rekt again
thegreatHAH;-;This Game is absolutely beautiful. Some of my best moments have been on this game, not only is the vanilla game absolutely brilliant but the modding community is also spectacular. You can play as Marines, Army, Navy, whatever you choose. That being said, some further optomization is necessary as this game has major lag spikes and crazy FPS drops, even in singleplayer. I have played for 300 hours and have yet to play the campaign, its great. If you are wondering what this game requires graphics card wise, I am playing with a MSI Radeon R9 270x which is a mid range card, on all ultra at average of 50-60 FPS (On singleplayer). For a long time I was playing with a NVIDIA GeForce 610 which is a low end card but wsa still able to play and had great expierences with. So Overall, no matter what your specs are, buy this game. If your specs aren't quite good enough to run it on ultra or high the sheer gameplay expierences will make you want to invest mor time, and of course more money on PC games. Gameplay 10/10 Graphics 9/10 FPS 7/10 Storyline (from what I've seen from others and from the few missions I have dabbled in) 9/10 Overall 9/10 would play
Raivol;-;well I only have 100 hours on this one. But that's enaugh after I've played nearly 2000 hours of ArmA 2 OA with and without the DayZ mod.(440 or so hours wasteland, 220 hours on a single dayz server and about 150 - 200 on multiple other DayZ epoch servers via DayZ commander) The game is simply improved, it runs better than the old one does (at least on my system), looks great, is less clunky. The game is set in future (I dislike this bit) Is a time cow as alaways. To newcomers this game takes time. There are no quick 10 minute rounds. The meat of the game for me is on 120 people wasteland servers, where it takes time to get gear, takes time to travel, takes time to siege and objective and so on. An average paly session will last from 2 hours and up (If you want to acctualy acomplish something). 10/10 would recomend if you can run it. Howerver I'd simply suggest picking up ArmA 2 when it's avalible for 5 or less euros, since the price is quite steep when not on sale and you're either going to love this (like I do) or hate it. It's not comparable to Battlefield or Call of Duty. And even more so it's false to think that liking any of those games will make you like ArmA as well. Also when deciding on making your purchase take a good hard look will you be able to run this game and if can play a game on 30 fps. I'm all PC master race guy with atleast full HD and 60fps as a requirment, however without the latest and greatest rig it's hard to swim around 60fps in this title. SP runs well, very well even, but when it comes to MP your expierence is close to unpredictable. On some servers you'll be running great and on some you'll have 10fps no matter what you do. This game is uniqe. It's more like tools and materials that can be used to create a beautifull house, than the house itself. If you want to expierence the construction of your house rather than getting one already built, there is no better title than this one.
Pientah;-;This games brings really fun and is addictive :> Great workshop and mods makes this game even better. Really worth to buy if you are looking for something to play longer than 1 hour.
slowbo53;-;Fun As Hell! Great game, only complaint is.... NO JUMP. REALLY!! Epic fail in that department as your legs into the floor of the cement pad you try to climb on to. I will say amazing game other then that though,
Apocalyptic;-;Great game.Gives you that original war feeling.For those who are interested in tactical gaming this is the game for you.
Snooowwwcaaaaat;-;Awesome game, addicting.
FunkMonkee;-;THIS GAME IS FUN , BUT MOSTLEY FOR THE MODS AND OTHER MULTIPLAYER
The Golden Chode;-;Great game. IMO, more realistic than Arma 2, better graphics engine. I was able to run it in 1600x960p. Recoil is not that of a damn Barrett .50 cal when you are shooting a pistol. Cooler story and just overall an advancement from Arma 2. OP AF
Suarez;-;one of the best gaems
TheIrishGhost;-;Have had this game for a while, near enough have 100 hours, i don't play the campaign but i do play the multiplayer and it is quite fun. Played on Invade and Annex with others and gave sniper cover over a valley. Played on Altis life and became a rebel killing cops. Played king of the hill and had to fight my way through the streets of Kavala. Long story short. This game is good, the SP and MP are both good, People are good but some can be annoying.
Vox;-;Looted the corpse of my fallen comrade and took his sunglasses. 10/10 respec for your fallen bredas.
Vampircorn;-;This game is definitely a direct improvement over Arma 2. If you are familiar with that game, it is very easy to transition over to this game. I especially enjoy the mission editor. The mission editor has a pretty steep learning curve, but enough tutorials and trial and error will get you competent with the editor's logic. The game is much better optimized than Arma 2 was, but it still runs pretty awful on multiplayer, even with a high spec PC. I ended up having to turn down my view distance to a pretty low amount to consistently get 40 fps on multiplayer, because the fps largely relies on the server's power. On single player or a small server of 5-10 people, I could just about max out the game with a steady 60 fps. I am disappointed with the DLC though, as it really doesn't add much at all to the game at this point, and it retails at $25. I would recommend picking this game up, even if you have never played the other Arma games, because it seems like it has a much smaller learning curve than previous titles, but is still just as in-depth. This game is a good purchase, especially on sale, the DLC on the other hand is not currently worth it.
Frost3012;-;This game is one of the most polished bohiema interactive games i will write this review in catgorieys i hope you agree with me Gameplay - SinglePlayer 3 - 5 The singleplayer is ok the campaign was not as good as the others and that is why i give it a 3 out of a 5 as i would not replay this campaign Content - Vanilla 2 - 5 in arma 3 Vanilla the content is pritty much recycled for examples there are like 10 varients of a MX rifle and not many default vechicles and thats why i would rate Content for the Vanilla 2 out of 5 Content - Add-ons 5-5 The main thing about arma is that the DLC is made by mostly the communtiy aka Free - Addons you can get addons that add more weapons, more Vehicles, More Infentry and MUCH MORE!!!! making the addons for content a perfect 5 Vehicles - Handling and Models 4-5 The Vehicle play in arma aka handling is not really that good but the Models are amazing and have had alot of hard work put in them making this catgory a 4 Mission Editor - aka the editor that allows people to make a misson 5 - 5 The Mission editor is spectacular in arma 3 and should allway be used want to make a halo dive misson you can make it want to make a infiltration mission you can do it want to make a stealth misson you can do it making a perfect 5 Overall 9 - 10 Arma 3 is deffintly worth a buy i would recomend it if you are a hardcore fan of arma 2 the addons add huge amounts of replability i hope you get this game and enjoy it the Multiplayer gets a 5-5 since its so amazing i would reccomed this game to anyone who is a fan of Arma games
Too Bot For You To Handle;-;This game is an amazing game and I recommend every body trys it
Tereznic;-;I tried the game on the free trial and I have to say it was the funnest expirence Ive had in a WHILE. I cant get it right now because its too pricy for me.
how can she slappp;-;a 12 yr old raged at me for taking his pilot seat in an attack helicopter, i then proceeded to takeoff and lag into the ground, teamkilling 6 guys, got banned from server. 420/69 would lag/steal again p.s. i have an i7 4820k, gtx 780, 16gb ram, 240gb ssd.....pull 17 fps most of time GOTY
Genistu;-;Arma 3 is a big fail.Not in Alpha state but definitely not completed. Game changes from update to update,also addons stop working with new version.You might say it's normal because new version has fixed the bugs.Wrong again.New version go on conflict with addons that worked very well from day 1,as for bugs...stil not solved,very often fps drops and connection issues between client and server. Gameplay...LAME...for 2015 Arma 2 was a big hit. Arma 3 is another version on Arma 2 with "new" tweaks. Annoying DLC screen while flying in vehicles from DLC.
lilvpy;-;IM SURPRISED I actually got addicted to it! Best game playing Alone OR Online. Soooo Gooood!
Tourelle;-;LOVE IT
TwelveGaugeSlug;-;Terrible multiplayer optimization with those who have AMD chips. Running an 8 core bulldozer AMD CPU with 8GB of DDR3 and a R9 270x and I cant get over 15-20Fps tops while online (no matter the server). Terrible. Its a known issue with this game engine, but it looks like there isnt any hope in site in the near future. Otherwise I think id like this game. I really have no use for the single player, so im not sure about it. I do know its playable on most rigs, even AMD ones. But I bought this one for the MP and I cant play it, so....not sure how good it is gameplay wise really. (PS-its not just my setup that causes these issues either. I couldnt run it any better with my AMD FX-6100 6 core with samsung DDR3 and a HD 7770 GPU).
Clethos;-;Arma 3 One of the best Military Simulator on the market right now! Alot of good features,Shooting out of vechicles and a very good! Warning:AMD performs worse than Intel in this game due to it being more Cpu based Buy it on sale or right now!
PantryPicker;-;I love this game! My dad beats me too.
OneShot;-;Played Dayz Standalone version.... Enjoyed it but so many cheaters hacking, So the only way I could play was to hack also.. It ended with a global account battleye ban. Brought Arma 3 on this account and loved it, however could not play online as the ban carried over onto this game also which I was devastated about. I loved this game and agree with the mojority of postive comments... so I decided to create a new account and buy Arma 3 again. Overall I am happy with paying double the price as I have a great game and I spent many hours on Dayz griefing the hackers and giving them a taste of their own medicine. 10/10
BlockAgent;-;This game is very poorly put together. Feels like the developers did a half-effort job putting it together and figured if a world existed, well maybe mods can make it a playable game. 3 hours of playing it was enough for me. What a terrible "game".
BlockAgent;-;This game is very poorly put together. Feels like the developers did a half-effort job putting it together and figured if a world existed, well maybe mods can make it a playable game. 3 hours of playing it was enough for me. What a terrible "game".
FoxMulder560;-;Pros: - .... Cons: -Horrible. Constant crashing, -Cant play ANY mod at all when ALL I EVER WHANTED was to play Epoch , Battel Royal and Wasteland Chernarus. -60$ game + 30$ for 2 chopper ? ... -100 Gig (Arma 3 + few mod install ) Wish i have some good words to the game but i Cant get a single match to function and yes i watch youtube video and all but after 3 days i still unable to run any mod. This game only remind me my experience on DayZ.Crash after crash and bug after bug. I made a huge mistake buying DayZ and ARMA, I will not support Bohemia Interactive anymore.
[] -Complex- [];-;Freaking AWESOME game. Love It <3
benor13;-;it no work for me
infidel;-;Great idea, good controls etc...........but the bugs are horrific. Almost 2 years on and you can still die from clipping through walls, missions can't be completed, or the AI breaks is just not acceptable.
Reeplaay;-;Interesting game. But it's not worth the amount of money you will have to spend. Also keep in mind that new mods will come or DLCs and you might be forced to pay more and more. Also the game play itself it's too glitchy and buggy. It feels like a early 2000s game. You die from fall damage instantly, your vehicles get wrecked instantly with a slight bump. If the wind was included in the physics it would probably kill you. This is proably really good game for army tactic training but as a gamer i don't recomend it.
Amat3ur;-;Impossible to create COOP game (server is not responding/server is invisible, etc.) I don't wanna play on DEDICATED servers only. I wanna play with friends, in COOP mode. If it's impossible, the game does not make sense. It is useless to execute such game at all and waste a time. Also thanks to updates I am unable to finish CAMPAIGN maps in SOLO mode even once. Missing COOP mode with friends in CAMPAIGN maps. I dont wanna play CAMPAIGN against AIs only and as SINGLE person without COOP help of my friends. If COOP within CAMPAIGN is impossible, playing such a game is just a waste of time.
Kilo;-;Amazing. BIS have outdone themselves this time!
Mekki;-;Input lag on all controls makes you feel as though you're running around with a block of concrete strapped to your head. The new Go Karts have what feels like a 100ms delay in single player from me pressing the D or A key to the wheels actually starting to turn.
DonutQuadriceps;-;altis life sucks and its so hard to run its stupid
Korbi;-;dont buy this game. its not finished. there is no story, there are bugs, ai is stupid,........ bohemia doesnt give a  about releases they promised. we are still waiting for the 2nd part of the campaign that should have been released - as promised - in december. now the tell us it will be february. its a sanbox and without community developers this game would worth 0.- I highly recomment to wait a few months.
moris.segouras;-;I've played the game during the free weekend and it is extremely laggy even in standart settings my pc has all the recomended features.unless it is a temporary bug that everyone deals with i dont suggest it to anyone.
CyberT7;-;best tactical game ever
Scotty | Snowman;-;Tried to land helicopter on top of a car while the intire rest of the team are fighting back the enemy. Car blows up. Kills 3 enimies. 10/10 Best noscope sim 2002
Zeapar;-;Tis a great game...
[S]poilers1;-;Pretty good game. You can fly helicopters and  and its better than cod. 12/8 ign
sgt.ketchup [PL];-;Sheitty DLC that is about the same price of the full game? Hell yeah! Optimization? Naaahhh who needs that.
Gunism;-;Get Arma 2, it's better than this. It has much more compared to Arma 3. I don't know why, but other than that, I prefer Arma 2 over this. This is just a copy of it, with an increased price slapped onto it. And by the way, if you're only purchasing the Arma series for DayZ -- don't . Just ing buy DayZ.
Frost;-;To much fun
Deathraven;-;Gamemodes for Arma 3 in a nutshell... -Altis Life = Getting run other in the first few seconds -Wasteland = Get killed by your own team -Arma 3 Life = Pay $30 or gtfo -King of the hill = Get killed by people who are higher level then you who are in jets. -Zues = .... Whats Zues? Overall, gud game to die in 11/10
T-Cubed;-;Arma 3 is a good game, just not for me, I don't like it very well. It still a good game, don't get me wrong. I just don't enjoy it as much as any of my other games.
Razz;-;Amazing game, especially Altis life, some people say sixty dollars isn't worth it, it is. Altis life and the workshop content are aspiring over expectations of most mod players, the base game is pretty good (Pretty complicated though), I would say the mods are the best of this game, like of course Garry's Mod, Altis life is my favorite, I play Battle Royale occasionally but my secondary gamemode that I play in the downtime of my favorite Altis Life server is King of The Hill, amazing gamemode, also to mention this game (just like Arma 2) is extremely moddable, unlike all EA games and lets say triple A games. All and All its worth sixty dollars and is a must buy. There are some downsides to this game like Arma 2 not that well of optimization (extremely better than Arma 2) but thats my opinion also DSYNC is a problem to some servers and you WILL have problems if you have a terrible internet company like me, would buy again. 9/10
Wax;-;As a combat veteran my opinion in' matters. I give this game 5 Hooahs outta 5 Hooahs.
TheMajorN;-;Great simulator! No wonder it won the award. It's just at the right pace, not too fast, not too slow. There's no health regeneration, so if you get shot, you're either going to have to patch yourself up or just tread with a wounded arm or leg. Best of all, no one fusses about it! There's no Call of Duty vs. Battlefield wars, no Ubisoft bandwagon hate. It's just Arma III.
Drakkhan;-;Not worth buying it. Runs like crap even with better Systems as Recommandet. Sry. BI but u ed it up again and after 2 years now its still a bloody mess...
SKing;-;Optimize your  game Bohemia Interactive, there is no reason I can play BF4 completely maxed at an average 80 FPS yet have issues running this game smoothly at all.
niten57;-;Very disapointed.
Kaito Kyo;-;The ing DLC Is Too Damn Expensive
Chuffer;-;Fantastic, huge open sandbox filled with the most abysmal, incompetent and down right dumb AI I've ever seen. I have over 70 hours of playtime on this and I have no idea why. It has potential for greatness but is ultimately just a hot mess of clunky controls and terrible systems. An example being your squad will often engage enemies that are specs on the horizon and go full auto on them. They will then precede to nag you constantly about having no ammo and will not rearm themselves at all. You litteraly have to get them to stand still, open their inventry and place any ammo clips you might have in their hands :-( This is just one tiny issue of hundreds that make it feel like an absolute chore to play. Its like baby sitting a squad of demented 6 year olds.
Xephyros;-;Even someone with a tricked out PC can't play this smoothly. Otherwise it would be awesome.
CrispyK;-;Awesome and pretty realistic game. If you have an AMD setup do NOT buy this game ! If you have a 800$ pc do NOT buy this game because even on lowest settings you can't get more than 30fps other than the first 10 minuts of game then it drops half way down. If you are ok with games that run at 20 fps then you will be happy with arma 3.. since it sometimes run at 25fps. The amount of desync is insane so if you have the battlefield 4 getting killed gehind walls don't buy this game because it's even worse, literally . The huge FPS drops when there is an explosion is insane, and the sound crackling and making you drop to 5 fps is constant. The amount of times where you empty a mag on an enemy that just turns around and 1 shot you is prety common. If you have +1000$ build a intel setup with nvidia gpu and buy this game. Then buy a streaming pc if you want to stream. well if you have +1800$ actually and not 1000$ If you have +1000$ build a amd setup with ati gpu and DO NOT buy this game. Then buy any other game and play with +60 fps on ultra while streaming. The graphics and the resources this game demands makes no sense at all. Arma 2 looks as good if not better. Oh yeah there's ragdoll in arma 3 woohoo. No seriously. Do NOT buy this game, constant DLC that you have to pay for, optimization updates followed by lower performance... unless you have intel/nvidia setup. This game is based on x87... the most  thing to do. 3 years of dev and yeah... you get the picture. Just deleted the game myself, will never reinstall, will never recommend it and will never buy a game from Bohemia interactive in my life and will beat my kids uo if they buy one! JK or am i? game is at 50$ on steam and then you can spend 50$ on DLC (probably 50$ more when future DLC will be released) and 1400$ on a PC just to play this game. Isnt that just great?! Oh if you have some spare money after all this feel free to donate some to me so i can play a game that i bought 2 years ago when i had the same performance (~25fps) on my old dual core pc with gts 260 that i have on my 8350 with r9 270x setup.
Sir Warren Twinkelote;-;TL;DR: 1) Still has as many bugs as in Arma 2. 2) Better graphics. 3) Even less FPS. 4) The game only uses 1 core of your N-core CPU (no improvement, a bad thing overall) 5) 32-bit only: even more lags. 6) The developers made a huge focus on DLCs: not much content in the game itself (weapons/vehicles). Verdict: Wouldn't buy if I weren't a fan of DayZ-mod or Arma 2 Hello, dear, let me guess... Arma2/DayZ-mod fan? As of now, I have 833 hrs on record playing Arma 2: OA (primarily DayZ-mod and derivations). At the beginning of this review I'd like to write down my expectations before rating this modern game Many of you know (if you don't, it might actually be a good thing), ArmA 2, especially talking about the DayZ mod, had more bugs than the whole african tropical rainforest. Most of the bugs were depressing, but some were really funny and those became true insider jokes among my mates. Back to the "not-so-funny-bugs" and the laggy game engine which only could effectively use 1 CPU core (-> 70FPS at most on a 2011 mid/high-end PC). Those were the reasons I bought Arma 3. I wanted a better game, which has better graphics, less bugs and most important: higher FPS. Regarding these aspects: 1) Arma 3 has better graphics (what else would you expect?) 2 and 3) Bohemia Interactive did a great job on their part, applause. /sarcasm off: (surprisingly) Arma 3 still uses only 1 CPU core . Thanks, now I have even LESS FPS than in Arma 2. The average FPS for me is 15-30 and there's no way to increase the FPS. Firstly, because the CPU is the limiting factor (game uses max. 1.5 cores of total 4), so lowering the graphics settings doesn't change much. Secondly, RAM is still an issue. We now live in the 64-bit era. In case you didn't know, 64-bit applications not only can use more RAM (theoretically more than 4GB, on Windows more than 2GB) but also perform a little better (5-20%). As you guessed, Arma 3 is still running 32-bit only. This mainly results in heavy lags on my machine (same applies to Arma 2, but this is an old game, why bother?). After a while, when Arma 3 uses up all of the 2GB RAM provided by Windows, The Great Lag begins. Every now and then I get this Lag Spike, giving me 2-4FPS for a second or two. The game becomes practically unplayable (everyone with a better CPU have a huge advantage over you in terms of FPS). Teh tech explanation: When Arma 3 hits the allocation limit for 32-bit applications (Win32: 2GiB), it begins (or Windows does; doesn't matter) to offload additional memory objects to the pagefile.sys file, which is on your HDD. Hard drives are muuuuuuuuuch slower than RAM and everytime the game requests memory chunks from this file, you run into the 2-4FPS lag spike as the game has to sit here and wait for the data. Pagefiles on SSDs reduce the lag spikes, but don't :csgogun:eliminate them completely, so #blameBohemia #blameArma Now, what's about the bugs? It has got even worse probably. Vehicle damage has become unpredictable . A slightly damaged wheel? (that's what the HUD tells you). Visually still 100%, but the vehicle will crap out and drive at 70% speed, if at all. El helicptero with a fully broken main rotor? I DON'T CARE, STILL GOING UP IN THE AIR LIEK A GOD, ROFL-COPTER IS ON THE WAY. Next example: Playing King of the Hill (Fun gamemode with all vehicles and weapons). You are the pilot of a transport helicopter with 10 passengers in. A rocket hits your heli and it either goes down or explodes instantly, all good so far. So, what's about a little reward for the guy who fired that rocket and killed all the people in the helicopter? NOPE, ER! They all died because of magic/suiciding/Ebola-chan/african bees/ing cactuses. Again: We would like to politely inform you, the player who did kill all these innocent soldiers will not get any kills for that in reward. Do you still want to pay so much for a game? Don't forget, you'll need a PC costing at least 25 times as much to play the game comfortably.
winteryknight;-;I got this in early access and waited until it was bug-free to play it. The game is just garbage. Everything is scripted so that you have to keep loading and saving to complete the campaign missions. Don't waste your money. The AI is non existent, like it was never programmed.
KestrelBirdMan;-;It's a very nice game with multiple dedicated servers with different mods! Brilliant gameplay!
Captain's Mittens;-;one of the best
Drakkhan;-;Not worth buying it. Runs like crap even with better Systems as Recommandet. Sry. BI but u ed it up again and after 2 years now its still a bloody mess...
SKing;-;Optimize your  game Bohemia Interactive, there is no reason I can play BF4 completely maxed at an average 80 FPS yet have issues running this game smoothly at all.
niten57;-;Very disapointed.
Genistu;-;Arma 3 is a big fail.Not in Alpha state but definitely not completed. Game changes from update to update,also addons stop working with new version.You might say it's normal because new version has fixed the bugs.Wrong again.New version go on conflict with addons that worked very well from day 1,as for bugs...stil not solved,very often fps drops and connection issues between client and server. Gameplay...LAME...for 2015 Arma 2 was a big hit. Arma 3 is another version on Arma 2 with "new" tweaks. Annoying DLC screen while flying in vehicles from DLC.
Clethos;-;Arma 3 One of the best Military Simulator on the market right now! Alot of good features,Shooting out of vechicles and a very good! Warning:AMD performs worse than Intel in this game due to it being more Cpu based Buy it on sale or right now!
ATCqj;-;One of the best military sim's out there !
Ben2356;-;A game with an experience and community like no other, with a multitude of game styles on a scale that destroys all rivalry
LeBanishedAngel;-;Nothing can compare to the variety of gameplay Arma III has to offer.
Achieve_HazarD;-;I got to play this game for free as it was one of the free games for the weekend at the time and ive got to say that the experience of war that you get is amazing and would recommend this game to any one who likes role playing games and military simulator's.
Frost;-;To much fun
ENOI;-;This game has terrible optimization.I am getting 15 fps in low graphics.
Ku Klux Delux;-;The game is far too buggy to be worth 60 dollars.
4thWorstPlayer;-;This is a waste of money. You'd think it would be good, but it isn't. It has all the pieces of a good game, but lacks emotion, even for a sandbox.
T.Rix;-;I bought this game with huge anticipation, I have sunk many hours in Arma II, both with combat sims and DayZ mod. To my great displeasure, upon launching this game I quickly realized my system couldn't run it in ultra. That's fine, my computer is a couple years old anyway, I tell myself. I try high settings. Nope. Medium, same story. And finally, I run it in the lowest possible setting, with my fingers crossed hoping that my frames might magically jump from 10 to 60. No dice. Even on the lowest settings my frames will dip to 5fps and stay there during intense battles, ensuring that I die as quickly as possible. Go ahead and google arma 3 FPS fixes, there is article after article of people encountering the same issue as me. If you are running an AMD card, you probably understand my plight. This game must have had it's QA done on one $20,000 computer and Bohemia said "Okeydoke, it's getting 45fps on this beast that means it's good to ship!" because otherwise I do not see how they could possibly feel that this game is both complete and playable. Shame on you, Bohemia.
Chuffer;-;Fantastic, huge open sandbox filled with the most abysmal, incompetent and down right dumb AI I've ever seen. I have over 70 hours of playtime on this and I have no idea why. It has potential for greatness but is ultimately just a hot mess of clunky controls and terrible systems. An example being your squad will often engage enemies that are specs on the horizon and go full auto on them. They will then precede to nag you constantly about having no ammo and will not rearm themselves at all. You litteraly have to get them to stand still, open their inventry and place any ammo clips you might have in their hands :-( This is just one tiny issue of hundreds that make it feel like an absolute chore to play. Its like baby sitting a squad of demented 6 year olds.
Xephyros;-;Even someone with a tricked out PC can't play this smoothly. Otherwise it would be awesome.
CrispyK;-;Awesome and pretty realistic game. If you have an AMD setup do NOT buy this game ! If you have a 800$ pc do NOT buy this game because even on lowest settings you can't get more than 30fps other than the first 10 minuts of game then it drops half way down. If you are ok with games that run at 20 fps then you will be happy with arma 3.. since it sometimes run at 25fps. The amount of desync is insane so if you have the battlefield 4 getting killed gehind walls don't buy this game because it's even worse, literally . The huge FPS drops when there is an explosion is insane, and the sound crackling and making you drop to 5 fps is constant. The amount of times where you empty a mag on an enemy that just turns around and 1 shot you is prety common. If you have +1000$ build a intel setup with nvidia gpu and buy this game. Then buy a streaming pc if you want to stream. well if you have +1800$ actually and not 1000$ If you have +1000$ build a amd setup with ati gpu and DO NOT buy this game. Then buy any other game and play with +60 fps on ultra while streaming. The graphics and the resources this game demands makes no sense at all. Arma 2 looks as good if not better. Oh yeah there's ragdoll in arma 3 woohoo. No seriously. Do NOT buy this game, constant DLC that you have to pay for, optimization updates followed by lower performance... unless you have intel/nvidia setup. This game is based on x87... the most  thing to do. 3 years of dev and yeah... you get the picture. Just deleted the game myself, will never reinstall, will never recommend it and will never buy a game from Bohemia interactive in my life and will beat my kids uo if they buy one! JK or am i? game is at 50$ on steam and then you can spend 50$ on DLC (probably 50$ more when future DLC will be released) and 1400$ on a PC just to play this game. Isnt that just great?! Oh if you have some spare money after all this feel free to donate some to me so i can play a game that i bought 2 years ago when i had the same performance (~25fps) on my old dual core pc with gts 260 that i have on my 8350 with r9 270x setup.
Sir Warren Twinkelote;-;TL;DR: 1) Still has as many bugs as in Arma 2. 2) Better graphics. 3) Even less FPS. 4) The game only uses 1 core of your N-core CPU (no improvement, a bad thing overall) 5) 32-bit only: even more lags. 6) The developers made a huge focus on DLCs: not much content in the game itself (weapons/vehicles). Verdict: Wouldn't buy if I weren't a fan of DayZ-mod or Arma 2 Hello, dear, let me guess... Arma2/DayZ-mod fan? As of now, I have 833 hrs on record playing Arma 2: OA (primarily DayZ-mod and derivations). At the beginning of this review I'd like to write down my expectations before rating this modern game Many of you know (if you don't, it might actually be a good thing), ArmA 2, especially talking about the DayZ mod, had more bugs than the whole african tropical rainforest. Most of the bugs were depressing, but some were really funny and those became true insider jokes among my mates. Back to the "not-so-funny-bugs" and the laggy game engine which only could effectively use 1 CPU core (-> 70FPS at most on a 2011 mid/high-end PC). Those were the reasons I bought Arma 3. I wanted a better game, which has better graphics, less bugs and most important: higher FPS. Regarding these aspects: 1) Arma 3 has better graphics (what else would you expect?) 2 and 3) Bohemia Interactive did a great job on their part, applause. /sarcasm off: (surprisingly) Arma 3 still uses only 1 CPU core . Thanks, now I have even LESS FPS than in Arma 2. The average FPS for me is 15-30 and there's no way to increase the FPS. Firstly, because the CPU is the limiting factor (game uses max. 1.5 cores of total 4), so lowering the graphics settings doesn't change much. Secondly, RAM is still an issue. We now live in the 64-bit era. In case you didn't know, 64-bit applications not only can use more RAM (theoretically more than 4GB, on Windows more than 2GB) but also perform a little better (5-20%). As you guessed, Arma 3 is still running 32-bit only. This mainly results in heavy lags on my machine (same applies to Arma 2, but this is an old game, why bother?). After a while, when Arma 3 uses up all of the 2GB RAM provided by Windows, The Great Lag begins. Every now and then I get this Lag Spike, giving me 2-4FPS for a second or two. The game becomes practically unplayable (everyone with a better CPU have a huge advantage over you in terms of FPS). Teh tech explanation: When Arma 3 hits the allocation limit for 32-bit applications (Win32: 2GiB), it begins (or Windows does; doesn't matter) to offload additional memory objects to the pagefile.sys file, which is on your HDD. Hard drives are muuuuuuuuuch slower than RAM and everytime the game requests memory chunks from this file, you run into the 2-4FPS lag spike as the game has to sit here and wait for the data. Pagefiles on SSDs reduce the lag spikes, but don't :csgogun:eliminate them completely, so #blameBohemia #blameArma Now, what's about the bugs? It has got even worse probably. Vehicle damage has become unpredictable . A slightly damaged wheel? (that's what the HUD tells you). Visually still 100%, but the vehicle will crap out and drive at 70% speed, if at all. El helicptero with a fully broken main rotor? I DON'T CARE, STILL GOING UP IN THE AIR LIEK A GOD, ROFL-COPTER IS ON THE WAY. Next example: Playing King of the Hill (Fun gamemode with all vehicles and weapons). You are the pilot of a transport helicopter with 10 passengers in. A rocket hits your heli and it either goes down or explodes instantly, all good so far. So, what's about a little reward for the guy who fired that rocket and killed all the people in the helicopter? NOPE, ER! They all died because of magic/suiciding/Ebola-chan/african bees/ing cactuses. Again: We would like to politely inform you, the player who did kill all these innocent soldiers will not get any kills for that in reward. Do you still want to pay so much for a game? Don't forget, you'll need a PC costing at least 25 times as much to play the game comfortably.
winteryknight;-;I got this in early access and waited until it was bug-free to play it. The game is just garbage. Everything is scripted so that you have to keep loading and saving to complete the campaign missions. Don't waste your money. The AI is non existent, like it was never programmed.
Echoes;-;It's okay. Also gave me PTSD.
Delirious Owl II;-;Trash game, Bohemia fails to fix the lag issue, hotfixes making the lag even WORSE. The combat isn't realistic if you have 5 fps, Bohemia fix this game before you make more games.
lilvpy;-;IM SURPRISED I actually got addicted to it! Best game playing Alone OR Online. Soooo Gooood!
Tourelle;-;LOVE IT
Deathraven;-;Gamemodes for Arma 3 in a nutshell... -Altis Life = Getting run other in the first few seconds -Wasteland = Get killed by your own team -Arma 3 Life = Pay $30 or gtfo -King of the hill = Get killed by people who are higher level then you who are in jets. -Zues = .... Whats Zues? Overall, gud game to die in 11/10
T-Cubed;-;Arma 3 is a good game, just not for me, I don't like it very well. It still a good game, don't get me wrong. I just don't enjoy it as much as any of my other games.
D3F4ULT3D;-;Great game, fun with friends and the storyline is great.
Angelo9657;-;You want a game where everything is close quarters combat? You want a game where you can see your enemy shooting you? You want a game where your health regenerates and you're able to survive several shots to the face? You want a game where the vehicles are extremely easy to operate and pretty much nearly invincible? You want a game where the guns are easy to aim and you need absolutely no experience to use them? You want a game where the map is nice and small and compact, and is perfectly practical to walk across? Sorry. But this game is not for you. 10/10
TheZombieNinja;-;Great Game
ShoRRti;-;i would like to test arma 3 out can you make it free for like 3 days please?
KestrelBirdMan;-;It's a very nice game with multiple dedicated servers with different mods! Brilliant gameplay!
The Golden Chode;-;Great game. IMO, more realistic than Arma 2, better graphics engine. I was able to run it in 1600x960p. Recoil is not that of a damn Barrett .50 cal when you are shooting a pistol. Cooler story and just overall an advancement from Arma 2. OP AF
Suarez;-;one of the best gaems
TheIrishGhost;-;Have had this game for a while, near enough have 100 hours, i don't play the campaign but i do play the multiplayer and it is quite fun. Played on Invade and Annex with others and gave sniper cover over a valley. Played on Altis life and became a rebel killing cops. Played king of the hill and had to fight my way through the streets of Kavala. Long story short. This game is good, the SP and MP are both good, People are good but some can be annoying.
Vox;-;Looted the corpse of my fallen comrade and took his sunglasses. 10/10 respec for your fallen bredas.
NEXT;-;Good Stuff !
Vampircorn;-;This game is definitely a direct improvement over Arma 2. If you are familiar with that game, it is very easy to transition over to this game. I especially enjoy the mission editor. The mission editor has a pretty steep learning curve, but enough tutorials and trial and error will get you competent with the editor's logic. The game is much better optimized than Arma 2 was, but it still runs pretty awful on multiplayer, even with a high spec PC. I ended up having to turn down my view distance to a pretty low amount to consistently get 40 fps on multiplayer, because the fps largely relies on the server's power. On single player or a small server of 5-10 people, I could just about max out the game with a steady 60 fps. I am disappointed with the DLC though, as it really doesn't add much at all to the game at this point, and it retails at $25. I would recommend picking this game up, even if you have never played the other Arma games, because it seems like it has a much smaller learning curve than previous titles, but is still just as in-depth. This game is a good purchase, especially on sale, the DLC on the other hand is not currently worth it.
Frost3012;-;This game is one of the most polished bohiema interactive games i will write this review in catgorieys i hope you agree with me Gameplay - SinglePlayer 3 - 5 The singleplayer is ok the campaign was not as good as the others and that is why i give it a 3 out of a 5 as i would not replay this campaign Content - Vanilla 2 - 5 in arma 3 Vanilla the content is pritty much recycled for examples there are like 10 varients of a MX rifle and not many default vechicles and thats why i would rate Content for the Vanilla 2 out of 5 Content - Add-ons 5-5 The main thing about arma is that the DLC is made by mostly the communtiy aka Free - Addons you can get addons that add more weapons, more Vehicles, More Infentry and MUCH MORE!!!! making the addons for content a perfect 5 Vehicles - Handling and Models 4-5 The Vehicle play in arma aka handling is not really that good but the Models are amazing and have had alot of hard work put in them making this catgory a 4 Mission Editor - aka the editor that allows people to make a misson 5 - 5 The Mission editor is spectacular in arma 3 and should allway be used want to make a halo dive misson you can make it want to make a infiltration mission you can do it want to make a stealth misson you can do it making a perfect 5 Overall 9 - 10 Arma 3 is deffintly worth a buy i would recomend it if you are a hardcore fan of arma 2 the addons add huge amounts of replability i hope you get this game and enjoy it the Multiplayer gets a 5-5 since its so amazing i would reccomed this game to anyone who is a fan of Arma games
Too Bot For You To Handle;-;This game is an amazing game and I recommend every body trys it
Tereznic;-;I tried the game on the free trial and I have to say it was the funnest expirence Ive had in a WHILE. I cant get it right now because its too pricy for me.
Baithoven;-;Amazing but not a good variety of vehicles. It will deserve the wait though. Love the soundtrack.
[DO] Focke66;-;Very nice game engine with lots of missions and MODs (hopefully full-on) coming for it. If it goes on sale again Im buying 2 more copies that is for sure.
Strength of a Thousand Howards;-;My tank hit a bunny and exploded. Anti tank bunnies- great game fully recommended. 1500/10
P-21;-;Very fun, will play for years.
Reicter;-;Preety wesome game
skywill_15;-;I was really hopeful about ARMA. As it is, it was pretty lame. Maybe it'd be better if I had a super fast computer, AND everyone had the fastest internet known to mankind. It is almost as realistic as WarThunder, but jumpy, jagged, and with laggy multiplayer. Some say the controls are confusing, but I don't agree. The controls are a little different, but you get used to them fairly quickly. Some of the confusion comes from putting more than one action with the same button, switching based on whether it is a tap or a hold. I referenced the controls menu a bunch, but there are numerous tutorials, guides, training scenarios and other practice available right in the game. I really appreciate how realistic it is in that there are no markers for the enemy, and it only takes a couple of hits to kill you. Unfortunately, it always takes at least 4 bullets to kill an enemy. Unless you hit the face. The helmet will not do, you must hit the face or neck. This is actually pretty hard to do when you are at distances of 100+m, which you usually are engaging at those distances +/- 50m, and when they shoot more accurately than you because you have been walking/running everywhere and thus have less fatigue. Avoid ever sprinting, even though the map is bigger than any map in any other game you've ever played in, just be patient and take 2-4 minutes to walk to the next battle. "If you run, you'll just die tired". I went into a multiplayer game and saw helicopters flying around in crazy upside down positions, crashing and falling to the ground. Perhaps a contributing factor was the fact that it was a 70+ person game. When I joined, I saw in the chat room that players were complaining about the lag, as I quickly downloaded a 3.4 MB setting file from the server. Obviously, my joining the game clogged their upstream pipe. This happened a couple times in the game as new players joined, lag spiked. Perhaps a fix of this could be a download mirror used for all servers, or something to save on server bandwidth. This game made me laugh at how unpolished it was at several points. Mostly this was for multiplayer lag jumps, but it was funny when I tried my first multiplayer mission and my trooper, who was not the squad leader, would not stop calling out orders to everyone every 10 seconds. I tried figuring out why I was issuing all these commands, but it happened without my pressing buttons or anything close to the squad command buttons. It was also funny because the in-game voice chat toggle button defaults to [Caps Lock], so when I returned to typing out messages they were SHOUTING HALF THE TIME. Oops. I couldnt figure out how to stop ordering everyone to regroup with me, nor could I find the enemy (it was a co-op mission), so I decided to try something else. In my second multiplayer game, I was starting to get the hang of it. I died plenty at first, sure, but there was always a nice helicopter pilot ready to take us to the battlefield when I respawned. I'm REALLY GLAD I didn't have to walk all that way, because if I did, once would have been enough for me to quit. I was starting to get the hang of it, and even a few kills. Someone finally got me while from a higher building, and I was returning to the battlefield in a helicopter. I started typing to my teammates while riding in the heli, and even though I was typing a message, when I used spacebar during the message, it caused me to jump out of the helicopter without a parachute. I died before I could finish typing out my question, but in a way it answered a different one. I decided to stop playing multiplayer and try the campaign. In the first mission it was funny to have an enemy blazing away full tilt at my essential NPC partner, and for him to not even notice the enemy was there, walking on by. I would have preferred my AI teammate to actually engage the enemy, but I'm sure walking up and shoulder checking him as he walked by was pretty effective. In the same mission, I snuck up on a machine gunner in the same first mission and wanted to see what the "action" button would do when I got close. It turns out, instead of knifing him or doing some other crazy-cool CQB maneuver, I pulled out my medical kit and started bandaging him while he turned his MG on my face and opened up. In the second mission, I wasn't able to progress because one member of my squad spotted an MRAP that he REALLY wanted me to destroy, even when our mission didn't call for it. The rest of our squad was fine to go to the Rendezvous point, but that NPC squad member kept yelling for us to take out the group of enemies by it. The squad leader kept yelling for him to return to formation, and I just kept walking through the forest for a while, hoping that he'd return at the next script line for the story. He didn't. I ended up going back to the last autosave and taking out the rest of them, by myself (after 20+ tries), without backup. I was a little glad I did, because when allies engage the enemy, they die as fast as the enemy does. Which is as fast as you do. Which is QUICK. I never neded up finishing that mission, because even when I knew generally where the enemy was coming from, I couldn't see them to shoot them. But they sure could see and shoot me through all the leaves and bushes in the forest. I died over and over. I'm sure it was a bit like 'Nam, and just as fun. So I decided to uninstall. If it weren't for that, the campaign at least has great production value, on par with Call of Duty. The voice acting, scripting of scenes, and music all are top notch. It is ready for Oculus IR, and maybe I'd enjoy it more if I had a computer that wasn't at least 6 years old. I am usually a simulation enthusiast, loving realism even over gameplay (hey, I like WarThunder, where you also have a hard time identifying who is an enemy and you die in 1-2 hits). However, this was just not very enjoyable. ARMA is like fighting on 3 or 4 battlefield 3 maps at once, with 100 players. That sounds fun, and it could be. As it is, however, it tries to do entirely too much (for my computer). It ends up being a laggy, frustrating mess. It'd be fun at a convention, on a LAN, with computers with monster video cards, because the draw distance is intense. But I was frustrated, not having fun, and ready to uninstall after just a few hours.
Hamsolo;-;Im glad i got this 50% off. Game is wayyyyyy to serious. I hate cod and games like it. Holds your hand all the way through. I thought this was going to be a version of battlefield by a different dev and a little more hands off. BUT I WAS WRONG. THe came is way tooo complicated. Unless your really into super realistic combat sim, this isnt for you! DONT THIS THIS IS AT ALL LIKE BATTLEFIELD. Multi is a mes. The audio sounds like roblox. Gun noises are rediculosly stupid. When you shoot people, the impact is so wierd and rediculos. It is impossible to shoot straight unless you never sprint. Laggy and clunky all around. Graphics do not at ALL warrent a 59$$$ price tag for a 2 and 1/2 year old game. I liked this a little and i will play some more of it but dont pay more than 30$ for it please. I just cant recomend it to anyone but a millitary simulator enthusiest. This games just isn't ment for a large population of people. Sorry i cant recomend.
Dr.Feels;-;Whoa...This Game is awesome! Though buy this game when it is $40-or below.
megawaly;-;my girlfriend hates this game.
Immortal;-;A much better improvement in the way that Arma plays and looks, I recommend this game to all Arma 2 fans and incourage people whom have never played Arma to try it.
mainente99;-;You can be a BUNNY, a F****** bunny, this is awesome 10/10 would be a bunny again
No Homo;-;I CAN'T PLAY ABOVE 20 FPS ON DUAL GTX 970 SLI AND OC CPU W T F IS THIS
NoHitKO;-;The multiplayer modes are brilliant, whether you'd like to add a custom mod and play Breaking point where you and your friends can loot, hide, murder and avenge as need be or you'd like to go onto the roleplay side and play some Altis Life that comes already in the game. It's a fun game if you like any type of shooter, like to drive cars fast, like to have tons of features, and like to play with friends.
Sideeffect;-;Performance is still rubbish. Low FPS while CPU and GPU are barely being used in wastelands. I want to play this game but can't the developers need to optimise the next game from the start to utilise hardware properly. Arma 2 had the same issues though and they ignored that also.
Duke of the Flies;-;Arma 3? More like Ar-this  is not fun. I played Arma 2 a fair bit and it was "fun", but this game just didn't peak any of my interests.  the people who forced me to buy this -ma 3
Amat3ur;-;Impossible to create COOP game (server is not responding/server is invisible, etc.) I don't wanna play on DEDICATED servers only. I wanna play with friends, in COOP mode. If it's impossible, the game does not make sense. It is useless to execute such game at all and waste a time. Also thanks to updates I am unable to finish CAMPAIGN maps in SOLO mode even once. Missing COOP mode with friends in CAMPAIGN maps. I dont wanna play CAMPAIGN against AIs only and as SINGLE person without COOP help of my friends. If COOP within CAMPAIGN is impossible, playing such a game is just a waste of time.
Kilo;-;Amazing. BIS have outdone themselves this time!
Robotic Titan;-;BEST GAME ever. Make sure your 16 or older cause if your not you wont have friends.
yeee;-;10/10 would die from a six foot fall again
stromko;-;I approached this like any other game, though I have played Operation Flashpoint, ARMA 1 & 2 before. Played the campaign, first flaw I noticed is that once the fighting starts in earnest the game's checkpoint just stops, and it won't even let you quicksave for long periods of time. As a result you'll be playing the same sections over and over again unless you're really good at spotting enemies in janky terrain and shooting them through inaccurate terrain hitboxes. Really, most rocks early on in the 'Survive' campaign seem to need about an extra foot of clearance, so if you use them as cover you're just wasting your very limited bullets, and I grimly suspect they would have screwed up just as many collision boxes if not more later on in the game. The enemies you are fighting in that mission also have some pretty good body armor so you need to accurately put a bunch of 6.5mm bullets on target against targets that are running, using terrain, and don't have any problem injuring you. Even having played the prelude I wasn't ready for the long stretch of running with occasional dicey battles and no opportunity to save your progress for a good 10 - 30 minutes fairly early in the Survive campaign. It would have been sensible to maintain flow for the game to at least ALLOW me to manually save before or after each of the firefights that are about 5 minutes apart of just running (or 20 minutes of stumbling along if you take a shot in the leg). Requiring a marathon jog through fighting 3 - 4 decent enemy squads including snipers and machinegunners with only one ally without even the option of saving, let alone automatic saves anywhere in there amongst all the scripted chatter and setpieces that you do encounter, would be fine as an optional challenge but not the start of a campaign where you have to get through it before anything cool happens. You don't even start with a single first aid kit to patch up your leg if you take a round through it, so one unlucky hit and you'll be staggering between checkpoints instead of a 2-minute sprint. For my money I'd rather buy either something a whole lot more interesting and deep than ARMA 3, or something just as simple in theme but with tight controls and good flow. For me ARMA 3 sits in that uncomfortable spot between a simulator and an action game where I'm going to be frustrated by the intricacies and slowness of getting to the action, and then the battles themselves aren't any fun either, especially not with bad checkpointing. That said, this sort of game really lives or dies on its multiplayer. Which I can't be bothered with. So as a singleplayer game, no, I wouldn't recommend it. If a game's singleplayer campaign can't hold up to scrutiny then it shouldn't have one.
Root;-;This game has serious playability issues, starting with trying to see something to shoot at. Something is wrong with the zoom functionality. It says there is a target to shoot out there, I affix a scope and even at maximum zoom I see nothing. Just more white, green, and brown blobs. On top of that, everything looks bad and walking gives me motion sickness after 20min. My solution was to get up and walk 300meters to the target so it would become visible and then shoot it so I could progress. My AI companions did all the shooting when the fighting started. The objective markers virtually disappear and are hard to see against the textures used by the game. The training starts with an NPC talking about Greenbacks and AAF's and I have no clue who these people are. I started the campaign and that just made things even worse. It explains that NATO peacekeepers are pulling out of Altis (fictional mediterranean island) to fight CSAT in the Pacific. There are a lot of hanging plot threads that make no sense, what's with the earthquakes, why do some of the bases get attacked, who is this dead guy I find on the road, what happens to the guys on the bases? Finally you get to the shooting part and it just doesn't work. After the first dozen deaths I end up having to put my face a few inches from the screen to try and see any bad guys and that only causes eye strain. You do not see anything to shoot. They see you, even prone, but you will not see them. No tutorial is given to explain how to nullify the bad guys ability to sense your presence. I quick view of let's plays on youtube shows they are playing a game that actually displays the enemy. Moving on to multiplayer would be nice. If there were actually multiplayer games. Don't be fooled by youtube or the tab that says multiplayer in the menu. There is no multiplayer. There is only multiplayer if you join a community through the forums. And they will have a list of mods to play and generally are about playing with people who already know how to play ARMA3.
Mikal;-;First and foremost, the graphics and realism is very, very, very good. I'd say exceptional. The controls however, are severely lacking, as they are in no way fluid. Using the ASWD + mouse for control, with half of your controls on the other side of the keyboard does not make this all that fun to do. Again, don't misunderstand me. The game's realism and graphics are exceptional, and the storyline was intriguing, but the controls are simply horrible, and it severely detracts from the game when you're having to remove hands from your movement controls, or from the mouse to hit Backspace to clear the squad command windows. In combat, this is NOT something you want to have to do, but there it is. Take it as you will. If you're after a game with good graphics and realism, and a decent storyline, check out ARMA III. If however, you want something that you can play fluidly and not want to bash your keyboard after ten minutes of dealing with the akward controls, move on.
Rollat0r;-;Dont get me wrong, i guess its maybe a nice simulation. The helicopter is loud as hell, you only camp and hope not to die. But for me, its not fun at all. I played the prolouge...had to restart 2 times because of bug and the bots insta kill you or are stupid as hell. Multiplayer: the transportation is nice, the people really wait until the vehicle is full. But for me there was no fun. You go to the battlefield...camp...wait...then you see an enemy! he laggs, you shoot...he disappear..i dont know if i killed him or he just lagged out. Then you die because somebody camped better than you. Even if its more "casual" i liked the Battlefield Bad Company 2 much more. You see more teamplay even you dont know the others and you have entertaining action non stop.
mr_mks | Na blese!;-;Arma 2 is 90% god ! And Arma 3 is only Bull ! it's a DLC game! Tip: Don't Buy DLC Only buy Arma 3 on 50% like me
delerium76;-;I want to like this, but I just can't. The controls aren't nearly intuitive enough, especially switching through the aiming modes, which seem to only work half the time with no explanation? The campain starts by putting red squares around the enemy, then without explanation completely drops this behavior, leaving you to have to visually locate and identify the enemy that are camo'ed and prone all around you, all while they can spot you from miles away and snipe you to death without you even knowing where they were. I gave up after the guy I was following was blown up and have no desire to return to this mess of a game. Maybe the mods/multiplayer are better, but the campain start is such utter crap I can't even bring myself to keep this installed.
Arcane Blades;-;lol...I don't understand how it got such high reviews. people say mods make the game....well that's not the way it should be imo. If the game sucks without mods...well...it just sucks. First 10 minutes of playing the game 2 major bugs. 1 invisible mobs..2 I got stuck going into the next campaign with no ammo for my weapons...I could not go to the ammo stockpile and do a damn thing about it...don't know why, don't care, done playing. Where are all these weapons they talk about? Maybe I didn't get far enough through the game but having only 2 or 3 guns to choose from was just boring...and damn the AI is badass...picking me off a mile away with a gun that in reality you couldn't hit a person with from 3 blocks away....absurd. I don't know maybe the multiplayer is awesome....sounds like that's why people like it...single player? beh...save your cash imo.
Erwin Rommel San;-;It's like skyrim with guns
SecurePath;-;GET THIS GAME!!!!!! 10/10
Daryl2599;-;Im in love with this game !
BlockAgent;-;This game is very poorly put together. Feels like the developers did a half-effort job putting it together and figured if a world existed, well maybe mods can make it a playable game. 3 hours of playing it was enough for me. What a terrible "game".
FoxMulder560;-;Pros: - .... Cons: -Horrible. Constant crashing, -Cant play ANY mod at all when ALL I EVER WHANTED was to play Epoch , Battel Royal and Wasteland Chernarus. -60$ game + 30$ for 2 chopper ? ... -100 Gig (Arma 3 + few mod install ) Wish i have some good words to the game but i Cant get a single match to function and yes i watch youtube video and all but after 3 days i still unable to run any mod. This game only remind me my experience on DayZ.Crash after crash and bug after bug. I made a huge mistake buying DayZ and ARMA, I will not support Bohemia Interactive anymore.
Scotty | Snowman;-;Tried to land helicopter on top of a car while the intire rest of the team are fighting back the enemy. Car blows up. Kills 3 enimies. 10/10 Best noscope sim 2002
Succubus Fuck Punch (Forthwind);-;It's optimization was done by an autistc four year old, and it's pretty much only fun with friends. Would recommend.
PortableJelly;-;(In Battle Royale) "Hey look at that plane" "Whats it dropping?" "Oh sweet its a carepackage" "Why is it dropping so many carepackages?" *BOOM BOOM BOOM BOOM BOOM* *Dead* 11/10 Would rage again.
Cclogan;-;Amazing game! Worth the dough
OptiTheDemiGod;-;*Pew pew pew* *taca taca taca* *Boom* "RIFLEMAN 200 METERES" "PROVIDING COVERING FIRE" "MAN DOWN" *gets shot from behind from AI that you don't see walking around you* *Load most recent autosave point* So yeah, it's a pretty good game I guess.
(TLC) {MG}Yo_mammas_cookie;-;This game takes practice and boy once you become fairly skilled this game really begins to kick off, the game does well to teach you things using a fun story mode and extra tutorials. This game has an alright community and i love the DLC!
Phobia;-;The best military simulator! If you enjoy realism, run out and buy now!
A Holt;-;love it buy Arma 3 NOW
MadBomber;-;The millatary experince gives intence awsomeness
Peepers;-;Fun, buggy, lots of mods
Zamiri;-;Great game recomend it to anyone!
squid;-;Can't play as an isis soldier. 0/10
E-BLADE;-;its fun game with the rite guys lol
I Fluttershy I;-;Very fun game. But downfall of it is that you need some of your friends to play in order to have lots of fun. + the AI cheat
[TONK]SBRP;-;Multiplayer didn't work. FPS terrible. Clunky. Naff.
[Ai]prnc [Allied Inc.];-;I will rate this game very 5 ways VERY SPECIFICLLY: 1. 5 points for physics/ballistics (very life like) 2. 5 points for gameplay/style (if your looking for that real gritty down to earth COMBAT experiance this is your game) 3. 4 points for diversity ( from weps, vehicle, guns, its not too much and not too little. just right although perhaps a few more rifles) 4. 4 points for tactical (in order to be succesful you must work as a team in this game, i didnt give it 5 because of the lack of communication quality between squads) 5. 1 point for optimization( HORRIBLE HORRIBLE optimization. Good or bad pc we all basically get the same level of performance wth higher end pc's pbvoiusly getting a LITTLE TINY bit better performance) this is the major flaw which can kill this game for some. FORTUNATLY for ME i have a pretty powerful rig so i can opt out 31-37 fps in cities with 75+ people online. which in all honesty is RIDICULOUS but boehemia is what it is. MY HONEST OPINION: If you sick of disney-like run and gun war games liek BF4 or COD and want a more real play experience \, i'd reccomend this game HIGHLY. +=+WARNING+=+ If you think you are going to get amazing graphics AND above 40 FPS (LOL) you are either nuts or rich. You WILL need the TOP OF THE LINE n i mean at least $2500 rig to run this game MAX at 60fps. but you can still run it at Mediumhighish and hope to get 30fps. well good luck and make the best descision.
CAPTNCAPS;-;ArmA is one of the best games I have ever played, but be warned it is nothing like your mainstream shooter like Battlefield or Call of Duty. ArmA presents you with quite a challenge, because the AI is hard and unforgiving (sometimes even unfair) and weapons, vehicles and damage all feel quite realistic. I recommend getting the DLC Pack with it and (as soon as it releases) getting the expansion. The DLCs bring cool new content to the game and it is a great way to additionally support the Developers ArmA can also be greaty improved with mods, to anyone new to the game: Check out mods like TFAR, ACE3, ASR AI and RHS:Escalation
Oberon;-;It seems the nice folks at Bohemia took a step back when making Arma 3. Theres no armory mode like in Arma 2, there's actually not much of anything. It seems Bohemia slacked off in order to make the end user finish the game through modding,
always bottom frag;-;Pros: - mods - looks good - mods - some more mods - a mod that's more finished than Day Z - mods cons: - so many damn mods 11/10 would download another TB of mods
Oberon;-;It seems the nice folks at Bohemia took a step back when making Arma 3. Theres no armory mode like in Arma 2, there's actually not much of anything. It seems Bohemia slacked off in order to make the end user finish the game through modding,
killfuckdie;-;Strongly reccomended to play, best Wargame sim ever, good co-op missions and Sandbox open maps. There are very good zombie mods (deadnation, breaking point and others) it's a future of zombie-sandboxes, i think, even better Dayz Standalone atm.
(WIP)Prof.McShizzle;-;Awefull and horrible DON'T BUY THIS GAME!!! IT IS SO BAD AND STUPID AND RAGE INDUCING AND A WASTE OF 60 DOLLARS. DO NOT BUY!
Peepers;-;Fun, buggy, lots of mods
ColonelFranks;-;Super fun to play with friends. Would definately recommend.
Nasalathotep;-;It must be said again and again: The ArmA series is NOT compareable to any cinematic driven, action packed shooters! And if you don't like teambased multiplayer, you won't get too much fun out of it, since the singleplayer campaign seems to be more like an extra. This said, the third Armed Assault gives you everything you need for the most realistic and intense battle experience possible! You might complain about the near future setting, which made it even harder for me to leave my beloved Chernarus (ArmA 2) behind, but you won't stumble over pulse rifles et cetera. Furthermore you'll get a huge sandbox world, an editor to do in it whatever you want and a fine community that never sleeps! So, what else should I recommend right now? Buy it! Don't wait for more content and lower pricing, the war has already begun! Edit: Best Game ever! =) 777 hours edit: Nope. Not at all! ArmA 2 was so much better! This P2W-DLC system sucks balls dry! By the way: There's still absolutely no use for planes in this one! Best game ever? I've must been really drunk when I wrote that... I still recommend this one, but only 'cause it became nearly impossible to play A2 online.
Retired Admin Abuser;-;jumped over a fence and died 10/lol s straight fire yo buy it
biggiesmalls0805;-;I find the mechanics of this game to be incredibly hard to master. i have played this game for over 100 hours and im still unbelievably horrible at it. its a simple process getting into the game however. simply plug in your N64 controller and try not to tap a wall with your hatchback.
yeah, ok bro (No Monitor);-;Unoptimized POS. low frames even with highest end computer. Put an entire clip into an ai and they just turn around and 2 shot me. The ai can shoot at you perfectly while injured standing up in the distance 700+ meters away. Paid DLC made by devs that 3rd party mods solve anyways and are usually better. No Thanks.
nintendosam;-;Ok, well im not entirely sure what to put here. But in my experience of the game its a bit like pancakes. So here is the recipe for success INGREDIENTS 1 large egg or 1 egg and one yolk  pint/280ml milk 4oz/110g plain flour (4 heaped dessertspoons) 1 tbsp melted butter METHOD By hand: sift the flour into a bowl and make a well in the middle. Break in the egg (and yolk, if using) and add a pinch of salt and a splash of the milk. Whisk the egg, gradually incorporating the flour, to make a smooth cream. Whisk in the rest of the milk and the melted butter. With a blender: put all the ingredients in a blender jug with a pinch of salt. Whizz until smooth. It should be no thicker than single cream. Brush a hot pan with vegetable oil before adding a ladleful of batter and swilling thinly around pan, tipping the pan so the mixture spreads evenly. It will begin to cook immediately: pour any excess back into the bowl.When the pancake is browned on the bottom and the very edges are beginning to lift away, give the pan a shake to make sure the pancake is loose. If it is sticking anywhere, use a spatula to loosen it. When it moves freely, then you are ready to toss it - or, if you're less confident, use a spatula to turn it over. The other side will only need a few seconds. Slide out of the pan, and try one of these delicious toppings
R3D-T!G3R;-;I don't evaluated a lot of game but really this one need it Its a good game -Nice graphic -Nice simulation -and a lot more But ... the BIG the HUGE BLACK POINT >>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>>> AI <<<<<<<<<<<<<<<<<<<<<<<<<<< THIS IS DESTROYING THIS GAME IMAGINE FAR CRY 4 WITH NO AI CallOfDuty with a AI taking cover behind a small rock like totally  you will get arma 3 before you spend 60$ or less on this game understand that : -you will never enjoying the campaign - you will never enjoying the player versus comp you will play ONLY player versus player on a mod its not ARMA (sic...) like a a kind of a RPG mod me im waiting an hypothetic update and crying on my 50$
ColonelFranks;-;Super fun to play with friends. Would definately recommend.
MightyMoose;-;I was actually one of the first people to pre-order this game's Supporter Edition on March 5th 2013 and so far the game evolved from a 7-8/10 military shooter with emphasis on realism to a 12/10 Military Simulator, the probably best mod support of any game currently on the market and an extensive community that happily accepts new players. If you're searching for realistic military operations in a videogame, ArmA is for you. If you're searching for some open world roleplaying or general TVT action, ArmA is for you. If you would like to be part of a group that conducts CO-OP and/or TVT missions together, ArmA is for you. Additionally one very huge part of this game is the mod support, literally anything you can imagine ranging from fictional spaceships to realistically modeled Main Battle Tanks as well as all accompanying features can be downloaded and used in game, just a few mods I would recommend checking out: JSRS 3 Dragonfyre, the successor to the very popular JSRS2 for ArmA3 and the previous JSRS for ArmA2, this soundmod delivers a high fidelity, realism oriented sound environment, I would strongly recommend checking out a few videos on the official JSRS studio's youtube channel, if you didn't know that it's a mod for a videogame you would probably think that the sounds are part of actual combat footage, that's the fidelity you can expect from JSRS. Blastcore Phoenix, JSRS is for sounds, Blastcore Phoenix is for visuals, Blastcore Phoenix which is also currently in developement is the successor of the very popular Blastcore mods for ArmA2 and ArmA3, this mod delivers realistic high quality explosion and smoke effects while still maintaining good ingame performance, if you want to check this mod out, make sure that you're specificially searching for Blastcore Phoenix as the new mod is quite a lot different from the old ones. RHS Escalation, this mod is actually split up into two mods and has been released only a couple of days ago, it brings very high quality, contemporary Russian and American assets into the game including, vehicles, weapons and uniforms, despite the mod being in a very early stage at version 0.30 it already has considerably more content than the main game, this mod is definitely worth being checked out. Authentic Gameplay Modification, this mod could be regarded as the successor for the Advanced Combat Environment 1 and 2 modifications for ArmA2, they take this game from being somewhat beginner friendly and while already very realistic to a Simulation that may be mistaken with VBS, the military training simulator developed by a sub company of Bohemia Interactive, this mod may not be for everyone but if you're looking for the most realistic military experience that can be delivered by a game, this mod is definitely worth checking out Advanced Combat Radio Environment or Task Force Arrowhead Radio, these two mods which actually could be considered rivals provide the game with very realistic communication in form of an overhauled VON and simulated real world radio models they also come with a very high fidelity UI, they achieve all this by using a teamspeak plugin. The TL:DR of this would be: Should you get ArmA? Yes.
Jon snow;-;10/10 would play again
Nasalathotep;-;It must be said again and again: The ArmA series is NOT compareable to any cinematic driven, action packed shooters! And if you don't like teambased multiplayer, you won't get too much fun out of it, since the singleplayer campaign seems to be more like an extra. This said, the third Armed Assault gives you everything you need for the most realistic and intense battle experience possible! You might complain about the near future setting, which made it even harder for me to leave my beloved Chernarus (ArmA 2) behind, but you won't stumble over pulse rifles et cetera. Furthermore you'll get a huge sandbox world, an editor to do in it whatever you want and a fine community that never sleeps! So, what else should I recommend right now? Buy it! Don't wait for more content and lower pricing, the war has already begun! Edit: Best Game ever! =) 777 hours edit: Nope. Not at all! ArmA 2 was so much better! This P2W-DLC system sucks balls dry! By the way: There's still absolutely no use for planes in this one! Best game ever? I've must been really drunk when I wrote that... I still recommend this one, but only 'cause it became nearly impossible to play A2 online.
DJ Stewboy;-;tbh  vanilla game. Awesome modded game 8.7/10
Mecks;-;This game is a fine example of why you don't give me access to helicopters and big guns. Arma 3 is a tactical FPS/TPS, in which you shoot people with big helmets on. 11/10 go buy
tomsN;-;Played the game with my friends (Altis Life, Arma 3 King of the Heel, ..) Yesterday I had no time for it and wanted to play today. start game - join server and.. Battle Eye: Global Ban #... FOR NOTHING !!!!! NEVER CHEATET OR TROLLING... SRSLY? 65$ FOR 27 HRS? IM NOT THE FIRST!!!! Just search on Google for Arma 3 Global Ban I try every day to build Contact to BattleEye.. But no Answer WTF? THANKS FOR NO SUPPORT / WASTE TIME AND MONEY DONT BUY THIS!!!
Prokrastination;-;The sole purpose of Arma 3 is the advertisement of overpriced DLCs - and therefore, beside the singleplayer campaign, the embodiment of "pay to win" in PvP. You want a decent weapon? To bad - you dont have the DLC. Ran out of ammo on the battlefield? To bad your opponent has the DLC - no weapon for you... The performance of Arma 3 is sub-par. 30 players on an online-server work fine. Every player added to that will drop your framerate - even on a killer-rig you might end up with 20 fps. The bugs in the game are plenty and sometimes beyond funny. The game has its moments. Yet those are rare. If you can grab it in Steam-sale... do it. If not... well - I warned you.
yuri;-;Do you like shooting brown people? Do you like planting IEDs? Do you like being shot out of absolutely nowhere while choking on 12 fps? Then I guess ARMA 3 is a good milsim. brown shooting simulator 2015
Kirito[TGBUS]ACG;-;Let me its true extent is difficult to believe that this game is very good!
=CKA= Pyra;-;I highly recommend this game to anyone who is tired of all the twitch shooters out there.
xlr250R;-;Sexy ambient, also lighting.
Tagliatelles#Marcel;-;Walked for 5 hours Get killed by a wall 10/10 would walk again
Freg;-;At first, I realized that my gaming PC could not run Armo 3. I spent years becoming a doctorate graduate in theoretical physics to have access to a supercomputer. The supercomputer was able to achieve an astonoshing -1 fps, something I didn't think was possible. As a result, it divided by zero and the universe collapsed. 6.9/10, would play again.
BrotherhoodOfHam;-;Just finished the loading screen. 11/10 would load again.
Lord Waffles;-;I bought the game and all the DLC for $80 My game crashes ten minutes after I join a server. Best ten minutes of my life 10/10
Mantiz;-;Awesome game, quality, top preformance. More than 500 mods great and realistic physics, best combat simulator. Awesome game ! I recommend it 100%
Lystics;-;I've played Arma for a long time. But when mod developers ban you from their mod because of a VAC ban more than three or four years ago, that is absolutely stupid. If you like being banned by admins that were destroyed by you and your friends in a firefight, play this game. I was banned by an admin with the message " YOU LYSTICS" GG.
Najaf;-;Gunplay and fighting mechanics were a major turnoff. The speed drills on the firing range are the perfect example of this. The campaign was really lacking. The end misssion was what the whole of the campaign should have been (or at least much more of it). Online is hit and miss, even with friends. Again, the handling mechanics hold this one back, but that's Arma I suppose.
UkiSash;-;With over 600 hours of play time. Plus probably about 200 more on another account I had. This is hands down one of the best games I have ever played. Not because its such a rock solid game with a good story. As a matter of fact im sure about %80 of people playing this never played the story. Probably about %40 of ARMA players didnt even know it had one. But this game does something that ALL games should. Its a swiss army knife of video games. It's developers decided to open the game up to modders and developers. Creating countless communities of LIFE servers, MILSIM servers, KOH, WASTELAND, BATTLE ROYALE and countless others whom I maybe have not yet discovered. No other game out there has such a vast veriaty of different game modes that allow the player to do Whatever he or she wants to do at the time. This game takes it self seriously yet at the same time, it knows how to tell a joke or two. (like its driving mechanics and vehicle damage, its quite funny.... sometimes). When you first hop into arma 3 you will want to go right to the multiplayer and load up one of the LIFE servers it has. Which i think is the 2nd reason why this game is so popular. First being the DayZ mod and subsequently the DayZ: SA. All in all If you are looking for a game that will alow you to play a rebel one day a cop the next and a military member the day after look no further. This versitile platform is exactly right for you. I actually have started to compare this to GTA, and quite frankly... i have more hours in this than GTA. I FULLY recommend this game to everyone. Sale or full price its well worth it!
C.Serena;-;I have spent quite a long time playing this game and developing for it. Pros: Graphics Systems (Weapon attchements Ect.) Combat Vehicles Feal More Realistic Physics are 100 times better than Arma 2 Cons: Feals Incomplete Mods Almost Feal neccesarry for vetran amra fans Paid DLC On a Small Scale Arma 2 DLC inluded weapons features maps and a new campaign not 2 helicopters and a sling system. Community Has went downhill since the introduction of DAYZ in arma 2 but has improved snce standalone. Mod Support Still hasnt improved Performance Multiplayer DeSync OverView: I love arma and i allways will but the new DLC system and lack of content left a bad taste in my mouth but overall the game holds up to its features and premise of a arma game just expect to downoad alot of mods for those AK's and AR,s you like. 8 Out of 10 For this game Time logged when this review was posted is 615 Hours of ingame time.
Goat Fucker;-;Not worth the 60$, It is running so slow on a gaming pc, on medium... CPU: i7 5820K/Board: Gigabyte GAX99 Gaming/Ram 16 - 4x4GB/Video Card: Gigabyte GTX960 4GB DDR5. and it crashed like 4 times within an hour..
Lystics;-;I've played Arma for a long time. But when mod developers ban you from their mod because of a VAC ban more than three or four years ago, that is absolutely stupid. If you like being banned by admins that were destroyed by you and your friends in a firefight, play this game. I was banned by an admin with the message " YOU LYSTICS" GG.
Mantiz;-;Awesome game, quality, top preformance. More than 500 mods great and realistic physics, best combat simulator. Awesome game ! I recommend it 100%
Phantom_Wolf;-;It is THE military simulator! Or something like it anyway. It ain't a COD FPS, no not even a Battlefield so much action game, even better, or worse. Many features such as weapon attachments, underwater ops, oh did i mention aviation? Pros: - Very very tactical, maybe too tactical. - Open world, limited to whatever people can figure out. - So many possible missions, you just need to find them. - So much mods, so many many mods, in fact maybe too many. - Often medium to long range realistic combat which is usually really hard to hit enemies. - Many features since first game release, such as shooting from vehicles and Virtual Reality. - Realistic graphics, limited to your hardware or your nerves for lag. - Many more? Cons: - Too tactical? Yep. Sometimes enemy AIs are a step ahead of you. - With big content and graphics, comes great hardware requirements. - Modifications that may be too big to download.
Sgt. Barnes;-;I bought Arma 3 Extended edition for 50% off at 40$ CAD. I regret my purchase because the multiplayer is a piece of . It takes forever to get to an objective and most of all the FPS is TERRIBLE compared to the single player. I get 45-60 fps on ultra in single player with view distance of about 3000 or 4000 but i get 20 fps in multiplayer. I have a core i5 2500k and a gtx 970 ssc. During multiplayer gpuz reports my gpu usage at 30% and windows 7 resource monitor shows cpu usage at 50%, Unless I can get this mess sorted out I will not support Bohemia Interactive anymore. Edit: After trying different video settings there is still no fix. From low to high i still get 24 fps at 500 view distance, unplayable. This is the worst multiplayer experience I have ever had, and really wish I could get a refund. The only good part about this game is the single player, which wasnt even completed when this game was released. Edit: The single player missions are very small and sometimes force you into a single path. they were decent but not as good as ARMA I missions. The multiplayer part of this game is a piece of . Edit: as of June 8, 2015, the game no longer works for me. I am trying to reinstall this piece of trash game to see if it will work. The game now works but still crashes and is PLAGUED with other bugs. Hilarious list of bugs from the morons at Bohemia Interactive: -Helicopter spontaneously explodes upon entry. -Computer terminal for purchasing vehicles sinks beneath the earth thereby making it innaccessible. -Sniper rifle is able to explode an APC. -Really  framte rates on multiplayer at all times. and the list really does go on. It seems this game is the steaming pile of  that they have been trying to create...
TubelessMusic;-;Now it is in Stablized version, lest play some campaign shall we?
The Don;-;Arma 3 Roleplay *Hey COP where can i get mary* 10 out 10 and in all serious VERY good No VERY GREAT!
hjorte pek;-;Uh Not too sure what to write here so heres a recipe for Pancakes instead Ingredients: 1 1/2 cups all-purpose flour 3 tablespoons sugar 1 tablespoon baking powder 1/4 teaspoon salt 1/8 teaspoon freshly ground nutmeg 2 large eggs, at room temperature 1 1/4 cups milk, at room temperature 1/2 teaspoon pure vanilla extract 3 tablespoons unsalted butter, plus more as needed Now to make it 1. In a large bowl, whisk together the flour, sugar, baking powder, salt, and nutmeg. 2. In another bowl, beat the eggs and then whisk in the milk and vanilla. 3. Melt the butter in a large cast iron skillet or griddle over medium heat. 4. Whisk the butter into the milk mixture. Add the wet ingredients to the flour mixture, and whisk until a thick batter is just formed 5. Keeping the skillet at medium heat, ladle about 1/4 cup of the batter onto the skillet, to make a pancake. Make 1 or 2 more pancakes, taking care to keep them evenly spaced apart. Cook, until bubbles break the surface of the pancakes, and the undersides are golden brown, about 2 minutes. Flip with a spatula and cook about 1 minute more on the second side. Serve immediately or transfer to a platter and cover loosely with foil to keep warm. Repeat with the remaining batter, adding more butter to the skillet as needed. 6. Procedure for adding fruit to pancakes: Once the bubbles break the surface of the pancakes, scatter the surface with sliced or diced fruit, or chocolate chips, nuts, etc. Flip with a spatula and cook for 1 minute more, being careful not to burn toppings.
FreakyFreekie;-;Great looking game. And the MOD's are just awesome. Don't get thoughts behind the DLC's tho..
triggerboat;-;Accidentally killed our entire base 9.5/10 would play again
xXdisAliveXx #throwback;-;ArmA 3 is a fantastic simulation of military combined arms warfare, successfully creating an authentic envirmoment un-rivaled to any other and hightech modes of transport to visit every inch of it. Though you may need a high performance computer to run this game, even on the lowest settings you can enjoy it. From enthrawling hour long witchhunts on Wastelands to one of the best First Person Shooter campaigns of all time, im sure you will find something that you will look back on and say "That was freaking awesome!" Create your own mission and play with friends with the in-game editor, where you can achieve the same height of perfection as in the Official Campaign. I whole heartedly dont regret any of the hours that I have put into this game and would recomend it to anyone who is willing to play properly, as a team and is willing to follow the rules of the servers becuase when you do, the game turns into a multi-million pound movie in-which you are the main character and you choose what happens. "This game is bloody epic!"
OliverTwisted;-;Great addition to the Arma series, it is buggy sometimes, weird along funny bugs.
Pyro7380;-;This game Is very fun and awesome. The graphics are insanely good, The attachment and clothing system is very cool, And this game is just plain out awesome. I'd recommend it to those who are fans of ARMA II or Military Simulators. Overall rating of this game for me is a 10/10.
MasterJonah;-;Best Call of Duty sequel sence Battlefield 3. 11/10 would 360 no-scope again
RedShadow;-;Tested the game during the free week-end on 2014.26.10 I have played Arma 2 and I am a fanatic of realistic military/tactical simulations, like the first Ghost Recons, Rainbox Six, America's Army, Insurgency, etc. Note that right now I am at the Tipping Point mission, and I only played single player. BTW I cannot finish the mission since I cannot for the life of me get into the speeboat. I can drown under it though. I also completed the entire tutorial which was very well made. +1 for this. However the first impression of this game ain't good: The "simulation" part is very lacking . Simulation? Nah... for real? The first missions goes way too fast , to the point that my dude is always totally tired following the team leader. Everyone moves around, and in the end they get shot. You end up the only one remaing and have lone wolf your way to the rest of the mission. I was expecting a very slow pacing, like Ghost Recon. Nope, team runs ahead and they don't wait for you. Since I try to loot bodies to build up a nice gear and be confortable, I stay behind while my team rushes away. I even didn't do jack in a mission since they were rushing so fast that they completed the objectives all by themselves! I was litterally crawling my way and looting sht while they were sprinting ahead. Mission completed by the AI only lol. Wow. Weapon handling is basic and very accurate. I meant too much accurate. I haven't noticed any bullet drop when shooting over 200 meters for instance. No compensation was required, just aim and shoot. Tangos accuracy however is insane. They drop to prone and headshot you. I couldn't test a sniper wwapon though. But no jams, fast realoding wether your mag is in a pouch or or backpack, it magically appears in your hand and goes straight to the mag well. The gear now, is mission specific. I litterally spent hours on customizing my gear to prepare for the next mission. Looting dead bodies and stuff. Optimizing weight. Now the end of the day approaches and night comes. So I'm like hopefully I grabbed some NVGs and I have an IR laser. Yeah. Next mission starts, my gear has been stripped. Backpack has disapeared, vest too and I end up with a short barel weapon, a FCKING FLASHLIGHT and my  to fight. While, of course everyone else is tanked with 30lbs of nades, NVGs and stuff like that. I regroup and I am given an NVG and a laser. Great. But why... now? In the middle of nowhere when we were 1 click away from base? WTF. I even tried, because I was so pssed that at every mission I start basically naked, I tried to go back to base on foot. Yeah climb that hill up and base is there. But nope. Radio says: turn the fck around soldier, you are walking towards a minefield... ahah so I'm like avoid the thousand claymores scattered around, when I suddently die. I was not moving. In other word: linear. And I'm not done raging on the gear yet : yes soldiers ain't supposed to have custom gear. I am fine with that. What I am not fine with, is being the ONLY ONE in the team that has dck. Which is totally incomprehensible since HQ has gear and stuff. So why? At the missiong overview, when we see the map, we can customize the gear there. BUT no support item is available! Which mean that my lovely prepared backpack IS GONE with everything inside of it. Gone forever man. Waste of time: clearly a game for non-thinking players; hop in mission, play, don't loot because no time, and don't question your gear you sht soldier. And also, you can't have a custom gear, but you can loot the opfor AND take their weapons? Ever heard of NEVER picking up a tango weapon because it could be IED RIGGED uh? Simulation hmm... nope. As for the scenario it's pretty bad IMHO. Mean soldiers attacking civies, and then NATO. The latter having to defend itself. So 4 NATO guys against 30 tangos is fine, no big deal. Missions are scripted and loosing a team member will not trigger a mission failure. Hopefully. Nothing much though, a lot of walking around. Not much tactics there, but at least some strats could be cool. Sometimes there is flanking. But not much. Want to use smokes? What are those for? We rush dead on, on tangos... The IA can see tangos behind hills. Yeah. My OWN DUDE can see an UNKNOWN CONTACT on the EAST 1.5 clicks away! Damn man you good! http://steamcommunity.com/sharedfiles/filedetails/?id=332462626 I end up shooting at the HUD squares that my buddies report. I can't even SEE the enemies that are super far away behind bushes, tree branches and stuff. How the hell can they spot them, while running like crazy >.> Simulation you said? Getting hit doesn't make you fall on your ss. It does in AA if I remember correctly. However your "accuracy" will be screwed. Or not really: your movements becomes eratic. Like your iron sights move around by themselves. But it is still Unreal Tournament accurate provided you shoot at the right timing when the crosshair is right on the tango. I like better the Arma 2 overall weapon experience, with the weird deforming crossair: like Rainbow Six. That way, you cannot see where your shots will land. In the end, having played a lot of America's Army 2 and a bit less of AA3, ArmA 3 is good, yeah, but definitely LESS realistic that those both. Insurgency stays the best simulation so far, but it's not an army sandbox sim: it is way more focused on CQB. Finally the default game setting are much too easy. Tougher armor, can seeing in real time your buddies moving on the map, you can see how many bullets are left, etc. Not a simulation: try the Elite settings instead, and remove the crosshair in addition. Now we are talking. Other stuff Graphics : I say awesome. Configuring this is easy and seamless. FPS are computed while tweaking options which is super great. +1 for this. But no FOV configuration so that's -1. Game tweaking : awesome again. Colorblind people, be not afraid. Well not that much anyway. You can change the ingame HUD colors. Which means that way points, tangos spots and stuff can be customized. Yeah the base color were blending, for me, with the surroundings. So I changed the colors to very bright yellow. Now I can see. Remember though that everyone has BDU and it's all green, brown. Hence I have a extremely hard time to spot enemies unless they move. I had the same "issue" with AA. In the end I recognize them thanks to their different weapons and of course their location. But some missions are SNAFU when the friendlies are surrounding a city. :/ cannot distinguish who is who. But It's alright, that's just me. Sound : Great nothing to report here. There is ingame music (sometimes) which gives... a bad vibe. Like we are in a movie/CoD game sht. I just don't like that, that is all. Up to 128 sonds sources at the same time. I like that. And you can disable music :) Spacialization works very well with my 5.1 speakers. Can hear stuff behind without problem. Conslusions I recommend the game, still. I can feel the amazing amount of details in the game. It is polished, and this is great. The huge flaw here is the "simulation" part that fails hard. I am playing almost a CoD clone, not an improved Arma 2. Sorry. For this reason, the free pass didn't convinced me. At all. I enjoyed playing but I really wasn't afraid of dying nor was I afraid of bad tactics: ain't nobody got time fo dat. Too fast is my final conclusion. I creep in the dirt, I don't run like a crazy monkey on a road you know. I will buy the game, but much later, when the price will have dropped even more: right now is around 22 and it's on -50% sale. Still too much. For me, for what I was expecting. If you are looking for a better realistic army infantry simulation, then America's Army 2 is still the best out there. AA3 is good too, but is more "frenetic", like ArmA3 is compared to ArmA2
Pyro7380;-;This game Is very fun and awesome. The graphics are insanely good, The attachment and clothing system is very cool, And this game is just plain out awesome. I'd recommend it to those who are fans of ARMA II or Military Simulators. Overall rating of this game for me is a 10/10.
triggerboat;-;Accidentally killed our entire base 9.5/10 would play again
xXdisAliveXx #throwback;-;ArmA 3 is a fantastic simulation of military combined arms warfare, successfully creating an authentic envirmoment un-rivaled to any other and hightech modes of transport to visit every inch of it. Though you may need a high performance computer to run this game, even on the lowest settings you can enjoy it. From enthrawling hour long witchhunts on Wastelands to one of the best First Person Shooter campaigns of all time, im sure you will find something that you will look back on and say "That was freaking awesome!" Create your own mission and play with friends with the in-game editor, where you can achieve the same height of perfection as in the Official Campaign. I whole heartedly dont regret any of the hours that I have put into this game and would recomend it to anyone who is willing to play properly, as a team and is willing to follow the rules of the servers becuase when you do, the game turns into a multi-million pound movie in-which you are the main character and you choose what happens. "This game is bloody epic!"
Rastafarian Targaryen;-;This game got me pregnant
twitch.tv/theohkee;-;Good Game Rate=10/10
Akatsuki;-;This is the best game I have ever played. Most of the people are very nice and will be glad to teach you the ropes.
ThisIsMatt;-;Very good military sim, unique campaign and highly entertaining multiplayer. Gr8/8 M8
Hailthorn;-;The sheer diversity of ArmA and the support for modding more than makes up for the performance
Moose-Knuckle George;-;This game is DEFINITELY worth $50. I mean, who doesn't want to be a drug lord in Altis Life?
owen bryce;-;Feels like im having muslims up my . I love it! PS. I love you all.
Trivius;-;A true successor to ArmA 2. This is what a sequel looks like, rest of the gaming industry, not the same thing with a couple of improvements or "twists" that could have easily been patched in or sold as an expansion. Bohemia Interactive have shown that they are really dedicated to their craft, and that they really listen to the community, and what they want. If only there were more developers like these, along with Valve, and other notable examples. Improved physics, graphics, mechanics, fantastic soundtrack, modding support, mission editor, this is the military sim to rule all military sims, and it feels a damn sight more snappy than its predecessor too, which really tickled me gleefully. Of course, it still has a few optimization issues, but it is certainly an improvement over previous titles. Even if you don't like what the vanilla game has to offer, there are many dedicated modders out there creating new and free content for you to enjoy, and so are the developers! This is by no means a perfect game, I'm not sure those exist, but it's a damn sight better than what most "AAA" games developers churn out these days. I'm looking at you DICE/EA and Activision.
fAzE yoko chan;-;only game where you can have a full unit 100% immersed and in character, completely at attention, to then be thrown of by a flying, spinning quadbike flying faster than sonic's genitals travelling at warp speed through tails' . definitely recommend
Alfalfa;-;My squad went into battle without pants but in full combat gear.
OliverTwisted;-;Great addition to the Arma series, it is buggy sometimes, weird along funny bugs.
sepillots//C SEPPY ANTI CHEAT;-;So immersive when played in multiplayer with a proper team. Map reading is just one of the real life skills you may need to use during battle, as well as using the radio and communicating with your team. Also includes a great editor to make your own missions for multiplayer and singleplayer, and you can upload your own missions to the Steam Workshop
Bz R3fl3x;-;Just yes! If you loved ArmA 2 you're going to love this!
Trivius;-;A true successor to ArmA 2. This is what a sequel looks like, rest of the gaming industry, not the same thing with a couple of improvements or "twists" that could have easily been patched in or sold as an expansion. Bohemia Interactive have shown that they are really dedicated to their craft, and that they really listen to the community, and what they want. If only there were more developers like these, along with Valve, and other notable examples. Improved physics, graphics, mechanics, fantastic soundtrack, modding support, mission editor, this is the military sim to rule all military sims, and it feels a damn sight more snappy than its predecessor too, which really tickled me gleefully. Of course, it still has a few optimization issues, but it is certainly an improvement over previous titles. Even if you don't like what the vanilla game has to offer, there are many dedicated modders out there creating new and free content for you to enjoy, and so are the developers! This is by no means a perfect game, I'm not sure those exist, but it's a damn sight better than what most "AAA" games developers churn out these days. I'm looking at you DICE/EA and Activision.
Dongerlord *Kinguin;-;Great game for all the family to enjoy.
TORNADO1001;-;This is a really great game! This is not a game for people who are going for a Call Of Duty style gameplay. There are some bugs but the developers are usually good at finding and fixing them. Cool DlC's are released frequently. The physics are quite nice, no un-realistic ragdoll effects when you die, nice vehicle handling, just dont fall down the stairs or else you wil die haha, they do need to fix that. The campaign is a thrilling story of a young Corporal Kerry who you'll play as. The maps are EXTREMELY detailed everywhere, there are so many cool and breath-taking areas of the two islands of Stratis and Altis. There are tons of servers and gamemodes so you can't be bored. There is also the option to mod this game in so many cool and fantastic ways it seems endless! But be warned, the controls are not so easy, they are not your simple stand, crouch, prone. The vehicle's controlling is decent but you will likely need some practice for the jets and helicopters which I had to do. The AI's path-taking and combat skills are impressive, at times they can act stupid. This game is a must-have for the computer gamer! I give this game a solid 5 out of 5 stars for its gameplay. I would recommend this game to anyone interested in a next level military simulation game. The developer's team is bunch of people who really do know what they are doing to make this game outstanding to play. This is not a game where you might think of a bunch of kids acting like they are United States Navy Seals or British SAS, you should think this game as a serious, fun, educational game of how military might work and fight in a simulated warzone. I hope this review encourages you to buy the game AND the DLC for it! I know I will be a constant customer with the amount of great work the developers have done to Arma 3.
H. Brook;-;Great game
Gandhi;-;ARMA III has been valued at $60 (49,58) for over two years now, and heres why. If you are a fan of FPS or TPS games, you have probably been playing COD, CS, or BF, ten hours a day, but ARMA III is not a FPS or TPS games, its a Military Simulator. Unlike COD, CS, or BF, ARMA III is meant to simulate war, making it VERY realistic. Which means its very hard to get any kills when you first start out, and unlike in COD, CS, or BF, ARMA III is set in a HUGE sandbox map, meaning: no invisible walls, almost everything is accesible, and snipers are everywhere ;). In order to enjoy ARMA III you have to like VERY slow paced shooters and have a ENORMUS amount of patience. You also must be ready to be killed by that level two sniper hiding in the bushes 1000 ft. (304 meters) away. Even though I said it is VERY slow paced, when you do happen to land yourself in a firefight, it is heart racing and very intense. In order for you to capture a objective in ARMA III you have to do these five things: A: Get a group of 10-15 people together. B: Carefully plan out, minute by minute, whats going to happen, where it is gonna happen, who its gonna happen to, and why its gonna happen. C: Aquire transportation to the objective and exit your vehicle about 500 ft. (152 meters) away from the obective. D: Approach with caution, because you have no clue where their security is. E: Excute with full pride and confidence. PRO TIP: Always be sure to keep in communication with your team and use a compass to give cordinantes on an enemy. ARMA III is a BEATIFUL game which means it has some heavy system requirments, I run it on an Alienware m17 and still get an occasional lag spike. ARMA III is not for everyone, or everyones computer, but for those who can run it, and enjoy this type of shooter, it deserves a 9.5/10 (because of high system requirments I took off half a point which is why its 9.5 not 10)
Baltic Dude;-;>Altis life >Cop parked on side of road >I overtake >Lights >I stop >Cop fines me 20k for reckless driving, speeding and driving on pavement  this I'm going back to Chernorus
Kaapo;-;Good game, don't buy if you got diabetes.
Bambi;-;This game is the best peice of junk ever. It has so many glitches and its so broken but no one gives a  because its so damn good.
Slap my hand (   );-;Arrested a guy in altis life for going 1kph over the speed limit. 10/10
nirvana_sth;-;have you ever played Delta Force 2? its a fps game from 1999. this game looks like a HD version of that. graphics are really bad if you turn them down a little bit, otherwise you would need a very hefty machine, even my GTX780 cant give me stable 60 fps on everything maxed. vehicles look like they are made of papers or card boards attached to each other. some people call it a real 'combat simulator', what they do NOT explain is that why there are characters running only wearing pink underwears in a realistic fps game? physics are extraordinary bad, the game is clunky, sluggish and stupid. try to climb a ladder and you would understand the bad physics, as your character would climb on an invisible ladder! looks to me the devs did not spend any time on this game. for a full price, my recommendation is a big NO! i bought it when it was still alpha, and lots of problems were never solved. heck, War Thunder is a free to play game on steam and the graphics, physics, models and environment in its tank simulator looks a decade better than a 39.99 Arma III. also, i must add, there is a horrible customer service and tech support from the devs. combat simulator? real fps game? could someone explain to me if high recoil on any weapons is anything next to realism? for instance, M4 carbine is a very weak weapon in real life, with 5.56x45mm Nato cartridge it has very low recoil for an adult. in this game, it looks like a 8 years old child is firing a M4, the recoil is unrealistic and stupid. BFBC2 is ten times more realistic than this. this game is not optimized well enough. watch some videos on youtube first, there is no environmental destruction what so ever like there is in BF series. AVOID this game. i can not stand it for 10 minutes. oh, the positive side, the community of this game is a very matured, kind, friendly, generous and helpful one. thats the only bright side here. my love and respect to them. wish there were more of these people in BF4!
Cpt.Selva;-;Not a simulator, its a pseudo-simulator. It wouldn't be 50% playable if it wasn't for the community based addons. Bohemia SEMI true sim is sold ONLY to the military. I'm playing since Flash Point, i got a milsim corp since Armed Assault, we gave up since we couldn't play due to BIS patches ( that always ended ing up the addons versions ) bugs, crashes and glitches. It has a MASTER PIECE concept of "Make your own scenario and mission" this is the best concept in a game and what gripped me into the series to be true. I've lost more time making missions than playing then, the editor was actually very fun and easy to operate. However, ARMA 3 doesn't even have a proper armor system for the armored vehicles, you can shoot them with a .50 to death within a minute, physichs will always be below average due to the engine, and, as a great vehicle enthusiast, this is a major fact while driving them ( Very wierd to hear a tank lowering it's sound when it's going uphill when the torque is at maximum so the engine sound should be at the loudest point ) Another major fact is that ARMA is not made for CQB, you will never see good CQB fights or even decent urban fights, you can even see some semi-urban firefights, but you will never experiment a true close quarters firefight simulation in ARMA. I wish we could have some alternative to it, bohemia must chage this engine, and make the game MORE realistic or it will lose it's fan, just as Codemasters with that "cool" Operation Flash Point DR.
Roque_THE_GAMER;-;BE CAREFUL, YOU ARE PAYING FOR A BETA GAME! this  has release in 2013 and is bugged as , crashers, glitches, all the  you meet at Arma 2 this game does not seems to be finished and the devs aren't really trying to the content of this is laughable is lower than Arma 2 with that half futuristic  mods and the comunity are the only thing that save this franchise other wise it will be dead quick mod are not flawless the are very buggy more than the main game but still wort to get so if you will buy for the vanilla GET OFF this is not a good game but if you want to play with mods you can give it a try i recommend you to buy on a steam sale to not be too painful for your pocket.
andrewaltogether;-;Not recommended, even for people who like a good military simulation game. Good: - Lots of potential for realism and immersion - Massive variety of ways to interact with game elements Bad: - Lack of variety in terms of gear (three colours don't make three different items) - Lack of any real weapons: it's all near-future stuff - Gunshots sound too mechanical or like movie sound effects - Weapon animations are loose: effects don't sync up right (two gunshots when you shoot three bullets, etc.) - Vehicles are very difficult to control without dedicated joystick/wheel VERY Bad: - Needlessly complicated control scheme which will take hours on hours to get used to (literally) - To say the learning curve is steep implies that there is a learning curve - Many functions of the game are hidden, unexplained, unintuitive, or poorly implemented - Potential for realism is destroyed when each mission becomes a sprint between ambushes There are several different tutorials - some in the "virtual reality", some on the islands, some as text-only, and none of which are adequate. Each tutorial is about ten-thirty seconds long and involves no actual help, assuming that because you pressed the right buttons once, you now know how to do it in combat. The team seems to have put zero effort into making the game intuitive: you will spend much of your time looking up various controls and reading about methods of interaction. This game is not finished. If you're looking for a good, intuitive, fun military simulator to get away from the Call of Duty bullcrap, pick up Operation Flashpoint: Red River. It might not be as extensive, and it suffers from a lack of replayability, but it isn't nearly as frustrating as Arma.
CannonFodderKiwi;-;I give this a thumbs down, not becaue its a war simulator and Im looking for another COD, but because its so glitchy, that every time I feel like Im starting to be immersed in the game, it knockes me back out. I use the bino's to see where enemy troops are and it just decides that I have selected another item and pulls that out. I change from my rifle to my pistol and it changes back by itself 10 seconds later. It just loses all feel to it, and when it happens and it gets you killed it just makes you think it not worth it. I wouldnt buy till they can iron out these issues. On the posive side the actual game would have good potential without that issue.
Doggy;-;Left click and shoot
FluffyNorfish;-;This game... Is a rollercoaster.. There's parts you will really enjoy then there's parts you wont enjoy. This is a war simulator, not like any cod or bf game you would get. What it means is it involves a lot of running, traveling and it may require a lot of patience. It is almost 90 % traveling and what it does is it makes the 10 % worth it because when you have traveled or ran for a long long time then you wont really be prepered for combat too much. Even though its almost just a walking/running sim or just a waiting sim, when something really does happen you wont be prepered too much and that makes it really thrilling. Not only wont you be as prepered as if you had ran for 40 ft and then gotten shot at, killed them, ran another 40 ft and getting shot at. There's even a pretty good single player you can play for hours. The most popular thing i would assume is the multiplayer and that is because a the single player is mostly scripted and you can go through it over and over and know what to expect. While multiplayer is diffrent because you can walk somewhere, get killed one time, walk to the same place, get killed again then walk there again and not get killed. (Its not actually like that sometimes.) It's a game that has a BIG focus on strategy, teamwork and resourses. Would i recommend this game? Yes. Thats just my formal opinion. This is a game you will most likely either love or hate. Before you decide get more into the game because its not just all of the same. It's one of those unike games you are likely to RARELY see.
Terminal Illness;-;I wish this would go on sale already so I can murder my friends like I've always wanted to
WeeChucky10;-;Played King Of the Hill Stole helicopter Everyone entered Helicopter i tried to fly helicopter I crash helicopter into spawn Got abuse in chat 10/10 would get called  Pilot again.
Ahri;-;The most boring game ever!
Sykkoh;-;If you think this is another Call of Duty knock off, you're far from correct. I know i haven't played for a while, because i got it free this weekend and i dont want to spend the 60$ on it. The game is one of the most realistic games ever. That can be a good thing, and a bad thing. People have been asking for realisitc games forever, but now that we have one, do we want it? Let me just get to the Pro's and Cons. Pro's: 1. Fighting enenmies is actually a challenge. (Unlike many other shooter games) 2. The story line seems to be very good, theres alot of twists to through you off. 3. When you kill enemies, you can loot their body and take their gun, attatchments, and clothes. 4. There arent many dull moments. Like i said, the campaign keeps you on your toes. 5. Open World Thats really where the Pro's end... Con's: 1. Its so realistic, its annoying. Dont we play video games to get out of the real world? 2. If you run for 200 feet or more, you will be fatigued and your max running speed is your normal walking speed. 3. The sway of the scope/sights is so bad. I wish i could show you how impossible it is to kill people from 100m away. Unless you get lucky. 4. The map is confusing to understand at first, theres no legend telling you what everything means. 5. The amount of bullets that it takes to kill an enemy, is the same amount of bullets it take to kill you. 6. AI's will see you from 200-300m away. 7. You have to manually save if you dont want to respawn 30 mins back. 8. Multiplayer was confusing. I spawned in and walked around for a little while, tried to type to people, and nothing happened. So i left. (Maybe its because im new to Arma, and dont know what im doing.) 9. Enemies with grenade launchers seem to have unlimited grenades to launch. You cant move out of cover without being blown up at times. 10. The game thinks you should know what to do, and how to do it. So, it will tell you what it wants you to do, and if you havent figured it out in about 5 mins, it will finally give you and objective point. So, if you're confused at some point, or lost, you get to run around wildly for 5-10 mins. 11. The graphics need to be better. You think its still loading in, but its not. The graphics are just not what i expected. Thats everything I experienced in the short time that i've played. If you do purchase this game, Hope a mod as good as DayZ (From Arma 2) comes out for this game aswell.
Iruto Kling;-;This is a game where you shoot things and they die. Almost like real life. Except its not real life.
Shields;-;Fell in love with it the first time i laid my eyes on it.
Reshende';-;Let me start with I LOVE this game Let me continue with I really wish I could love it more. So, it's an awesome feeling when you get a kill. Me personally, I use a sniper, so I can expect quite a few. However, the game has an awesome idea but terrible, TERRIBLE engineering. When a server is 5 hours old, you might was well leave because it's going to get hacked. When you get into a game that doesn't ban easily, you might as well leave because people will continuosly Team-Kill you, with no punishment When you see an explosion at base, you may as well leave because someone is going to crash a helicopter into you, respawn, and repeat. It would be better if hackers got banned. Not to mention, on decent Titan X gaming PC's it gets an average of 30 FPS. I wish I could like it more... 3/10
TheAsianWithStyle;-;Read this before you buy the game, because you're about to step into a massively new world. Arma 3 was such a big leap since Arma 2 and left many Arma players shocked (Including me). WIth new weapons, vehicles, infantry, drones, maps, and more leaves you with a brand new world to explore. Now that you can swim, you have a wider access to the new maps. Unlike Arma 2, you will actually enjoy swimming in the ocean! There is much more to talk about, but it's too much to explain. One word before I go, Amazing.
SaltySystem;-;10/10, Over many hours of playing Arma i have grown a bond, a bond so tight even Gaben could not break it.
ryan;-;I've always enjoyed the arma series, the tactical gameplay, strategic planning of things. BIS outdid themselves on this one and i can't wait to see more of what they bring. Note to self: Don't forget to bring ammo into the field, this is like the 4th time i've done this.
Ethan;-;It's the dead of night on the CSAT-occupied island of Stratis, and the peaceful darkness is about to explode into chaos. I'm leading one of two spec-ops teams on a mission to liberate the leader of a local guerrilla faction and return him to the much larger island of Altis. A British squad is in charge of the actual rescue. Our job is to cause as much trouble across the island as possible to distract the CSAT forces and give the British the opening they need. Over the next hour, that's precisely what I do. Inserting by boat from the northwest coast, I head south and raid an ammo dump before cutting across to the eastern shore to destroy a heliport. Then my squad suppresses an enemy encampment from a hillside near the centre of the island as I swoop in from the west to flank them. Yet before we can regroup, my entire team is killed by reinforcements descending from the north, and the British still need more time to complete their mission. Alone, I rush to the southernmost tip of the island, where I blow up a fortified anti-air position before escaping by riding a quad bike back through the swarming enemy forces to the extraction point, where the boat takes me home. Arguably the biggest complaint about Bohemia Interactive's post-Flashpoint games is that their campaigns haven't used the magnificent landscapes they create to their full potential. The first Arma's campaign was a hastily cobbled-together disappointment, while it took a certain zombie-survival mod to harness the austere and foreboding power of Arma 2's Chernarus. That Arma 3 uses half an island for just one of its twenty-odd missions is indicative of Bohemia's effort to resolve this ongoing issue. Indeed, taken as a whole, Arma 3 strives to make this deep and impenetrable military simulator series a more comprehensive, more engaging and more user-friendly experience. It isn't completely successful, but I had an awful lot of fun watching it try. While Arma 3 was officially released back in September, the campaign has been portioned out in three substantial chunks over the last six months. Each chapter is a self-contained entity with its own story arc and theme; combined, they tell the tale of the excitingly named Corporal Ben Kerry and his role in the war over the fictional Mediterranean island archipelago of Altis and Stratis, waged between four different factions. The first part, Survive, is geared towards introducing players to Arma. It takes place entirely on the smaller of Arma 3's two islands, Stratis, and sees Kerry banding up with a group of NATO survivors after the local Altian Armed Forces, backed by NATO's eastern equivalent CSAT, rise up against the local US garrison. For the most part, missions are small-scale skirmishes that keep you firmly in the "follower" category while teaching you the basics of minimising your daily lead intake. Rescuing a downed helicopter crew instructs you on establishing a defensive position, while a midnight liaison with local militia explains how to flank and clear buildings. It's hardly the campaign's most spectacular stage. Story-wise, it's let down by voice acting that ranges from passable to cringeworthy and a script that understands military radio chatter but not how human beings interact with one another. Even here, though, Bohemia's approach to maximising the assets it has built is apparent. Missions are nearly always multi-staged, with objectives being added and changed as events rarely go according to plan. While it smoulders rather than sparks, Survive concludes strongly and the momentum is carried over into Adapt, definitely the best of the three chapters. This introduces Altis, a masterwork of environmental design. I could write another 1000 words on its remarkable sights and sounds: its misty dawns, crimson dusks and streetlight-speckled nights. But what's most important is how the detail that's gone into mapping the landscape's undulations - the lumps and bumps, hills and valleys - plays into the game's combat. A little rise in the ground might be the difference between life and death as you throw yourself down in evasion of the fiendishly accurate enemy AI. When they stop to reload, you'll rush to locate a better vantage point, order your men to "find cover" (an extremely handy new command) and plant half a dozen bullets in your opponent's surprisingly tough body. Tactics are vital in Arma 3, but it's terrain that really makes the difference between success and failure. It's crucial to learn this before Adapt begins, because the difficulty suddenly ramps up. The first mission sees you alone, unarmed and with a city full of enemy soldiers between you and any kind of safety. At this point, setting saves to unlimited using Arma's highly customisable difficulty levels becomes a necessity. Fittingly, after Survive, you will die many, many times. That said, it's important to note that combat is more satisfying than before thanks to improved animations, smoother weapon handling and better optics - meaning the challenge stems from your opponents rather than clumsy controls and slow-to-aim weapons. Adapt also changes the way you play. It gives you a squad to control, which is a mixed blessing. AI units tend to be much more perceptive of enemy locations than you are and are especially useful when facing down tanks and APCs, but they also require a fair amount of babysitting to keep them alive, and the lack of changes to Arma's squad commands means this can be a chore. Especially problematic is AI ammo management; your teammates go through bullets like a swarm of locusts through a corn crop, and resupplying them in the field is a nightmare in Arma 3's clumsy interface. Alongside its story missions, which include the brilliant raid on Stratis described above, Adapt also introduces an open-world component. From your base you can go out on "Patrol" and complete multiple optional objectives, from clearing enemy checkpoints to smoking out a sniper hidden inside a labyrinthine industrial complex, all while collecting weapons, ammo and equipment to use during the main missions - though the clunkiness of Arma's inventory management means this is less enjoyable than it should be. If you want to bring stuff back to base, you need to find a vehicle and load it item-by-item from your own inventory, while before each mission the game defaults to a standard equipment loadout and items you previously had can be lost in this process. After the meatiness of Adapt, the final chapter Win feels fleeting by comparison, with only six missions to its name. But they're also the most spectacular, displaying vast, combined-arms battles that cover sweeping areas of Altis. It's strongly reminiscent of the opening of Operation Flashpoint, but with you in control rather than being led by an AI squad leader. In these closing stages you can call in devastating artillery strikes and helicopter assaults, simultaneously demonstrating the sheer destructive power of modern warfare and your own insignificance in the scale of things. Story-wise, it's also the most interesting segment, making unsettling use of its near-future setting and offering a branching conclusion that is fascinating, whichever direction you take. Arma 3's campaign is a big, powerful, deeply engrossing thing, but there is one disappointment: its lack of vehicular missions. Since the story focuses on one not particularly interesting character who is ultimately a grunt, there are no tank missions, no helicopter missions and no jet missions. I can understand why, to a point: Arma's vehicles, especially its airborne offering, take time and effort to learn to control. Moreover, in these kinds of games infantry combat tends to be more enjoyable anyway. On the other hand, Flashpoint offered plenty of vehicle engagements during its campaign without any issue, and it's frustrating that, 13 years on, Arma's campaigns still lag behind it in terms of breadth of experience. 8/10
Axiom Telecom;-;Real life war-simulator and extremely detailed. 10 PSI out of 10
Pussy Kiss;-;,          ,      ,   ,       ...         ? ,    5   ,   ,          ... !!!*SPOILER ALERT*!!!        , ...      :3  ,  ,  ,      ,   - WORKSHOP. ,    ,    ,   ..    ,   ,     Metal Gear Solid (    )  ...   ,       ,   ,  PEOPLE HAV, Bohemia Interactive  .      ,     "" :)
TheyGiveMeNoEaglePowers;-;this game u get shot alot and you go argh but u keep playing cas it good when u drice car and go swimming. i lik cas you can drive really fast and stuff, in this gam eyou can t shoot anyone cas the y kill you fisrt lol
ChickenFatDaddy;-;tried to get in my friends car and got hit by the side mirror and died realistic/10
ChickenFatDaddy;-;tried to get in my friends car and got hit by the side mirror and died realistic/10
FireThief;-;Graphics are pretty shocking and the tutorial is very simplistic but when you begin the first mission there is little help regarding what to do. As a soldier you're left to your own devices and to complete goals solo. Yet some of the goals aren't clear. Not sure if it's just my old PC but if you're running windows 7 you may have a rough time as I found myself constantly lagging which heightened my annoyance. I personally would not recomend this game to anyone and I can 100% guarantee I will not be buying the full version of this game.
MattFiler;-;Tried this game on the free weekend to see what it was like. Running on an Intel i5 3.4GHz processor with 20GB ram and a wired 4.7MB/s internet connection it totally lagged out even on lowest settings. I couldn't join a game without spending ages in slow and badly designed menus mixed with painfully slow loading screens. Badly optimised game, would not recommend.
kibbl;-;Greedy DLC, The game is "still in Beta". The funnest thing to do by far is KOTH online but good luck getting in a server, randomly the server broswer will flip out and report 0 servers. At which time the only solution is to completely restart the game. Every time hearing that STUPID theme when it starts up, DUH DUH DUNNN DUH! Server broswer reports 0 servers, restart.... DUH DUH DUNNN DUH! 15 bucks for a couple of rifles and diffrent color guillie suits <.<, helicopter pack 15 bucks, still in Beta my . Money Grab, Poorly optimized 6/10 DUH DUH DUNNN DUH! ....... 5/10
MajgenMiller (AKA ADMIN 11th);-;its one of the best arma games i have play ever
Bart;-;Realy awesome game you should realy buy it!
MustangWarrior;-;Arma 3 is a very special game. The realism that is blended with the game really brings the game to life. The maps in the game are extremely huge, allowing for people to roam and have great battles. The gamemodes associated with Arma 3 show what fun can be had. Battle Royale is among my favorites, where the game is a hunger-games-like survival competition. There is a variety of vehicles, including aerial and sea. The weapons have many attachments, and some have the unique trait to have tracers. Overall, the game is a thrilling experience. 9/10
BOT Josh;-;this game have the best 'realism' where you can easily die by bullets, high recoil and no terms of 'one-man-army' like most of the game these days. its possible to be OMA but that requires many tries on each levels. THE BAD THING is that the gameplay is kind of BORING because theres too many information that you recieved but less thing you can do. Instructions/Guide while in game sometimes doesnt help a new player to understand this game. Too many button to use! The AI in singleplayer kindda DUMB. The AI doesnt react to our command smart enough. Realism : 9.0/10 Gameplay : 5.5/10 AI : 3.5/10 Graphics : 8.5/10 Physics : 7.5/10 Overall : 6.8/10
The Holy Moose;-;Loved it, After the success of Cooking Mama and League of Legends the developer Activision shines down on us with the masterpiece that is this game (Gears of Halo Thef Auto 5) and with its staggering 69 dlc packs all priced at $4.20 you'd be a fool not to try this game out. Insomniac Games really outdid themselves on this one. 8/6 would eat without package.
Funky;-;ArmA 3 is a military simulation game, set in the Greek Islands of Stratis and Altis. This is a futuristic game, using remote control planes, heat-seaking helicopters and amazing new vehicles. In this game you can play as BLUFOR, a teamup of the FIA and NATO troops. You can play as Independent, a group friendly to no one but the AAF. You can join OPFOR, a CSAT controlled team. This is less simulation and more fun. You can make your own scenarios and levels using the Zeus control menu or the level editor. The level editor is simple and fun to use. The modding community is big for this game, and a Steam Workshop is available to install modifications with one click of a button. Installing new helicopters, planes, skins, troopers and more from the workshop! Lots of new gamemodes exist, like Wasteland, Epoch and Altis Life! Wasteland is an amazingly styled gamemode. Complete objectives to gain money and buy new vehicles which come with the game. Pick your weapons and outfits, spending your money. You can fly and drive everything in the game, but you have to pay in-game money. You can join OPFOR or BLUFOR and assist your online team, or play as an independent player, being allowed to kill everyone. Altis Life is a roleplay gamemode for ArmA 3. You can play as a police officer, civilian or thug. Being able to smuggle drugs, steal cars and helicopters and fly around. The police can setup roadblocks, check you for IDs and can do what most police in real-life can. I would recommend this game for anyone and everyone, even if my description hasn't given you much it's a very fun game, easy to follow along and learn. For all of you who have the dream of flying in this game, it's so easy! It includes flight assistance for anyone who can't get the hang of landing and taking off. There are so many different servers, Wasteland being my favourite.
Bart;-;Realy awesome game you should realy buy it!
Funky;-;ArmA 3 is a military simulation game, set in the Greek Islands of Stratis and Altis. This is a futuristic game, using remote control planes, heat-seaking helicopters and amazing new vehicles. In this game you can play as BLUFOR, a teamup of the FIA and NATO troops. You can play as Independent, a group friendly to no one but the AAF. You can join OPFOR, a CSAT controlled team. This is less simulation and more fun. You can make your own scenarios and levels using the Zeus control menu or the level editor. The level editor is simple and fun to use. The modding community is big for this game, and a Steam Workshop is available to install modifications with one click of a button. Installing new helicopters, planes, skins, troopers and more from the workshop! Lots of new gamemodes exist, like Wasteland, Epoch and Altis Life! Wasteland is an amazingly styled gamemode. Complete objectives to gain money and buy new vehicles which come with the game. Pick your weapons and outfits, spending your money. You can fly and drive everything in the game, but you have to pay in-game money. You can join OPFOR or BLUFOR and assist your online team, or play as an independent player, being allowed to kill everyone. Altis Life is a roleplay gamemode for ArmA 3. You can play as a police officer, civilian or thug. Being able to smuggle drugs, steal cars and helicopters and fly around. The police can setup roadblocks, check you for IDs and can do what most police in real-life can. I would recommend this game for anyone and everyone, even if my description hasn't given you much it's a very fun game, easy to follow along and learn. For all of you who have the dream of flying in this game, it's so easy! It includes flight assistance for anyone who can't get the hang of landing and taking off. There are so many different servers, Wasteland being my favourite.
DOOMJESUS;-;it's like arma 2 but not as .
FlipDrizzle360;-;Kids play Call of Duty Boys play Battlefield Men play ArmA. Even though I'm not what you would considered a "man" yet, ArmA is the best FPS Tactical Shooter simulation/sandbox I have ever played.
Technologic;-;Amazingly fun, endless possibilities in this game.
Cen7raL;-;The best 30 FPS simulator I have ever played. Game is so good that user mods are better than the actual game. My personal favorite part about this game is the desync where you see people in tanks flying across the map raining down shells across the map.
Techno(sleeping);-;Great game, one of the best all around modern day, military sim.
Burglar Bill;-;WAGWAN BLUD DIS GAME BE BARE TRIM LIKE THAT INNIT
Khan;-;from your bipod trying to shove your barrle into a rock and your character dieing of a blown lung after walking five feet,instant death by fire, falling three inches and your enemys obsorbing round after round its a joke of a game and the punch line is that its a military simulator, but fun if you mod it to something completely diffrent 10/10 joke should of been made by tom clancy, stick to space games bohemia
Robert Frost;-;You can shoot rabbits. 12341234/10
[VBG] PsychoShade;-;Arma 3 packs a full punch, improving on all aspects of Arma 2. From the weapon system, the flow of your character, or even the smallest thing such as your side mirrors and rear view mirrors in your car actually work. Pick this game up. You will not be disappointed.
Muska;-;There is just no other game like the ArmA series and ArmA 3 has bought hte graphics bang up to date along with a host of new features. This is far too msall a box to start going into all ArmA 3 can offer you. It is well worth the money and has a rich modding community. A must own.
that aint falco;-;makes me want to bump meth and become a lesbian
Dendis Khan;-;i killed a man with a gun 10/10 for originality
Attacktix25;-;I eat
Ben;-;As a reddit gold user, I've waded through dirt and mud (referring to dreaded REPOSTS, haha!) before so I know what to expect from a real life army man simulator. This was not what I was expecting. I was put in to a tight spot with my team, I couldn't even move, let alone adjust my fedora to tip at the lady members of our team! (Just kidding, there were none! Get in the kitchen! Haha!) and I even died once while I was distracted, looking at the funnybanana meme WHICH YES, I DID SAVE. THANKS JOHN! It's a great game, but I don't think I'll be playing it much when I get accepted in to the r/megalounge! Haha! Get me a whiskey on the rocks, autobutler! Haha! - Peter
Jetpacko;-;Game had great introduction and I had fun. I don't know what it says about a war game when the most enjoyable part was the driving bits though... There was also quite lot of lag and frame rate kept jumping. I also had problems with achievements so that they did not come up when I got them, they came hours late or not at all. Game had problems but I still recommend it because it was fun.
Darth Revan;-;I love this game more than Selena Gomez. (That's a lot) :)
Goalie;-;It's like Arma 2 but with less content, poorly optimised and cash grab DLC (Loadmasters anyone?). Was hoping it would get better but it's still worse than Arma 2 in almost every way except graphics, I think I'll stick to operating in Chernarus and Takistan instead of a Greek Island that has anti-framerate technology.
char565;-;why simulate a semi future era? then thats not simulation... i think the best arma will be arma 2 optimized,even with smaller island. i want that, but not these robot combat..no..
Athiuk;-;Game is pretty cool and detailed ... but its aparently going down the pay for any extra content road Im a cheapskate ... paying for extra model just make me sick .... if they would come out with actual add-on Ie wait a year or two finish singling out every issue with your engine then come out with a dlc adding a bit of everythng + some mission i m on thats fine by me i'd buy But here the game does not feel finished to me maybe they need to come out with more DLC's .... Just my opinion
Ben;-;As a reddit gold user, I've waded through dirt and mud (referring to dreaded REPOSTS, haha!) before so I know what to expect from a real life army man simulator. This was not what I was expecting. I was put in to a tight spot with my team, I couldn't even move, let alone adjust my fedora to tip at the lady members of our team! (Just kidding, there were none! Get in the kitchen! Haha!) and I even died once while I was distracted, looking at the funnybanana meme WHICH YES, I DID SAVE. THANKS JOHN! It's a great game, but I don't think I'll be playing it much when I get accepted in to the r/megalounge! Haha! Get me a whiskey on the rocks, autobutler! Haha! - Peter
Jetpacko;-;Game had great introduction and I had fun. I don't know what it says about a war game when the most enjoyable part was the driving bits though... There was also quite lot of lag and frame rate kept jumping. I also had problems with achievements so that they did not come up when I got them, they came hours late or not at all. Game had problems but I still recommend it because it was fun.
Darth Revan;-;I love this game more than Selena Gomez. (That's a lot) :)
Adviral;-;I would say that arma 3 is the best game of 2013-14 and maybe 15 since it is good optimized it has tons of mods including sandbox and even you can play other games on arma 3!? DAYUM a big bravo to BH
Baron;-;Arma 3 is an improvement and significant step forward over the previous in its franchise, securing its top spot as the go to for military simulation. Arma 3 makes big steps forward with huge worlds and more varied vehicles and weapons. With the clever integration of the Steam workshop, player-made content has never been easier to install and manage. A smart move by Bohemia Interactive because it's these fan based mods that are the backbone of Arma and will give Arma 3 endless hours of replayability. With the effortless downloading and installation of a huge library of player created mods, from team driven tactical scenarios to the the chaotic survival mods, it's a must have for any shooter enthusiast.
Sexy Duk;-;Great graphics, realistic gameplay and i had a great experience with this game. Much better than any other shooting games like : Battlefield and Call Of Duty. Succesfully made me fat. ._. Recomended 10/10 -DatFpsPlayer
229C55530BF75A9A4B3A2FC60FEA6DBA;-;Broken multiplayer + horrible singleplayer campaign = Bohemia Interactive. Thanks guys.
thelyraki;-;Just dont buy it......it needs a NASA pc to play (no, 30fps is not playable in this game....dev, why u do this??? then, you can have 35fps in solo but 4 fps in multiplayer!!!??? again, why? (while in multi, we have lesser players/aircraft e.t.c.) most servers are rpg's....almost no coop server. its VERY HARD to find real strategy/realism/gameplay here.....the vids you see on youtube do happens, but its very rare....dont buy it. Arma 3 is maybe the worst game i have ever bought after shogun 2..... and i really wanted to buy it....
Makise Kurisu;-;>mfw i hit a small rock in a go-kart and die 11/10 GOTYAY. But seriously, this game's a hell of a lot of fun. With friends. <3
Dance Commander Aerdoria;-;One of the better games (if not THE best) on my list in which you have complete and absolute freedom. The editor itself is a very fun feature and you can do practically whatever, as long as you dedicate some time to learning how to script or the syntax, or whatever. In any case, an amazing game which I truly enjoy playing with others co-operatively, but also PvP. The combat is fun, somewhat simple, but surely adrenaline-pumping and full of action. If you're playing with the right people, it's a relaxing, beautiful experience which helps team-building, teamwork, leadership and orientation quite a bit. The new features (stances) are amazing. Holding control and pressing w,a,s or d acts responsively and puts you into a certain stance. The controls are easy to learn, flying isn't all that difficult if you have some patience and the nimble-ness to use auto-hover. Armoured vehicles (for now) contain only Armoured Personnel Carriers, but there'll be Main Battle Tanks soon, which is AMAZING. The names are altered, but you might recognize how the Zamak trucks are actually Kamaz trucks! (THE MORE YOU KNOW!) Anyhow, the aircraft (helicopters for now!) are amazing and perform quite well. My favourite? I don't have one for now! But onto the weapons, which I find sauce. Weapons are highly customizeable and allow for dynamic attachments and replacing the aforementioned. Stealth operation? Slam a suppressor on. Long-range? No problem, here's a scope. And it all goes together very well, but the content is still lacking. However, it's a beta and I can't wait for the actual release of the game (which will be amazing, as the beta is saucetastic as it is). To anyone who wants to explore a mediterranean-esque island, I truly suggest purchasing this game and going crazy. As I said, you have a lot of options, the editor itself, you can craft campaigns in that thing. As stupid as it seems, it can be something better than singleplayer/multiplayer combined. It's all down to you and how you wish to play it out. You could even try roleplay servers and be a civilian. But that's not what this is about. This is warfare. 10/10
Allah is my aimbot;-;Don't buy this game unless you're willing to pay more money for a game you already payed for. The game has the est marketing system I have ever seen, you have to pay $70 just to get it and an extra $20 to be able to use half the guns in the game, you would have thought its original hefty price tag would have been enough. Other than that it's a good game.
Kinderfleich Mit Zitrone;-;the morning after i had downloaded this game i procede to relive my life experences. id like to start off my life with telling everyone i had failed english every year till 8th grade, it ing sucked. so i was living my life and i decided to live my life like a man on xbox live likes to live to live my life to life long standards of living to exceding life goals set by people who are alive. once apon a time i was  by a asian girl. so next time we meet on the avengers i decided to play arma 3. as i was held pinned down in a building i thought of my military training from my time in the military. so i proceded to out military the man in the military and proceded to win the war and saved america. did i mention was was  when i was 14? 10/10 would bang.
Railgun;-;Most entertaining shooter I've ever played
Strider;-;One of the best games i think ever played. 10/10 From Northern noobs YT
[OG] Bobby Johnson;-;I say that this game is my most playable and favorite i have ever played, i recommend to try this game because it's gonna blow your mind in a good way :p. For those who just bought it, try Altis life and Wasteland. 800 hours played worth it. 10/10 <3
Mr.Red;-;The campaign is awesome and they are adding more vehicles. Mods are starting to come out slowly but they are really good. Overall buy it
Quickscope master of disaster;-;Terrible 1st impressions FPS is huge on almost every server if theres ppl its impossible to play because of the fps if the fps is low theres like 3 ppl on the server. Impossible to find a normal sever I get handcuffed for doing nothing and a lot of other boring ... I WOULD ABSOLUTELY NOT RECOMMEND BUYING OR EVEN WASTING YOUR TIME ON THIS GAME
Strider;-;One of the best games i think ever played. 10/10 From Northern noobs YT
[OG] Bobby Johnson;-;I say that this game is my most playable and favorite i have ever played, i recommend to try this game because it's gonna blow your mind in a good way :p. For those who just bought it, try Altis life and Wasteland. 800 hours played worth it. 10/10 <3
Geog;-;is good pls buy
Rain;-;I personally think that this is a love or hate kind of a game, and I hate it, more specifically how it controls. Yeah it looks great but if I cant enjoy the way the character behaves I wont enjoy the game. Its just too clumsy in my opinion. If you dont like arma 2 then you wont like this one.
Xen0tech;-;This game could be so much better if they fixed the ai. Was the same in arma 2 and unfortunately nothing has changed. Stealth is dead enemies will spot you in the dark 200 meters away or from a moving helicopter while your underwater. It is so inconsistant and really kills the immersion when concealment is moot. Instead of enemies getting smarter on higher difficulties they just get aim bots. Got to the point where even sticking my head out of cover for a split second meant death from a distant machinegun headshot. Thats not more challenging its just cheap. Best thing about this game is the editor.
Arkenahten;-;It took them far too long to polish this turd for me to recomend anything BIS is involved with. Yeah the game is ok now that they have finally added the features that should have been there from day dot, but I bought a physical copy of the DELUXE EDITION from EB and as such i expected a FINISHED GAME, not the Alpha/Beta i was confronted with. It should never have been on shelves 6 months ago let alone when i bought it back in 2013. And you would think DELUXE EDITION implies that at least *some* of the DLC would be included. Nope. Not so"DELUXE" then is it? Imagine buying a new car, and on your way out of the dealership the shady salesman casualy states 'Oh just so you know even though you have a dashboard, none of the dials or switches work. But as soon as we get some in we can install them for a nominal fee'. Seems a bit rude dosen't it? paying for something and realizing it dosen't even come close to expectations. And the excuse "why not just use mods" is just a sad way of admiting the game isn't finished and/or it isn't any good on its own. And even though i may pick it back up and try again i really don't see myself spending anywhere near the time i had intended to as the experience has left a VERY bitter taste in my mouth.
Mkilbride;-;It's alright. But it is ArmA. So you know. Poor performance. Buggy mess. Frustrating mechanics, but moments that are legendary in all that.
Panimala;-;the holocaust never happened
=CB= Satariel;-;Really boring game with bad graphics
Orma;-;AI is still
~;-;One of the buggiest and most unfinished game I've ever played. Starts game on medium settings, 20 fps, sets to ultra, 50 fps. That's also a very bad framerate for having 2 r9 280x Firstly, none of the sound is working. Sound is working everywhere else, except for Arma 3. Then I got into a multiplayer game, which takes a few restarts btw. I couldn't find a single server so I had to end up just joining my friend through Steam and it worked. Then I got into a server and after waiting for all textures to load, I noticed the bad framerate. Then we started driving around for a while and even the driving is really bugged. If I start going forward, I can't stop going forward and the same for going backwards. Then I decided to go out of it. I got thrown out high up in the air and landed so I died. Also, a small little thing, the cursor is still visible. It flies over all monitors, but the game doesn't tab out or click anywhere, so no big deal, just a little bit annoying... One of the buggiest games I've played in a while. :/
F0G;-;Addictive shooter, enjoy playing multi-player with your friends on custom servers and missions. Endless fun.
Spoons;-;much shoot , very pew pew , many deaths
Beta * CSGORiver.com;-;if you re looking for style, this is the right game for you. Excellent bullet balistic, realistic gameplay and also customer friendly company :)
Ayb1;-;High price low fps, overall bad game
YiffMan;-;Shot the floor only to have the bullet bounce from the ground and hit my friend in the head This feature is heavily overlooked But beacuse of this we arent friends anymore thanks Arma 3
gig;-;This game is on the opposite side of most of the games that are simply too afraid to make things too hard. I normally don't like these types of games because they seem to create their own version of reality that makes the game even less realistic. For instance: Enemy troops, who have just been established as being too dumb to find their  on a map of their own homeland are now able to hit you, without scopes, in heavy cover at 300 meters. In contrast, a veteran marine gets tired from walking up a gentle slope for two minutes. However, the single player is meant to train you for multiplayer, and it succeeds in doing this. Or you would think. The multiplayer allows for plenty of roles, so if you are new, you can always stick to support. Unfortunately, the FPS is going to be around 25 on standard gfx. I also get this feeling that 80% of the people have NO CLUE what is going on. This is usually a sign of scattered game design. Optimization is kinda bad depite being almost indistinguishable from a game from 2006 with a ton of AA modded in, but how else are you going to move those newly rebranded Nvidia cards off the shelves every year? The keyboard bindings are a tragic mess. Double right clicking to use the iron sites? Five different buttons to use all the menus and submenus? Various key combinations to draw a LINE ON A MAP?? Using a layout standard that does not resemble anything ANY OTHER WELL KNOWN GAME uses? It does not help that there seems to be a .75 second delay to all commands. This is the Crusader Kings II of FPSs, except where Crusader Kings is ed because of random events that cause your King/Duke/Whatever to grow a nipple out of his forehead, totally trashed mechanics that allow for an army of 14 archers to defeat your army of 1240 because it was raining and they felt kind of down and AI that seems to really hate you especially for no clear reason other than that they want to capture you and cut out your eyes and testicles, ARMA III has controls that make no sense and optimization that makes Company of Heroes 2 look like it could run on a TI-83 calculator. Buy for the (extremely short) single player on sale. The idea is novel, but not so much the implementation. I feel sorry for those poor designers who got arrested by the Greek Armed forces during this game's production. Not worth it.
h1jacker;-;14      , ,    20   .  . 0/10 I just can not understand how it is possible working for 14 years with this engine and not to fix these ing 20 fps in multiplayer. Stupid imbeciles. 0/10
Oompaloompa;-;Barely a decent game to say the least -NUMEROUS rediculous animations that will get you killed while exiting/entering anything -Dont try to hide because players only see grass a few feet infront of them -A small shrub blew up my tank -Walk 10 miles just to get shot by a 5 star general of an ai -Not very fluid combat Just stick to arma2
[K&K] Not Wilhelm Tell;-;Another day, another ArmA game, another load of bugs and lags. Don't expect this game to run well if you want a solid 60 FPS, it will always find a way to ruin your performance. I'm constanlty monitoring hardware usage and ArmA III lags even while not loading my CPU or GPU above 70% (I'm running the game on a 6 Gb/s SSD). I cannot help but compare this game with Battlefield 4 that runs almost perfectly well. I do realize that BF4 isn't running a whole load of AI and scripts plus its maps and object count are much lower but somehow I feel DICE could do optimization much better than BIS. Seriously, what excuse would you have for a game that lags without hardware bottlenecks (so it seems)? I'm definitely not recommending this game as I'm absolutely convinced that steady performance is above fancy visuals. I've tried all kinds of performance tweaks for this game - launch parameters, custom memory allocators, edits in the .cfg and .ini files, unparking the CPU cores, changing process priority, messing with settings & etc. All they do is give you a tad of extra FPS and nothing more. No tweak will change the fact that ArmA III uses a 32-bit executable and obsolete overcoded engine with no proper multicore support. On the other note, I don't really like the pseudo-futuristic setting of this game. It's indeed pseudo-futuristic as most all present equipment is denied prototypes or current tech that has nothing futuristic about it except being exotic. Mid-2030s? Even while not being a mil expert I understand that realistic portrayal (isn't this what a tactical shooter is about?) of this age is not possible as we have no idea of technology that's going to be used at the time. Scopes with built-in rangefinders and auto adjustment? That's something already created, greatly promising and not even present in this bogus - same as triton oxygen mask, google glasses, smart bullets, thermal goggles and even real time active spectral matching camouflage (EDIT: The current version now includes Nightstalker Scope that has a built-in rangefinder). A3 setting ended up on the side of cheap pulp fiction. That's not really a major problem since I'm looking forward to mods like ACE 3 and RHS Escalation that should reintroduce the modern stuff by adding new or converting old assets, and it's really good to note that EULA and A3 engine allow this. The game wields many improvements over ArmA II. The inventory system is marvellous, radio comms sound much more like live chat, visuals, animations and sounds are vastly enhanced but is that really enough when the game often lags like hell because it's purely unoptimised? A3 is too expensive for its content quality, but I may change my mind if devs manage to improve its performance. However it's unlikely they ever will. The way I see it, in order for ArmA III not to lag BIS will have to code a new but reverse compatible engine on the basis of DirectX 12 with proper multicore support and a 64-bit executable. http://img.leprosorium.com/2096814 Pathetic performance: core usage, RAM usage, GPU usage and video memory usage. The game barely used 50% of availiable computing power, horrific 22 FPS are of course the result. The only solution is to lower the viewdistance and object distance to the point where whole world turns into a permanent hazy  like your Silent Hill. Needless to say that flying aerial vehicles becomes a questionable undertaking.
Sebidee;-;Unless you have a half a dozen friends who will play this game with you then I strongly recommend that you DO NOT buy this game. It's all about teams and co-operation and it is absolutely zero fun to play on your own. You will have no idea what is happening and even worse, you will be at a massive disadvantage while playing because everyone else is in teams. Usually you will be trekking along (normally walking for miles since your fully trained soldier can only run about 20 yards before passing out from exhaustion) you'll hear a pop pop from two miles away and then you are dead, and will have to make another 20 minute trek back to the battlefield. Without co-ordination with a very sizable squad of friends then you will always fail. The game is supposed to be ultra realistic but unfortunately this makes for a very poor game. We don't want to fight long distance firefights against invisible enemies with your gun waving around like you've got cerbrial palsy just because you jogged down some steps. The graphics are definitely good, you've got to give it that, but the performance is trash. If you are playing on low to mid settings then the game will be even more difficult - good luck seeing anyone further than 100m away after your LOD turns them into blobs. Literally the only joy I've gotten out of this game is driving trucks around and flying helicopters, but since this is supposed to be a shooter then that is not good. Actually fighting other players or even the AI in the campaign is massively frustrating. My  Mexican friend who made me buy this owes me 44.99. This game is worthless.
-TPF-;-;I'm sorry, I do like this game. It is different from other FPS, with wide open combat and amazing community made missions, tactical multiplayer and interesting vehicles. But if I can crush crisis 3 on ultra @ 1080p, and BF4 on ultra @ 1080p and maintain a solid 60+ FPS what I don't want is to see a game use 25% of my CPU and 45% of my GPU under max load. And since this game is CPU intensive it adds insult to injury. I can barely hold 25+ FPS in big citys on low but somehow I get 60+ on ultra if I'm out in the middle of no where! I swear it renders every texture and unseen geometry... well it does... The game is not optimized at all The game can't utilize hardware at all (Intel better than AMD I must admit) Offering a laggy and unsatisfying experience to people. And I can't imagine what framerates people get on lower spec systems :-/ And bipods aren't a ting. I can see it. I can touch it. But my soldier is mentally handicap, or it is stuck like a stubborn bicycle stand that needs some oil. I will get fanboys arguing with me but to be honest they probably don't care abut graphics... wish I could be like that - I dont want my game to look like it runs on a console tho. My specs: (someone asked) GTX 780 4gb vram - 16 gb 1600mhz quad - AMD fx 9590 (stock clock) so yeah I should be able to run this OS: dual boot - linux + windows 8.1 on an SSD
Tyrone;-;Pretty amazing game lots of addons and user made missions to play would reccomend 10/10
DetroitTechno89;-;Gameplay is perfect, the idea is perfect. But expect low fps ( even on high end pc's ) Some times my gpu load drops below 20% this happens on low to ultra settings. My friends have the same problem. It happens in the city;s. Not in the open. Looks like this game can't be fixed cause the problem ik the engine were the game is build on. The only fix is a entire new engine. Like they are going to do with dayz standalone. I get 75 fps average but drops which are like in the 20's If you can live with fps drops to 25 buy it. The gameplay is the best part of arma 3. The sound is below average. Not the quality but direction of the sound is coming from
Tismo;-;I regret buying this game. It reminds me of the sensation you get after stepping in wet puppy  while walking to the bathroom in the morning.
The Flump;-;I am doing this to level up my steam profile.
DetroitTechno89;-;Gameplay is perfect, the idea is perfect. But expect low fps ( even on high end pc's ) Some times my gpu load drops below 20% this happens on low to ultra settings. My friends have the same problem. It happens in the city;s. Not in the open. Looks like this game can't be fixed cause the problem ik the engine were the game is build on. The only fix is a entire new engine. Like they are going to do with dayz standalone. I get 75 fps average but drops which are like in the 20's If you can live with fps drops to 25 buy it. The gameplay is the best part of arma 3. The sound is below average. Not the quality but direction of the sound is coming from
Tismo;-;I regret buying this game. It reminds me of the sensation you get after stepping in wet puppy  while walking to the bathroom in the morning.
The Flump;-;I am doing this to level up my steam profile.
SnipeEm;-;This is Petty much BF4 but more realistic.. Better Vehical machanics, Better Graphics, and Alot more recoil. I give this a solid 8/10
$uokukko 8);-;Graphics were great, but my fps was a bit low even tho I have a GTX 770. A nice game nevertheless.
YT:MrBeyondNames;-;Verry good game and had great fun on king of the hill really recommend it if your into fighting and action games
Prayerz_;-;This game is good
Dusty;-;I was a newbie, now still a newbie.
Maverick;-;First of all, ARMA is not a shooter like COD or BF. The pace, style of gameplay, maps, are really different, but I have to say that it is more enjoyable, funny, and COMMUNICATING with the other players is great. For example, being the gunner of a tank: there are numbers that tell you direction and distance, so other player inside the tank tells you the indications to shoot. You wont be able to find this anywhere else. Or being in a squad, splitting in pairs to clear some buildings while the other 2 players cover you. It is important to make clear that you buy ARMA for its multiplayer and coop mode. If you are looking for campaign game, dont buy this. Also, if you are planning to buy this game, I have to tell you that you will have to join a clan to enjoy this game to its maximum; otherwise, by yourself, you wont like it as much :S Joining a clan means you will have to download MODs (content created by the community), and probably TeamSpeak (program similar to Skype) to play with them (all clans ask for a mic, take that into account). To sum it up, ARMA is a total unique in the experience out in the market regarding FPS. Nonetheless, to have a good time you need to join a clan and play with other people, and be willing to download new content.
Maverick;-;First of all, ARMA is not a shooter like COD or BF. The pace, style of gameplay, maps, are really different, but I have to say that it is more enjoyable, funny, and COMMUNICATING with the other players is great. For example, being the gunner of a tank: there are numbers that tell you direction and distance, so other player inside the tank tells you the indications to shoot. You wont be able to find this anywhere else. Or being in a squad, splitting in pairs to clear some buildings while the other 2 players cover you. It is important to make clear that you buy ARMA for its multiplayer and coop mode. If you are looking for campaign game, dont buy this. Also, if you are planning to buy this game, I have to tell you that you will have to join a clan to enjoy this game to its maximum; otherwise, by yourself, you wont like it as much :S Joining a clan means you will have to download MODs (content created by the community), and probably TeamSpeak (program similar to Skype) to play with them (all clans ask for a mic, take that into account). To sum it up, ARMA is a total unique in the experience out in the market regarding FPS. Nonetheless, to have a good time you need to join a clan and play with other people, and be willing to download new content.
FarmerDom;-;Such a good game. Don't get it if you have a bad pc!
Zero;-;Get it now !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
=W-S= simonthedog;-;i love arm 3. the graphics are like god giving a credit card without any limit. the gameplay is super fun, but you should definently download the nmd menu (workshop mod). the sounds are amazing and dont sound computer gen at all they sound real. to sum it up probobly the best and most realistic military sim available on the steam store
|H2o|Ch3v3ll3;-;Terribly optimized and leaves you wondering what the difference is between this and Arma 2. The entire arma series needs an overhaul. The only keeping these games alive are player made mods. Wish Novalogic still made games.
DustAngel;-;The good one
Tarly;-;This game.... is ING BEAST No in all seriousness if you like mil sims and want realistic and fun Military game this is the game for you.... Just make sure u have a supercomputer to play it though 10/10
Shiftas;-;Its pretty good game.
Lardninja (Back August 2nd);-;This game is really fun i would stongly recomend it. It is good to have freinds to play with.
La Meme Danker;-;Arma 3 is probably one of the best games ever in my opinion. The RPG is unbeatable and people who play this game like to actully play it legit.
Sparrow420;-;Do you have a monster computer? Then i would suggest checking this out because it is an amazing game. Dont have one? Then this is the laggiest POS you will ever play. They didnt really bother on the whole optimization thing, i guess its too mainstream to optimize your game. Im running a Phenom Quad Core @ 2.8Ghz, 8GB ram, and a Radeon 7770 and i have to put this game on dead low settings just to make it even possible to play. That is just ing ridiculous, when these specs allow me to play any other game at high settings. I loved Arma 2 and arma 3 improves on the series so much but the amount of power it takes to get into a decent size game just is not worth its price tag.
LuckyPantz-Ryan;-;How could this still be this bad.. still playing arma2 witch is much better
weedwizard420xxx;-;Uses OFP engine from 10 years ago. Recommends GTX 560, I have 580 and NEVER get more than 20 fps no matter what my settings are. This game was made by dirty slavaboo gopniks who have no ing clue what they're doing.
Nitroxc;-;Arma 3 is easy to explain. Imagine arma 2. Now add proper stances to it, ALOT better performance, alot of fixed bugs (alot more introduced aswell) and on and on. Arma 3 is a good game for what it is. The main problem is: the devs are ing lazy, they didn't bother modelling lots of civillian cars like in arma 2, instead, 4 or 5 that just have different skins. About 1 tank per faction. 3 or 4 Helicopters and  me, only one ing jet. I mean thats ing lazy. The amount of content in arma 3 is ing embarrasing compared to the shear amount of content in arma 2. Bohemia Interactive have done a great job with all the new content etc. but this game should still either be in alpha, or very early beta. NOT a finished game. Overall if your reading this to see weather you wanna get this game or not, its down to you. If you want a game that runs and plays really well, if you can look past the laziness of the devs and the lack of assets, then get it. If you can't however, just stick with arma 2 until the devs actually do something about the lack of assets etc. Again, this game should be in late alpha - early beta. NOT a finished game.
Unknown Mech;-;The game is really great for simulation in warfare, A must buy!
Tas Brdainais alis;-;Best military simulator ever... Want to experience some hardcore  not COD ? try it, buy it, enjoy it.
Pulpy Wine;-;Endless fun with all the user created content :D
Devin;-;As someone who plays Wasteland a lot. You either live long enough to be the person to kill fresh spawns, or you die quick enough to become the fresh spawn a lot.
vice_grip;-;I pre-ordered on the first day it was available. I loved ARMA 2 and was not disapointed. Intense, co-operative and worth every penny. Wether you want to blow a guys head off from two kilometers away with a .50 cal, go diving and disarm sea mines, fly a transport or attack helicopter or roll a tank off a cliff. The possibilities are endless. Its older brother Arma 2 is available for cheaper and give similar game play with more mods currently available, but with a better weapons attachment and gear system, UAVs and diving, Arma 3 has much to offer.
Kip;-;I love this game.
TinyFPS;-;I ran through a mine field while in my underpants. 10/10 Seriously get this game 10/60 frames.
Hyphen;-;Very realistic game. Spot on combat, vehicular, and weapon mechanics. My complaint only complaint can only be related to possible crappy servers I have got on or my own ADD...but either way, sometimes it feels like gameplay can drag on without anything happening for an overwhelmingly extended period of time. Overall, 8/10 in my mind. If you are super into realism in war games, definite 10/10.
ll koolaid;-;10 Kart DLC advertisements out of 10.
Raspupin;-;Saw a War Movie went to play ARMA,Saw anything related to combat or warfare went to play ARMA ;) One of the most addicting Games and Military Simulation i ever Played! Endless mods packs,maps,mission and game modes! You can just can do there almost anything that refers to war and military simulation and even more than that,Starting from making missions in the editor and playing with friend,playing on public server or even joining a clan that suits you,joining a PVP server as king of the hill,free for all or just any other pvp modes also if you feel for some role play there is also some from that as well!! As i said game of endless contact that keeps expanding and getting new thing while thats being created only by the community there are also the devs that are keep updating and making the game better. As you can see i Realy recommend buying this game,worth it! :)
Rabassa;-;I have to say, haven't played much, but i would recomend this game to everyone, you have to see the huge amount of things that this game offers to you, it's beautifull.
Slatemiester;-;10/10 great game, would do again -IGN
LemonShit aka FuckFace;-;my mic does not work in arma 3. i have tried everything out of everything with no results at all, plz help. my mic works in skype, voice recs, and other games like Gmod. but it dosent work in Arma 3. there is nothing wrong with my mic. there is only something wrong with Arma 3 that dosent transmit my voice at all. plz add me on steam and help me im very desperete. and frustrated. and by the way sry for my bad English
Governor;-;Very nice game i played arma 2 and arma 2 operation arrowhead and they have step it up really nicely the multiplayer server engines could be a bit better but apart from that it's a masterpiece of Fps games.
The worst AK;-;The game is very fun but the 20$ for a helicopter dlc is completely insane.
james;-;Excellent 1st or 3rd person tactical shooter. More cerebral than most. If you're tired of twitch FPSs and totally stupid AI who forget you exist when you go behind a tree then this might be right up your street. An easy to follow tutorial gets you ready for the single player campaign. I've only played for a few hours so far but I'm hooked. And it is BEAUTIFUL! The island setting is so rich that I get a great sense of immersion and tension. Combat is sudden and brutal. Loving it. 10/10
PFC Valls [29th Ret.];-;Been here since first Arma, I've seen huge improvements, and still a long way to go. Arma 3 is way better than Arma 2. The alpha version itself has fewer bugs than the released version of Arma 2 - but that doesn't mean it is bug free. I play it in a realism unit and we use the game extensively, trying to get 100% of what the game can offer, either using Zeus or other mods to improve the experience. The scenario depicts an unstable region, currently constituted by two Greek islands located to the south of the balkanic peninsula, on the Aegean Sea. The first one is Stratis (Agios Efstratios - https://www.google.com/maps/@39.5122819,25.0139011,13z) and the second one is Altis (Lemnos - https://www.google.com/maps/@39.9023965,25.226326,26328m). Bohemian crew actually went to those islands and took pictures of the towns located there, so the in-game cities looks almost exactly the same as the real cities (Just like Kavala, in Altis, that looks very much the town of Limnos: http://youtu.be/e5urNdAogpA). There are four factions struggling for power in this region. They are: NATO (North Atlantic Treaty Organization), CSAT (Canton Protocol Strategic Alliance Treaty), AAF (Altis Armed Forces) and FIA (Freedom and Independence Army). In all missions, the game depicts CSAT as an invading force, and NATO as the peacekeeping force. AAF and FIA are local forces, and their allignment varies along the missions. The game still has some latency issues, lagspikes, dedicated server crashes frequently, the framerate is extremely low (tops 25) even using the "standard" settings over a high-end rig, the learning curve is very steep if you didn't play the previous titles from the franchise, but once you get things going, it is some unique FPS experience that no other game can give you (and I've played enough of them to know about that). Be aware, if you're willing to hop in a server, grab your gear, walk 10 steps and start killing people, this game is not for you. This is a complete combat simulation suite, focused on realism, which means that usually if you spawn too close to action, you'll die and you'll never know where from. If you fly your helicopter too close to the objective, you'll probably be shot down. If you drive your Hunter directly inside a hostile city, you'll probably gonna blow from land mines or AT soldiers. Be ready to drive cars or pilot aircraft for 10 minutes, then park the vehicles and walk for 5 more minutes prior to hope for any action at all. It is a great game, and if you are a fan of simulation AND combat genres, this is the perfect mix of both. For some footage, check out my youtube channel: https://www.youtube.com/user/PFCValls
Soulassassin;-;Brilliant game. Awesome RP on Altis life! Especially NG ZA-Life! come and join us! www.neutralgaming.co.za
Moist Sausages;-;This game has successfully ruined my social life...... 10/10
Banter;-;This is as real as it gets for war games. If your looking for a good realistic game this is for you 10/10.
j trading;-;I do really recomend the game but the game is meant to be $50. I was looking at the arma website and converted it to usd and it said it was around $50. So would I say its a ripoff... No but I do think that steam should lower the amount. This game is worth it but steam just needs to look at that because I was playing the free weekend and it should have been like $25 dollars. I at that time had $20 so maybe we should ask steam to make a free full edition weekend where you could download it and keep it after the weekend finished...
persPaladin;-;ArmA 3 is a good successor to ArmA2 with some great improvements to the engine, visuals, vehicles etc. Mainly I have played the Wasteland, King of the Hill and Epoch (Alpha) mods. King of the Hill being the most rewarding and enjoyable over all. I have only just dipped my toes into the campaign, however I will be doing more of it I think. With all the improvements to ArmA, you'll still get those good ole ArmA moments like clipping through walls/floors, and your vehicle exploding on contact with a weed or bush.
Charor;-;You don't buy crack for sometime in the future just like you dont buy Arma if you plan on going to work the next day...
Will-Metal;-;Awesome game. (As long as you have an extremely powerful CPU.)
[eFantazja.eu] kaimada;-;One of the most expanded game ever made. Every aspect of the physics is independent and gives stunning effects. + Feeling of shooting + Precisely made weapons + Precisly constructed wehicles + Movement + Stances + Challenging + Lot of mods + Almost every aspect of the game + You can fall in love in it - Or you can hate it - Some bugs - Too hard for some people
WUSKER;-;Loving this game
((-THC-)) The Human Boss;-;Stop playing fake military games (aka Battlefield, Call of Duty, Combat Arms) and start playing some real ones. This game separates the kids from the men.
Monocle Man;-;Best game for multiple reasons: The singleplayer is actually good which I did not imagine. The variety of multiplayer servers and game mode is amazing and can do so much, like role playing, taking over an objective and some other stuff. The differences between this and arma 3 is so different, like scuba diving gear and . Anyway, overall, I think you should get this game if you are debating it but you may need a good rig to run it.
Rox;-;Fantastic Game ... Best Mil Sim game i ever palyed !! :D
NewUser;-;Awesome game! Improved graphic from Arma II. I like this game so much!
Owl;-;Great game
sinistralmist;-;this game suck
TacticalTuna;-;Great millitary simulator game would recomend for people who like to feel like there in the action
@Spyda_Official;-;the best shooter game i jave ever played. PAD SUPPORT NEEDED
LukeD | *St'eamAnalyst.com;-;Game of The Year! Even after the release was Published in 2013! 10/10~
BorisJohnson;-;10/10 Must buy.
Jourjii;-;lol my computer couldn't even run this when it was free weekend ;v;
Danxy;-;They should add an RV to this game. 9/10 will update once RV is added.
DarkNSF;-;easily the best milsim available
DaavPuke;-;If by chance you are fortunate to be right-handed, use default controls at all times, don't mind that even this comes with several impairing elements, don't mind tons of glitches and unstable content, don't mind wading through to find actual significant content yourself or want to put in dozens of hours of effort to make content in a steep and vague learning curve...then this game is the best a military simulation can do for now.
mitts;-;you dont need it anymore there's a standalone for dayz
Evan Eisenfaust (Vacation);-;This game is very fun and open and alot of things to do. The singleplayer is very amazing with the stunning graphics and visuals. The audio is somewhat clear, but I can understand people clearly in chat and I can hear gunshots and explosions from a long distances and it is very cool. The multiplayer side is amazing and playing from the combat simulation with others to the Altis Life RPG addon and to the epic zombie survival mod of DayZ to surviving and fighting in the world of Wasteland. Last but not least, the editor for Arma 3 is very good, but very advanced to understand right away, just get used to the basic things of editing until you can create large scale battles with the editor. This game is not for the regular FPS players, this game is way more intense in my opinion than Call of Duty or Battlefield. You actually have to plan and use tactics to get the job done and the maps are very large and you can't run forever. So at first it might be irritating for new players, but you will get used to it. Very fun military simulator and it is very addicting. This game is a thumbs up! :D 12/10
Will;-;Extreamly coordinated assaults. Actual military veterans play. Good .
Jgartner;-;This game is one of the best Military sandboxes i have ever played. You can fly a jet, drive a tank, and  things up. You can even fight in you underware!!! 10/10
ChrIs_C //Alphalete//;-;Ok first off HOLY CRAP this game is sweet. If you cant pay the normal 60 bucks wait till it goes for les( I got mine for 30 i think) I would call it a military simulation with a shooter twist. A great game thats lots of fun. You can be seriouse and treat it like its real life or just  around like i do most of the time and blow stuff up. If you liked Dayz in arma 2 there is breaking point wich i play and that is pretty good but can get a little frustrating. But over all 10/10 would buy again. Seriously if your PC can handle it get it.
captainhepp;-;This is a combat SIMULATION... NOT a FPS. With that in mind: This game focuses on war/combat as a complete package. As opposed to something like Battlefront (a classis FPS where you are shooting/fighting constantly), here you may never even fire a shot on a given mission. I personally fire very rarely. You will spend time in transit to/from multiple objectives. Sometimes this will be in a helicopter, sometimes a truck, sometimes on foot. While there you may spend literally hours stalking/sneaking to avoid detection by groups of enemies that can kill you with a single shot. Yup. Just one. You can also drive a simply jaw-droppingly wide range of vehicles and equipment. You can pilot/ride in everything from fighter jets to tanks to cars top speed boats to even a mini submarine. The game is also extremely extensible, meaning that it is very easy to mod in almost any way you can imagine. While installing some larger mods may take some basic computer knowledge (find a folder, put a certain file in that folder, then specially edit another file, that sort of thing), many addons are as simple as visiting the Steam Workshop *in-game* and subscribing to new content. Everything else is automatic from there. Who will like it: People who like depth and details. You like to plan every aspect of your approach to get the best possible advantage. You like working together with other players (many missions are co-op against a deadly AI). Who should pass this up: People who like constant, violent action. While there are definitely times when you seem to be constantly embattled, this doesn't happen very often.
Hoo-Dini;-;The game is amazing, it brings out all of our good aspects. Teamwork, Co-ordination, Patience and gives us hours of entertainment. You can play a custom mission by yourself or with your friends, you can even play with people from across the world and make new friends. I would highly recommend buying this game if you haven't already got it.
[XG]DeathAngel;-;Realy good game who ever dosent have this game i recomend it to you , you will have so much fun
Cheese Bread;-;this actually needs strategy instead of running around the map with ur barrett 10/10
King Beans;-;I tricked a 12 year old cop and stole his cop car. 11/10
prpchsr105;-;I have to admit I was hating this game in the beginning. I couldn't understand why I kept dying. I couldn't get the controls down and everything felt WAY to complicated. Then a few weeks ago I decided to sit down and learn the game. As other reviewers stated this game is not Call of Duty or Battlefield. You have to be patient. You have to learn the weapons and vehicles. This game is worth every penny as long as you invest a few days to learn the controls. Add in Steam Workshop and other mods (Breaking Point is my favorite) and you have a fantastic war simulator.
Snark;-;ARMA II was one of my favorite games (and it still is) but ARMA III is just in a testing (Alpha) version and they upgraded everything which was bad in ARMA II (better physics, ragdolls, animations... and they even added cool new things, such as weapon modifications, uniforms, first aid kits and underwater life) the only bad things are bad optimization and the funny animations when you're climbing a ladder (I don't know why they left that in there unchanged, it was funny as hell back in ARMA II). There are some mods for it already and the game doesn't have even a month, so the modding community will be big, like it was for ARMA II I think. There's even a sandbox zombie mod! :D I really love the graphics, this is the most photorealistic game you can get (Crysis 3 has unrealistic lights). Audio effects are cool too, but not as cool as in Battlefield 3 for example. Gameplay is almost the same as in ARMA II, but there are some new things like your character's stances. I was messing with the editor for like 5 hours in a row and I did some interesting things. The editor has a new look, but works exactly like in the previous game. I think ARMA III will be ever more successful than it's predecessor and I'm proud of our Czech brothers for such an amazing game. My recension will change with the upcoming Beta version. Overall: 10/10
Tyvaros;-;Arma three fits into the modern FPS category very poorly, its not a bad game its just not CoD, a better category would be TFPS, Tactical First Person Shooter, cause thats what it is, its also a very fun and challenging game.
[GWJ] ebarstad;-;I loved (still love) Arma 2: CO and Arma 3 is a brilliant successor. They've added a lot of polish to the game, made movement feel much smoother, and really improved the graphics. With Steam Workshop, new content for the game is just a click away and there are some excellent user-made missions out there. Moreover, there are a ton of mods available which can change various aspects of the game. I've put more than 400 hours into Arma 3 playing and creating missions and that's just in single-player. I can't recommend the game enough to anyone who likes realistic, open-world shooters. It'll be installed on my PC for a long, long time.
Firmament;-;Great gameplay, great visuals, sounds, and the two new islands are frankly wonderful and huge. In my opinion the most noticeable improvement since Arma 2 is that we are now evolving into some realistic and visually credible open world, as opposed to the narrow places kinda looking like more or less similar "checkpoints" in previous games. The gameplay adjusts extremely well to the new terrains, making Arma 3 something closer to an actual simulation than "just" an advanced FPS with "milsim" elements into it. However, it is impossible to talk honestly about Arma 3 without telling what hurts most: the lack of vehicles (planes notably, but not only), the lack of weapons and few annoying Ai pathfinding issues (sometimes even on places where all should normally go well). That being said, I personally can see an insanely great potential behind Arma 3, and the way it will continue to evolve will in my opinion probably make it simply one of the best game ever created. All it needs is some more time to grow up.
ISTE MUA;-;Definitely the best military combat simulator to date ! Simply a TRUE simulation of combat. The Pros: -Complete combat simulation(Physics taken in account at every bullet,Very realistic movement system and an extremely realistic commanding system) -Mission/Scenario Editor:Make every imaginary scenario real in the huge sandbox that is ARMA III,Which means that you get all the tools and the ability to make missions by yourself and play them afterwards.Is it pitting 100 jets of BLUFOR(friends) against 100 jets of OPFOR(enemies) and watching them fight it out as a civilian caught in crossfire or right in the action as a soldier,Or just spawning a vehicle and exploring the huge sandbox ? Yeah you can do anything ! -Huge sandbox..and when i say huge i mean HUGE.Extreme probably one of the biggest in gaming. -Steam Workshop !!! Simply the ability to upload your realistic or crazy missions online for others to share,or download masterpieces by scenario "artists" of ARMA -Mature,realistic and engaging multiplayer ! No whiny 10 year olds.This is the real deal.An engaged community with a lot of experience in the game and well-built servers The Cons: -Very heavy for your system ! Even with a high end system it will still flinch a bit on very high settings.It's the price you pay for the huge sandbox.But it's worth it ! -Lack of content at the moment.Yes at the moment you are given the huge sandbox but barely half of the stuff you had in ARMA II to play around.This involves player models,guns,vehicles etc.Though as the game goes on the developers add content periodically so no worries,though do not expect it fast.Patience over all ! -It's a hard game to get into and it targets certain audiences.What do i mean ? Well the game is overall complex so if you're looking for a game to quickly jump into ARMA III (or any ARMA in this context) is not suitable.It requires enough of your time.Next if you're looking for an alternative to games like battlefield,COD etc.You're looking at the wrong game,this is not your generic FPS this is a Military Simulation. -----Verdict|| At the moment my rating is 8/10,a good game but feels prematurely released with the lack of content ! Also not for the generic user/gamer,and not for the owner of a mediocre or weak pc.
Stevve;-;Improves a lot from the previous games, but lacks certain key improvements to really set it apart from ARMA 2, like a redesigned "AddAction System", and multiplayer performance. Still a great game in its modding infancy. In a few months there will be some great addons.
Copenhagen;-;Realistic warfare to a whole different scale is Arma's specialty, giving players the unique experience to play simulated firefights between either PvP, or PvE. For the most part, Arma 3 has a good community. Most people communicate with their teams to lead them into cities, complete objectives, or simply talking to a pilot to let them know where to drop you off. I do not recommend trying to play as a CoD player in this, trying to use a sniper in a city, or trying to quickscope. You'd probably die really fast. Anyway, there were only some problems with Arma 3, such as minor bugs (that are not that noticible; rare), or major bugs that haven't been fixed yet. Also, some players seem to take this game a little too seriously. I've seen many players who haven't played the Arma series and wanting to try to use vehicles for the first time. Some players don't allow them as (obviously, being a beginner) they're not good, or wasting precious vehicles that could have been useful. Overall, it's a great game, but don't take it too seriously and just remember it's a game, not real life. Graphics: 9.8/10 Sound: 8.5/10 Gameplay: 9.7/10 Community: 7.5/10 Overall: 8.9/10
Agares Tretiak;-;This is -the- tactical shooter. If you're tired of the often trite and rediculous "military" shooters out there, and want a more realistic simulation of military endevour, give this game a try. Not for the faint of heart or the incautious, it's by far the best military FPS experience I've had to date. That is not to say it isn't without it's faults or problems (touch on those in later on) but the overall experience, the sense of scale, and the frankly, the amount of fun I've had in this game are what make this game my go-to for tactical combat. PROs - Scale of the environment; you're not going to find anything remotely like this in scale, save possibly in WWII Online, which is comparitively more dated than this. The enviornments are huge, even on Stratis it takes considerable time to simply walk from one location to another. Both maps offer a good variety of cover, concealment, and terrain to fight in, from forested hills and mountains to underwater stealthy goodness. - Realism; What I mean by this is that the game provides fairly realistic expectations on human limitations, such as the amount and types of gear one can carry, fatigue, and the surprising turns of fragility and endurance of the human body. Marksmanship is important and vigilance is key in firefights. It's easy for the unwary to lose track of a target if you don't keep your eyes peeled and your rifle ready, creating a sense of tension in combat unlike most any other I've experienced. There are swells and lulls to it that speak to an environment that lends itself to a more realistic combat experience. - It's pretty; While not the top tier of graphics, this is certainly an accessible and sometimes stunning gaming experience. It takes a poet to describe the sweeping vistas that reveal themselves at the oddest moments. With your intense focus on the environment around you, you can be trekking to an objective location in multiplayer with some friends, and crest a hill to see a marvellous Mediterranean sunset over a quiet sea-side village. And there's a poignancy when that serenity is broken by an artillery barrage from the forward observer on the opposite hill. The character models can be customised in a way previous titles of this series could not, giving voice to the inner tactical fashionista (really, sometimes dressing in all-black gear just feels -good-). - Modding support; Mod support for this game is building slowly but surely, and for a few of my gripes in the CONs section, there are mods that help alleviate the suffering somewhat. As a niether here nor there sort of observation: The game interface is much improved over previous versions of the game, especially the inventory system, which is a marvelous improvement compared to the frustration generated from the previous title. However, it's not perfect, and especially the contextual menu needs some major tweaking and re-examination by BI. CONs - Optimization; the game could do with some. Settings I can use on most games with comprable graphics simply do not hold up in ArmA III, but it's rarely crippling. I still wish it'd be less of a struggle to have settings on a level that makes the game as pretty as it is, without a lagging frame rate. - Lack of choice; this applies more to gear and weapons, than anything. While the stable of available gear for use has been increasing gradually since the Alpha Supporter edition, there's still a surprisingly low number of choices for small arms and vehicles in particular. I'm hoping that the Campaign extensions will also continue to provide more variety to the in-game gear I have to choose from. - Dinky guns; It's a bit of a pet peeve, I'll admit, that some of the weapons feel weirdly underpowered in this. Perhaps its simply because I'm less used to using them, but a few weapons take more than half a magazine at short range to bring down relatively lightly armored foes with well placed shots. I'm looking at you, SMGs and 5.56 weapons.
Hyphen;-;Very realistic game. Spot on combat, vehicular, and weapon mechanics. My complaint only complaint can only be related to possible crappy servers I have got on or my own ADD...but either way, sometimes it feels like gameplay can drag on without anything happening for an overwhelmingly extended period of time. Overall, 8/10 in my mind. If you are super into realism in war games, definite 10/10.
ll koolaid;-;10 Kart DLC advertisements out of 10.
Raspupin;-;Saw a War Movie went to play ARMA,Saw anything related to combat or warfare went to play ARMA ;) One of the most addicting Games and Military Simulation i ever Played! Endless mods packs,maps,mission and game modes! You can just can do there almost anything that refers to war and military simulation and even more than that,Starting from making missions in the editor and playing with friend,playing on public server or even joining a clan that suits you,joining a PVP server as king of the hill,free for all or just any other pvp modes also if you feel for some role play there is also some from that as well!! As i said game of endless contact that keeps expanding and getting new thing while thats being created only by the community there are also the devs that are keep updating and making the game better. As you can see i Realy recommend buying this game,worth it! :)
Rabassa;-;I have to say, haven't played much, but i would recomend this game to everyone, you have to see the huge amount of things that this game offers to you, it's beautifull.
Slatemiester;-;10/10 great game, would do again -IGN
Prof.Gubbins;-;Got Arrested for standing still for too long. And got kidnapped 6 times in one hour.
Johnny Karate;-;The multiplayer in this game is amazing you can do almost anything. Could use a bigger variety of guns.
Chris;-;Feels just like call of duty
Jackal560;-;No other game offers such vast ammount of customization and replayability. So many mods to download to make the game even bigger than ever. Get some friends and have a blast.
Samuel[UK];-;Really fun and the multiplayer is really really fun altis life on some servers lots of mods to use and addons
UltraShLookLook;-;Great game and great community content provided us with an awesome experience. KEEP IT GOING BI!!
Webgamerz100;-;absolutly amazing game!
SlayerGaming_;-;Arma 3 is a good game and all that stuff but it the most glitchy and laggy gameplay in any game. one of the glitches is not getting into a vehicle but nonstop searching it for weapons so i had to give up a helicopter for that glitch. unless if you want to be realy mad at how you die in about 2 shots and have to giveup vehicles do to glitches thats fine but im sure nobody wants to die in 2 shots and loose about a hour of work getting guns then dieing from thirst or teamkillers / hackers.
legendkiller152;-;great game
Rule;-;I highly recommend Arma 3 if you're into Army games with a (high) sense of realism. You can make this game as awesome as you want yourself. Depending on which (modded) gamemodes you play or with who you're playing. I'm part of one of the largest Arma 3 clans out there (Joint Task Force 2) and it really adds to the experience, having a Tactical Realism based clan. Think of stuff like Basic Training, military rank structure, working with a chain of command, teamplay based on military tactics and manoeuvers etc. check us out over at www.jointtaskforce2.com
Commissar Leminski;-;Highly polished Arma II with future weapons, new shooting stances, and vast detailed maps. Like its predecessor the Mod community makes for a highly customizable game experience now backed by STEAM WORKSHOP. WARNING: Some dedicated fan boys of the ARMA Franchise would claim this is a very smooth game, I feel while smoother than ARMA II it's still a far cry from being "entirely" smoothed out. The most popular game mode seems to be "Wasteland" which is DayZ with out zombies. As you can imagine new players often get camped and ed prior to even finding a weapon. Supposedely you can port ARMA II objects into ARMA III, I have not tested this yet, but that proves to be some what promising for custom map design.
Smersh;-;This is war
EODFudala;-;Great game, if you are interested in having a Dayz like experience I would recommend downloading the Breaking Point mod.
Swiggity Swooty;-;Pretty chilled brah.
Hammer_RLG;-;Excellent sandbox simulation, but unlike others I will not say it is a total military simulation. vehicles and aircraft and their controls, pathfinding, etc. need vast improvement for this to even be considered a survey sim. however, ARMA 3 is an excellent infantry simulator and the vehicles and aircraft used as a supporting cast are sufficient. thrown in the community mods, game modes, and missions and nothing can beat ARMA 3. i just wish the grass was not so cheesy looking when you crawl though it, and the graphics were a bit more cinematic. i guess one cannot have everything.
Bers;-;Best from BIS 10/10, now just wait for ACE2 10/10
AL.AN. ^KonvictGaming.com;-;Good graphics,improved gameplay. An oveerall improved experience !
Protuhge;-;Great
eek!;-;Best shooter since, well, arma2. Make sure you try its wasteland mod, specifically sa-matras wasteland. the only legit version of it. Arguably arma2's version of wasteland is better, but arma3 is the future. pros: realism cons: not enough realism (sci fi elements)
AlphaWolF;-;The scale of this game is absolutely EPIC! And like nothing else Ive played. The game engine is a great improvement over Arma 2 and looks every bit as good as Battlefield 3 & 4 graphics but where this game really shines is its Modding support! Online mods like the day z and wasteland mods are such great fun and there are moments where youre creeping through the woods or in valleys in the dark at night and you just feel this uneasy tension that you never know whose sights you could be in. I was a long-time fan of the Battelfield series but the DLC whoring has completely disenfranchised me from the series, it came to a point where any time I just wanted a quick game with friends I was forced to download stealth DLC that I was never going to purchase and it stealing valuable HDD space, therefore preventing me from playing at all even when 3 of us did have the latest patch, 3 of us couldnt play anything but vanilla due to the fact we all had different DLC. ARMA3 has been a breath of fresh air to me with loads of content available from the modding community I may even start modding this game myself because they have provided modding tools and actually support the modding community and listen to their concerns and address things that need fixing, Unlike other (we know better and are not interested game companies ) I cant wait to see what awesome mods will come in the next few months.
jando;-;You either die a good soldier or you live long enough to see yourself become a hater. There are 2 ways in this game the first hours, you hate right away or love it all the way.
smooth buddy;-;this game took away all my downstairs hair
Not Nice Minh;-;Good game. It's not worth 60 bucks. Game is glitchy and still needs lots of works. Feels like a Alpha/beta game.
TheRealCharlie;-;grate game fun game modes and very enjoyable with friends
PeeToo50;-;The engine man! get it now!
Harmless;-;Epic war simulator. Beautiful attention to detail. Definantly recommend this game to anyone to try.
Jebediah Kerman;-;Probably my current favorite FPS. It's the definition of military sandbox. Be warned however, this isn't an easy game, and you will die, a lot.
enc0ded.enable;-;Arma 3 the worst game of the series.
Taylor Swift <3;-;its like an army simulation its so real ! it might laggy at somme points but still a good game
Oleered;-;ing Epic Game! endless possibilities!
jamies;-;best game to ever be created especially if you have the kart dlc :D 9.333333333333/10 half life 3 confirmed?
Shiftas;-;Its pretty good game.
Kyle_Lucian;-;This game is amazing, I have been playing Bohemia Interactive games since Operation Flashpoint Cold War Crisis. I have never had an issue with online play however until yesterday. I got a Global Ban for an unknown reason as I have never downloaded any kind of preformance tools, hacks, scrips or anything that could alter game play in any way. I have never had an issue being banned until yesterday. I emailed battleye and got an auto responce saying buy another game or suck up being banned. That is unprofessional and unacceptable. If this issue is not resolved promptly I will NEVER buy another Bohemia Interactive game. The money is not the problem here I have more then enough money to invest in the game all over again, but I simply refuse to pay for a game twice. This is especally wrong when I did nothing wrong. I hate cheaters in game as much as any one. Hackers/Cheaters ruin the fabric of the game and make it no fun to play, but banning people with out any kind of investigation is not the answer. I hate criminals more, but when some one is arrested for commiting a crime they are at least given a chance to challenge such an offense. At this stage I do not recomend ARMA 3 or any Bohemia Interactive game to anyone. The fact that they do business with Battleye and support the product developed by Bastian Suter, with out any type of customer support is unacceptible. I hope either the issue is resolved, or BI finds another anti cheat engine with a better customer support channel. I have sent multiple "test emails" to battleye after getting what felt like an automated response back. No matter what I put in the emails it said the EXACT SAME MESSAGE. This is so frustrating that I wish there was a way to take legal action against the company. Never in my life have I been so frustrated by a company and their product. I am editing my post to add a little information. I have recently contacted a lawyer whom I am close friends with, as I do not want to make sure I am not wrong on this matter. He has recomended me to do the following. File A Claim on econsumer.gov File A Claim on https://www.bbb.org File A complaint at www.ripoffreport.com Contact Steam and inform them of the situation, and that I will be disputing the transaction with my credit card company. Contact Bank / Credit Card Company and dispute the charge. (Anyone else having the same issue as me, I strongly suggest doing the same.) ---- I did not pay $65.00 to be banned from 90 to 95% of the servers. This will not stand legaly, as the customer support at BI and BE are useless. This is a HUGE problem with this game. I have talked with over 35 people who have confirmed to have the same problem as me. Two of them have video of them being blocked for nothing one got blocked with in 72 hours of owning a second copy of the game the other was blocked with in 3. He literally recorded buying the game, installing the game, playing the game, and being banned from the game. I will never buy another product from BI, and would not advise anyone else to either.
CyplexGamer;-;It's a really fun game i spend to much time playing it
Mana Break;-;Crazy Developer:"What about making an open world based simulation shooter with good graphics, many weapons and really interesting vehicles? But since it has to be something special, so lets set in the the future and maybe add something like... like DIVING and flying JETs, and using UAVs and using Artillery tanks and much more. But since 300h playtime is not enough for us, lets add FULL MOD COMPATIBILITY AND a built in editor." Programmers:"YES LETS DO THIS!" And well. This is Arma 3. A mod compatible first person shooter set in the future with an open world and MANY ways to solve a (multiplayer) mission: Diving? No Problem. Sniping? No Problem. Driving in full-ham using tanks? No Problem. In other words. Arma 3 is a sandbox. A shooter-sandbox. You like zombie games? Just download and play the breaking point mod. You like RPG (with soldiers, civilians and even Suicide bombers? Then join an RPG server. You like the vanilla gameplay of tactical shooters? Join a vanilla server. You'ld like some modded gameplay with lets say 20, 30, well no >50 modded weapons? THEN GO AHEAD, DOWNLOAD MODS AND JOIN A SERVER USING THE SAME MODS! But there is one thing which may turn down some "xXxCoD-Fanboyz". The realism. You got shot in the lag? OH, YOU WONT BE ABLE TO RUN THAT LONG ANYMORE. But realism doesnt mean that the game is impossibly hard. It just means that you have to play as a Team while using tactics. The main problem of the whole game is the optimization. While PvP-only servers work pretty well on my "normal" PC with about 30-40 frames, servers having many AI's will make every PC die. The frames will drop to 10-20, even if you dont see the many AI Soldiers running around. Still go ahead and buy this game. Every Teamplayer who got bored from Battlefield of Duty: Medal of modern warfare and 08/15  will enjoy this game :)
GanjaGunGorilla;-;Great game. Would be great with more weapons and a useable bipod. Controller support is great; just a few button maps don't seem to work. Awesome game overall. 9/10 would eat.
Enchanted-Bambi;-;yea if price goes sown
Diehardx95;-;ing Love playing this game. need to be worked on some more but great game and modding community.
V3 <On vacation>;-;8/10 There is so much content to enjoy in Arma 3-from cooperative missions to battle royale to wasteland. I guarantee you'll be spending hours playing through it all. The experience becomes even better if you have friends to play with. Even though the single player isn't very enjoyable, it's a huge leap from that of Arma 2. If you can catch Arma 3 on sale, I definitely recommend you buy it.
CoolBeans2498;-;I enjoyed playing this game on the free weekend, but I don't think this game is worth $60. By now it should have dropped a little and Arma II should be free buy now.
Ultras FC Porto;-;Amazing graphics and amazing sound quality! It is a heavy game but most gaming PC's can run this easily! Battle royale for life!
Smittyrb;-;yeah its pretty cool i guess
Chipmunk333;-;This game is fricking amazing its got HD textures and the driving and shooting is well thought out and that just makes this a whole lot better. There is nothing I dislike in the game
AndyH;-;Disappointing on several levels. Essentially you're paying $60+ for an engine that mods run off. The mods that currently exist are pretty underwhelming, and aren't made by the studio. They have universally low production value, and there are only a couple that are played. The insulting part is the engine isnt even good. It's pretty slow no matter what settings it's on, and this is with pretty decent hardware. Maybe if you can get this game on super sale it would be worth it, but the amount of content in this game in NO way justifies the price
David [AG];-;Arma 3: is a good game but has it's bugs but over all and rilly good game
10Luk;-;this compact model sedan has great interior crocodile aligator leather seats and nice city mpg. Beats the subway by a long shot 2/10
samooja;-;I couldn't get fps to playable level in multiplayer and I have new 1000e desktop pc. Fps below 20 with low settings wtf?
KanekiwOw;-;cool
Tismo;-;I regret buying this game. It reminds me of the sensation you get after stepping in wet puppy  while walking to the bathroom in the morning.
Obama Land;-;So epic I want it so bad
fidel-2castro;-;,          ,     Steam           .     600
wake me up inside;-;game is really fun. its not some game like CoD where you can run and gun. no this game needs tactics and good team communication. the graphics are also amazing 9999/10 - IGN
Lambparade;-;Back In Highschool I ran Track. This one kid...lets call him "Ray" was overweight and very slow. Near the end of my highschool experience he got stronger and thinner...but at the end of the day he was still slow..Way to slow he just ran slow...he wasn't ment to run. This game has little content. FPS problems will occur on most high populated servers...sometimes regardless of hardware. Not worth 60 bones.
Uptown funk;-;Broken from the start. Horrible gunplay, often crashes, laggy  multiplayer. The action menu alone is reason enough to not reccomend this game
KoKo;-;Very, very, vey badly optimize for multiplayer. I can have 50 fps in solo (High) ! In multiplayer.... im having not even 20 fps.... In solo the gameplay is very very boring. The graphics are amazing. But just at High and ULTRA. The control is the same as Arma 2, a little more intuitive and fluid. In general the game is nice, but you get bored esealy. Need new content, new weapons, AND SOME MORE ING OPTIMIZATIONS ! GOD DAMN !!! 6.8 / 10
Khomrade;-;Worst controls in a game ever... Really want to like this game, but it's hard to enjoy without spending hours learning their painfully unintuitive controls
The Wampire!;-;This isn't a bad game, but it's not worth the price, and it's mostly a template for mods, and set in the future. If you want a true military experience, i would strongly reccomend arma 2 co, its worth the price, not this template.
Neurojazz;-;The engine looks nice, but based on the older operation flashpoint engine still. Entering houses feels 'iffy' and like walking around on honey - god forbid going prone in one... it's like the house knows judo.
dday002;-;got one word for y'll "epic"
Iggy Azalea;-;I TYME PURCHASE!
marciN;-;God, I want this game so bad.
DeadRex#;-;Really cool game, nice graphics and fun gamemodes!
-Twitch.tv/WubstahVIP;-;Very good game. If you have played the Arma series before then you will know what you are in for. Lots of Mods and Missions to play online with friends. Also runs smooth on both my PC & Laptop.
AHGetToDaChoppa;-;With all the different multiplayer modes and missions, plus custom made scenario missions from the workshop, this game never get's old. It is a great game for hardcore players. The game is gorgeous. Especially at night. I paid full price for this game and never regretted it. If you see it on sale, it is a must have for military fps fans.
Toucinho do Cu;-;Good game with great mod's
Xplosv;-;This game is amazing!
Zunken;-;very good i think yes :)
Puffin99;-;I recommend this game, to all the FPS/SIM players!
Klg26;-;This is the best military simulator available, with its superb graphics and it's wide range of features highly recommend it to anyone who enjoys realistic gameplay.
SiThSpAwN;-;I laughed, I cried, I shot people in the face....
kittydecat;-;This game is nice, I like vac, I like vac bans. I  yo sister in bed, she number 1 prostitue in kazakhstan!
Jengels;-;Ater around 150 hours of playing this game I firmly say it is worth the money.
Lt. Gen. Nathan Bedford Forrest;-;Amazing army simulator that's more than just "DayZ." Buy this game if you want a more realistic experience than "Call of Duty" or "Battlefield."
Can't Find My Keyboard;-;u shuut guns and fly helicopters wich is fun bt hard i giv this gaim 10/10
ajchili;-;ing Great
Shin Sekai No Kami Da;-;I really like this game it is so fun the editor mode is really fun to play around with making your own scenerios or just having a massive war for the hell of it so to the creators I say Arigato!
Gorilla Presidente;-;One of the best value games on Steam, both in terms of its sheer scope and and its unvarying ability to meet its lofty goals. Truly a modern game.
UNSC_Marine1;-;<O>_<O> get it or ill eat your puppy....
dday002;-;got one word for y'll "epic"
Ciradis;-;this game costs too much but it's pretty sweet
Iggy Azalea;-;I TYME PURCHASE!
AtomicPalourde;-;Arma for life
Pringlesduhh;-;arma 3 is buggy but very fun with friends scenarios great every thing is beautiful couldnt reccomend it any higher
Giant PvPnis;-;Its so real its almost like am actually playing a video game.
CrazySteeve;-;This game is one of the best simulators I have ever played. It contains many improvements to the engine, graphics, and controls since ARMA 2. This game has been made better by the steam workshop to host a ton of downloadable senarios. I would recommend you play this game with friends, or some sort of community. Some negatives of this game, is its performance, I requires a powerful computer to play, even then there is some sort of performace drop. Also there was a lack of single player content, but there is now some being released. Im looking forward to the future of this game as it gains popularity, and plus with all the cool expansions ARMA 2 had, there will probably be new content in the future. One more thing is that there is a huge difficulty spike because its a simulator. This is no call of duty or battle field, and requires alot of time to get used to. If you never had any experience with ARMA games and you are not shure if you should get ARMA 3, buy ARMA 2 + OA, it has been on sale recently for really cheap.
Kanzy;-;Best Shooter I have ever played, its not like other FPS games, Less arcade style and leans more towards realism but aside from that, the World of ArmA is just simple amazing and beautiful, very well made terrain and cities/towns, you can lose your self just wandering around.
Hrjmansson;-;-;Bad optimisation in the engine leads to FPS lag, meaning you need a pretty insane rig to run it, even tho you shouldnt have to. Has A LOT LESS content than previous Arma versions (Not counting community ofc). I enjoy the game, but the FPS issues (which cant be fixed because they have to re-design the engine) and the lack of conent makes it stale quite quickly. Edit: Due to some incredible community members, some missions are now actually playable. Wasteland by Sa-matra is very stable, as are some Altis life servers. System: i5 2500k @ 4,2ghz 16Gb RAM @ 1600Mhz GTX 660Ti OC'd With this, I get around 20-60FPS wether It's on low or ultra, it still runs the same.
romkabobr;-;Bought the game excited to play it. Didnt start up. tried different ways to start up, then without steam, still didnt start up. Looked to get some help, did the -nobenchmark tip. The game started. Played a couple hours, Got off went to bed. Got up, tried to run the game, doesnt start up again. Even with the -nobenchmark, and different combonations of starting the game.
Navihawk;-;If you expect to run this game at good framerates on nvidia cards, it is more than likely you will be tweaking the settings to almost nothing before getting at least 30FPS in campaign matches!
Elas;-;I really want to like this game, but I cant. The games mechanics, graphics and the characters competency with his rifle is too far below the average shooter for me to enjoy. I find myself yelling at the game to just hold the gun still enough to shoot and find out where my impacts are. The character can not hold his rifle still, to save his life. Ive seen 90 pound women hold them better than the player's character. He feels totally unsupported, like he is floating in the air, even when laying on the ground. I'm fighting the character's complete lack of ability to hold the rifle still constantly. Any reasonably competent shooter can easily track a target from a prone position without needing to fight the rifle's weight to stay focused. The player never feels grounded. Zeroing feature is kinda cool if it made a difference. Ive shot a lot of rifles, and none of them behave like they should in this game. The game says that when shooting close, I should aim lower to compensate. The reverse is true in real life because of height of the sights over the bore of the barrel. If you imagine and draw out an arc, and you sight your rifle to the highest point on the arc, all other ranges besides the one you are calibrated at should be BELOW the highest point. This is of course excluding the fact that bullets don't travel in perfectly shaped arcs. A round could travel very straight and flat then gravity wins out and will drag the round to the ground very quickly before 200 yards, as is the case with the AK47. A rifle like the M16 will shoot a very flat arc to 300 yards and can even stay predictably flat enough to make accurate shots out to 600 yards without a problem. All of this feels like the game completely ignores or has wrong, so using a weapon system that uses a round I know well makes it difficult and frustrating when the rifle wont do what Im asking it to do. For a simulator that is bad, very bad. The game markets itself as a combat simulator, but I find myself fighting the controls so that much the whole "keep it simple stupid" philosophy of combat training sorta gets lost in having to press 3 buttons at once to make an accurate shot. Let alone assembling a drone and using it with any sort of practical use. I understand they want certain aspects of the game so a player feels like he actually has to do HIS job in whatever unit he is in, because everyone has their own roles to play in the war. However that isn't how the game plays. It would be one thing if the missions were objective based and if you are a drone pilot, your objectives in the campign would be different than say the medic, or support gunner. However your role changes from mission to mission, and sometimes even on the fly. This causes you to pause the game and read the field manual, so you don't crash the helicopter and get yourself killed, while in flight. Or sitting there like an idiot trying to figure out how to put a drone together so you can use it to spot a mortar team on the hillside. That complexity would be fine except if I only get a chance to play this game once a month or so, the the particulars of addressing the problem requires me to look them up again. So when I forget how to "switch to secondary sights on a rifle." It isnt a matter of pressing a button, but looking up which buttons to press in sequence. Hell I could have done that in real life with a simple twitch of the wrist, or adjusting my cheek weld. The game would play out smoother if you were to pick a class of soldier to play at the start of the campaign, and played missions with those roles, so you aren't finding yourself learning how to drive a tank when in the last mission you were on foot doing ground recon calling in air strikes. I get it, one hero wins the war on his own, but once again if you market it as a military simulator, I shoudlnt have to memorize and be profiecent at the entire game just to play the game, and do a complicted task maybe once or twice in the campagn. Pilots can play as pilots, officers can play as officers, and scouts can play as scouts. It also adds replay value playing the same missions from a different perspective, and learning a new job in the game. This game makes my eyes hurt. Im not sure what it is about it, but something about the lighting effects tends to cause me to have to stop and close my eyes for a few moments ever couple of minutes or so. The background blur is so bad I can't scan horizons and look for subtle out of place details of a sniper in the brush. Or look down a street without letting the game's blurry lighting effects to catch up with what Im trying to do, which is hunt the enemy. I thought maybe it was my graphics settings at first. No, its just how the engine is made. I'm not a fan of battlefield 4, but at least the game is clear, and I can predict ranges and bullet drop. Its no wonder Im squinting all the time, holding the gun up is often like looking down the reverse side of a telescope. Everything seems shrunk and distant, then "zooming" down your sights looks how it should have to start with. (especially bad with pistols.) All in all, I feel myself in the mood to play the game, only to find myself yelling at the screen for my guy shooting 15 rounds at a soldier standing upright and facing me presenting a perfect silhouette, and not hitting a damn thing because my rifle is floating in the air. If I survive that encounter I find myself looking up which actions to even look up in the field manual just to turn on FLIR in an APC, because I am now apparently a tank driver at night. Then I explode because the AI has to do none of this. So I go back and play something more satisfying like Xcom, or mechwarrior.
George Costanza;-;REVIEW FOR 'WIN' CAMPAIGN EPISODE This Campaign Episode was unfortunatly shorter than the rest, I finished it in 3 Hours and 24 Minutes. While throughout the short time you are presented with Interesting Scenarios and Action Sequences, These are overshadowed by Short Length and a Lackluster Ending. I guess we're waiting for ArmA 4 to continue this story. + Action Packed and Well Acted and Scripted + Update has Improved and Added Features - Unacceptably short length - Lackluster Ending
DIESEL;-;If your looking for a Good Mil Sim game then I suggest sticking with Arma2..Arma3 has seemed to have turned into a Role Playing game much like world of warcraft...mil sim servers are few and far between altis life dayz and the other role play aspects of arma3 have destroyed what the Arma series was meant to be..but I suppose BI needs to appeal to the masses. Its a well executed game..needs some tweaking but I am sure BI will update just as they did in Arma 2..just dont expect too much in the way of mil sim for what your going to pay for arma 3. Would I recommend this game? Depends..for someone who likes to role play like dayz and life games sure..but for anyone expecting what Arma 2 was..dont bother.
Slaughtahouse;-;Do not purchase. Overpriced, lacking content. Game wasn't fully finished after the beta ended. Avoid and stick to ARMA II
[RGC] Bogus;-;quite meh to be brutally honest
GrandadBen -A Naughty Fellow-;-;Rubbish game With great good graphics and an exciable ending to the story where meaty m8 blaze tryes to take over europe to save his family and enilate all minoritys. all in all i rate this 8/8 m8
Obama Land;-;So epic I want it so bad
fidel-2castro;-;,          ,     Steam           .     600
UNSC_Marine1;-;<O>_<O> get it or ill eat your puppy....
Deven;-;best first person shooter!!!!
LjubishaSRB;-;To be honest like all previous bohemia games Arma 3 is filled with all sorts of bugs and unfinished / half complete stuff , however there is something unique about this game , something special that keeps people playing this game .Graphics , gameplay, campaign are pretty good even though they could be allot better. Even though there are other military sim's that are not bad at all , Arma titles hold the very top . Why, you may ask ? Its because Arma 3 provides the user with the tools to create whatever he wants. You finished the campaign ? No problem , here are hundreds of user created missions for you that you can now play. You dont like the missions ? No problem , here is the editor in which you can make ur own missions. You dont like the Arma 3 Factions/Weapons/Vehicles /Visual FX/Sound/AI/Realism ? No problem , here , download the hundreds of mods available for free. You want to create ur own content ? Here are the modding tools , you can do / create whatever you want with them. And this is what makes Arma 3 special .I am sure bright future awaits this game If the devs listen to the community and the community stays loyal to this game.Recommended.
Shin Sekai No Kami Da;-;I really like this game it is so fun the editor mode is really fun to play around with making your own scenerios or just having a massive war for the hell of it so to the creators I say Arigato!
Eyuji (RIP Ana Moreno);-;One of the only game where i spent more time on the graphic settings for optimal 60fps and training in the tutorial than actually playing the game. Aside that the control are smoother than arma 2 and feels more optimized but the content is still lacking. It become a great game if one get invested in it, otherwise pass your way if you expect playing it like a regular FPS with WASD and left click, you'll become a machinist on your keyboard.
[MTTB] FaZe HordS;-;Arma 3: The game is good... still not as good as Arma 2 (IMO) more content in Arma 2 then what it is in Arma 3 but the modding community fixes that to like 100% adding more guns and armies. And now that Bohemia is adding Karts into the game.. after a "april" joke thing... and then adds it as a Pay DLC... sure the money goes to charity but why need some karts? When are the DLC's that acctualy are usefull... like in Arma 2 where DLC's added more armies and units Czech republic DLC and BRIT DLC? those where good DLC's now we get Sniper DLC Helicopter DLC Kart DLC Like what? But yea... the game is good overall even though the server browser is compleatly empty with servers... and sinse Zeus came out i though there was going to be TONS of servers running it but nah... not a single server is running it... So... use Zeus in SP Editor much better Do i recommend the game? YES 7/10 (No servers and  DLC's that have no use)
M.DePietro;-;Amazing game. If you're a fan of the other Arma games, you need this.
TOMMY TRIPOD;-;The fact that i can buy drugs and can ride a pink go-cart 10/10
[QF] DDonoven;-;Best damn thing EVER!
Jourjii;-;lol my computer couldn't even run this when it was free weekend ;v;
Yondas (   );-;oh soso good :3 This is one of the best games of forever :D 10/10 IGN "kinda good i guess"
Hud293;-;great game my friends need this game fun to play with a bunch of people
O2theMalley;-;Few games own the title of Miliatry/Combat Simulater, even fewer do it well, even less update them. Heres to BI, for delivering.
JustinBro;-;Although I havnt played it yet to me it looked like a very good game and since i have got money :I Im buying it :D
Evan Eisenfaust (Vacation);-;This game is very fun and open and alot of things to do. The singleplayer is very amazing with the stunning graphics and visuals. The audio is somewhat clear, but I can understand people clearly in chat and I can hear gunshots and explosions from a long distances and it is very cool. The multiplayer side is amazing and playing from the combat simulation with others to the Altis Life RPG addon and to the epic zombie survival mod of DayZ to surviving and fighting in the world of Wasteland. Last but not least, the editor for Arma 3 is very good, but very advanced to understand right away, just get used to the basic things of editing until you can create large scale battles with the editor. This game is not for the regular FPS players, this game is way more intense in my opinion than Call of Duty or Battlefield. You actually have to plan and use tactics to get the job done and the maps are very large and you can't run forever. So at first it might be irritating for new players, but you will get used to it. Very fun military simulator and it is very addicting. This game is a thumbs up! :D 12/10
Will;-;Extreamly coordinated assaults. Actual military veterans play. Good .
Jgartner;-;This game is one of the best Military sandboxes i have ever played. You can fly a jet, drive a tank, and  things up. You can even fight in you underware!!! 10/10
mattr;-;Excellent game, I would highly recommend.
Laserman;-;The graphics are awsome, the weapons sound are excellent, and the singleplayer missions are excellent
Guitarpro1992;-;Great game
minikane;-;If you like open word shooters this game is EPIC! best to get with friends
Yuet;-;Great game for realism, even more so if you have patience and friends to play with
kittydecat;-;This game is nice, I like vac, I like vac bans. I  yo sister in bed, she number 1 prostitue in kazakhstan!
Jengels;-;Ater around 150 hours of playing this game I firmly say it is worth the money.
Icchan;-;Best consumer grade military simulation money can buy.
xXcAzBrOxX;-;this game is the best if you get it you will love so much
Silentghost2001;-;I wanted to love arma 3. so very much. Its the military game i had been thinking about in my head for years upon years. open world. freedom. huge battles, huge armies tearing each other to bits as you either control a tank, chopper oir take part in an infantry skirmish. However thats exatcly what arma 3 fails to deliver! The shooting mechanics are fine, as the ballistics. The sound it complete trash, the guns sounds absolutly awfull. It will certainly be worth your time downloading the sound mod for these, made by some guy in his bedroom it completly trounces the vannilla sounds of arma 3 in every respect. Adding a much needed realism in that department (Bohemia please hire this guy) But back to the crux of what is wrong with arma 3. I realise this game is in beta still, and the main game campaign is unfinished. WHERE IS THE WAR!? every mission in arma 3 be it a user created scenario or the main campaign. Each mission is just a skirmish, a tiny bunch of AI controlled bots versus you and your squad. It lacks impact. it lacks excitment. At no point playing arma 3 was i immersed in what appeared to be a realistic military conflict. Now, this is 2014...planetside 2 an online multilayer game manages to have 2000 players on one map in an incredible seesaw conflict for control of the map...ITS A FREE TO PLAY GAME...why does arma 3 not manage this even in an AI controlled sp warzone? let alone a multiplayer arena. Is it engine limitations? WHY DOES ARMA 3 NOT HAVE A WARZONE MODE alongside its campaign and multiplayer. All i want to be is plonked down in a huge island wide conflict. able to choose one of many mission objectives and actually feel involved it something organic and dynamic! There are a few user created missions that attempt to create this but they fall short, something about this game makes it unable to run a huge conflict without causing serious serious clientside lag. Now ill mention the multiplayer...what a joke...its so laggy as to be unplayable. I dont know why either. There is something seriously wrong either with the servers, or there is something wrong with the way stuff is optimised and implemented in this game. Please note arma 3 has been released for a very long time now, ok yes its not full release. BUT MY GOD PLEASE FIX THE MULTIPLAYER BOHEMIA it makes your company look rediculous. dayz SA is in alpha and it manages to run 1000% better multiplayer arenas. Now my last qualm is the price. 60 dollars for something that has an unplayble mulitplayer and an unfinished single player????? HOLY @$%! My advice is very sadly. do not buy this game until full release :( and even then make sure it works properly or you may be wasting your money
JabbaTheSlut;-;Did two drug runs. Bought a gun, took two people hostage. Made them phone the police. Killed two police officers. I was then tazed and arrested, then put in jail. Someguy flew in with a helicopet and broke me out. 11/10.
N3cro;-;Battlefield finally has moar realistic ttk and weapons and gear, oh wait its arma without movement like having a stick in the .
Diti;-;Being a war simulation game (in comparison, Battlefield is an arcade game), the community is very mature and respectful. Besides, if you are a programmer, you can do A LOT with this game.
TI | Samsa;-;If you get bored of all those CoD/BF clones out there, try something "new" and more real. In Arma 3 one bullet can be your end, at "full health". How it should be. It has far better emersion than any CoD, BF or CS game ever had.
ubereme;-;Great Game!!! a more Adult Battlefield 4. Good Graphics and the Best Modz Ever!
Dogma;-;This game is epic, if you're a Battlefield or COD troll then I suggest you move on to something like SiMS. Don't waste your time on campaign mode, get yourself onto multiple player, find a clan, get on TS, and trust me you wont look back. See you on the battlefield es
Chemvo [ivo4life];-;INVALED SCREEN HELP ME PLS.
Spiidy;-;Really good
Fetty AWP;-;Game has amazing graphics. That is all I need to say.
yeahd00dshaun;-;I built my PC so I could play this game. This is the only reason I spent over 500 dollars on a computer. This is such an underrated game. Although this isn't a game for casual gamers. Only the hardcore gamers will enjoy Arma 3. It is by far the best shooter I've played. I will be purchasing any DLC for it on the day of the realease.
Harbinger;-;A good follow up to Arma 2. With updated graphics and smoother movements, certainly one of my favourite milltary shooterrs out there. However, I am missing the familiarity of guns that Arma 2 had with it's massive assortments of weapons and vehicles. Would definitely like to see more added on to the game on that respect. AI are more intelligent. Maybe too intelligent. However, with great game types like wasteland and an integrated steam workshop, it certainly delivers. Mods may also add on to the game the same way dayz and ACE did for ARMA 2.
[GOTR] OldGregMangina;-;Call of Duty's more educated and respectable older cousin. An FPS for the thinking man who appreciates the real life brutal realities of combat. This game doesn't grab your hand and guide you to its breast, this game makes you work for your entertainment. Treat this game right, take the time to understand its nuances, and never underestimate it's bite, and you'll have a much more rewarding experience than you can achieve with most FPS games. When a mission is carried out via your own strategic wit and whim, and hours are spent infiltrating and avoiding enemy patrols so that you can make it to that perfect firing position for your sniper, it really makes that one shot a lot more heart pounding than any round fired in any other military shooter. If you have ADHD, watch wrestling, appeared on Jerry Springer, think Call of Duty is a good game, and/or are the offspring of two genetically similar parents, you will NOT enjoy this game.
[SATI] Z3ROGRAVITYGAMING2015;-;Hardcore military simulator plenty of mods maps and content.
Cthuluhoop on 1 vs 100;-;I NEED A BETTER COMPUTER BUY THIS GAME NOW
El D-Pay;-;at first i was like pew pew pew pew but now i'm like ... waiting... pew.
[NOVA] {S4D} Karma;-;ing Great. OMG xD
PV2 S.McClinton;-;I Love this game good Job who made it
Ramaloke;-;The vast amount of game modes will keep me entertained for hundreds of hours and I've only played two of them! Altis Life is fun and wasteland mode is some of the most intense FPS action I've ever played.
abkrivo;-;I would not say this game is worth buying at full price, but I can tell you that it's really fun nonetheless. There are a lot of bugs and it feels more like a retextured and updated Arma 2 but there are plenty of fun scenarios and multiplayer is very good. The game requires a really beefy computer to not run on  graphics so if you have a crappy computer and you don't want to see  graphics, then don't get this game. However, if you're up for an intense milsim, then get this game. Rate: 8/10
Extra Nuts;-;This is by far my favorite sandbox game. The base game itself is very good and the multiplayer is a ton of fun (though servers do need to be restarted like every 4 hours of the multiplayer lag gets out of hand). I would not reccomend this game if you have a lower end to mid end machine as this games graphics will destroy your machine. Buy this game.
Prime Melody;-;Arma 3. The Thrilling sequel to the Arma series. Featuring an entirely new set of environments, weapons, vehicles and voices, Arma 3 brings a unique gameplay experience bound with everything from Fps and Tps firefights to large scale battles on a grande scale. Unlike many shooters of its genre, Arma 3 features realistic bullet and damage characteristics: if you get shot in the arm weapon sway increases, if your vehicle takes hull damage you are more easily susceptible to bullet damage. Arma also brings futuristic weapons of modern warfare into the mix: the developement team did a good job of mixing modern weapons and giving them a unique futuristic twist. Arma 3 also brings an unlimited gameplay experience. With millions of different missions, each different from one another in the gameplay, the potential to create, play and enjoy missions is endless. Incredible for team building and communication building, Arma 3 gives everyone from recreational players to strict military based players to have an enjoyable and realistic experience.
CasualPickle;-;10/10 best game in a while haha just because...
ThatDudeAgain;-;Arma 3 is like its predecessors. When Bohemia launched it (I mean after Alpha and Beta Phase) it was still incomplete, lacking content (for example: I mean the biggest Island ever and only one Jet for a minor Fraction the AAF) and Bug riddled. So nothing changed, Behemia is still greedy and the community has to bring it arround. Wich it does! Missions Mods everything is comming from you guys! Thanks for that.
Septima Ratio;-;epic!!! everyone should own this game!!
Digitalcat;-;I mistaken a rock for a car. 11/10
GymShowers;-;Good game, you can do a lot in it.
Ash;-;Eat, Breathe and  Military life. Fantastic.
[RECON] gatlinggun1962;-;This game is Amazing but does have its moments online co-op like getting shot through walls. But this game is well worth the money even though its in alpha its has so much to offer for the engine platform it uses is amazing. the graphics are outstanding for multiplayer. over all I would give the game a 7 out of 10 on Campaign and a 10 out of 10 on Multiplayer just because the Campaign is kinda hard in the beginning of it the Multiplayer you have a good community of players on the coop. I just love it i will keep playing this game until Bohemia Interactive comes out with Arma 4 if they do it will be hard to top this game and the cooperation of other players. they just need to add more stuff but its still in alpha.
Alptraum;-;I'm not sure wether I should recommend it or not but it's enjoyable so I will. The game was released unfinished. There were close to nothing to do in the game because of the lack of content. There's 2 factions in BLUFOR I think, and one in OPFOR, one in Independent unless I'm mistaken. There's no weapon variation, there's like 2 weapons per faction if even. Only independent have jets and it's just one jet with another variant of it. The lack of content is what completely ruins this game. The combat, however, is very smooth (unless your FPS is on 20 which it usually is unless you have an absolutely extreme gaming computer), well-made and convenient. There's 9 stances you can take, high stand, normal stand, crouching stand, high crouch, normal crouch, low crouch, sitting (while firing), lying down and lying on the side. There's also a combat pace and a running pace which is great. In the combat pace, you run slower with your weapon up so you don't have to walk to fire like you did in ArmA 2. I love the game for it's mechanics which are much, much more smoother than ArmA 2 but I always play ArmA 2 more because of how incredibly much content there is for it. Especially with ACE. The graphics are awesome aswell. The lightning, the textures and effects are amazing but they'll most likely drop your FPS drastically. Not sure if it's due to bad optimization or if it's because the maps are so huge and detailed. Also, Altis, the main map of the game, I've noticed is very popular and everyone talks about how it's 270km2 or something like that, but travelling from one side of the map to the other is only 20km and takes like 2 minutes by chopper which was kind of dissapointing. It's still a great map though with alot of nice places and things to do. To summarize: This game is really well-made and cool but when it comes to content and features, ArmA 2 beats it by far.
Hefty;-;One of the best military sims out there. If you like immersion/sandbox, then you will love this.
Cordovan Splotch;-;I absolutely love Arma 3 and would in every way recommend it to anyone with even a passing interest. There are somewhat valid criticisms of it which I will get out of the way right away, before getting into why the pros by far outweigh the cons. 1. Lack of Content - One of the more popular criticisms of this game is the lack of official content in the current build, especially compared to the amount of content in Arma 2. The two main factions currently (at the time of writing this review) have no fixed wing aircraft, armoured vehicles of different factions have the same turrets and weapons merely reskinned (artillery, anti-air and remote controlled turrets on smaller vehicles) and UAVs/UGVs are identical for all factions except for different camo patterns. 2. Performance - Another often heard criticism of Arma 3 is that it performs very poorly on some machines that it often should perform well on. Like machines with top-end graphics cards and powerful CPUs. Addressing these points one by one, I will say that while there is content missing that even I would have expected the game to have at release, it isn't a whole lot. Arma 2 did not have all the content it does today at it's release either, and much of it is inflated by there being separate entries for guns with different attachment combinations, so that the same gun with four different sight attachments would show up in a list as four different guns. As for the performance issues, the game runs perfectly fine on my middle-of-the-road gaming rig and runs at playable rates on the old low to mid-end machine of my best friend. The performance of the game on some people's high-end machines is in no way a sure indicator of bad optimization, especially when the same game runs great on other machines with the same hardware. Now getting to the real meat of the review. The visuals of this game are amazing, especially if you have the power to crank up the graphics settings. The lighting is great and makes the game look heavenly, especially at night. The texture quality is top notch, especially for foliage and I fully believe anyone interested in first person shooters, should experience one where you can freely roam a huge 270 square kilometer beautifully rendered island with a rendering distance of several kilometers. Other cool graphical features are the volumetric fog and clouds as well as rain that is rendered as independent particle effects for each raindrop in stead of a mere filter or overlay. Audio-wise the game could do with some improvements that are guaranteed to happen over time, if not by Bohemia Interactive, then by community modders, however overall the sound design of this game is really quite good as it is. The gameplay is where Arma 3 really shines over it's predecessor, as controls of your soldier have been improved to feel a lot more direct and fluid than in previous games, though the action menu still tends to limits how good the game can feel in certain situations. The inventory system has seen huge improvements from Arma 2 and is much more streamlined, without sacrificing flexibility. Vehicles are now physics simulated objects, which is a huge improvement over Arma 2's incredibly janky vehicle physics. Underwater gameplay is a really nice addition that looks amazing and gives mission makers a lot more freedom and variety to work with, when making missions and giving the players different approaches to completing them. Firing weapons in Arma 3 feel pretty damn good as most rifles have a good deal of kick to them, making them both sound AND feel powerful in stead of feeling like Call of Duty or Battlefield style bullet-hoses. Different weapon calibers penetrating diferent materials differently at different angles and distances gives both the shooters and the people being shot at a lot of things to think about and decide how to react to in every firefight, which is great in a game that is so decidedly slow paced as Arma is, compared to other first person shooters. If you get this game and want to dive straight into some fun Arma 3 gameplay, I suggest playing though the first episode of the single-player campaign first, to get acquainted with the fairly complex controls and spotting/shooting enemies at ranges that other FPS games would never expect you to. Once you feel somewhat at home in the game, I highly recommend looking for a multiplayer server running the Wasteland mission, which is sort of like a 3-way Team Deathmatch gamemode with survival elements, base-building, resource gathering and impromptu mini-missions against AI that all of the three teams are given and can undertake at the same time, each team trying to beat the others for the promised reward, leading to some very interesting clashes. So all in all, I can barely recommend this game enough, but to get some real enjoyment out of it, you'll want to run it on a decent mid to high-end rig.
Jason;-;Great game
[RECON] gatlinggun1962;-;This game is Amazing but does have its moments online co-op like getting shot through walls. But this game is well worth the money even though its in alpha its has so much to offer for the engine platform it uses is amazing. the graphics are outstanding for multiplayer. over all I would give the game a 7 out of 10 on Campaign and a 10 out of 10 on Multiplayer just because the Campaign is kinda hard in the beginning of it the Multiplayer you have a good community of players on the coop. I just love it i will keep playing this game until Bohemia Interactive comes out with Arma 4 if they do it will be hard to top this game and the cooperation of other players. they just need to add more stuff but its still in alpha.
Alptraum;-;I'm not sure wether I should recommend it or not but it's enjoyable so I will. The game was released unfinished. There were close to nothing to do in the game because of the lack of content. There's 2 factions in BLUFOR I think, and one in OPFOR, one in Independent unless I'm mistaken. There's no weapon variation, there's like 2 weapons per faction if even. Only independent have jets and it's just one jet with another variant of it. The lack of content is what completely ruins this game. The combat, however, is very smooth (unless your FPS is on 20 which it usually is unless you have an absolutely extreme gaming computer), well-made and convenient. There's 9 stances you can take, high stand, normal stand, crouching stand, high crouch, normal crouch, low crouch, sitting (while firing), lying down and lying on the side. There's also a combat pace and a running pace which is great. In the combat pace, you run slower with your weapon up so you don't have to walk to fire like you did in ArmA 2. I love the game for it's mechanics which are much, much more smoother than ArmA 2 but I always play ArmA 2 more because of how incredibly much content there is for it. Especially with ACE. The graphics are awesome aswell. The lightning, the textures and effects are amazing but they'll most likely drop your FPS drastically. Not sure if it's due to bad optimization or if it's because the maps are so huge and detailed. Also, Altis, the main map of the game, I've noticed is very popular and everyone talks about how it's 270km2 or something like that, but travelling from one side of the map to the other is only 20km and takes like 2 minutes by chopper which was kind of dissapointing. It's still a great map though with alot of nice places and things to do. To summarize: This game is really well-made and cool but when it comes to content and features, ArmA 2 beats it by far.
kostasdx;-;The overall experience you get from ARMA games is good. But bugs are to be expected. The game feels like an actual war simulator. One shot can either kill or hurt badly, medkits are must have and the missions are a fun experience. The game is reccomended when you have a couple of friends with you. It gets dull and boring if you are alone (like any other game) but with friends the whole satisfaction is improved.
Sakuukuli;-;The latest edition of the best military simulator series. Has a steep learning curve and requires an up-to-date machine to run, though.
persPaladin;-;ArmA 3 is a good successor to ArmA2 with some great improvements to the engine, visuals, vehicles etc. Mainly I have played the Wasteland, King of the Hill and Epoch (Alpha) mods. King of the Hill being the most rewarding and enjoyable over all. I have only just dipped my toes into the campaign, however I will be doing more of it I think. With all the improvements to ArmA, you'll still get those good ole ArmA moments like clipping through walls/floors, and your vehicle exploding on contact with a weed or bush.
Charor;-;You don't buy crack for sometime in the future just like you dont buy Arma if you plan on going to work the next day...
Yondas (   );-;oh soso good :3 This is one of the best games of forever :D 10/10 IGN "kinda good i guess"
Hud293;-;great game my friends need this game fun to play with a bunch of people
PanteR;-;Very good game.
O2theMalley;-;Few games own the title of Miliatry/Combat Simulater, even fewer do it well, even less update them. Heres to BI, for delivering.
JustinBro;-;Although I havnt played it yet to me it looked like a very good game and since i have got money :I Im buying it :D
crumplypanda;-;If like simulation military ganes this one is for you you can fly a jet thru a wall and not die you can also get shot by a rocket dierectly in the chest and not die BEST SIM GAME EVER
Captain Australia;-;I highly recommend this game. very realistic, very hard. what i like most about this game is the combat is not over in 5 seconds like most action game eg call of duty. Also with all the wide range of guns and very unique future vehicle makes this game incredibly fun.
pandabe4r;-;ok, i played abit :rfacepalm: and want to give some words to the community and maybe the developer aswell. 1: sorry for my bad english, hope you'll get the point of what i want to say here. 2: go along if you play wasteland or altis life most of your time 3: who iam, veteran in fps since 1991. had my first 286' in early 90's. have a real life and like to play some time (imean for any genre of game you can go to the [steam]shop and play simulation, rpg, comic, violence, etc) i just want you all get my point quikly, because thats the deal- dont wast your time. i mean seriously, dont waste your +#+$7#+ time in a game that made for simulate players act together in a prebriefed style. in a game that made for bring realistic fun to deal with enemies not like arcade style. in a game that was made for coop and now 90% server out there are (single)roleplay. in a game that is full of bugs but beauty in detail - when you can be level 1000 at bf4/cod. in a game with a community of real soldiers that lost real buddies, by teamkilling them. in a game that need alot of fingersytle WASD wont bring you fun at all. in a game that is rated +18 , not infact 60% kiddies trolling the servers. i could go on like that if you want. so get your positive things out of it.i mean this game have moments, which i cant describe in words- and actually the bad situation had taking me to write this review.have fun in playing , hopefully as a team
TriiX;-;This game is awesome
-= Yoshi =-;-;Great gameplay and lots of fun!
Replay;-;really good game with tons of mods
WastedMike [=MARSOC=];-;If you call yourself a serious FPS gamer then this is a MUST OWN game, 10/10 (For full Arma experience then join an ArmA based clan/community)
KCCOsilkies03;-;love the game so glad i got this!!
Vladimir Putin;-;even the  physics in this game are realistic 10/10 would physic again.
Lt. Gen. Nathan Bedford Forrest;-;Amazing army simulator that's more than just "DayZ." Buy this game if you want a more realistic experience than "Call of Duty" or "Battlefield."
Can't Find My Keyboard;-;u shuut guns and fly helicopters wich is fun bt hard i giv this gaim 10/10
ajchili;-;ing Great
HARDCORE CHAMPION VORKED;-;I thought I would love this game, but after dealing with sloppy menu systems, unoptimized game settings, and ridiculously varying quality in gameplay, I just wish I never spent the money on this. All the online gameplay shown is under incredibly set terms that you'll almost never see without dedicating a ton of time to a community with a teamspeak.
Salt;-;i thought sunday was a weekend day.
jonbravo2;-;A great game, fun to play with friends. Honestly, I feel a bit ripped off by the lack of content provided by the developers, and the gameplay seems aimed at entertaining the Call of Duty/Battlefield FPS crowd. They continue to update it with new content, but it just doesn't hold my interest very long. Not to mention the many unrealistic features they added in to make it combat seem more "fluid and fast" If you are overflowing with $$$, and you feel like buying it, go ahead. I would not recommend buying it just yet.
CubukAdam;-;Awesome graphics and plot but game's playability is very low. Controls are very hard to use. You can not change them in the way you choose. It is the worst game I ever played for 4-5 years. Really annoying just because of controls. There are universal keys like 'T' for chat or 'Y' for team chat, they are totally different. And another problem is that Bohemia uses the same strategy for their other products like DayZ. Another not recommended game for me.
Slave;-;is this game fail or what?
StateMonster;-;This game is probably the least fun game I've played in a long time. It tries to sell itself as a military sim, but it's as much a military sim as minecraft. Wandering an empty island for hours until you get shot by some guy six miles away is not fun. Also, 60 dollar price tag? Games like Red Orchestra 2 are so much better than this and are much cheaper. You're money is better spent elsewhere.
Vancer2;-;This game is Arma 2 only with enhanced graphics on the same buggy ing engine that hasnt been optimized for Graphics cards.In Campaign mode is the place where your fps will always be its highest. Once you join Multiplayer the FPS will drop fast than a 1990's cellphone call in a tunnel. To truely enjoy the game you have to purchase a monster eight core cpu which can go for around $800 or even $1,000 And I'll be damned if i'm gunna spend that money on a cpu to play a $60 game thats really only worth $20. If you decide to ignore this, or any of the other negative reviews or buy into the lies of the  stains you call a positive review. Then I hope you enjoyed playing arma 1 cus thats what its going to look like if you want any decent performance. The game relies heavily on CPU's which will leave you at times skipping at times that leaves you feeling like your on a laptop with an integrated nvidia 9000GT I have two ATI Radeon HD5770's I was playing with one alone I get 12 FPS after switching to Crossfire the game gets maybe an increase of 1-2 fps. Metro 2034 Last light gets more performance on one 5770. Save your money and go buy something else its not worth the cash. Why you should spend your cash elsewhere. Same buggy CPU heavy engine as in ARMA 2 . Also somewhere you may see something about realistic bullet penetration and that sort of thing. I have shot on occasion several soldiers who have needed more than 9 shots before going down at ranges near of excess of 500 + feet or meters . And you know you hit them can they twitch their bodies at 90 degree angles. The game goes by meters, a meter is 3 feet more than a yard so do that math. So it doesnt have realistic bullet penetration. Again a lousy game Same graphics only with more bloom and water reflections. You can now swim underwater and have a 2 man submarine that is unarmed except for a laser pointer. Still experiences the same crashes and glitches as Arma 2 (ITS THE SAME ING GAME) Too many mods and generic mod servers Like Wasteland, basically Dazy without zombies still terrible.
SiThSpAwN;-;I laughed, I cried, I shot people in the face....
Gorilla Presidente;-;One of the best value games on Steam, both in terms of its sheer scope and and its unvarying ability to meet its lofty goals. Truly a modern game.
elt;-;Dear beiber fan _69, Here my love xoxoxoxoxo HB sort yo ping den wees play togeth gg gg gg gg gg gg gg gg gg gg gg Lov Dirty mike and the boys - Trev Thanks bro for this Amazing game and the Review: this game is amazing, smooth engine, great missions, a nice step up from arma 2, Downside: multiplayer is to time consuming. qq
RedruM;-;Amazing Game would recommend to 100% Everyone
PymaSensei;-;Very Good.
[Evo] Justnothing;-;This is gonna be est game ever i see you dont make dayz mode for arma 3 But its not gonna happen u create new game for day z u published videos for u are working on arma 3 for dayz You guys said you are going to publish it soon u tricked people
Showboat;-;Much fun, very wow
Corrupting Q;-;i recommend this game
TALLS;-;Good but wish there were way more planes
Ruski Padoski;-;Gather a group of friends and play on a wasteland server! Very fun and very intense gameplay if you go for the missions that pop up on the map, but make sure you gather resources like good weapons, armor, food and water, beacause your enemies will.
iGame360fficial;-;If you plan on buying this game. Make sure you have a GPU better then an AMD Radeon 7750 1GBDDR5. Because thats what I have and I CANNOT go higher then standard settings. And on standard I'm getting 27-30 FPS. Kind of sad that this game alone cost gamers $8 Million in computer upgrades. THIS GAME ALONE. PC SPECS i7-2600 @3.40GHz AMD Radeon 7750 1GBDDR5 64 bit Windows 7 8GB DDR3 ram Quad Core
Alliedcvil;-;It's tough to review this game because Steam doesn't have a so-so category. The game is gorgeous even though it chugs on my rig that works great for any other game. So here's an easy way to review the game: Gameplay - 6/10 - The singleplayer elements... I don't play MP on this yet are really hit and miss. The weapon accuracy albeit accurate still leads to the AI being incredibly cheap. You can hide under bushes and the AI will shoot you from 2 miles away and you will definitely die, you shoot at them 20 times and you will maybe hit them once, but they seem like terminator robots that never go down. This can be incredibly frustrating because you'll get sent back 20 minutes to a way earlier part of the mission to do the next thing that I have a grip about. This game could definitely be called FOREST RUNNING SIMULATOR 2014. You will spend hours running in the forest and really doing nothing at these point to traverse to another part of the island, which is not too amusing when you do this and get hit once and then have to do it all over again. Lastly from the negatives is the control and interface, it's fun to learn and difficult to master is one thing, but this game has it's own language practically when it comes to the bizarre control set. Lots of bugs, but what game doesn't have a ton of bugs... especially games that come out of Eastern Europe. (Note: Not trying to be offensive, it's just that a large list of games from that region started with bugs galore except The Witcher) On the good side of gameplay is the fact that the extensibility of the game is HUGE! So many options, so many details and subsystems that it's honestly cool to see new options you have seen once after playing for a few days and spotting something new each time. The realism factor could either be a great selling point or loss to you. Warning if you are expecting Call of Duty, Battlefield, or even Operation Flashpoint... then you will more than likely dislike this game from a gameplay perspective. Graphics: 6/10 - The game is gorgeous in every single way. Navigating the underwater areas and the night settings are especially a sight to see. The only reason that the graphics score is lower than perfect is the fact that the animations are really hit or miss. This is also particularly clear when it comes to watching people talk during the gameplay. It's something that takes you out of the realism of the game. Sound: 4/10 - The voices and gun noises are pretty awful. They're definitely workable from a gameplay aspect, but sometimes you'll just hear something like one of the truck horns and think, did they record a boat horn mixed with a clown car? -------------- All in all if you added up the score of the game from this little review it would make the game overall be pretty crappy, but that's the beauty of the game so far. It's a work in progress being made by a team that really cares. Each time I play the game you'll see a note from the dev saying that they polished x,y,z or the community addressed the issue. Who knows in a few months most of my gripes may be solved by the devs, but regardless of all of that i'd recommend this game to any hardcore PC gamer.
NetWalkerBR;-;Best war simulator ever!! Highly recomended !!
PolarBear;-;Its a pretty good game, If you can get past its many bugs and dsync issues
BwieDieter | Jeremiah Danger!;-;I have played the predecessors for a long, long time and always thought of them (although crooked) the games to end all games for me. Then ARMA 3 came along, and now I know that ARMA 2 and especially ARMA were good games, but far from being the nearly perfect games I made them out to be. Im not on about realism, because it is a game after all. No game can ever come close to the real thing, and it would be a horrible game if it would. Think of realism as things like "take a bullet to the head in game and never be able to play ever again". What I AM on about is the level of immersion. That ARMA 3 can put you under real stress, can make you involuntarily shout out "INCOMING!" or make you race for virtual cover, make you flinch and instill fear for your virtual life. This time around, the experience is hindered by far fewer bugs and glitches than in any ARMA game ever. The inventory system has been reworked, vehicle and aircraft physics have been improved, the engine has been rebuilt from scratch. All while retaining a "feel" very much like ARMA 2. In essence, this game is the best ARMA ever released - improved on all fronts, no features lost in translation. On top of the technical aspect, even though this game hasnt been live for a long time now, it has already been modded, customised and improved by the vast, loyal and savvy community, to a degree that ARMA 2 saw about 2-3 years after its release - and there is far, far more to come. Can I recommend this game? Yes. Is it a game for everybody? No. But it is a game *everybody* should try. This has been the only game I have bought for full price (44.99 ) in years, and I dont regret a single cent spent. What are you still waiting for? get ARMA 3. It will be different from anything youve ever played. Except ARMA 2.
fattboi94;-;Great game for any military entusiast.
Cobolt;-;Arma 3 ... Where do you start all the kinks of arma 2 have been cleared, the engine runs smooth... the animations even smoother and the optimisation is always on the Up and Up. throught out Arma's history it has been clearly building up to this. the Arma game to end all Arma games. IF you are considering Buying remember... this isnt a fast action shoot em'up (But sometimes it can be) this is tactical and stealthy. Also if you buy this game and need someone to play it with you ... Hit me and the 45th up :D
Major Wood;-;Dont play single player, play multiplayer.
Cry-Tek;-;If you havent already bought this game, its a must buy!!!! its 40% off atm get it while you can!!!
Sparklih;-;its okay i suppose but not worth 40
Blackjack4800;-;Too advanced, and teamates will ditch you constantly. Also many framerate issues.
Even Speedwagon is afraid!;-;No, this is in no way better than Call of Duty, I feel cheated with this game, it's too hard and endlessly complex.
IamRonny;-;buy it for wasteland mod, never regret
stylezwest;-;Another great add-on to the arma series. i suggest wasteland for PVP only needs
SkitZ;-;Ugh,What else is there to say about arma 3? Theres so many things. A huge open world so detailed and so great thats amazing. An awesome community that loves playing tactically. I could go on for days,You just have to try it. Here take the money just buy it. Your still focusing on my review go ahead and buy it buy it now nownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownownow
*Anth*;-;Best real life combat simulator hands down there is no better foot, land, air and sea Arma series does it like no other game I have played. Player made addons and missions making this game stand like the leaning tower of pisa it may not be perfect but it does look and feel great.
jando;-;You either die a good soldier or you live long enough to see yourself become a hater. There are 2 ways in this game the first hours, you hate right away or love it all the way.
smooth buddy;-;this game took away all my downstairs hair
Not Nice Minh;-;Good game. It's not worth 60 bucks. Game is glitchy and still needs lots of works. Feels like a Alpha/beta game.
TheRealCharlie;-;grate game fun game modes and very enjoyable with friends
PeeToo50;-;The engine man! get it now!
Harmless;-;Epic war simulator. Beautiful attention to detail. Definantly recommend this game to anyone to try.
Hella;-;I love this game, it has brought me plenty of fun and I can assure you that you will like it too. If you have enough cash to buy this game (as it is expensive) I highly, highly recommend.
TiCx #2;-;You won't regret this! Unless you're FoshoTM
jasonLJ;-;Absolutely phenomenal game. Expect lack luster performance on AMD chipsets though.
TG Colorfulmoose;-;For the tactical junkie. NOT for those who want another Call of Duty. Even Battlefield and Ghost recon (some of the best shooters of our time) don't stack up to the tactical and realism aspects of this game. There is a LOT to learn about playing this game. It's very control-intensive and takes a lot of memorizing how to execute certain functions. This is truly a simulation, not a typical shooter. This game gets extra points for its expandability and modability. Only negative points: Can be difficult to learn (but worth it!), is a little slow to respond to control movements (sort of adds to realism, though), and there is not enough campaign (yet).
Engita;-;I wouldn't call it the greatest simulator. I would call it pure fun though, deffinately a reccomendation to anyone looking for a highly moddable and enjoyable game. The Campaign is also quite enjoyable, Multiplayer on the other hand will make you face endless frame rate drops and purely bad performance. This is expected for a game of this scale, but the games performance is really my only downside, highly reccomend this game on the other hand.
ECHOOO;-;Very good game just need to fix bugs i recommend it to all
LooneyTunez;-;Awsome Game ..
DarK_St3alth;-;ARMA. The most respected Mil-Sim series to date. Serious play, that's the objective. "Fun" isn't a word I would use. It's not casual, you simply can't hop in, play 15 minutes, and then hop out. The enjoyment comes from finding a server and getting to know people. Playing with them when you take on hour long missions, that's the enjoyment. First thing I have to say really, which I almost forgot about, IT'S REAL SCALE. The "maps" really should be called environments. You can't drive from one side of the island to another in minutes. The battlefield is really a battlefield. While most modern games focus on a small segment of a city, town or something, ARMA is about the openess making you sniper bait. You have to look hard for hostiles, they could be shooting at you from a hill across the valley. Performance. Was it terrible the first few days after release. Even still, AI seem to cause a drop in FPS even though they are far away. This isn't latency, this is pure frame for frame output. Never really understood how something unoptimized got pushed out. That being said, they follow Valve's ideas and push out updates for free. I play with a GTX 560Ti and Core i7 870. CPU matters, GPU matters. i3 wasn't up for the task, even with a 4GHz clock. You need an i7 or 8-core AMD heat monster to play with details. If you can push your rig, you get to see things that many don't get to see. N00bs will have a large hill to climb in regards to learning the game. 7/10
Blackshark;-;Fun game but not worth more than $20. Many bugs, desync, etc. Issues that were prevalent in Arma 2 but were never fixed.
Irish-sniper;-;Until i stop getting CPU crashes ill keep this as a negative
marshman13;-;What's the matter everyone? Are you not ready to play god at this moment? Are you chillin just thinking why you hate brocoli? ARE YOU AFRAID OF A LITTLE DISCIPLINE? Well don't just think... this game is excellent! P.S. Watch for goats
NISBRO;-;I played 11 hours on the free weekend, and i use to enjoy the flashpoint series but found this game hard to get into and the missions seemed the same most of the time. Only the first episode was available for free but it seemed the same, run through some trees shoot a few enemy then go to objective, shoot a few more, complete objective wait 2 minutes then mission ends. Couldnt connect to any multiplayer servers so maybe this game is too old now and no one hosts severs for it in the Pacific region? I might pick it up on the sale again if its 60-70% off but 50% off and I will still hold out on it for now.
Atomicdeath;-;It bleeds awesomeness, and oozes excellence. This game as gotten multiple updates since release and is still very fun. I love Bohemia, and love Arma.
Falconer;-;Fun army simulator game, although I play it for the RPG city life element. It's also less buggy in comparison to it's predecessor, ArmA 2.
yung j bains;-;worst game
rein;-;This game is like no other. I have many hours spent in every build of this game, from Alpha to release, and I can proudly say that I enjoyed every single one of them. This isn't a game for everyone, there is no real guidance on what you are intended to do, the tutorials are confusing, and you will find yourself dying from all directions in combat missions. Much of the game's fun is drawn from the sheer uniqueness of it's conflicts - from small 4 man espionage missions at night to full on assaults with armored sections and infantry alike. There are few games that I could irrefutably consider a true sandbox, and Arma 3 is probably one of the best sandbox experiences around, with practically limitless mission oppurtunities from the community due to the excellent mission designer already implemented. Visually, this game is absolutely breathtaking at high settings - night time is probably the most stellar with it's pitch black atmosphere, and night vision opticals are almost a definite requirement - vehicle lights and weapon lights cast beams through the shroud of night, tracer rounds meander across the vast fields of Altis, destroyed vehicles emit a vicious explosion and emit plumes of smoke. Daytime is equally impressive with Arma's mesmerizing sky boxes and vast expanses of land which seem to travel infinitely. I don't feel like writing more right now but ultimately, Arma 3 is a visually stunning, virtually endless sandbox of military endeavours.
Am i called this?;-;very difficult to learn, if you just want something like cod or battlefield, dont get. 8.3/10
bokkem;-;Having spend many hours in the buggy but innovative (at the time) Operation Flashpoint, I took the opportunity to try Arma 3 weekend deal for free. While being 2 minutes in the tutorial, I somehow got my camera stuck I can only walk back and forward and turn my head. How to undo this: no fraking clue! Rage quit, uninstalled and never, ever going to install another Bohemia product on my PC.
Harvey;-;you don't get to shower with other men.
Salty Jim;-;Why play Arma 3 when you could be putting your genitals into a mince meater which would be a lot more fun. I feel like Ive been robbed! Definitely not worth 35.99 -_-
ShorTy;-;Dont buy this trash game, Looks good on streams looks and sounds fun as F! but the game is trash! FPS chop all servers in games with 1-24 players i got like 100fps + all max settings games with 70-100 people i got like 20-40 fps chopping also the game lags alot the mic chat is GODAWFUL annoying! people in global chat with there mics lagging bad due to severs. The game is worth 10-20$ tops until they fix the problem they never fixed in arma 2 or never will fix cuz they suck at scam money from people. Worst game of the year No joke
Ethan;-;10 - Graphics 9.5 - Sound 10 - Gameplay 9.7 - Voice Acting 10 - Potential (Modding, and custom mission scenarios) Overal this is a great game!
Sir. Siguno;-;This game is so awsoooomeee!!!!!!XD buy it now!!!
Snakelore;-;Arma 3 is amazing, it has lots of variaty and uses tons of tactics and different stratagies. Arma 3 is tons of fun. It is insanely fun with friends. It's a great game and I recommend it to anyone.
RebelPup00;-;10/10 Would Play 420 Hours Again
Classicsniper00;-;I have put over 1000 hours into this game, played the  out of it, edited and made missions all night till the sun came up. It is the best military sim you will ever play. Anything can be done in this game, and the mods make this stupid realistic. It can fit a run and gun play style, or you can do it tactically. Personally I played it with a handful of friends, and even underwent training from a guy with 9+ years in Special Forces. This game is the real deal. And you will not find one like it. That being said, I have stopped playing Arma because of their money loving developers who really bent their fans over and violeted them in their no-no places. The game still runs poorly on high end systems, there are hundreds of content missing from the game that was promised since prior Alpha, but God Forbid they are releasing pointless DLC's to squeeze every penny out of our wallets. (Go Karts? Seriously?) And not ot mention a Helicopter DLC that adds 2....2!!!!! New Helicopters, that are ALREADY in the game, you just can't fly them, for $15. If that's not the BIGGEST Scumbaggery I have ever seen, then I don't know what is. Overall, the game is fantastic, but the Devs have completely lost my support and respect. That being aside. I will give this game my 10/10 for the sake of Arma. But I'd rather give it a zero because of Bohemia Interactive.
spencc1996;-;Arma 3 is fun if you have friends to play it with. plus thiers a wide vairity of mods such Breaking Point that can enhance your arma experiance. Buy it on sale and Have fun!
Moonman{Look at profile};-;Arma 3 is one of the best selling FPS Sandbox games ever made. Some of those people come from arma 2 or arma 1 but most people I know, arma 3 was their first arma game. From flying helicopters to infantry rush. Arma 3 has a huge community and is still growing today! Also not to note the spectacular performance by the dev team update almost weekly. The best thing I love about aroma is there always going to be something new each time you play from Altis life to the realism units. Friend me if you want to see some screenshots of arma 3 ~Macmaster
Ciradis;-;this game costs too much but it's pretty sweet
[MTTB] FaZe HordS;-;Arma 3: The game is good... still not as good as Arma 2 (IMO) more content in Arma 2 then what it is in Arma 3 but the modding community fixes that to like 100% adding more guns and armies. And now that Bohemia is adding Karts into the game.. after a "april" joke thing... and then adds it as a Pay DLC... sure the money goes to charity but why need some karts? When are the DLC's that acctualy are usefull... like in Arma 2 where DLC's added more armies and units Czech republic DLC and BRIT DLC? those where good DLC's now we get Sniper DLC Helicopter DLC Kart DLC Like what? But yea... the game is good overall even though the server browser is compleatly empty with servers... and sinse Zeus came out i though there was going to be TONS of servers running it but nah... not a single server is running it... So... use Zeus in SP Editor much better Do i recommend the game? YES 7/10 (No servers and  DLC's that have no use)
M.DePietro;-;Amazing game. If you're a fan of the other Arma games, you need this.
TOMMY TRIPOD;-;The fact that i can buy drugs and can ride a pink go-cart 10/10
[QF] DDonoven;-;Best damn thing EVER!
PhoenixDown;-;I love this game. so much fun!!!
ryan;-;Great game
elt;-;Dear beiber fan _69, Here my love xoxoxoxoxo HB sort yo ping den wees play togeth gg gg gg gg gg gg gg gg gg gg gg Lov Dirty mike and the boys - Trev Thanks bro for this Amazing game and the Review: this game is amazing, smooth engine, great missions, a nice step up from arma 2, Downside: multiplayer is to time consuming. qq
PloppyWhacker;-;TactiCOOL
=(eGO)= Butterz;-;Arma 3 is an ambitious title with a style of gameplay that will polarize players. The many complexities and amount of controls to master can be a daunting task for any newcomer to the series, while seasoned vets will feel right at home (for better or worse). There is a great deal to learn about playing Arma in a way that is enjoyable. The default campaign mode is passable, with all the tropes you'd expect to find in a military shooter, with a few surprises here and there. Missions vary in length and scope, ranging from short range patrols to full on combined operations assaults.
Z0011;-;The best war simulator
noodle;-;Like its predecessors, ArmA 3 succeeds at supplying a realistic, entertaining, and accurate game experience that provides great scenery, new weapons and units, a community-based scenerio workshop, and a game that can be played professionally with a developed community or leisurely on a public server.
Prof.Gubbins;-;Got Arrested for standing still for too long. And got kidnapped 6 times in one hour.
Johnny Karate;-;The multiplayer in this game is amazing you can do almost anything. Could use a bigger variety of guns.
ZingZip;-;Kim Jong-il (Korean pronunciation: [imdzil]; 16 February 1941  17 December 2011) was the Supreme Leader of the Democratic People's Republic of Korea, commonly referred to as North Korea, from 1994 to 2011. He succeeded his father and founder of the DPRK, Kim Il-sung, following the elder Kim's death in 1994. Kim Jong-il was the General Secretary of the Workers' Party of Korea (WPK), Chairman of the National Defence Commission of North Korea, and the Supreme Commander of the Korean People's Army, the fourth-largest standing army in the world. In April 2009, North Korea's constitution was amended to officially refer to him (and his later successors) as the "Supreme Leader of the DPRK".[3] The most common colloquial title given to him during his reign was "The Dear Leader" ( ) to distinguish him from his father Kim Il-sung, "The Great Leader". The North Korean government announced his death on 19 December 2011,[4] whereupon his third son, Kim Jong-un, was promoted to a senior position in the ruling Workers' Party and succeeded him.[5] After his death, he was designated as the "Eternal General Secretary" of the Worker's Party of Korea and the Eternal Chairman of the National Defence Commission, in keeping with the tradition of establishing eternal posts for the dead members of the Kim dynasty. Birth Soviet records show that Kim was born Yuri Irsenovich Kim[6] in the village of Vyatskoye, near Khabarovsk, in 1941,[7] where his father, Kim Il-sung, commanded the 1st Battalion of the Soviet 88th Brigade, made up of Chinese and Korean exiles. Kim Jong-il's mother, Kim Jong-suk, was Kim Il-sung's first wife. Inside his family, he was nicknamed Yura, while his younger brother Kim Man-il (born Alexander Irsenovich Kim) was nicknamed Shura. However, Kim Jong-il's official biography states he was born in a secret military camp on Baekdu Mountain (Korean: ) in Japanese-occupied Korea on 16 February 1942.[8] Official biographers claim that his birth at Baekdu Mountain was foretold by a swallow, and heralded by the appearance of a double rainbow across the sky over the mountain and a new star in the heavens.[9] According to one comrade of Kim's mother, Lee Min, word of Kim's birth first reached an army camp in Vyatskoye via radio and that both Kim and his mother did not return there until the following year.[10][11] In 1945, Kim was four years old when World War II ended and Korea regained independence from Japan. His father returned to Pyongyang that September, and in late November Kim returned to Korea via a Soviet ship, landing at Sonbong (, also Unggi). The family moved into a former Japanese officer's mansion in Pyongyang, with a garden and pool. Kim Jong-il's brother drowned there in 1948. Unconfirmed reports suggest that five-year-old Kim Jong-il might have caused the accident.[12] Reports indicate that his mother died in childbirth in 1949,[13] however, unconfirmed reports suggest that his mother might have been shot and left to bleed to death.[12] Education According to his official biography, Kim completed the course of general education between September 1950 and August 1960. He attended Primary School No. 4 and Middle School No. 1 (Namsan Higher Middle School) in Pyongyang.[14] This is contested by foreign academics, who believe he is more likely to have received his early education in the People's Republic of China as a precaution to ensure his safety during the Korean War.[15] Throughout his schooling, Kim was involved in politics. He was active in the Children's Union and the Democratic Youth League of North Korea (DYL), taking part in study groups of Marxist political theory and other literature. In September 1957 he became vice-chairman of his middle school's DYL branch (the chairman had to be a teacher). He pursued a programme of anti-factionalism and attempted to encourage greater ideological education among his classmates.[16] Kim is also said to have received English language education at the University of Malta in the early 1970s,[17] on his infrequent holidays in Malta as guest of Prime Minister Dom Mintoff.[18] The elder Kim had meanwhile remarried and had another son, Kim Pyong-il. Since 1988, Kim Pyong-il has served in a series of North Korean embassies in Europe and was the North Korean ambassador to Poland. Foreign commentators suspect that Kim Pyong-il was sent to these distant posts by his father in order to avoid a power struggle between his two sons.[19] The 6th Party Congress and heir apparent (19801994) By the time of the Sixth Party Congress in October 1980, Kim Jong-il's control of the Party operation was complete. He was given senior posts in the Politburo, the Military Commission and the party Secretariat. According to his official biography, the WPK Central Committee had already anointed him successor to Kim Il-sung in February 1974. When he was made a member of the Seventh Supreme People's Assembly in February 1982, international observers deemed him the heir apparent of North Korea. At this time Kim assumed the title "Dear Leader" ( , ch'inaehann jidoja)[20] the government began building a personality cult around him patterned after that of his father, the "Great Leader". Kim Jong-il was regularly hailed by the media as the "fearless leader" and "the great successor to the revolutionary cause". He emerged as the most powerful figure behind his father in North Korea. On 24 December 1991, Kim was also named Supreme Commander of the Korean People's Army. Since the Army is the real foundation of power in North Korea, this was a vital step. Defence Minister Oh Jin-wu, one of Kim Il-sung's most loyal subordinates, engineered Kim Jong-il's acceptance by the Army as the next leader of North Korea, despite his lack of military service. The only other possible leadership candidate, Prime Minister Kim Il (no relation), was removed from his posts in 1976. In 1992, Kim Il-sung publicly stated that his son was in charge of all internal affairs in the Democratic People's Republic. In 1992, radio broadcasts started referring to him as the "Dear Father", instead of the "Dear Leader", suggesting a promotion. His 50th birthday in February was the occasion for massive celebrations, exceeded only by those for the 80th birthday of Kim Il-sung himself on 15 April that same year. According to defector Hwang Jang-yop, the North Korean government system became even more centralized and autocratic during the 1980s and 1990s under Kim Jong-il than it had been under his father. In one example explained by Hwang, although Kim Il-sung required his ministers to be loyal to him, he nonetheless and frequently sought their advice during decision-making. In contrast, Kim Jong-il demanded absolute obedience and agreement from his ministers and party officials with no advice or compromise, and he viewed any slight deviation from his thinking as a sign of disloyalty. According to Hwang, Kim Jong-il personally directed even minor details of state affairs, such as the size of houses for party secretaries and the delivery of gifts to his subordinates.[21] Idealized portrait of Kim Jong-il By the 1980s, North Korea began to experience severe economic stagnation. Kim Il-sung's policy of juche (self-reliance) cut the country off from almost all external trade, even with its traditional partners, the Soviet Union and China.
DR.WHO;-;its really good love everything in it so far
Feudal;-;Ran over by a Ifrit and survived 11/10
Jebediah Kerman;-;Probably my current favorite FPS. It's the definition of military sandbox. Be warned however, this isn't an easy game, and you will die, a lot.
B0x;-;Pretty Awesome
Grillz;-;Very fun and addictive game, pretty low FPS and the desync issues are pretty drastic, but you start to get used to it and forgive the problems in the engine. I guarantee you will lose your sense of time once you get into it. 8/10
pandabe4r;-;ok, i played abit :rfacepalm: and want to give some words to the community and maybe the developer aswell. 1: sorry for my bad english, hope you'll get the point of what i want to say here. 2: go along if you play wasteland or altis life most of your time 3: who iam, veteran in fps since 1991. had my first 286' in early 90's. have a real life and like to play some time (imean for any genre of game you can go to the [steam]shop and play simulation, rpg, comic, violence, etc) i just want you all get my point quikly, because thats the deal- dont wast your time. i mean seriously, dont waste your +#+$7#+ time in a game that made for simulate players act together in a prebriefed style. in a game that made for bring realistic fun to deal with enemies not like arcade style. in a game that was made for coop and now 90% server out there are (single)roleplay. in a game that is full of bugs but beauty in detail - when you can be level 1000 at bf4/cod. in a game with a community of real soldiers that lost real buddies, by teamkilling them. in a game that need alot of fingersytle WASD wont bring you fun at all. in a game that is rated +18 , not infact 60% kiddies trolling the servers. i could go on like that if you want. so get your positive things out of it.i mean this game have moments, which i cant describe in words- and actually the bad situation had taking me to write this review.have fun in playing , hopefully as a team
TriiX;-;This game is awesome
-= Yoshi =-;-;Great gameplay and lots of fun!
Replay;-;really good game with tons of mods
WastedMike [=MARSOC=];-;If you call yourself a serious FPS gamer then this is a MUST OWN game, 10/10 (For full Arma experience then join an ArmA based clan/community)
John;-;Lemme tell you what i think about arma 3. ARMA 3 is a fantastic military sim game. The physics are great, the graphics are awesome and everything about it i enjoy especially the addons. It's a great improvement and i don't know why dayz isn't running on this amazing engine. The zoombies mod that i enjoyed is gone now thanks to bohemia and dayz. I hope you guys rot in hell. What i hate about this game, comes from a deep part of my soul and also a very external part of me too. The amount of dip and try hards and ing posers i come across rattle me bones like no other. Going into a server with "Spec ops" as your slot to choose to be makes me want to shoot my brains out. The moment i went into these servers felt all i heard was "SPEC OPS READY FOR PICK UP" "THIS IS SPEC OPS GOING INTO FIRE" "THIS IS SPEC OPS SUCKING  FOR CRACK MONEY" that last one was a joke but you can see my anger in this. So i ask in the chat bar that doesn't have a scroll up option for some ing reason, "are you guys in the military or have any of you served" and with a gust of wind that screams oh  here we go, it came "no, we have never served, luckily we have this game" my wtf face was not big enough to show how i felt. These  heads have no idea what it's like to be in combat, i don't know yet my self but i plan on knowing very soon, nor military tactics, nor anything of particular military from anyone not just these "spec op" dumbasses. anyway, i get out of this server cause at this point i am growing a giant vein on my temple because i am holding back my self tearing these guys a new one. "Alright" i tell my self as i decide to browse through servers. "ah, this one must be great, seal team 8" OKAY seriously, i get that you're a ing  and don't want to actually serve, but naming your ing server seal team # doesn't make you look cool. It pisses people off. I go into this server and ask if any served or serving. Noopee, seriously. what the  do you think you're doing? what part of being in a seal team do you ing know besides call of duty or some stupid ? okay, well there's alot of that. let me get to my closing statement. arma 3 is fun, i love the game graphics are nice but the mulitplayer is so un-optimized it drives me insane. Having a nice pc and trying to enjoy games but without devs optimizing their games or using 64bit gaming, EVEN THOUGH THE GAME YOU RELEASED IS A PRETTY HEFTY GAME TO PLAY baffles me. The physics engine is great, physx engine it's called from nvidia, it's some cool , too bad it doesn't look cool at 20fps and i am trying to drive but go right into a ing rock. physics are working though that some good . anyway. also the game feels stripped, like there's nothing compared to arma 2 regarding weapons and vehicles. I would not recommend this game if you have ever served/serving in the Military or you want something casual. If you have served or serving you will want to gut everyone. There's no point in playing a game where no one knows what they are doing and pretends to be some badass that they will never be except maybe online, but the pre pubescent or going through puberty voice doesn't sound like you want to follow them. The amount of posers and wanna be's ruin this game for me. oh and especially the "15th MEU" oh pretends to be a real marine MEU. LIke seriously these guys think they are Marines. Their website says how much of they follow Marines. they even pretend to have medals and shadow boxes. what the  is this . As someone working his  off to join a special group of people i can no longer play this game without getting rage. singleplayer is fun though. i like the single player. mods are nice, and i really can't say much else. I would and wouldn't recommend this game. It's up to you.
1324543156461436;-;Abit buggy, but extremly fun! Join the funest Atlis Life Server: 1) Go to the Multiplayer server search 2)Remote 3) Type in 74.122.192.171 and port 2302
Mr. Melchoir;-;Realism at it's finest. Doesn't get much more real than this ladies and gents.
CaptainCockSniff;-;well i was driving along in stratis life and a cop texted me gg and i was kicked off and global banned..... im not hacking lol even if my account looks sus because of my vac ban my ing  brother gave me im searous i liked this game it was great then i was banned for no reason gg game. 60 dollars wasted on this .
Seryth;-;ArmA 3 is an improvement in many aspects from ArmA 2. The graphics are more realistic, the movements are more fluid, and I find the vehicles are easier to control. This is a game that you will either absolutely love and play a lot, or you will hate it. The ArmA games aren't easy to learn by yourself. It takes time and patience to become fluent in the controls. You need to approach them with an open mind. Great versatility for mods and modders. The ingame mission editor is fantastic to use and great for trying out all that ArmA 3 has to offer. 10/10 do recommend
wake me up inside;-;game is really fun. its not some game like CoD where you can run and gun. no this game needs tactics and good team communication. the graphics are also amazing 9999/10 - IGN
eimroNgnikcuF;-;while playing i take off my clothes and carry bloody men around while they float like ghosts behind me like ghosts
Death Assured;-;The most poorly-optimized PTSD simulator!!!
kostasdx;-;The overall experience you get from ARMA games is good. But bugs are to be expected. The game feels like an actual war simulator. One shot can either kill or hurt badly, medkits are must have and the missions are a fun experience. The game is reccomended when you have a couple of friends with you. It gets dull and boring if you are alone (like any other game) but with friends the whole satisfaction is improved.
alastairpei;-;One day in Wasteland Sandbox, I found a car. Picked up the gun inside, and got in. Crashed into a small rock, entire car blew up. 11/10
pilot_seelie;-;There's a famous World War I quote that says warfare is "Months of boredom punctuated by moments of extreme terror." Replace "terror" with "frustration" and this game does, indeed, give you the True Combat experience written on the tin. From the description and tutorial missions, I was expecting a military simulation with experiences like "The commander ordered my squad over the radio to go to grid point 134-190 and hold the bridge, so we mounted up in an APC and fought out way there to hold the line against the enemy advance." Basically, I expected a much deeper and more realistic version of Battlefield -- like the Falcon 3.0 and Gunship 2000 military sims I played when I was a teenager but with infantry and tanks and tactics and whatnot. What I got is... nothing like that. The single-player is more like what I would call a "walking forward simulator." Seriously, my left middle finger started going numb from holding down W while following the squad leader character across a field for 15 minutes while only encountering two enemies. Of course, when I DID encounter enemies I tended to get shot in the head pretty quickly because the AI can see right through the oh-so-realistic scrub brush that covers the landscape whereas all I could see was the tangle of bushes in front of my face with a big red "TARGET" box floating in the middle of them. Then the squad leader guy stepped on a landmine (the only one in the world apparently -- of all the luck!) and I started following some other guys across another field for even longer, only this time with an ambush of several lethal bushes a few minutes out from the save point. After snoozing my way all across the field and then getting killed in the same spot about a dozen times I thought "Okay, maybe the real draw here is the realistic chain-of-command combined arms multiplayer scenarios, let me try that." So, I popped into multiplayer... and didn't see any of that either. There were scads of "RPG" servers where I could play as a random villager, AKA playing Walking Foward Simulator toward the corn field at the edge of town and trying to earn a bit of money to buy food at the market and not starve. True combat gameplay, right? There were "Wasteland" servers where you spawn in the middle of the continent somewhere with nobody around and only a vague suggestion of what you'r supposed to be doing ("fortify a base, gather supplies and hoard them") and of course a half-hour walk to the nearest point of interest. I wandered around the airport for 10 minutes looking for supplies or a vehicle, found nothing, shrugged and disconnected. There were also "King of the Hill" servers which at least featured combat. Well, actually they mostly featured waiting for helicopters to respawn. The objective was to go from my team's base to occupy a town about 1.5 kilometers away, which equated to a half-hour walk, a ten-minute drive (assuming you didn't run over a bush, which would pop your tire and then it's back to the half-hour walk) or a one-minute helicopter ride. So, helicopter was the obvious choice, but those only spawn every few minutes. Half the time some jerk would crash his truck into the helicopter and destroy it so we'd have to wait again. On the occasions I actually got to the airspace over the town, I would jump out of the helicopter, open my parachute, and generally be shot to death while dangling in the air. The one time I parachuted out early and walked for a minute to get to the town, I survived for a good while sneaking into the town but didn't run into any enemies to fight... eventually I got bored of that and ran to a tower to see if I could snipe people from the top, but as soon as I peeked out over the railing I got shot in the head. So, was it realistic? You bet. Months of boredom punctuated by moments of extreme frustration. Was it fun? Not really. I had a lot more fun playing LUFTRAUSERS while waiting for it to download. Overall a colossal disappointment. I'm so glad it was a "free trial weekend" -- I would have cried tears of rage if I had actually paid for this thing.
Latios;-;After playing several missions, and managing to lose every single one, I'm done playing... I can't tell if I'm hitting anyone, foliage blocks my every shot, and all I manage to do is die...die die dead died die. It's honestly the worst feeling I've ever had in a game. I'm worthless to my team, the mission, and myself. I'll just do everyone a favor and quit. I wish I had my money back on this one...
Zoop;-;If I wanted to catch fish I would buy a fishing simulator.
Fiddler;-;ARMA III In my eyes, personally i think this is a game. Thank you for spending time for reading my review:P
|BE AGRESIF;-;Do you like headaches? this game is headache game
(youtube) busskill2;-;you thats why
Fox;-;its boring and you wont know what to do switching back to call of duty s
Sargeant Stubby;-;[UPDATE] Arma 3 is a great military sandbox game that consists of: Campaign User-made scenarios Multiplayer MANY different game modes DLCs that aren't too pricy (DLC buyers get items, while at the same time supporting the development of arma 3 ____________________________________________________________ Arma 3 in my opinion is a very realistic military simulator. You have a lot of weapons to choose from, and a lot of attachments. There are: 5 pistols 3 Sub-machine guns 10 different types of assault rifles 3 Designated marksman rifles 2 sniper rifles 3 LMGs That's not it though! Leave it to the developers to make even more guns coming up in the marksman DLC. Vehicles consist of: AFV-4 Gorgon AMV-7 Marshal Ifrit Hatchback HEMTT Hunter MSE-3 Marid Strider SUV Tempest Truck Quadbike UGV Stomper Zamak Go kart [Was added in as a joke, but people wanted it in the game as DLC content!] 2S9 Sochor BTR-K Kamysh CRV-6e Bobcat FV-720 Mora IFV-6a Cheetah AH-9 Pawnee AH-99 Blackfoot CH-49 Mohawk MH-9 Hummingbird PO-30 Orca UH-80 Ghost Hawk Mi-48 Kajman A-143 Buzzard A-164 Wipeout To-199 Neophron Speedboat Swimmer delivery vehicle [Submarine] Assault boat Think that's a long list? That's a lot, but not all! Each of the vehicles have their own unique features. ____________________________________________ I bought Arma 3 during the alpha stage, when it wasn't too great, however, Arma 3 has improved so much, and the developers have made a lot of tweaks/fixes.
supersqwack;-;Been with the series since the original flashpoint. There's simply nothing else like it. It's versatility exceeds anything else out there. Wholeheartedly recommended
-PorkDev-;-;This game is amazing! I enjoy having the more realistic feel, while still maintaining the fun of murder!
DRIZZLE;-;I mean seriously? It may be a laggy piece of absolute cow . But it's Arma in 3. 420/10 Would Blaze.
Not Deidara;-;Iz epic EDIT: Ok so since people probably didn't find this review good enough, I decided to write a real, professionally made review. Pros: First off; the controls are way better, more customizable and generally feel nicer. Secondly; the graphics are absolutely beautiful, and I even got this to (sorta) run on my laptop. Which is wonderful. And finally; The multiplayer is a lot more open, as far as ive seen. You've got Zeus, which is fun when you play with friends, theres Altis Life, Wasteland, and a lot of things I haven't seen in Arma 2 yet. Oh, and Steam Workshop support. Incredible. Cons: As i said earlier, the graphics are absolutely beautiful. Which means you need some high-powered NASA computer to run this on the highest graphical settings. Or you can switch to lowest and have no lag at all. Which in return gives you the world's worst eyecandy. Theres also the long download times (from my experience) when you enter a server with the slightest hint of addons. It seriously took me half an hour when I tried to join a regular Co-op server. Neutral thingys: This game requires a lot of patience and tactical knowledge. And with a lot, I mean like a crapload of it. This isn't your stereotypical pew pew FPS. This is (As it says in the game desc) a military simulator . You'll rarely encounter baddies (from my experience), and when you do its bang bang and you're dead. Which is useful when you're on the winning side. I mean, theres just no hitmarkers. Only death. (I'm looking at you, CoD.. grumble grumble)
Memphistopheles;-;I got in an Altis Life server and was arrested for stealing a police truck
RuZl;-;I find ARMA 3 hard to play. It's single player is though, the AI is merciless and some game mechanics are hard to get under control. But wow, ARMA 3 really comes to live when you play this game online with other people. There are tons of good, fun servers you could lose yourself in for days. Doing missions taking hours at an end, under professional leadership from an HQ, pilots, Squad Leaders and your mates. You get to know them. You don't want to die. You leave no man behind. And after a while, you try to take leadership. And people give you that. The game is though, the community takes that, and owns that toughness by making the rules on yourself as a player though. No lone wolfing, this isnt Battlefield. This is a battlefield.
DoctorMozG;-;Arma 3 makes big steps forward with a huge world and more vehicles and weapons. This time around its trump card is Steam workshop integration though, making downloading mods effortless. A smart move by Bohemia Interactive because it are those mods that will give Arma 3 its long lifespan. Unfortunately Arma 3 is quite inaccessible and doesn't seem to grow along with modern game design on certain fronts. Space time and perseverance are your best friends here, until Bohemia's support starts paying off.
cartof;-;Altis Life is the best mod on this game!
Chef (Fallout 4 hype train);-;great game. 11/10 if you dont mind it murdering your system
Fredo Krueger;-;It has ISIS now
GeekFurious;-;You're going to need a good PC to run this with a reasonable amount of frames, and you're going to need to abandon your Call of Duty mentality to truly enjoy this --and you're also going to want to get serious about the mod community- but if you're a fan of military style games and want a massive environment with no invisible walls, then this is the game for you.
TheChargersKarma;-;The game needs a larger arsenal of guns and more vehicles for civilians, otherwise I see that the game is going along quite nicely.
BobTheHuman;-;spent my first 10 minutes playing black jack at the casino then went up to a rebel base got my license and saw someone get shot
Deltadude;-;It's a amazing simulator, it has amazing communcation techniuges the bring gamers toghethor and make them use there brain more.
Peach;-;this is not a game you play on your own. youll be missrable
Malacate;-;Best game in the world, beautiful graphics...
[upk]zde5469;-;Good game.Super models weapons.Verry good workshop.Good comunity.Verry good editor.Super maps.Verry good models cars,planes,boats,soldiers,houses.Very good citys.
Tface31;-;I recomend this game!!!!!1 botaboom!
thrashrock_thrashjazz;-;GREAT GAME !!! I LOVE IT EVEYTHING ABOUT IT IS REALLY AWSOME!!
Gremillion Dollars;-;The premier military simulator. This game encompasses so much of what can be done in a video game. I've spent a long time mastering small sections of the game, but the level of content here is an ocean. Want to master the handling of medium range assault rifles? That'll take a very long time to become a proficient master, and even then you need to get used to special conditions (night combat, ranges, recoil of the different rifles). Want to master helicopter flight? Don't even get me started. The flight model is excellent, and mastering just one model is going to take you quite a while. Beyond just the detail in each mechanic is the fun had here. Multiplayer servers are sandboxes and turn the game into a free-roam adventure with open-ended goals. Alternatively, you can join servers where you are part of a cohesive unit fighting against other players or AI.
catnapper;-;After spending a fair amount of time with this game and pretending to live on a mediterranean island for the sake of a review, I can say that ARMA 3 has it's priorities straight. The single player campaign is realistic enough and everything else about ARMA 3 is brutal. Remove all thought of Call of Duty or even Battlefield from your mind, try anything you see in CoD and you will DIE and get laughed at. Health regeneration, auto-aim, engagements less that 100 meters, and shotguns are all things you will/should NOT see in ARMA 3. However, you can live every stange military fantasy you wnat to. Shooting people, sniping, killing civilians, being civilians, drones, diver assaults, air support, tanks, cars, SAMs, mortars, helicopters, APCs, towns, camps, hills, forests, valleys, RPGs, and more can all be part of the custom level that you build for yourself or even the world. You owe it to yourself to at least try ARMA 3 at least once.
Yogi;-;This is the future of war games. All it needs now is interactive cockpits for the aircraft, tanks, and other vehicles but the modding community is superb. There's bound to be something for you in Arma. It's not JUST war and guns and tanks and stuff... You can go mountain climbing, scuba diving, skydiving, and even command your own battalion of... butterflies.
Jack Morgan;-;Only game I really play on steam now. Highly recommend getting it if you like realism in games
Zombietimms;-;A very good game,still needs some work on it. I love the arma games and this is the best yet. Keep up the great work guys.
Hackster;-;Great game!!!!
fodderfap.meme;-;i love hand cuffing people and making them bow down and kiss my feet.
Electric Lemon;-;This game is awesome, I have logged more hours into this game than any other game.
d   n l;-;Great game without mods. EVEN BETTER WITH MODS! MY FAVORITE MODS ARE TFAR AND ACRE!
{MGS3}RedNeck_Gamer;-;Great game for hardcore gamers cant wait for what more is to come in this game
Smiley;-;Arma 3 is a masterpiece that i think will be played for a a long time! This game has beautiful graphics of terrain and objects. Gameplay mechanics are quite easy to learn but becoming a master takes time and practice, you maybe able to kill from 100 meters but you will have to train to kill at 1000. There are a wide selection of weapons and clothing for your charicter, ranging from Ghille Suits to Civillian clothing. Where I think this game shines is the scale of combat, With two absolutly huge maps and combat scenarios Arma will never give you the same scenario twice! This isn't any arcade shooter, Arma is a TACTICAL shooter, some would even call it a role-playing game! SUMMARY: BUY this game if you have a moderatly powerfull pc!
jee_george;-;Sandbox multiplayer is awesome. Don't even bother going to in-game gun stores. Grab whatever rifle and equipment you can and make use. I found a submachine pistol and a silencer, a smoke grenade and some glow sticks. Left my car running on a busy road at night with the lights on and watched it. Surrounded it with glow sticks. killed three people and came away with a decent back pack, rifle and grenade launcher and a ghillie suit. With space to pack my handy little PDW. Don't get angry when you get shot after hunting down the perfect kit and have to hike for miles and miles again. Downside @ 29/11/14 Is there are a lot of hackers at present and it's ruining the fun. This game still gets 5 out of 5 stars
UncleKAPPA;-;Best game ever,you should definately try it out!
#1;-;BEST GAME EVER!!! I <3 ARMA!!!
TeH1PERCENT;-;Pretty fun, but hard to get used to playing after playing Arma 2 OA for so long.
Dorothea;-;great game to play with your friends
BabyHead;-;What can I say about this game , Good points is that its very modable and enjoyable with or with out mods , but this game comes to light when it has mods installed . Bad point about the game is the stamina bar as seems the devs had so unfit poor soul run his  off as seems if you run more then 50 m you cant hit thing beacuse of your scope bouncing around all over the place when you stop . But overall it great game to play and the task force radio mod is must adds more depth and realism
Fack The Ripper;-;ArmA 3 is a awesome game, 10/10. Many cools mods and game modes to play online and the single player is fair fun.
olimpiuciocotisan;-;Absolutely love this friggin game!
Fritadelik;-;best war simulation game ever
Brian015;-;It is like real war with slightly worse FPS in multiplayer.
Gamer;-;Very fun game, big guns and big toys to play with
^RForce^Raa;-;This is The Best Game i've ever seen ! xD
Rphrrll;-;ArmA3 brings me back to the original OpFlash games, with slightly less clunky feeling controls. They were always the downfall in these games. I know the "Simulation" that these games are trying to offer do exhibit what would be deemed as clunky controls, but ArmA3 strikes a great balance between realism and gameplay.
TheThrasherAsh;-;Shooty shooty good, driving okay, flying hard. 10/10 bullets either tickle or are fired near you and you die.
Stefan SX;-;Arma 3 does not have time to teach you how to play it. It does not have time to help you find someone to play with. It lacks the common decency to provide a story, of any kind, at release. Bohemia Interactive's sandbox military simulation series began life in 2001 as Operation Flashpoint: Cold War Crisis before the developer retconned its own title, renaming the series Arma. Updating the game for modern PC players was a tall order, and after four long years of development Arma 3 still isn't done. Bohemia Interactive made the decision to release it anyway. Arma 3 may be the most challenging, and the most rewarding, online shooter I have ever played. But it's missing key components  most damning of all a single-player campaign. As a result, it feels more like a huge demo than a finished product.
FateKnife;-;If you want to real reality you must play this game! It's wonderfull...
Reconi.Fi;-;I would recommend the game as played with friends. Campaign alone for example is ing pain in the . The AI companions are  and enemies seem to be at most points superhumans. I mean they aim ridicilously well and they see even the slightest movement in a bush from one click away. I mean, seriously? Then you drop player alone in the middle of these superhumans. "Fun, eh?" Well yeah, if your ing physics would actually work and the forest and bushes would ACTUALLY COVER SOMETHING. I played OPF series from the start and ARMA series from the start, but this campaign and the AI in it is the absolutely worst. But in the other hand when played with friends (with A LOT OF FRIEDS) it is a good game. Player versus player massive multiplayer matches are fun. Their little ing  campaign is not.
Anonymous;-;Awsome game pritty nice grapics ran on full blast fps around 30 but will need a beafy computer to run it on full grapic but i really wish they could combine all arma 2 oa weapons and vehicles into this game and THEN it would be the best arma to me.
-=WHC=- Opiwahn;-;its arma 3 a simulator you can simulate everything from real live to ARMAgedon nice grafics nice gameplay 9/10 almost perfect
Hamerhatsi;-;So this one is a weird one. On the one hand this game can be an amazing amount of fun whilst playing several different mods already integrated into the system. It is some of the most tense fun ive had in a strategic FPS. The game also looks pretty dang good, On the other hand this game screams BETA, with bugs a plenty lack of many features that was avilible in arma 2. For example bi-pod integration still hasnt been going in. That alongside the DLC being added even though the game is extremely unpolished. Simply put: arma 3 is great but also a big dissapointment from me. 6.5/10 p.s performance is still a huge problem for many people so make sure you can run it!
TheG481;-;I have played this game for around 130 hours now and i just extremely enjoy it. Here are some pros and cons. + In-depth combat + Realistic + Infantry, Ground, Water, and Air combat + A  ton of mods + A  ton of custom missions + All the DLC is basically free. (every new feature will be available for everyone. While you cannot drive certain vehicles, you will be able to ride them as passenger. And when there will be new features like the ability to slingload cargo, you can do it as well without paying for the DLC.) - The game doesnt run that well, even on the highest-end machines you most likely won't get more than around 50 fps. - There arent that much servers, gamemodes like Altis Life seem to have taken over the server list, resulting in a low amount of co-op missions. So expect to bring friends to this if you would like to play missions online. - The game's performance is heavily decided by the server. If the server laggs you will not only get lagg, but a low framerate as well. Here are some final ratings as well: Gameplay / Fun = 9/10 Replayability = 10/10 Performance = 6/10 DLC = 8/10 Servers = 5/10
Mr_Turtle;-;This game is really beautiful on Max Settings. Even on low settngs, the game is still visually impressive.The gameplay also is very good and smooth, especially when you jump down some stairs and appear on the roof of a building! 10/10
LT_Jackson;-;Come Join My New Server! Help me expand my Player Base and help the server become popular Arma 3 Epoch with all-terrainpack enabled. - 88.150.150.250:2382 temaspeak 3 - 85.236.100.27:19147
LuxusBarrel;-;I usually love arma but when it crashes (happens 24 hours a day) i get so ing  off! and my arma just decided to think im new and it did not save my changes i did to infi. movment and ext....
Twarmew;-;I can be an elite soldier with a Big  gun while wearing nothing but my underwear.
Nocturnal;-;Arma 3 Is Great!!!! Let me just start by saying are you sick of the troll kiddies running around with the cheapest weapons and using an auto aim assist and killing you right away? I know i am. This game Gives you an immense feel for war and keeps you thinking constantly. Sometimes the Action is spaced out quiet a bit but when the battle hits it is the gaming moments that stay with you forever. Plus Getting that mega kill is something to actually be proud of with your skill and not just stupid luck.
TheWhiteHornet;-;Great for realism and simulation enthusiasts. But if your just buying this for wastelands or because you liked DayZ, you can promptly  off and not get this game.
673499047;-;Very good,very real
ProXy #kenyanscientist;-;Arma 3... where do I start? Let's start with what Arma "is". Arma is a so-called "MILSIM", which basically means "Military Simulator". Unlike Call of Duty or Battlefield, Arma aims to achieve ultimate realism. Maps are massive, a shot in the chest could mean instant death and a shot in the leg means crawling until a medic takes a look at it. Few games match the level of realism that the Arma franchise has, and while the controls can be strange at times and some of the bugs could make the game hilarious instead of serious, the games are loved by the community behind it. STORY I must admit that I haven't delved too deep into the story, but it consists of a number of chapters, the first being "Survive", the second "Adapt", and the third "Win". I got to somewhere around the middle of "Survive", so please don't listen to me to the fullest regarding the campaign. Anyways, you start the campaign as an american soldier stationed on the island of Stratis, which is the smaller of the two maps in Arma 3 (the larget being Altis). The American forces are just preparing to leave the island when they are attacked by an unknown force. Communications are quickly cut, but you manage to get to your squad and together you complete missions around the island (the missions vary from securing crash sites to attacking hostile bases). IMHO the campaign is awesome, and I do believe that there were some ooh's and aah's exclaimed during some points of it. 8/10, great story but once again do not take my word, check the other reviews for a more detailed account on the storyline! And so we move on to the next part! MULTIPLAYER There are mutiple things you can do in the multiplayer (hah get it? no? sorry :c). Would you like to just kick back and play some relaxing roleplay? Then you can do that! Play as an ordinary citizen or a man of the law hunting some apple-stealing, drug-trafficking criminals around the islands! Or maybe you would really like to hop on and play some Wasteland, where you must gather food and water and watch out for other players. You can also gang up with some friends and build a badass base with walls and mortars and machine guns and a whole bunch of stuff, so you have somewhere to go when you're not out hunting players or completing missions around the islands! Other game modes include Domination (COOP vs AI, join up with a group of players and take on the AI as you battle for complete control over Stratis or Altis), King of the Hill (3 teams, BLUFOR, OPFOR and Independent fight each other to control a certain area on one of the islands), Battle Royale (no point in looking for teammates on this one, kill everyone else on the island and claim victory in this intense mod!) and many others. 10/10, amazing multiplayer, great community, one of my best multiplayer experiences ever. GAMEPLAY There are quite a few bugs in the game, however. The ragdolls can sometimes act up and that can be frustrating sometimes, but most of the time it's just funny and they don't exactly ruin the experience. Graphics are top notch, sound is really good (and there are mods that improve them even further!) but the enemy AI can sometimes act like they have no brain. That includes running around in circles when under fire, simply lying down and making no attempt at figuring out where he is taking fire from, but I guess that the AI just thinks that it's so good that it doesn't really need to survive anyways. 7/10, even though the AI is weird at times it certainly does not stop you from having a good time. FINAL VERDICT This review took a whole bunch of my time, and I have probably forgotten what I wrote up at the top, but Arma 3 is overall a great game and is definitely worth it at full price (however I believe that sales are quite common on this game, so keep a look out for that!). Apologies for any grammatical mistakes, English is not my main language. 90/100
Dokkasan;-;The controls in this game are all wonky. You can change them in game, but you can not change views in a vehilcle(there is literaly no button for it). Make sure you have an amazing graphics card if you are going to buy this game. The combat makes you feel like a total noob. When the bullets start flying, your aiming gets all shaky and you cant aim at anything properly.
Fubuki;-;Whatever you do, be thankful this review is up. It might be realistic and such, but the controls are horrible. You are limited to few weapons, and cannot record gameplay footage without setting the game to view in window screen. Don't waste your time downloading this, as it is 11.2 GB, and there's not alot of things to do.
alex :D;-;i dropped the soap
Badmrtickls;-;I killed someone on a go kart with a lightning bolt, then i killed another guy by putting several planes on him that glitched and blew up. Buy this
Am i called this?;-;very difficult to learn, if you just want something like cod or battlefield, dont get. 8.3/10
Jordan;-;Great game you wil have countless hours of fun just with the regular arma 3. Getting bored? Thats fine just jump on a multiplayer server like altis life and you will be able to get many more hours of fun! just make sure your pc can handle it.
TooTights;-;Amazing military sim! Endless expansion posibilities, and already plentiful mods!
joltfreek;-;Bohemias gone to immense effort to create real, immersive environments for Arma 3. Across two sprawling islands youll find all kinds of terrain, from salt-flats to forests to stretches of rocky coastline. Even without a directed experience, just spawning into those maps is a pleasurable experience, letting you explore and discover some amazing virtual places. Arma 3 is also that rare  these days  game that will push all but the most powerful PC hardware. It looks amazing even on older systems, but if you want to crank it up at eye-bleeding resolutions youre going to see performance loss.
YuvonDovah;-;One of my favourite Games ever: definitely my favourite shooter, Almost all of my hours have been placed into Wasteland survival and just practising my helo skills - If you are to pick this game up be aware that there is a steep learning curve and practically every key has a function. I've put 100's of hours into many aspects of the game, and i've still only scratched the surface. One thing i'm eagerly anticipating is the arrival of the 2017 mod which is a Dayz esce revamp of the game, focused more so on surviving then Wasteland.
Wendel101;-;Love this game amazing game to play meet new friends hang out with friends i would recommend this game to everyone i knew.
Dagi;-;Simply Best of its series so far.
King harry_lobster;-;very good role play and domination game but note u need good computer
Reaper;-;If you like Shooter games with diffrent game modes and the army theme then this is the game for you
neonmonkey25;-;(free weekend) GTX 760, intelcore I5, windows 8.1 (64 bit), 8 gigs of ram, directX 11, and the game still runs like crap on the lowest setting. do not recommend.
zGunner;-;Server browser will constantly break my internet connection forcing me to restart my computer. It's amazing how many bugs still exist in this game that were there over a year ago. Really not much has changed since the last free weekend I was in. I would still reccomend a game like ArmA 2, but not this one. Only on the condition that you buy it now while it is 50% off. This game is worth, at a maximum, $30. So now is the only time to buy it, otherwise you should save your money on something better. If you're going to buy, please don't be dumb enough to buy the DLCs. There are hundreds of mods out there to download for free with waaay more effort put into them than these crap DLCs. Meanwhile they continue to ignore major bugs while adding new content among thousands of already available mods. Bohemia has lost my respect with how they treated this game. I'm sick of these developers relying purely on the community to fix their bugs, and create content that should have been in the release of the game. The core game has a very limited selection. The mods are what make it even worth $30. Also, about 60-75% of servers are a bunch of children roleplaying cops&robbers with each other. It's really sad to see a game with so much sandbox warfare potential to be turned into a playground for kids to act out their immature fantasies. The servers with actual gunplay tend to be filled with trolls and of course, more children. The only real way to play and enjoy this game is by joining an organized clan. Don't expect to enjoy yourself too much in combat gamemodes if you don't have a skilled group of buddies. Having friends to play with just helps the game feel more fun regardless. tl;dr Buy while it's half off, otherwise, stay far far away.
NubLife;-;I bought this game day 1 of steam release, it was pretty barebones stuff, a few guns, even less vehicles, 1/3 a campaign. They said more weapons would come, (if you know arma 2, they had dozens of weapons, arma 3 however had less than 10) well more weapons did come, in the form of paid DLC. More vehicles, more paid DLC. Scumbag moves
Wolciara;-;One of the best me game :)
Salty Jim;-;Why play Arma 3 when you could be putting your genitals into a mince meater which would be a lot more fun. I feel like Ive been robbed! Definitely not worth 35.99 -_-
Nightwalker;-;Most if not all reviews of this game took place before they had a campaign, workshop support, and Zeus. I love this game... Thats all i have to say.
NoxV ' NetStalker;-;Gets run over by ATV moving at 60 Mph, only breaks legs. 10/10
[twitch/youtube]BadPro;-;great and awsome military lovers game . you can enjoy how realistic is it , how many weapons it includes . those pretty detailed driving transports and how many different vehicules . the thing that i like is the workshop it s fans are too creative there always something new to try , some mods you will enjoy for free . its developpers aren't lazy at all , there is many updates and many news they are working pretty hard to make this game more special . funny DLCS :D thats my opinion share me with yours i would be glad to hear it :)
(suck ra;-;story it is a soldier that sprays bullets at his enemies and his breathing very fast.his name is arman and he's a good soldier who is not from usa but he thinks the usa is good. his brother is German so he died in the war. arma is now in finding brother's footsteps may make his family had placed! but the poor cope with this?
PearZilLa;-;Tons of fun if you know where to look and when you play with friends (either ones you already know, or ones you meet online). The communities that I have seen online so far are all friendly and play the objective (for the most part). Overall, this game runs great for me with a little optimization and the level of coop and competitive play could last me hundreds of hours of tactical enjoyment.
knaeufle;-;My favorite Multiplayer Game, also bunch of various mods.
Mark Suckerburger;-;really good war game
Playmaker;-;Depends on the mod. Altis Life - Depends on server but most are fun unless you find one that is filled with squeakers and trolls. recommend, http://www.therevolutiongaming.com/ A3L-Glitchy but fun at times, roll back and total loss of bank was turn off after finding out the streamers were comp'd. http://arma3-life.com/ King of Hill, Wasteland fun but rarely find people to play with.
vgscamz;-;Who doesn't love ARMA? :D
Kevinlowks;-;Loving this game, favorite game type to play is King of the Hill. Highly recommended!
Peng voll in die Fresse;-;A lot of fun in general and a whole bunch of awesome mods.
Cerby;-;I have been looking for a game like ArmA 3 since I started with shooters. I always thought Call Of Duty, or Battlefield 3/4 was the most simulated you could get without really going to war. This game is war. This simulator requires players to really try, it is not a run and gun game, you do that, you die. You need to be tactical, aware of your surrondings, and be prepared for anything, from a fireteam of men, to a sniper team, to tanks sitting on the hilll line. Everything about this game is amazing. Grapihc are awesome, if you can run them on normal or higher, the AI, and ragdolling could use some work. One con of this game is the AI, sometimes there smart, sometimes there dumb. They can get hit with a grenade at point blank range, break there legs, lay down and bandage, then get up and run away. Over all, 20/10, would recommend to anyone who wants a good shooting simulator.
(BWco)Adam Smith;-;Game is easily wroth the money, the story mode keeps you on your toes, the online... well what can i say if get tired of one game mode theres lots of other to try, then the workshop add that much more to the game, A great game wroth the buy!
celticwind77;-;Best millitary game sim ever!
Norbert the Nutjob;-;Not worth the 60 bucks but i find its graphics to be a very nice upgrade to arma 2
Microsoft Word;-;briefcase flung me in air n kill me 11/10 wud buy again
Vex;-;I love this game. I transport drugs and sell this for money to buy more drugs :D
Kiserjger;-;Epic: War battles.Ck# It Out
FluX;-;Mad Game, lots of fun, heaps of content.
Smile;-;One of the BEST Tactical Shooters on Market! 9.9/10 EDIT: DLC Policy! really ed up! pay'd 60 for that game, now they want 12,99 for 2 helicopters?!
beer enabler;-;make even less friends than in arma 2 since more people play it and they don't want you on the helecopters even if you promise you'll be nice
HALF COCKED JACK SHAFTOE;-;Got Kidnapped by a gang called "ISIS", they forced me to rob a bank with them, then took me into the mountains and made me fill up their helicopter with heroin and cocaine. When I was done, they got ready to "sacrafice me for Allah", just as they were about to kill me, they police showed up on mass, and killed them all. One of the commanders had responded to my desperate texts, he gave me some food and a free backpack. The system works, would get kidnapped again. 10/10
AOEmpires290;-;Visual Quality - 10 (Outstanding) Gameplay Mechanics - 9 (This may not feel like your average first person shooter.. Slower paced then most mainstream shooters, The controls feel solid and actually shooting someone feels increasingly satisfying. Also the game will slowly force you into using a more planned and strategic tactic when facing your target, as using the "Run & Gun" tactic will get you killed in this War simulator.) Multiplayer - 6.5 (Poor Performance drives away the whole experience.) Sound - 8 (Although clumsy at times, Some sound effects may postively enhance your experience.) I would definately recommend this game.
Purrcy;-;This is a great military simulator, much like ArmA2 but completely improved graphics, dialogue etc. The campaign is pretty long and there is also enough scenarios to keep you busy for a good 30+ hours solo, but after that there the multiplayer which is 100% more fun with friends. Overall, great military simulator.. but it is a SIMULATOR, this isn't Call of Duty fellas, yes there is bang bang in every mission, but it it a simulator (cannot stress enough)! If you want to get the most fun out of this game then you need to role play and not go all CoD style and run and gun everything with 2 legs (save that for multiplayer). Appart from that, I had many hours of enjoyment and many more to come!
MrC00p3r;-;Most imersive shooter I've ever played. Tons of mods and wonderfull gaming experience when you have a performant PC and good clan to play it with ;) Check out Black Legion (http://www.black-legion.co.uk/) to see what we do in Arma III ;)
BigBoss;-;with a 6+ years of gaming. this is the best game i played hands down. with a realistic gamepaly and everything. there is some bugs here and there, but let me tell you even these bugs are fun and enjoyable. i have over 1000 hours of playing this game and i still learn new things about it. GET THIS GAME RIGHT NOW!!!
FallenWolf;-;Pretty Dank in the bank
Lord_GabeN;-;promise not doing this for achievement.
GH0LT;-;Probably the best modern shooter and sandbox game! - Minus points for being a bit glitchy sometimes
Cruncha_Muncha;-;Great Upgrade from arma 2. Highly Recommend!
YippyYu;-;The game is awesome very realistic army simulator.
Irish-ish(VACATION);-;This game is one of the best games I have ever played. It beats CoD and Battlefield by a long shot. The only problem I have with this game is that it crashes alot on lap tops :(
Zoadric;-;Very nice game !
MOV Captain Jim;-;Figured out how to use the new firing positions. Then figured out you could use them to break dance. 10/10
[HSF];-;Arma 3's features in comparison to the previous Arma is sustantial. NPCs no longer have extremely odd path finding patterns, and animations are much smoother. The recorded voices for commands and such are more lively and smoother. NPC Dialogue or qeued dialoge seems more in-tone with the situation. Command voices for specific objectives run smoothly, and actually sound more pleasent. Bohemia Interactive really showed what they can do this time. 5/5
FrAnkie  onPC;-;great game fun playing with friends and just having fun
Big Loaf;-;One of my favorite games on Steam. Has a great variety of ways to play (both in gamemodes and roles). Sounds great and looks great. Only negative thing I can say is that some servers don't restart often enough, leaving the server a bit laggy.
gilmat09;-;my lav got explode by a tente 10/10
Nassadross;-;I dont even own this game 22/10 its okay :IGN
-Nemesis-;-;I cant write reviews but here is an interesting fact: 5 in 4 people dont understand statistics.
DanVonTrap;-;Amazing game. hours of fun played on this and many more to come.
Fireblade7022/Twitch.tv;-;I have heard many things about this game such as its poorly optimized or it's too laggy. Yes it is poorly optimized in some situations but when it comes to graphics, knowyour computer specs and dont argue when it lags because you bought the game without looking at your computer specs and noticing their bad. In my opinion this game is very fun. It is a very realistic game because crashing a car that your in will hurt you. Getting shot in the head will kill you. When sniping there is bullet drop. I love this game not only for its graphics, but mostly for the gameplay. I will note that I reccomend having friends to play with on the game because it's not so fun alone. Well at least there are some nice people in the game, others willbe totlal douches as a teamate. I love to play gamemodes such as King of the Hill, Wasteland, and Battle Royal but not so much. I will rate this game a 8.25/10 due to the lag even on low setting. Also if you have the settings too low for your computer, the game will lag, I can play this game at 50FPS on ultra settings.
Please Understand;-;Like Skyrim with infidels
Peter C;-;After 400 hrs playing ARMA3 i find it exciting and challenging, the editor is another world on its own, then theres muitiplay a whole lot af different roleplay . From police ,dedic,rebel and even sell body parts . I give it a 10 as far as rpg go.
JakeC2000;-;This game is fun to play with friends or by your self. There are lots of game modes you can download and install such as: Battle Royal,Wastland,Altis Life ext. If you are bored of playing multiplayer (Dont know how you would be) you could play the campain or play some of the show cases. 10/10
Josh;-;Pretty hot game. Played it for hours, done everything you can really do and it's still fun. Ape/10.
Callum;-;An amazing game and a great in-depth simulator. Well worth buying if your system can handle it.
James Lundy;-;I shot someone, they died. 10/10
hungerkopf;-;its a great game if you like tactical gameplay
MNation9;-;Arma 3, the best military sim out there. Me and my squad load into the plane, just another drop in an enemy town. The plan was to sabotage th AA so we could carpet bomb the place. Our recon ****** up. We were supposed to drop in far enough away so are plane wouldn't get hit, but apparently the AA were farther up than expected. "JUMP! JUMP! JUMP!" our sargent said. We all jumped. Into the forest Surrounded by the enemy. We all rallied at the plane crash, and decided to fortify there to hold off the enemy. "We will die today men, but for every man hit, ten of their's will fall!" They closed in... We shot six rounds.. They responded with artillary.. oohh, the artillary. I surived with broken legs. just me. All alone. As I crawled through the carnage, I saw sarge, lying their, blood seeping through his cloaths. I black out, from the loss of blood. And I never wake up. Ever, ever, again.
Art Vandelay;-;Buggy as hell. They never fixed weird issues like being able to walk through walls. Hard to tell when you've actually shot someone. No real visual indicator that you've shot someone, so you end up shooting them 5 times out of confusion. Single player campaign seems badly thought out. I basically had to save scum to get off of the first island. AI is awful. No armory mode or quick mission mode. I regret buying this in alpha.
Mr Hotstuff;-;I will never ever buy another mistake (Bohemia Interactive game). I trusted this company and purchased this game in Alpha. Not only did they deliver a buggy failure. They have the nerve of releasing expensive DLCs that are meant to be included in the game. And announcing new games when they haven't even finished whats on their plate. This developer should be renamed as EA v2.1 Never again BI, never again.
Red Falcon;-;a little hard to get use to and takes alot of skill, but is the game of which I have spent the most amount of time on and never get bored of due to the completely dynamic multiplayer and community made missions and mods. This game is truly a hell of an experiance and I personally recommend it especially to persons who may be either interested or are already in the millitary
[KW]Van;-;Workshop is nice. Also a rather nice physics engine and nice multiplayer
Snakelore;-;Arma 3 is amazing, it has lots of variaty and uses tons of tactics and different stratagies. Arma 3 is tons of fun. It is insanely fun with friends. It's a great game and I recommend it to anyone.
Bubbles;-;Can't recommend it more, try it out!
HiddenNinjaCatZ;-;Arma 3 is one of my top 5 favourite games, it has 2 massives maps to play on. And millions of mod like Breaking Point, Arma 3 Life, Battle Royal and many more. Overall this game is massively awesome so why not try it out?
Ethan;-;10 - Graphics 9.5 - Sound 10 - Gameplay 9.7 - Voice Acting 10 - Potential (Modding, and custom mission scenarios) Overal this is a great game!
Hadril|sven;-;Arma 3, another great hit after the Arma 2 from Bohemia Interactive. Great open-world game. Graphics are quite good, with the gameplay and game mechanics. Another feature for this game it is a huge target for modders. Contains many fun modes, as well many co-op modes and multiplayer modes. One of the more popular is the Battle Royal mod. And also the campain is very interesting. On the other hand, the bad things are mostly the optimisation. It's open-world and good graphics come at a heavy price. Takes a good computer to have a full expirience.
YASSS finnaly hit DMG;-;10/10 would be a rabbit again
what now fnatic fanshits;-;Game is  8/8
Cereal.Killer()Matt;-;The most complex and realistic Tactical Military Shooter ... once ghost recon went down the tubes after ghost recon 1 this filled the void for me and gets allot of my attention and game time :)
Deviant Killer;-;I have now been playing ARMA3 for a few weeks or months (Time flies when you're having fun) and it is one of my favourite purchases on Steam. I had ARAM2 and AO (then modded Dayz), so i figured, Why the hell not. For the past 5-10 years i have been more so a fan of multi-player gaming over single-player, thought i thought to myself, i will try this one single first, mainly due to the fact i wanted to know how smooth it ran. Graphics up pretty much full, played it and had an average framerate more than 30FPS, so all is good. I have a little play of single player and start to pick it up. Game looks great. Few Km of open sandbox.Can't complain. I try joining a server. Stratis Wasteland. 70 players, smaller map then the main one. (19.3km or something i think). Spawn in and streight away i head some explosions and firing. Luckily enough on my first go online, i managed to take out the two guys firing and loot a vehicle. Nice rifle and a nightstalker scope. I just sat in a bush, my sights scimming around and taking out the odd players 1 by 1. Night time comes, Change scope to thermals. Beautiful. Hiding up a hill, sat in a bush, with a thermal scope and another 2 clips if ammo to use. I felt how sadistic i had become. Beautiful. This was just wasteland mode. However there are many other modes. Altis RP i would say is the most populated. A role play island where a player will need to gain licenses, buy weapons, vehicles. Basically it's what GTA online would be like. I reccomend picking up some scenarios from the workshop, such as Whole lotta altis and whole lotta stratis. as we as some of the mission generators. If you're amazing at CoD. Don't expect to be amazing at this. This is a real game and does require a lot of skill and thought. No running in expecting to kill 30 in a row.
Beanz6895;-;loved this game from day one, now 6 months later i still love it
=mfp= DjPTTR;-;I Strongly recommend getting this game to anyone that has a good PC and enjoys the likes of battlefield and maybe Call of Duty and anyone that has previously owned a AmrA Game
[SG] WOC D.Byrne;-;Very fun, few FPS issues, but they don't effect it in a mayjor way. Community support is great, developers listen to bug reports. Very wide varity of game modes.
Hypocrite CSGOGAMBLE.COM;-;Knocked a guy out, Stole his kidney then sold it for drug money and got arrested. 11/10 would steal a kidney again
dootz21;-;english no good. hard to get bored playing is game. easy to get hard playing this game.
Msgtjmman;-;This game is now my child.
Dirt Diver;-;After the great Operation Flashpoint (Now Arma: Cold War Assault) the first two ArmAs where not THAT great, but still very good and I enjoyed playing them for a long time. Arma 3 is my favourite part of the trilogy, thanks to a good and thrilling campaign (much better than CoD or BF) and the ArmA formula, that perfectly works now. AI does what you want, their aim is very good and they are very helpful. Enemy seeks cover and is a real threat, which makes the missions very thrilling. Like in the first three Rainbow Six or the first Ghost Recon. The campaign feels very tense, like Operation Flashpoint or the Addon Resistance and I really enjoyed it. The game runs perfect on my two year old PC and it is sure beautiful. The sound is also very good and the rifles dont sound like toyguns which adds to the war atmosphere. Voice acting is great too. The controls are a bit difficult to master at first if you havent played the other games of the series, but you get there with a little practice. The new item system is also very good and now you can quick and easy change weapons, put attachments on your rifle or grab some other gear. Overall this game is one of my favourite games of all time and its a true masterpiece and thanks to the community you have tons of content for free. Get it and enjoy it! :-)
Kangxi the Snaek;-;I disobeyed my 12 Year Old Commanders orders and mortared our supply station.
Endre;-;GIVE ME THIS GAME FOR FREE PLEASEEEEEE
Chef (Fallout 4 hype train);-;great game. 11/10 if you dont mind it murdering your system
Fredo Krueger;-;It has ISIS now
GeekFurious;-;You're going to need a good PC to run this with a reasonable amount of frames, and you're going to need to abandon your Call of Duty mentality to truly enjoy this --and you're also going to want to get serious about the mod community- but if you're a fan of military style games and want a massive environment with no invisible walls, then this is the game for you.
TheChargersKarma;-;The game needs a larger arsenal of guns and more vehicles for civilians, otherwise I see that the game is going along quite nicely.
BobTheHuman;-;spent my first 10 minutes playing black jack at the casino then went up to a rebel base got my license and saw someone get shot
Deltadude;-;It's a amazing simulator, it has amazing communcation techniuges the bring gamers toghethor and make them use there brain more.
Peach;-;this is not a game you play on your own. youll be missrable
Malacate;-;Best game in the world, beautiful graphics...
Supremefist;-;Best thing since Wolfenstein 3D!
[upk]zde5469;-;Good game.Super models weapons.Verry good workshop.Good comunity.Verry good editor.Super maps.Verry good models cars,planes,boats,soldiers,houses.Very good citys.
Tface31;-;I recomend this game!!!!!1 botaboom!
thrashrock_thrashjazz;-;GREAT GAME !!! I LOVE IT EVEYTHING ABOUT IT IS REALLY AWSOME!!
Gremillion Dollars;-;The premier military simulator. This game encompasses so much of what can be done in a video game. I've spent a long time mastering small sections of the game, but the level of content here is an ocean. Want to master the handling of medium range assault rifles? That'll take a very long time to become a proficient master, and even then you need to get used to special conditions (night combat, ranges, recoil of the different rifles). Want to master helicopter flight? Don't even get me started. The flight model is excellent, and mastering just one model is going to take you quite a while. Beyond just the detail in each mechanic is the fun had here. Multiplayer servers are sandboxes and turn the game into a free-roam adventure with open-ended goals. Alternatively, you can join servers where you are part of a cohesive unit fighting against other players or AI.
Plebasaurus Rekts;-;I know it says recommended, but if you have no patience or toleration for bugs, crashes, and a large amount of trolls and hackers don't get this game. That being said, if you are ok with dealing with a un-optimized, buggy, but AWESOME game: it is best to wait for a sale because $60 is a large amount of money. But if you are seriously considering getting the game read below. | | | | \ / \ / \/ \ / Now to that you have the game start to familiarze yourself with the gameplay, but don't get too frustrated because they can be a bit wonky if you have never played a tactical shooter. Once you do this, there are two big player bases to this game: RP (roleplayers) and MIlsimers (hardcore tactical military simulation). I am a mixture between the two but I can't say I'm more towards one or the other. If you like the sound of doing roleplay and want to jump right in, find a good Altis life server my favortite is CGIs server. Oh wait you don't like roleplaying but you really want to be a hardcore milsim player then my suggestion is to find an 'online military unit'. The 15th MEU is a good one as I know a few people that are members. With many of these military simulation units there are age limits, it is usually 17 but all communities are different. I really hope this review helped some people decide if this game is right for them as there are many people that absolutly hate the game and then there are people that are completely adiccted to it and play nothing else.
Ghetto Cornetto;-;Wasteland for days son. <3
Mr. Blonde;-;I have always loved the Arma series and always will but here is my review. Pros -great graphics -great story -workshop compatibility -easy to mod -great voice acting -great animations -great textures -visually pleasing gun models Cons -poor optimization 100000000000000/10 would buy 5 more times
-=CG=- Mik;-;People that make mods for this game do a better job than the devs. 10/10
Ed!;-;The most joy you will get from this game isn't in the playing itself, but instead the creating of your own custom content and seeing others enjoy it.
TheState;-;I've played it every once in a while. Would recommend
Viktor;-;Kim Il-sung approved for NK populace
RedRebel;-;A true life like of experience of war is to be had in this game Certainly the conflicts of the Middle East are encapsulated in the King of the Hill servers. Driving around in your 200 dollar rented pick up truck, not really knowing where you are going, you squint awkwardly into the horizon; then you zoom in with your scope because you realize you are dumb. Seeing little dots appearing you suddenly hear the distinct crack of gun fire. Being the smallest of the three factions you barrel out knowing the overwhelming s***t flinging powers of even just a small detachment of enemies. The gunner fires wildly as the tires blow out and the car smashes into a wall. He is now dead. The passenger attempts to fix the car whilst you take over the gun, firing randomly into the distance until the shooting stops The car is fixed, you are still alive. You make it into town and rendezvous with your comrades. The truck stops as an rpg slams into it, exploading and killing all inside. You are dead. You respawn and do it all again.
mongoose/grinch;-;Coming from Day Z standalone, this game was a new and exciting transition. This game brings up alot of mixed feelings from my time in military service; but humanizes it all in goofy and offbeat player to player combat. the balistics are pretty on point for small arms and heavier weapons; and the tutorial & story mode can be beneficial to all who are new or experienced. I have never met so many young and old players who cooperate more and utilize military terminology, communication, direction and land navigation to enhance my total gaming experience. From gathering a stockpile of marijuana on altis life rpg to spotting a target's range for indirect fire or close air support; Arma 3 has very little in terms of flaws; but it is those small flaws and minor server glitches that add even more to the fun variable.
CanadianDonut;-;This game is definently worth the money. With gameplay ranging from straight out deatmatch, wasteland, Altis life, KOTH, and Zeus, Arma 3 brings a whole new style to first (and third) person shooters. Though there are a  of bugs, in a way, it kinda makes the game. I have had so many countless omments just bursting out laughing at what my friends and I call "Arma Physics", and I feel the bugs are usually hillarious. Finally, don't play campaign. If you wan't a good campaign, buy something like COD. Arma 3 has the most unique multiplayer experience ever, and playing campaign is a waste of your time.
TheRedArmy;-;if you like war, rpg and survival this is your game but... if you like realistic physics then this is your nightmare :)
Warr007;-;This ame sucks I can't stop playing it
3EZ;-;Very Good Game, maybe not worth 35 but I advise getting it when it is on sale! 9/10
Etash;-;Very cool, Very swag I live it
d3mol1t1on;-;I've only played it for a few minuets..(lol) i really dont play much else. very good game! extrmely long learning curve if you're new to arma in any way.. bye bye COD & MWF.
SinasXbox;-;This Game Is Very Very Awesome.
Spyder;-;This game is a sandbox, and what you get out of it is what your imagination or the community behind you puts into it.
Fly like Adler #Burr;-;Wasted 200 hrs of my life 10/10
[UmbrA] /interd/ (Ace);-;A crazy amount of single and multiplayer content just like arma 2 but way more responsive with some new welcome additions to the already immersive experience. If you like massive battlefields and as close to real life combat this is state of the art!
kaisukaru;-;reasons to play arma3: arma rp servers altislife etc Battleroyale Epoch, breakingpoint etc crashed my truck full of cocaine in a random location in the middle of nowhere next to nothing, thought all my work was wasted, then out of nowhere a dude runs out of a bush, repairs my car, i tell him, i have no money with me, but i have coke, gave him a bit, and he ran away in a random direction 10/10 would crash my car again
Bloo Flar3;-;Great game, love it. Problems with helicopters and its blades, might have been updated but still a great game (And car hitpoints are messed, so if you ram someone in the back your tires go =/ )
Angry_Neeson_52;-;Fun game very badly optimized you will have tons of problems with your game and get low fps but if you have a really good pc that can play on Ultra with 60+ FPS then you will probably get 20-50 FPS but there is a way top fix that if you really want to fix it but you dont have to if you can deal with a lower frame rate defintaly a fun game i cant see playing it alone very much must have friends in this a lot of people in this game can be either extreme A holes or really serious but fun people some servers require you to sign up and be accepted in but those can be the best i do recomend but only if it is on sale for $35 or lower. Hope this helped you.
KK Kafe;-;Even though I just started playing this game, I would already say it was worth my $60. The graphics are amazing and the detail makes everything look cool af. The only cons I would say are there are so many different controls that you will be referring to the field manual very often. Also, the keybindings are very awkward. For people that play different FPS often and are used to things like ctrl or c for crouch or space to jump or e for interact, they'll be annoyed when they constantly forget it's x to crouch. I was also sort of  that I couldn't change the keybindings...
sam.watkins;-;First off i havent played enough of this game to write a full review i just want to shout out to all the people tempted by this game in the sale. This game is amaziing, or atleast what ive played of it so far. I loved arma 2 but it felt a little bit stale compared to this game. the world and charicters just feel that little bit more real which really help the immersition of a game like this. Music is good and can really build tenstion when needed and hype you up for the big fight upcoming. I would highly recomend this game to anyone intrested in both fps and stratagy fans. I would also recommend it to people who are intrested in warfair in generall. You will not be disapointed ! (full review in an update once ive clocked in enough hours in this very indepth combat simulater)
Shoubert;-;There are so many servers out there, that being a new player to ARMA 3, does not constitute childish behavior of admins, that say that I am being ignorant. For that matter, go have a nice 13year old life. The server IP I would suggest for you to avoid is Karmics PVE/LIFT/MISSIONS/TRADERSTOCKED at IP 24.123.11.106:2302. Complete lack of social skills that admin had. Just because I did not constantly check my side bar, does not make me ignorant. I am still learning this game and I really dont give two  about who runs the flipping server. I only want to have fun, while learning the game, and not be harassed when I log in about reading the mother flippin side chat/bar. For your information, I do read whatever come up in the beginning, just to see if anything important shows up. If not, I just walk or run around and play. I give two fingers up for that server and admin. (to.ot)
Catelyn Stark;-;You can do stuff in this game
Seko*TRADING VULCAN*;-;Very nice and cool game!
Reconi.Fi;-;I would recommend the game as played with friends. Campaign alone for example is ing pain in the . The AI companions are  and enemies seem to be at most points superhumans. I mean they aim ridicilously well and they see even the slightest movement in a bush from one click away. I mean, seriously? Then you drop player alone in the middle of these superhumans. "Fun, eh?" Well yeah, if your ing physics would actually work and the forest and bushes would ACTUALLY COVER SOMETHING. I played OPF series from the start and ARMA series from the start, but this campaign and the AI in it is the absolutely worst. But in the other hand when played with friends (with A LOT OF FRIEDS) it is a good game. Player versus player massive multiplayer matches are fun. Their little ing  campaign is not.
Anonymous;-;Awsome game pritty nice grapics ran on full blast fps around 30 but will need a beafy computer to run it on full grapic but i really wish they could combine all arma 2 oa weapons and vehicles into this game and THEN it would be the best arma to me.
-=WHC=- Opiwahn;-;its arma 3 a simulator you can simulate everything from real live to ARMAgedon nice grafics nice gameplay 9/10 almost perfect
Hamerhatsi;-;So this one is a weird one. On the one hand this game can be an amazing amount of fun whilst playing several different mods already integrated into the system. It is some of the most tense fun ive had in a strategic FPS. The game also looks pretty dang good, On the other hand this game screams BETA, with bugs a plenty lack of many features that was avilible in arma 2. For example bi-pod integration still hasnt been going in. That alongside the DLC being added even though the game is extremely unpolished. Simply put: arma 3 is great but also a big dissapointment from me. 6.5/10 p.s performance is still a huge problem for many people so make sure you can run it!
TheG481;-;I have played this game for around 130 hours now and i just extremely enjoy it. Here are some pros and cons. + In-depth combat + Realistic + Infantry, Ground, Water, and Air combat + A  ton of mods + A  ton of custom missions + All the DLC is basically free. (every new feature will be available for everyone. While you cannot drive certain vehicles, you will be able to ride them as passenger. And when there will be new features like the ability to slingload cargo, you can do it as well without paying for the DLC.) - The game doesnt run that well, even on the highest-end machines you most likely won't get more than around 50 fps. - There arent that much servers, gamemodes like Altis Life seem to have taken over the server list, resulting in a low amount of co-op missions. So expect to bring friends to this if you would like to play missions online. - The game's performance is heavily decided by the server. If the server laggs you will not only get lagg, but a low framerate as well. Here are some final ratings as well: Gameplay / Fun = 9/10 Replayability = 10/10 Performance = 6/10 DLC = 8/10 Servers = 5/10
Peter Hale;-;Arrested for cooking meth 10/10
DR.NOMAD;-;Fun game, still needs some work on to fix de-sync and on ingame physics. apart from that its a good game, too bad I gotaa run it on low =(
3spooky5me (  );-;Played it for some time when it was free BEST GAME EVA if ya have the muneyz buy this! :) it has allot of mods to so :*
Justin44;-;awsome game heapz of mods to play
Clyde;-;Fckin nice game isnt it
=AJSA= Humorousone;-;Just like arma 2, there's a huge amount of variety in gameplay with this game. The graphics are fantastic, although most people probably won't be able to run this game on full settings at a reasonable framerate. Worth picking up, even if you're not planning to play it in the immediate future.
hydrohornet;-;1337/10 would play again
Orbital_Duck;-;Stole a tank and drove over my friend, got launched into the air and exploded on landing. 10/10 would kill my friends again
Onakagai;-;Do you like to spend 30 minutes waiting to get deployed, only to have your helicopter shot down by an enemy jet? How about spending 20 minutes to get the the AO only to realize that your team has already captured it? Do you want to know the feeling of waiting for hours to get into combar, just like real life? If you want real military simulation (including the time it takes to get into combat) then this game is for you.
Sogra;-;Realy nice game... a few bad hacks and buggs still out for it but over all very good game
Mik Mogus;-;Dear Diary I have recently been deployed to Altis it is my first tour of duty and already things are completely messed up I watched the Lance Corporal in my company try to fast rope and he ended up going through the roof of the helicopter surprisingly he didn't die until about 5 minutes later when he got ran over by a drunker contractor with severe road rage problems. The second day didn't fair much better the staff sargeant and our driver were shot by snipers who then proceeded to come over and tell us how we "got rekt" right before they stole our truck and our canned beans. Day 3 was even worse we had to walk 20 km back to base because of the theft of our truck which we did find crashed into those sub compacts that can go 300km/h, we lost Simmons that day.....thank god we had ketchup. Day 4 was the worst day we got attacked by the snipers again.I have yet to fire my weapon at an enemy I pass the time by going on 10km heights only to be chased by the drunken contractors again and masturbating freciously, I find myself getting angry at our policies we can't go out into the field with our issued rifles instead we have to give money to the local shopkeep to buy our rifles and ammo his name is Billy he is a nice guy. I still have yet to take somebody down I did fire my pistol at an enemy only to be winged by a sniper's bullet as it killed our company engineer. After the last day of my deployment I am happy to leave Altis we are now heading for another island called Stratis to help with the war effort we will see how everything turns out. Day 153...........all is lost I ate another PFC again 12/10 would get eat again
BIZARE;-;Make arma not war! arma is the best military simulator out there! You will not believe the hours you can throw away at this game while playing the endless multiplayer servers such as life! - in which nothing can compete!!! Grab some friends and join a server, only then shal you understand! Brilliant. 9/10
L;-;A fun game, well can be fun, if played with the right people on the right servers on the right game mode... have fun!!
Big Green1981;-;it is a cool game i like it =)
hellz^;-;This is my first time playing the Arma series and I must say this game has changed my perspective of military-style FPS games. The realism is phenomenal and it keeps me coming back for more. Huge learning curve when trying to remember all the commands associated to the game which can get frustrating at times but once you get handle on those it's a lot easier. Outside of that, this game has something going whether it's the close-to-reality gameplay or all the other mods you can discover or the required teamwork needed to be succesful in crushing your opponent. Hands down my favorite game currently in my library.
snowwalker;-;after you play this game ones ..you will never play another
Jordan;-;Great game you wil have countless hours of fun just with the regular arma 3. Getting bored? Thats fine just jump on a multiplayer server like altis life and you will be able to get many more hours of fun! just make sure your pc can handle it.
TooTights;-;Amazing military sim! Endless expansion posibilities, and already plentiful mods!
joltfreek;-;Bohemias gone to immense effort to create real, immersive environments for Arma 3. Across two sprawling islands youll find all kinds of terrain, from salt-flats to forests to stretches of rocky coastline. Even without a directed experience, just spawning into those maps is a pleasurable experience, letting you explore and discover some amazing virtual places. Arma 3 is also that rare  these days  game that will push all but the most powerful PC hardware. It looks amazing even on older systems, but if you want to crank it up at eye-bleeding resolutions youre going to see performance loss.
YuvonDovah;-;One of my favourite Games ever: definitely my favourite shooter, Almost all of my hours have been placed into Wasteland survival and just practising my helo skills - If you are to pick this game up be aware that there is a steep learning curve and practically every key has a function. I've put 100's of hours into many aspects of the game, and i've still only scratched the surface. One thing i'm eagerly anticipating is the arrival of the 2017 mod which is a Dayz esce revamp of the game, focused more so on surviving then Wasteland.
Wendel101;-;Love this game amazing game to play meet new friends hang out with friends i would recommend this game to everyone i knew.
Dagi;-;Simply Best of its series so far.
King harry_lobster;-;very good role play and domination game but note u need good computer
Reaper;-;If you like Shooter games with diffrent game modes and the army theme then this is the game for you
Motball;-;very good, poorly optimized, but very good
Meh;-;I don't even know why I keep playing this game. 10/10
malamechka;-;Hello ARMA i will just go streight on and say it's a good game worth evry 'penny of the money they ask for .
bot grzly;-;Great game for anyone looking for a realistic war game. Probably the closest thing you'll actually get to shooting people. 10 potatoes/10 mushrooms.
Tommygun0428;-;This is great game very fun to play i mostly play altis life which is prety cool how everything works the storyline for single player is fine all together a great game
Emsraven;-;good game, great fun to play with friends
jens;-;really good game !
Can I eat this game for protein?;-;I have always been a fan of the ARMA series because its really different than the other shooters. There are so many different ways to play this game, I spend hours scripting and fooling around in the editor for my own enjoyment. I don't play multiplayer that much but it's still a great experience when I get to it. This game is very heavily GPU and CPU dependant so I wouldn't reccomend this to people who have a low-mid range gaming PC. Mid ranges might still be able to run it but you will get lots of FPS drops below 30 fps. This game is really fun and easy to get into. I am proud of the work that Bohemia Interactive is doing and continue to be a fan of their titles. I rate this game a 9.5/10.
..R.X.S.;-;V good game, altis is best mod :D
Spridits84;-;please give me back my time what I spend playing this excellent game :D
Dr. Dank;-;Joined altis life. Met man willing to assist me. Trusted man. Man gets gun. Man ties me up. Man steals pants. 10/10 would get pants stolen again.
Tobias the Great;-;1st time playing this I go on altis life with a friend, heres how it went: We spawned, bought a bag and a hat each, went picking apples for a few hours Then bought a car each and went to do some delivery missions My friend crashed and I drove 18.5km to repair his car, only to find he was dead 2 paramedics came and revived him, I took the hat from my dead friends body first and offered it as payment The girl took the hat because the guy didn't like it and then accused me of being sexist because he wanted my hat He chased me around his ambulance for 10 minutes shouting 'GIVE ME THE F***ING HAT' I dropped the hat, drove off only to see the ambulance over take me and get blown up by terrorists I then burned in the wreck trying to get my hat back 11/10
-BlackBurn;-;Almost 40 hours into the game and I can honestly say it's the best game I've purchased on Steam, amazingly fun, action packed and a lot of things to do, never gotten tired of it and I'll continue to play it until I find another game as funny as this one.
Bulbsy;-;Great looking, great playing, great multiplayer. It's Battlefield, just not for babies.
Dezzre;-;10/10 would dickbutt again.
Dll;-;Coming up on 1000 hours of play time, and I still enjoy it.
super is dooper CLUTCH;-;its cool
PO1 Loupis;-;Great game for anybody sick of the run and gun play style of CoD, Battlefield, and so on. The editor is fun and easy to understand, the multiplayer is a bit laggy, but other than that, perfect. The community in Arma is the best I have seen in any game, and I think you should join it.
SMALLZZ;-;Awesome Game. Would definitely reccomend
Not Hitler;-;GO BUY IT!!!!!! 8,8/10
toasty54;-;I don't even own this game and I'm writing this review, but I really wish I had this game. It's good.
Bob Marley #nofrickensound;-;the game sucks really laggy if your on a laptop and other computers
Arogon;-;Best PC game.....nough said....
Deresolution;-;Absolutely love this friggin game!
Twitch.tv/Clix4Knifes;-;Unlike Arma 2 , Arma 3 can give much more. Not that Arma 2 is bad its just that Arma 3 is like gmod. If you want to play DarkRP you join a server other than downloading the addons and only picking from a small ammount of servers sometimes. Along with the ease of access to the numerous amounts of gamemodes it also has a certian play style to it.
PowerButton;-;basically play it, horses/10
Onetimeseeker;-;A relentless pseudo-turn based dungeon crawler, with no end of challenge. The game features only two immediate and apparent difficulties: Too Easy, and Easy. Don't let these difficulty titles fool you, they're a lot more daunting than they seem. The dungeons are unforgiving, one mistake or failure to prepare can ultimately lead to your cascading loss of the dungeon. The already challenging difficulties can be further multiplied by selecting different escape pods that give new rules to your dungeon. The greatest enemy you will face in the dungeons isn't the monsters, it's the random number generator. What's in the next room? Monsters? Dust? A much needed damage-per-second, or utility hero? Maybe the room will be empty. Who know's what's in store for you in the depths of the Dungeons of the Endless. This game is not for those who are looking for a casual dungeon crawler.
josh;-;amazing game. probably my most favourite. worth every penny.
Panther;-;This aint cod = 10/10
Petyr Baelish;-;Great game, lots of fun. but... They really need to fix all the F****** CRASHING! One of the best games ever for 5 mins and then, BOOM!, "Too much fun detected, must crash", such Bulls***. 10/10
Nick;-;This game is amazing. While the campaign and "vanilla" multiplayer are extremely fun, it's not even the tip of the iceberg in terms of gameplay. The real experience comes with the mods, scripted game modes, and editor included within the game, or downloadable through various websites. What Bohemia Interactive has done is give those with a vision the incredibly powerful engine (and therefore a means) to create the amazing gamemodes you can download anywhere and play.
real life puta;-;Immediately upon entering a rp server, I was asked to enter a strange vehicle (Held at gunpoint of course). I hopped into the back of a black pick up truck and an invisible force prevented me from leaving. I was then driven halfway across the island. It was a long trip, the strange man in the front seat told me a few stories, some very touching others not as much. By the end of the journey, I felt much closer to the not-so-strange-anymore man. Our brief 15 minutes together had me believing I had found a new friend. A companion in this bleak world. That belief was soon torn apart as the man in the front seat let out a guttural scream and drove us both into a lake. Your experience in Arma 3 could be similar. 10/10
Nathan;-;If you want a really good war game and don't want autistic five year old yelling "HARD SCOPER" or the game telling you "You are leaving the Battlefield"
Charlie Kelly;-;I was able to pick up a snake. 10/10
C02NVENT.appx;-;This FPS is quite unique. Instead of only pewpewpew or team fight, this game provides a *real* battlefield, not like DICE's Battlefield series.I won't call it a game but a military simulation software.And there's plenty of mods in this game, so it's very playable. One of my friend played this game for 60hrs in 2 weeks.Since this game is for the hardcore players, so it wouldn't be very friendly to newcomers. Best military simulator ever.10/10. Also BTW, DON'T THINK YOU CAN PLAY THIS GAME WITH IT TOLD YOU THE MINIMAL SYSTEM REQUIREMENT OF 8800GT. My GTX460 still sucks for almost half of time.
Kimpel;-;This game is terrible, you should totally play it!
gilmat09;-;my lav got explode by a tente 10/10
Nassadross;-;I dont even own this game 22/10 its okay :IGN
-Nemesis-;-;I cant write reviews but here is an interesting fact: 5 in 4 people dont understand statistics.
DanVonTrap;-;Amazing game. hours of fun played on this and many more to come.
Fireblade7022/Twitch.tv;-;I have heard many things about this game such as its poorly optimized or it's too laggy. Yes it is poorly optimized in some situations but when it comes to graphics, knowyour computer specs and dont argue when it lags because you bought the game without looking at your computer specs and noticing their bad. In my opinion this game is very fun. It is a very realistic game because crashing a car that your in will hurt you. Getting shot in the head will kill you. When sniping there is bullet drop. I love this game not only for its graphics, but mostly for the gameplay. I will note that I reccomend having friends to play with on the game because it's not so fun alone. Well at least there are some nice people in the game, others willbe totlal douches as a teamate. I love to play gamemodes such as King of the Hill, Wasteland, and Battle Royal but not so much. I will rate this game a 8.25/10 due to the lag even on low setting. Also if you have the settings too low for your computer, the game will lag, I can play this game at 50FPS on ultra settings.
Please Understand;-;Like Skyrim with infidels
Peter C;-;After 400 hrs playing ARMA3 i find it exciting and challenging, the editor is another world on its own, then theres muitiplay a whole lot af different roleplay . From police ,dedic,rebel and even sell body parts . I give it a 10 as far as rpg go.
JakeC2000;-;This game is fun to play with friends or by your self. There are lots of game modes you can download and install such as: Battle Royal,Wastland,Altis Life ext. If you are bored of playing multiplayer (Dont know how you would be) you could play the campain or play some of the show cases. 10/10
Josh;-;Pretty hot game. Played it for hours, done everything you can really do and it's still fun. Ape/10.
Callum;-;An amazing game and a great in-depth simulator. Well worth buying if your system can handle it.
James Lundy;-;I shot someone, they died. 10/10
hungerkopf;-;its a great game if you like tactical gameplay
Whocanmakeasunset;-;Great game with really good features. Even if you have Arma 2 you should really buy this game too. The only negitive things about it is: You need a good PC(I mean good), I advise checking the minimum requriments before you buy, Its a bit over priced (Should be about 25) and it crashes occasionally. Other wise its a fantastic strategic first and third person shooter with the most realism i have ever seen. If you do buy Arma 3, I would recomend downloading the battle royale mod via the internet. It is essentially the Hunger Games except with guns. It provides me with hours of fun.
Cameron;-;Great Game!
Batman?;-;Arma 3 is my favorite simulation game I have played on Steam. It's fun to play and you won't get tired of it. The workshop is amazing for Arma there are always lots of missions to play. The helicopters and jets are fun to fly around in. I don't like that there are limited amounts of weapons (so if you want more guns you need to download a mod.), there is also no melee attacks. over all Arma 3 is a really fun game and I highly recommend this game.
Klink264;-;Wait. I don't own this game. HOW CAN I MAKE A REVIEW FOR IT?!?! I'VE NEVER EVEN PLAYED IT!
=DGR=Bilco;-;Absolutely love it!
Twarmew;-;I can be an elite soldier with a Big  gun while wearing nothing but my underwear.
Nocturnal;-;Arma 3 Is Great!!!! Let me just start by saying are you sick of the troll kiddies running around with the cheapest weapons and using an auto aim assist and killing you right away? I know i am. This game Gives you an immense feel for war and keeps you thinking constantly. Sometimes the Action is spaced out quiet a bit but when the battle hits it is the gaming moments that stay with you forever. Plus Getting that mega kill is something to actually be proud of with your skill and not just stupid luck.
TheWhiteHornet;-;Great for realism and simulation enthusiasts. But if your just buying this for wastelands or because you liked DayZ, you can promptly  off and not get this game.
XxZITRONxX;-;Sick of the absurdness of the Call Of Duty franchise or the so called "realism" of the Battle franchise? Well switch to ARMA. With stunning graphics and amazing lighting effects. The realism in this game might be too much for some, but that's what the game's about, true realism. No idiot sprinting with a sniper rifle or ramming a jet at tanks here. This game is for the mature audience, not prestige 12 year olds.
((-THC-)) The Human Boss;-;Stop playing fake military games (aka Battlefield, Call of Duty, Combat Arms) and start playing some real ones. This game separates the kids from the men.
Monocle Man;-;Best game for multiple reasons: The singleplayer is actually good which I did not imagine. The variety of multiplayer servers and game mode is amazing and can do so much, like role playing, taking over an objective and some other stuff. The differences between this and arma 3 is so different, like scuba diving gear and . Anyway, overall, I think you should get this game if you are debating it but you may need a good rig to run it.
673499047;-;Very good,very real
Ghostramun the Slave Trader;-;Arma 3... where do I start? Let's start with what Arma "is". Arma is a so-called "MILSIM", which basically means "Military Simulator". Unlike Call of Duty or Battlefield, Arma aims to achieve ultimate realism. Maps are massive, a shot in the chest could mean instant death and a shot in the leg means crawling until a medic takes a look at it. Few games match the level of realism that the Arma franchise has, and while the controls can be strange at times and some of the bugs could make the game hilarious instead of serious, the games are loved by the community behind it. STORY I must admit that I haven't delved too deep into the story, but it consists of a number of chapters, the first being "Survive", the second "Adapt", and the third "Win". I got to somewhere around the middle of "Survive", so please don't listen to me to the fullest regarding the campaign. Anyways, you start the campaign as an american soldier stationed on the island of Stratis, which is the smaller of the two maps in Arma 3 (the larget being Altis). The American forces are just preparing to leave the island when they are attacked by an unknown force. Communications are quickly cut, but you manage to get to your squad and together you complete missions around the island (the missions vary from securing crash sites to attacking hostile bases). IMHO the campaign is awesome, and I do believe that there were some ooh's and aah's exclaimed during some points of it. 8/10, great story but once again do not take my word, check the other reviews for a more detailed account on the storyline! And so we move on to the next part! MULTIPLAYER There are mutiple things you can do in the multiplayer (hah get it? no? sorry :c). Would you like to just kick back and play some relaxing roleplay? Then you can do that! Play as an ordinary citizen or a man of the law hunting some apple-stealing, drug-trafficking criminals around the islands! Or maybe you would really like to hop on and play some Wasteland, where you must gather food and water and watch out for other players. You can also gang up with some friends and build a badass base with walls and mortars and machine guns and a whole bunch of stuff, so you have somewhere to go when you're not out hunting players or completing missions around the islands! Other game modes include Domination (COOP vs AI, join up with a group of players and take on the AI as you battle for complete control over Stratis or Altis), King of the Hill (3 teams, BLUFOR, OPFOR and Independent fight each other to control a certain area on one of the islands), Battle Royale (no point in looking for teammates on this one, kill everyone else on the island and claim victory in this intense mod!) and many others. 10/10, amazing multiplayer, great community, one of my best multiplayer experiences ever. GAMEPLAY There are quite a few bugs in the game, however. The ragdolls can sometimes act up and that can be frustrating sometimes, but most of the time it's just funny and they don't exactly ruin the experience. Graphics are top notch, sound is really good (and there are mods that improve them even further!) but the enemy AI can sometimes act like they have no brain. That includes running around in circles when under fire, simply lying down and making no attempt at figuring out where he is taking fire from, but I guess that the AI just thinks that it's so good that it doesn't really need to survive anyways. 7/10, even though the AI is weird at times it certainly does not stop you from having a good time. FINAL VERDICT This review took a whole bunch of my time, and I have probably forgotten what I wrote up at the top, but Arma 3 is overall a great game and is definitely worth it at full price (however I believe that sales are quite common on this game, so keep a look out for that!). Apologies for any grammatical mistakes, English is not my main language. 90/100
The Timmigrant;-;Brock the Rock approves.
jABRiL;-;mod breaking point dont miss it
buttcakes;-;Definietly not worth the money. Dissapointment of the year 2013, offers nothing significantly new nor is it even that good of a game overall. I regret getting this game, while ArmA 2 is probably one of my best purchases ever.
=);-;Bad game. Horrible game engine. System requirements for what? Nope company. Few models. Multiplayer always glitches. Waste of money.
DtK.GRIFF;-;Pros: Better Graphics Better Controls Better Sound Cons: Same laggy multiplayer as Arma 2 Same terrible interaction system Still using outdated Arma 2 mod tools (All mods are just ports) Most vehicles and weapons are the same between factions, just different textures Still uses 2004 Netcode Its trying to be more casual As of right now, I do not feel as if this game is worth the $60, it still plays like it's in Alpha. Unless they release proper mod tools, I would not buy until it drops atleast 50% in price.
Duck Hunter;-;Still runs like a big pile of poopydoodoo. Single player campaign is not finished. Feels like a beta but it is the "official release".
HighBeard;-;ARMA 3 is a military simulator, It gives the game a very realistic feel to it but the only issue is the fact that the developers of the game break things quite often and don't fix them for extended periods of time. Such as the new update that came out today.
Jeshwah;-;Very hard to get bored of, I love military games myself and this is by far my most favorite game and I haven't even played much.
Lacka Task;-;Its like GTA but in a military way. - the map is ing huge! i never seen anything like this in anygame I also like how you can build your own forts and hold your territory and stop enemies from getting past ya by placing walls around your area and also place military cargo towers and have you and your fellow sniper team mates go on top of them and look around for any traspassers Game has so many choices of misc, items and weapon attachments and many tools and resources and the cars are good too! but also you don't have to play in a military style if you want, you can play as a normal citizen man and do your everyday life story! There is nothing to complain about because this game is ing great. I run this game on very high and i get 25 to 50 fps, i had no problem at all with bugs so far. This game hass amazing graphics, the textures look amazing, the models look very nice, the effects, lights and shading look very realistic! best graphics on a open world game so far for me Graphics 10/10 Gameplay 9/10 Map 9/10 Weapons 8/10 Worth the $ bought this for 30$ when it was on sale. BUY IT IF YOU HAVEN'T
[1stCav]Bannon;-;The game is Great, but when I try to host my game crashes!!
Cryo Anubis;-;i git it for free and now its not why
Holiday;-;It's frustratingly fun. So, thumbs up.
Tired Hippo;-;Arma 3 is fun
Patient 000;-;Altis life with friends is hours of fun
crustN;-;Great, immersive shooter! Do not recommend for Call of Duty players, it is nothing like CoD!
Djordjano # NA COPONA;-;one of the best games i have played !!!!!!!!!!
Maine Coon;-;There are lots of bugs and poor design choices, that's for sure. The graphics aren't that great and the game runs like crap (sometimes 25 fps on my top end system). The game can also be really boring and frustrating (like when you get stuck on rocks and have to restart a 2 hour mission). That said, I definitely recommend this game for someone who's tired of the same ol arcade shooters. Before I played Arma, I thought Battlefield 3 was a military simulator (lel). This game is nothing like call of duty. In arcade shooters like CoD, there's tons of action, all the time, and it gets mind numbing. In Arma, action is pretty infrequent, but when it does happen it's really intense and unforgiving. The missions are also very sandbox; you can plan out your own strategies instead of just running through ACTIONPACKED!!!!!, repetitive levels. It's a hard game to learn. It uses almost every button on the keyboard. To this day I still don't know how to do some things, such as use laser guided bombs. If you're looking for a challenging, intense "true pc game" you can't go wrong with Arma III.
inactive;-;First i want to start off with the graphics... AMAZING!!! Next it is a fun game, many many many game modes to play. I think there is some gamemodes that seem nerdy like RPG, but give it a try it is fun. This game with the graphics it is hard to run, but you can also optimize it a bit, and when i mean a bit you can increase the fps 10-15 with easy steps. Sum it up GET IT!!
Pork Sword;-;This combines the FPS that every serious FPS military gamer would want to play, It has great customization for your apparel, the guns are also easily customizable and it looks great on ultra high, even better is the fact that it has a very active gaming community and workshop items are constantly being added. Also, when you kill people you can rob their pants. 11/10
DarkphoenixZ;-;Military simulation at its best. If you want to try something different other than arcade COD/BF, definitely give this a try.
donk momos;-;I have it now and I like it
Ziwo;-;Best Tactical FPS Ever! Really Keeps You On You Heels.
Jack Frost;-;fun game all around
LlamaPotato;-;Glitches Thats all I can say Made it absolutely horrible to play.
[KW]Van;-;Workshop is nice. Also a rather nice physics engine and nice multiplayer
Zat, Zato n' Eddie;-;i'm just so glad this game doesn't have dayz.
Uganda Man;-;This game is awesome. I just got it and its hella confusing. Get this game. Play this game. Learn the game. Dominate this game.
Poopie2;-;Banned for someone elses fault Period Life in altis gets givin million bux BI bans me  you Bohema!  you!
- Captain Hatsune Miku -;-;War changes people.. >Taking a stroll through the woods in single player campaign. >Hear a loud explosion. Look over and my sergeant is dead. >Killed by landmine >Kneel over his body crying >"Sergeant Adams no!" >Im lost without him. >I know what I must do. >I must become Sergeant Adams. >I Remove all of my cloths while i stare over his lifeless body >Emerge from the woods 20 Mins later wearing bloody cloths and a helmet >Return to camp >"Sergeant Adams Reporting for duty!" >No one asks why I'm wearing his cloths >I continue to wear the helmet throughout the campaign >Adams is love, Adams is life. 10/10 Would PTSD again
UPUU - I HATE SMURFS;-;Its great! The vanilla game is fun to play, and when mods are installed the game is even better! Play this game if you: Like aircraft Like tanks Like open world games Like to explore Like to destroy things Like to play multiplayer Like to mess around Like to rekt scrubs 8/8 m8
Eagle;-;Bohemia Interactive made their debut with Operation Flashpoint and then changed to Arma series afterwards. Since the first installment it has been downhill up to third one. The engine is heavy, unoptimised, clunky for smooth gameplay no matter what setup you may find for your PC. The menu and UI interface is also archaeic and still as slow as it was in OFP days. I can't see justification for this game unless it would be around 4,90 and even then it's not worth your time. The map is boring and unimaginative compared to that of Chernarus, Sahrani and the multiple locations of OFP. As for gameplay the shooting is well done and the many ways of controlling your character is definitely the best of the industry has to offer. It's unfortunate that the teamplay and coordination falls down to its own clunkiness. Finally the modding is still there which offers replayability and whatever people come up with to use but still I find the engine and other problems within the core too deep to actually be worth of one's time.
Bubbles;-;Can't recommend it more, try it out!
Boe;-;10/10 will ruin your life.
GreedyGaunlet;-;If your looking for a review on this game you've come to the wrong place, but if your looking for an outstanding pie recipe you've come to the right place. Ingredients: 1. 6 tablespoons unsalted butter 2. 1/2 cup white sugar 3. 1/2 cup brown sugar 4. 1/4 cup water 5. 1/4 teaspoon cinnamon 6. 1 pinch salt 7. 5 apples - peeled, cored and sliced 8. 1 pastry for double-crust pie Directions: 1. Preheat oven to 425 degrees F (220 degrees C). 2. Combine butter, white sugar, brown sugar, water, cinnamon, and salt in a saucepan over medium heat. Bring to a boil, remove from heat and set aside. 3. Roll out half the pastry to fit a 9-inch pie plate. Place bottom crust in pie plate; pour in apple slices. 4. Roll out top crust into a 10-inch circle. Cut into 8 (1-inch) wide strips with a sharp paring knife or pastry wheel. Weave the pastry strips, one at a time, into a lattice pattern. Fold the ends of the lattice strips under the edge of the bottom crust and crimp to seal. 5. Pour butter-sugar mixture over top of pie, coating the lattice, and allowing any remaining sauce to drizzle through the crust. 6. Bake in the preheated oven for 15 minutes. Reduce heat to 350 degrees F (175 degrees C), and bake until the crust is golden brown, the caramel on the top crust is set, and the apple filling is bubbling, 35 to 40 more minutes. Allow to cool completely before slicing.
Jakkaphong6131821;-;It's a great game. It lags alot if you have bad internet. It lags alot for me, but I play it for a week and I wanted to get a refund because it's boring and I could buy a world at war and Gta 5 if you are getting to Deluxe Digital Arma 3.
Lerory;-;launch arma play multiplayer on wasteland spam your mic on side chat listen to people swear and get  off at you
Lion041400;-;Graphics 8/10 Opitimized 4/10 Gameplay 6/10 Multiplayer Campaign 7/10 Mods 10/10 Overall 6.5/10 Now down to the deatils. The game's graphics amazing looking. The opitmization. Yeah that's not existing. It's like Dayz Standalone in it's early beta. So yeah... Mods for it great. Altis life, Takistan Life, CIty Life, Surfing, Arma 3 Life Mod. really great game. Plus Overpoch. Freaking amazing. Now to the campaign... Again... ALmost not existing. The campaign is about as boring as a math class would be on a friday afternoon. So would I recoomend tehe game? Well if you only want to play the mulitiplayer and the mods then I definitly would recoomend it. Plus if you rae into roleplaying games the mods for this game will be perfect for you. There very well designed and have great GUI's unlike somethign like Gmod Darkrp. Now if you want a war simulator... No not the game for you... Go back to Arma
Scoup -JurkaClan-;-;so meny bugs around. that game.
paul walka;-;funnest  in multiplayer
Cinny;-;The only reason why arma is a walking simulator is because everyone blatantly refuses to give you a lift anywhere. Some even call you a fatass for not walking accross half the map. Why they do this I have yet to figure out.
Jays112;-;What's people complaining about? DLCs a rip off? Then don't buy the DLC. No one asked you too. But if you do want the DLC, then buy the dlc bundle if you have the game already. BUT if you don't have the game right now, buy the Extended Edition. (You can wait for a sale on that) This game is such an improvement over Arma 2. Graphics are better, physics are better, and now BIPODS. If the game isn't running nicely, you can go into the launcher and tweak the settings like adding more RAM for the game to use and how much cores.
Amagi;-;Doesn't matter how much I suck at; 1. aiming. 2. spotting. 3. driving. 4. flying. 5. landing. 6. commanding. 7. decapitating. 8. surviving. ..I still love the game. 9/10.
lfrers;-;Awful. Way too complicated and clunky to be fun.
AsAlwaysBETA;-;The game is very overpriced but if you're a fan of military simulator you should buy it
CANADIAN(Auf Wiedersehen );-;I love and I hate it
Sargeant Stubby;-;[UPDATE] Arma 3 is a great military sandbox game that consists of: Campaign User-made scenarios Multiplayer MANY different game modes DLCs that aren't too pricy (DLC buyers get items, while at the same time supporting the development of arma 3 ____________________________________________________________ Arma 3 in my opinion is a very realistic military simulator. You have a lot of weapons to choose from, and a lot of attachments. There are: 5 pistols 3 Sub-machine guns 10 different types of assault rifles 3 Designated marksman rifles 2 sniper rifles 3 LMGs That's not it though! Leave it to the developers to make even more guns coming up in the marksman DLC. Vehicles consist of: AFV-4 Gorgon AMV-7 Marshal Ifrit Hatchback HEMTT Hunter MSE-3 Marid Strider SUV Tempest Truck Quadbike UGV Stomper Zamak Go kart [Was added in as a joke, but people wanted it in the game as DLC content!] 2S9 Sochor BTR-K Kamysh CRV-6e Bobcat FV-720 Mora IFV-6a Cheetah AH-9 Pawnee AH-99 Blackfoot CH-49 Mohawk MH-9 Hummingbird PO-30 Orca UH-80 Ghost Hawk Mi-48 Kajman A-143 Buzzard A-164 Wipeout To-199 Neophron Speedboat Swimmer delivery vehicle [Submarine] Assault boat Think that's a long list? That's a lot, but not all! Each of the vehicles have their own unique features. ____________________________________________ I bought Arma 3 during the alpha stage, when it wasn't too great, however, Arma 3 has improved so much, and the developers have made a lot of tweaks/fixes.
Spottie;-;DONT BUY THIS GAME UNLESS YOU LIKE LAG! I have a very high end PC and this piece of trash struggles to get over 40fps in signle player mode.
Barackuse;-;Not for the COD or BF player, there is no bunny hopping here. Arma is a combat simulator. The learning curve is high but the overal exp IMHO is awesome. I've played them and I cant wait for the polished version to be released.
Siberia;-;I really like this game. :D
Mr. Groove;-;JOIN OUR BBS ARMA 3 EPOCH/OVERPOCH CHERNARUS/ALTIS SERVERS NOW! BBS | EPOCH | ALTIS | 217.23.5.27:2302 BBS | OVERPOCH | ALTIS | 217.23.5.27:3302 BBS | EPOCH | CHERNARUS | 217.23.5.27:5302 BBS | OVERPOCH | CHERNARUS | 217.23.5.27:4302 www.bloodbathservers.vilayer.me
Orbital_Duck;-;Stole a tank and drove over my friend, got launched into the air and exploded on landing. 10/10 would kill my friends again
Onakagai;-;Do you like to spend 30 minutes waiting to get deployed, only to have your helicopter shot down by an enemy jet? How about spending 20 minutes to get the the AO only to realize that your team has already captured it? Do you want to know the feeling of waiting for hours to get into combar, just like real life? If you want real military simulation (including the time it takes to get into combat) then this game is for you.
Sogra;-;Realy nice game... a few bad hacks and buggs still out for it but over all very good game
Mik Mogus;-;Dear Diary I have recently been deployed to Altis it is my first tour of duty and already things are completely messed up I watched the Lance Corporal in my company try to fast rope and he ended up going through the roof of the helicopter surprisingly he didn't die until about 5 minutes later when he got ran over by a drunker contractor with severe road rage problems. The second day didn't fair much better the staff sargeant and our driver were shot by snipers who then proceeded to come over and tell us how we "got rekt" right before they stole our truck and our canned beans. Day 3 was even worse we had to walk 20 km back to base because of the theft of our truck which we did find crashed into those sub compacts that can go 300km/h, we lost Simmons that day.....thank god we had ketchup. Day 4 was the worst day we got attacked by the snipers again.I have yet to fire my weapon at an enemy I pass the time by going on 10km heights only to be chased by the drunken contractors again and masturbating freciously, I find myself getting angry at our policies we can't go out into the field with our issued rifles instead we have to give money to the local shopkeep to buy our rifles and ammo his name is Billy he is a nice guy. I still have yet to take somebody down I did fire my pistol at an enemy only to be winged by a sniper's bullet as it killed our company engineer. After the last day of my deployment I am happy to leave Altis we are now heading for another island called Stratis to help with the war effort we will see how everything turns out. Day 153...........all is lost I ate another PFC again 12/10 would get eat again
Zhu;-;THIS game is very fun and entertaining. with new mods coming out it makes it more interesting and creative.
minis^;-;I watched ISIS molest a goat.
Hitler had aimbot;-;this trashed turned me on babes
Software2;-;This is a realistic shooter, with teamwork and everything. At some points you can be so immersed into this game that you think you are a real soldier that is fighting in a war. I also think this is a game that people would say "Buy this game for me" to their friends or family for the holidays.
Sean;-;arma 3 is a good game you should buy it unless you're a part of isis
Rex.;-;Went to war in a Kart Driver outfit and got shot in the head. 11/10
My Grandma;-;Great game. In my oppinnion its probally the best military game i ever played graphics are outstanding but the multiplayer was disapointing when i got banned from 80% of the servers after only playing it for a few days . They wouldn't even tell me what i was being accused of and never gave me a warning about anything just random perma ban on most servers. Very disapointed and sad because i was just getting into the game and having a great time with my new computer i just built to play it :(
MrZombie1310;-;An immersive FPS that includes realistic strategy and awesome battles with a range of weponary. Stunning visuals and gameplay 10/10 from me!
The Potato Slicer;-;good game but if you have a old computer it runs VERY slow .
Windows Beta Version;-;I try to jump up a rock and boom Im stuck inside it 11/10
wolfcry0;-;An incredible game for anyone that likes realism more than run and gun style gameplay The only downside is it's very picky about the server side of things and some gamemodes or servers will bring down the client FPS to unplayable levels (<25 fps)
Oinotn4;-;First Arma game I have bought and boy is it fun. If you ever get bored of the vanilla game there are plenty of multiplayer mods that can keep you entretained for more than a while
XGULFXKING;-;This game has one of the most powerful graphics that has been seen in any game so far in a fps and survival etc game. No screen tearing, Hardly any graphics problems on terrain or sky etc. This game is a 9.5/10 game, and will beat the bf4 and cod series if the developers concentrate on this game for the long term run.
Hazza;-;i love this game too bits but i would not spend the original prize fund i would defo get this when its on sale but this game is awesome tons of mods nice community overall 9/10
Ghost;-;This game is an total Masterpiece, its the closest you can ever get with trying to remake a Millitary Simulation Game. i say buy it!, you won't get dissapointed. and you even have tons of awesome mods, like a DayZ: Arma 3 Mod (Epoch) , which looks and plays even better than DayZ standalone, itself, you have base building mechanics, tons of weapons, and best of all , you can play on player made maps, and don't make me even start talking about Arma 3 Battle Royale. yeah and btw, The game runs much better on Intel CPU'S than on AMD CPU'S especially in Mulitplayer.
Fuzzy Thunder;-;this game
Egastas;-;ArmA 3, successor of ArmA 2 and ArmA 2 : OA, is in my opinion the best ArmA game yet released. ArmA was always known for it's moddabillity and the user's freedom to create their own missions, since Bohemia Interactive released "ArmA 3 Tools" modding became even more easy. There are many really good mods out there, some are as good and big as a whole DLC! The game without mods is also good of course, the campaign was well designed and there are many fun multiplayer missions, which you don't need mods for (only few actually need mods).Everyone who played ArmA 2 or any other ArmA game, and liked it for it's tactical depth, it's moddabillity, all the multiplayer missions or for whatever reason this game is defenitely worth it's money. A note to all DayZ fans : DayZ Epoch (the most popular DayZMod version since somewhere in 2013 i think) is comming out for ArmA 3 somewhen, at least they announced it, only closed alpha when i last checked. tl;dr ? A GOOD GAME !
campbell #Dayz;-;if you don't have this game ....... you better kill yourself .it wonderful game with open world never end
.Slush`;-;ArmA 3 is an excellent military sandbox, You don't buy it for the Singleplayer. You buy it for the Community mods and addons. You could really never run out of things to try or play.
Deco;-;Its ok.
Coyote Bongwater;-;Nothing on Earth can run this game. What I can do, however, is enjoyable.
Spridits84;-;please give me back my time what I spend playing this excellent game :D
Dr. Dank;-;Joined altis life. Met man willing to assist me. Trusted man. Man gets gun. Man ties me up. Man steals pants. 10/10 would get pants stolen again.
Tobias the Great;-;1st time playing this I go on altis life with a friend, heres how it went: We spawned, bought a bag and a hat each, went picking apples for a few hours Then bought a car each and went to do some delivery missions My friend crashed and I drove 18.5km to repair his car, only to find he was dead 2 paramedics came and revived him, I took the hat from my dead friends body first and offered it as payment The girl took the hat because the guy didn't like it and then accused me of being sexist because he wanted my hat He chased me around his ambulance for 10 minutes shouting 'GIVE ME THE F***ING HAT' I dropped the hat, drove off only to see the ambulance over take me and get blown up by terrorists I then burned in the wreck trying to get my hat back 11/10
-BlackBurn;-;Almost 40 hours into the game and I can honestly say it's the best game I've purchased on Steam, amazingly fun, action packed and a lot of things to do, never gotten tired of it and I'll continue to play it until I find another game as funny as this one.
Bulbsy;-;Great looking, great playing, great multiplayer. It's Battlefield, just not for babies.
Dezzre;-;10/10 would dickbutt again.
Dll;-;Coming up on 1000 hours of play time, and I still enjoy it.
super is dooper CLUTCH;-;its cool
PO1 Loupis;-;Great game for anybody sick of the run and gun play style of CoD, Battlefield, and so on. The editor is fun and easy to understand, the multiplayer is a bit laggy, but other than that, perfect. The community in Arma is the best I have seen in any game, and I think you should join it.
[MM] TChuso;-;Not a great game, but a great community. Ok, the game is great as well.
supersqwack;-;Been with the series since the original flashpoint. There's simply nothing else like it. It's versatility exceeds anything else out there. Wholeheartedly recommended
-PorkDev-;-;This game is amazing! I enjoy having the more realistic feel, while still maintaining the fun of murder!
Redneck Bushwookie;-;I can be a rabit 10/10
Ditchgnome;-;Arma 3 is a military simulator. It's not supposed to be played like Call of Duty or Battlefield where you run and gun, but you most certainly can. It helps to play this game with other people, because the AI isn;t very helpful. There is also the problem with bugs that come with any Arma game. You will break your legs from running around, you will get trapped in the world, and you will get stuck doing simple actions; you will also love every minute of it. When you learn how to deal with these issues, the game is an absolute blast.The draw of the game isn't the base game, it is the mods. Just like Arma 2, this game will have a long lifespan because of mods like Arma LIfe, Epoch, Battle Royale, Breaking Point... just to name a few. Just be sure before to watch some videos or read the instructions on various websites before you mod the game so that you don't have to reinstall your game or spend hours trying to figure out what you did wrong. 9/10 Would fly a helicopter into a tank again, bring a friend, but please fix the annoying bugs.
Doctor Lambda;-;Will light your CPU on fire. 7/10
miggs;-;Almost a perfect infantry combat experience. The peripheries aren't quite polished, especially air combat, and there is a lack of content in the base game, but the ability to make mods for this game is what really makes it shine. Overall I give this game a 9/10
goldenningas;-;Fun game. Really fun for mucking around or just surviving online. Huge map. Great with mods (zombie survival mods such as Zoombies). Must play shooter.
ILikNachos;-;Pros - Fun Editor Good Multiplayer Nice Community Good Devs Cons - FPS lag if you dont have a amazing computer Hard too solo - multiplayer Over all 9/10
Peter Danklage #ROAD TO LEMON;-;GET THIS  IF U GOT A INTEL CPU DEN U GET FPS IF UR  GOT AMD U R GONNA LAG LIKE A
TrILLIuM64;-;I really recomend this game, it's a really good game with a lot of possibility. I love this game
Zycorge;-;Most realistic shooter I have ever played...and thats a lot.
Giskard;-;This game was released in September 2013 without a single player campaign. Part 1 of 3 DLC s to add it was released in October. Its now Christmas and and whilst there has been other updates for multiplayer, the final 2 DLCs that add the missing single player campaign are no where in sight.... It will probably be years before we see them and the fan boys will consider that good service.... Personally I do not.... My advice... save your money for something else.
Jaco;-;good game, entertaining for hours :D Still requires a lot of bug fixed though.
Klager Ren;-;Best military simulator out there.
TTM~Nemo;-;the realism thats put into this simulatour is amazing i enjoy playing constantly and always will. the msot enjoy aspect si the modding cmmunity so many great minds are putting their hard work into this game i enjoy testing and playing their content.
Lumberjack;-;This is a great step up from ArmA 2. They did take an odd turn and remove most weapons from the base game to get people to buy additional DLC. Beyond that, the new graphics introduced is a nice update to the game that introduces working screens and a cleaner look. The "ArmA physics" for vehicles that used to be a riot when in a wheeled vehicle has been largely updated and has less vehicles flying 200 ft. into the air. All in all, a great game to play with friends or even random people to get your tactics on.
sinistralmist;-;this game suck
OpTic AW;-;Very fun game. Playable for hours on hours. Great community, and lots of addons. Totally recommended.
Rexy junior (On Holiday);-;This game has destroyed my life, graphics are amazing, im addiceted, halp, Plz stahp the fun, i got like to many hours, #PRAY4CONOR
Le Jim Dickson;-;Good graphics and sexy  music all it needs now is B****s
Dragonwreath87;-;this game is awsome
typhooN;-;Together me and 2 friends did a bunch of drugs, drove into town square, then proced to run over a cop whilst smoking from my body from the Marijuana. 11/10
Thoralian;-;Rated 8/10, difficult but rewarding.
digitalTribe;-;Awesome,simply the ultimate military simulation. Fantastic graphics and visual and pure realism. Incredible weapons feedback and perfect accuracy of balistic and physical. Many awesome user missions such as: Altis life RPG, Wasteland and many more .
witkind;-;This game is a rly fun and who ever wants to buy it go for it
TheAntiMartyr;-;Boring simulator 2014. Love feeling bored? Is your life not complete without pointless derision? Then Arma 3 is the game for you! You can take long walks with friends and talk about everything from the weather, the first time you got laid, or how you miss mom's home cooking. If you join a full server, and stay in it for 3 hours at a time...you do run the risk of eventually encountering enemy combatants. This occurence is rare but known to happen. Not to worry. You will die instantly and get to start the process all over again. So make sure that you read up on politics, sports, and current events so that you don't bore your online friends while on your long walks together. And for those having trouble figuring out the controls...LShift + Tab + R + T will tie your right bootlace, should it happen to come untied during one of your walks. Substitute R for L if its the left boot that comes untied first. On a side note, this game has a great online community. If you are new and need help...just ask. You will promptly be addressed and told to "Go **** yourself."
Callux;-;awsome game! :) but can get very boring if playing alone on altis!
NotSoAwesomeNation;-;I have to say, this game blew me away the first I tried it. Here's what I think of the game: Pros: -Realistic, if you get shot twice your dead, no regenerative health. -Editor allowing you to create your own missions. -Hard combat makes you think on how to complete said missions. -You don't always have to be the commander, or even fight. -Multiplayer gameplay can be intense and make you think even more than against the AI. -Makes you work with your team to actually get stuff done. -Actual terminal ballistics. -Booming mod community. Cons: -Hard to learn controls (If new to series) -Some minor bugs (This will go away hopefully after beta, so I'm not taking a point away for it) I can't think of any more. So, overall, I give this game a 10/10. EDIT: Just thought of 1 problem that affects a lot of people: Optimization issues. New score: 8.5/10.
SERj17;-;+rep 10 of 10
fab1973;-;I love Arma 3 . My love for this type of game goes back to Operation Flashpoint. But I hate this  of a game at the same time, it still doesn't work properly. Bohemia acts like "here game done" with their final release of the  campaign, but it is a game you will play and only enjoy it and the experiences 20% of the time, it will frustrate you more times than please you. I love it, but what a !
Reptar;-;Yeah is good! Good stuff! Lot's of shooting like pew pew pew. Cons; no dinosaurs :(
NewUser;-;Awesome game! Improved graphic from Arma II. I like this game so much!
King Pootis;-;My first game on A3 brought me the most horrific experience I've ever had in any game, ever. We're on our way to the objective, a small dump east of a town occupied by enemy forces. I'm leading a team of 4 men. We come to a crossroad and I sprint across, telling my men to hold back. I cross a few more times, trying to get a response from any snipers. Nothing. I run, my LMG gunner runs, my medic runs. But I kept my Marksman on the other side to make sure we'd make it across. Anybody seen Full Metal Jacket all the way through? Remember the sniper scene? The marksman takes a round in the leg as we're running and goes down. He then takes two more in the chest. The kid who was playing had some mad acting skills, he played it up to 11 here. He screams as he's being shot. Crawling, drenched in his own blood. "SARGE? YOU AIN'T LEAVING ME OUT HERE LIKE THIS, RIGHT? I-I WANNA GO WITH YOU GUYS! C'MON SARGE, H-HELP ME! C'MON! PLEASE DON'T LEAVE ME!" he died after that. I cried and he respawned. 11/10, would recommend getting.
Peace;-;This is not a game for people who want fast action movie style gaming, this is a game for people who appreciate the finer things. Having done both military service and picked up MILSIM airsoft as a hobby this game is the closest you will get to what goes on in reality. There are experiences you will have in ARMA 3 that can not be had in COD or BF, experiences that will have you shaking from the adrenaline release. One that comes to mind was a mission to destroy an enemy comms tower, I was squad leader of 8 or so AI:s. As we approached the Comms tower and I told my men to go stealth, no firing unless fired upon. We moved slowly taking advantage of terrain, keeping an watchful eye for enemy patrols. Once the tower was in visual range pace slowed even more and I spent the better part of 30 minutes just looking for enemy patrols and advancing to about 200 meters from the tower. There I positioned my men to cover a wide firing arc as I had spotted quite a few patrols moving in and about the tower. I considered opening fire and probably being able to drop a good portion of the enemy before they could zero in on our position. But a firefight is always a risk, and these AI had been around for a few missions and I had started to anthropomorphize them a bit and secondly I might get hit and killed. As I considered how I would start the engagement a sudden hole opened up in the patrol pattern, I realised the tower is unguarded and I had an opportunity to do something I had not considered. I got up and ran as fast as I could towards the tower, all the time expecting the bullets to start cracking above my head. I kept scanning as I ran whizzling through bushes trying to pick a path that the least visibility to any patrols. After what seemed like far too long I reached the tower and threw out a satchel charge and another for good measure, if one would not bring the tower down it would sure attract attention. I turned around and made my way back, as I closed on my men I started ordering them to fall back, hope growing that I might get out of this alive. Falling back to about 400 meters I finally detonated the satchel charges and the tower fell, from there it was just a short run to the truck and back to Command. I had done it. I had pulled off the perfect mission, not a shot fired and all under my command back alive. That is what this game is about.
[13th] Danius;-;Oh man. Where to even begin with this one. It would be an extreme disservice to simply call Arma 3 a shooter, as it is so, so much more than that. Arma 3 is a military simulator. This is a distinction that its developers hold sacred and are proud of, and one to which I can attest is completely accurate and deserved. But its even more than that. Arma 3 is a gaming platform, upon which so much has already been and will continue to be built for years to come. At its core though, Arma 3 in a supremely excellent military sim. The graphics are stunning, the gameplay is excellent, the mechanics are solid, and Bohemia Interactive has done an absolutely amazing job packaging this all together. New comers to the Arma series (as I was) may initially be overwhelmed by the games complex mechanics and decidedly different pace from your typical FPS/shooter. Enemy engagements happen at much greater distance than is typical in the genre and are often brief, brutal, and more times than not will conclude with your demise. There is no handholding here. No mini-maps, no enemy UI icons/indicators, no hit markers, no health bars. If you get shot a couple of times, you will find yourself unceremoniously dispatched. While this creates a high barrier for entry and a steep learning curve for new players, it provides a unique and distinctive play style. Situational awareness, cover, teamwork, suppressive fire, and generally moving purposefully and as if your  depended on knowing what was behind the next ridge or hiding in the bushes are paramount to your success. Add to these infantry mechanics the amazingly rendered vehicles, armor, helicopters, and planes, each with their own realistic mechanics to learn and master, and you end up with a truly amazing military simulation experience. Out of the box, Arma comes with a great single player campaign comprised of 3 separate acts, each containing ~12-15 missions. The campaign focuses on a well crafted story of a military conflict that has erupted over Arma 3s two HUGE islands of Stratis and Altis. You play the part of a NATO soldier who finds himself stuck in the middle of a complex engagement. The campaign is rewarding, and challenging. (I have yet to complete it as Im stuck on one mission that I simply cant seem to complete.) However the single-player campaign is FAR from the end of this title. The mission editing tools have allowed this amazing community to develop some absolutely awesome single player missions, all of which can be downloaded free of charge from the Steam workshop and numerous other sites around the interwebs. I would also recommend you check out the supremely excellent full game conversion single player mods Whole Lotta Altis and Dynamic Universal War System which will provide countless additional single player hours and could be completely stand alone titles in themselves. Oh and the multiplayer, oh god the multiplayer. Wasteland, King of the Hill, Invade and Annex, Battle Royale, Breaking Point, so many Co-Op opportunities, the amazing looking upcoming Epoch (currently in closed Alpha). Im sure there are so many others that I havent even discovered yet. Each of these represent COMPLETELY USER GENERATED and totally disparate ways to play Multiplayer within the Arma 3 platform. By purchasing Arma 3, you immediately have access to each of these completely gratis and each could essentially be considered totally separate game. In wrapping up this lengthy review, Arma 3 is an amazing experience and a true accomplishment in game development. It is the only game in recent memory that I can say with confidence that I never get bored with playing. Bohemia Interactive has made it clear that they plan to support this game for years to come, and they have built something amazing on which the possibilities are truly endless. Purchase this game. Purchase it now. Thank me later. (IF YOU DO NOT FIND MY REVIEW HELPFUL, please leave a comment as to why. I welcome the constructive feedback.)
ArtificialApple;-;This is quite possibly the most emotional shooter I've ever played, and it's not because of the campaign. Crowd around, children, it's story time. One day, not so long ago, my squad had just destroyed an anti-air battery. Our pilot landed, and the rest of the squad boarded one by one. I was about to get in when the rockets started flying. The chopper lifted off, with my pilot saying that he would return in a few minutes. Unwilling to die before then, I rushed to the nearest cover, a small house by a narrow road. I entered to find a ten year-old player who had also been left behind. He explained that he was a sniper and invited me to join his "clan". I politely declined, explaining that my own squad was inbound. As I finished, a Ghost Hawk flew over the horizon. My squad had arrived. This noble child soldier and I were sprinting to the helicopter when the bullets started hitting. The sniper screamed as a 6.5 mm cartridge entered his leg. His shrieks for help were cut short by one final burst of carbine fire as I climbed in the transport. My new friend was dead. 10/10, would experience survivor guilt again.
Sir Quad Kill aka Sir Charlie;-;If you have friends, this is a great game to play with them. If you don't have any friends, this is a great game to play alone. If you don't have the game to play, get the money for it. If you don't have the money for it, get a job. If you don't have a job, rob the bank. If you get arrested robbing the bank, at least you tried.
theconjuring;-;Children play Call of Duty Boys play Battlefield Men play ARMA
Durga;-;After some 1,400 hours on the game, I can say with FULL VALIDITY this game has ruined my life. If you like realistic physics, teamwork, and every form of warfare, this game is for you. 10/10
Runekn;-;Can't tell you if you should buy it or not, but I can tell you this. You will find annoying bugs, highly requested features that isn't there and lack of content if you're not satisfied with what you have. But when you really get down to it, and experience some of the awesome scenarios you can get in multiplayer and custom sp mission, it's something magical you just can't find in any other game. Arma is not a game which you pick up at launch, play the campaign and a bit of mp, and then trow away. You buy it, love it or hate it, and then play it forever or trow it away immediatly. Arma is a game which you can never called finished. There will always be added to it, be it user or official content, fixes, features or optimizations. Hope I expressed myself correctly and that you learned something from it :) If you like realistic shooters and organized large scale multiplayer warfare, this will be your gem! I'll give it a 9/10, simply because: screw bugs, I've used hundreds of hours on Arma 3 that I would never take back. READ: I will not accept random friend requests! If you have a question, please post it in the comments.
Solly: Panparam;-;It's not a good 'game' for newbies. No, it's not... I use to sit at a place and watch the sunset. I have no idea how to actually shoot, drive and complete missions. It's like my personal sunset simulator. And it's damn beautiful. 10/10
Mr. Bong;-;I have owned this game for a number of weeks now and I have been completely hooked. Great game for the more serious war gamer, not for those who prefer the fast paced combat that you get from Call of Duty series which I consider more for the younger gamers anyway. Arma 3 moves a lot slower and is more squad based than other war games, similar to Battlefield series only slower than that when playing online and you may find yourself on 10 minute helicopter rides just to get into the battlefield and you will be highly satisfied with each kill you make as you know a single round landed by your enemy could be fatal regardless of the weapon they are using. You will have to make good use of any cover you can find and hit the dirt as soon as you hear a bullet crack over your head and then very carefully survey the surrouding area and work out where you are taking fire from as it will usually not be obvious where the fire is coming from and you will find yourself having to hold up for 10-20 minutes in a single location (sometimes longer, I personally have gotten pinned in one location for over an hour) because you are either pinned by enemy fire or it is too dangerous to move forward. You will need to buffer up on your mic communication skills as most players use proper phonetics etc when relaying information to each other on the battlefield such as coordinates and other reconaissance. You can not respawn as quickly as you can in CoD if you are taken down by enemy fire so staying alive is more crucial than any other war game you have played and you wanna hope you are moving up with a squad that has a medic. The graphics are great, the game is a little glitchy at times and the controls take a little getting used to. I recommend buying this game to any serious war game enthusiasts who want to get as close to war as possible (unless doing paintballing or airgunning), and if you do buy the game - I recommend completing the whole VR Tutorial before actually joining a server or playing the Campaign as you will need to really learn all those different keys that may make the difference in a hairy situation in game.
uW | [Yoloman]RCoffeyRIPInternet;-;I hit a tree in a tank...The tank didn't survive. 11/10-Ricky's Coffey
Jazu;-;Played the free weekend, flew an attack helicopter in the Showcase menu, slightly pressed W, my entire helicopter went face down while 30 feet in the air, I pressed Shift + S to slow it down while bringing it up, it pulled up insanely fast, saved myself, but at the cost of the life of an AI, you will be missed, George.
Swiper;-;Very clunky game, not fully optomized yet in my opinion. Requires a very high end PC and also requires DLC to play on most servers.
RMJ;-;I have only payed for ARMA games since 2001 "operation flash point" ARMA 3 was, and will be the last I will ever pay for! All my custom missions" work" for all the other games! Since ARMA 3 ,since the updates all older missions I made no longer work in ARMA 3 , so the 8- 12 hours spent making every mission I made = a waste of time! I find this appalling, I will never PAY for this gama again!!
Chaseisgr8;-;Great game, truely is. Just if your expecting instant fun, like like you see on YT, just watch the videos, its more fun XD
WrOx *MPGH.net;-;Let me tell ya sth bout this gaem... 1) ITS 10/10 for noscoping noobs that think that bcz they are good at BF and COD they are good at any game. 2) 15fps on LOW in a City still worth, not playable but WORTH 3) graphics, meh...id go for full high no matter whats your PC your so or so not gonna have good fps even on low so why watch sh*t when you can watch the 10/10 graphics 4) engine, meh you cant jump... still 10/10 10/10 would play again if it wasnt for desync and my sh*t net
bC;-;it has go carts. 10/10
Park0urDavid;-;Best army game 10/10
Georgien;-;way this game has a F** 90% review ?! i do not understand because this is most lovely game i ever played so i recommended it for u my friends this game has so many good thing buy this game guyes u gonna love this game i already played 543 hour and I'll resume to play
SoapInTheEye;-;One of the worst games I played evar. Buggy as , online full of  and poorly optimized
GamerCantGame;-;Went on Atlis Life and it started to play Green Day! great start....Till some guy tells me hes Hijacking my Cat. 10/10 IGN would get told some guy is Hijacking my cat.
MoriSummer;-;this game is great
Adrian;-;+AI either misses every shot, or noscope you across the map. -Changes your keyboard language to English (American) over all a kek/kek
$tat3#AtomicSquirrel;-;so good to install and unninstal! plz try
mrfla14;-;This game don't deserve much love,bad performance,mouse bug at start can't click anything,controls are bit weird mostly when you try to aim it zoom...whatever,ordinary graphics (played Ultra 1080p) with 2009 polygon count.On foot graphics runs better with people shooting and all that good action than flying on helicopter that you only can see ugly ground texture with some trees with no action...weird. Grass looks to much like paper really ugly. Yeah you can make scenarios and yeah the map is huge yeah it's a sandbox but no it's not that great. To many people likes it,takes a hater,i rarely hate games but Arma 3...i hate it.
neonmonkey25;-;(free weekend) GTX 760, intelcore I5, windows 8.1 (64 bit), 8 gigs of ram, directX 11, and the game still runs like crap on the lowest setting. do not recommend.
zGunner;-;Server browser will constantly break my internet connection forcing me to restart my computer. It's amazing how many bugs still exist in this game that were there over a year ago. Really not much has changed since the last free weekend I was in. I would still reccomend a game like ArmA 2, but not this one. Only on the condition that you buy it now while it is 50% off. This game is worth, at a maximum, $30. So now is the only time to buy it, otherwise you should save your money on something better. If you're going to buy, please don't be dumb enough to buy the DLCs. There are hundreds of mods out there to download for free with waaay more effort put into them than these crap DLCs. Meanwhile they continue to ignore major bugs while adding new content among thousands of already available mods. Bohemia has lost my respect with how they treated this game. I'm sick of these developers relying purely on the community to fix their bugs, and create content that should have been in the release of the game. The core game has a very limited selection. The mods are what make it even worth $30. Also, about 60-75% of servers are a bunch of children roleplaying cops&robbers with each other. It's really sad to see a game with so much sandbox warfare potential to be turned into a playground for kids to act out their immature fantasies. The servers with actual gunplay tend to be filled with trolls and of course, more children. The only real way to play and enjoy this game is by joining an organized clan. Don't expect to enjoy yourself too much in combat gamemodes if you don't have a skilled group of buddies. Having friends to play with just helps the game feel more fun regardless. tl;dr Buy while it's half off, otherwise, stay far far away.
NubLife;-;I bought this game day 1 of steam release, it was pretty barebones stuff, a few guns, even less vehicles, 1/3 a campaign. They said more weapons would come, (if you know arma 2, they had dozens of weapons, arma 3 however had less than 10) well more weapons did come, in the form of paid DLC. More vehicles, more paid DLC. Scumbag moves
Wolciara;-;One of the best me game :)
Dokkasan;-;The controls in this game are all wonky. You can change them in game, but you can not change views in a vehilcle(there is literaly no button for it). Make sure you have an amazing graphics card if you are going to buy this game. The combat makes you feel like a total noob. When the bullets start flying, your aiming gets all shaky and you cant aim at anything properly.
Fubuki;-;Whatever you do, be thankful this review is up. It might be realistic and such, but the controls are horrible. You are limited to few weapons, and cannot record gameplay footage without setting the game to view in window screen. Don't waste your time downloading this, as it is 11.2 GB, and there's not alot of things to do.
alex :D;-;i dropped the soap
Badmrtickls;-;I killed someone on a go kart with a lightning bolt, then i killed another guy by putting several planes on him that glitched and blew up. Buy this
UnwrittenArtz;-;Really Good Game, Thats For Sure!!
Determined'Beee;-;This game is well worth the cash. It has a pretty hefty price tag, I know but the gameplay is amazing. I can't describe how beautiful the game is even with a lower setting. With ultra, the game is just gorgeous. Arma 3 is so well optimized, you could be playing from medium to high in almost any decent rig. The number of things you can do in this game is almost unlimited. From tactical ground combat to flying multiple CAS & AA jets. Not to mention Various helicopters that come in civilian, armed or plain gunships are really fun with friends. Tanks, ranging from high armor and huge  guns to lighter Anti- Air tanks. Armored vehicles such as APC's to trucks equipped with fully automatic grenade launchers. Theres so many things you can do at almost any time. Having to master your flying skills to shoot down another jet or getting a kill 1100 meters away with a .50 cal sniper rifle gives you a surreal feeling and is indeed very rewarding. This game takes patience and with time and practice, it will give you lot of satisfaction. Further more, if for whatever reason you dislike the gameplay or get bored, (which is highly unlikely, especially with friends) remember that this game has an active community who constantly makes multiple mods of almost any genre all available for free at anytime. Zombies may interest you if you have moved from DayZ or the Dayz mod from Arma 2, in which both can be replaced with much better graphics and gameplay. 10/10 a must have game in your library!
michael.ace @KelloggsCereal;-;For me this was in my list of one of those legendary releases of 2013, this is a perfect game for an open-sandbox reaslitic military shooter and has numerous gamemodes instead of just being the typical army type first-person shooter where you just do a mission shoot and it's over. One thing is to make sure you have a great gaming rig because this is a very demanding game and is still going through some updates to increase optimization.
CakeLizard;-;This isn't the game my grandfather or my brother played but my son has.
--;-;I dont know where to start with Arma 3 really. Amazeing Graphics,weaponry,Military Simulation in future, I highly reccomend you getting Arma 3 if your looking for Strategic, fun.3PS,FPS, and best yet is the Atmosphere and Land Scape
NoxV ' NetStalker;-;Gets run over by ATV moving at 60 Mph, only breaks legs. 10/10
[twitch/youtube]BadPro;-;great and awsome military lovers game . you can enjoy how realistic is it , how many weapons it includes . those pretty detailed driving transports and how many different vehicules . the thing that i like is the workshop it s fans are too creative there always something new to try , some mods you will enjoy for free . its developpers aren't lazy at all , there is many updates and many news they are working pretty hard to make this game more special . funny DLCS :D thats my opinion share me with yours i would be glad to hear it :)
(suck ra;-;story it is a soldier that sprays bullets at his enemies and his breathing very fast.his name is arman and he's a good soldier who is not from usa but he thinks the usa is good. his brother is German so he died in the war. arma is now in finding brother's footsteps may make his family had placed! but the poor cope with this?
Nightwalker;-;Most if not all reviews of this game took place before they had a campaign, workshop support, and Zeus. I love this game... Thats all i have to say.
greg_003;-;The graphics are good but thats all thats good. Full of glitches, bizzare controls, terrible gameplay. Worst game ive ever played. I wanted to give it another go. Bought a helicopter and typed a couple of messages advising people not to get in cos its my first time flying one, people got in anyway. Of course i crashed and another player told me 'go f**ck yourself'. Charming. I shot some guy about 10 times without him dying. On several occasions my parachute didnt/wouldnt deploy and im still not sure whether it auto deploys or not. The raise/lower zeroing kept locking my gun in the ADS position for some reason. My char wanted to reload whatever button i pressed, and i had to keep fiddling around to cancel it. Generally found it extremely tedious and not much fun, so i quit. Should have saved my money.
travellerTTT the bhopper;-;Amazing, worth the money
SoapInTheEye;-;One of the worst games I played evar. Buggy as , online full of  and poorly optimized
Park0urDavid;-;Best army game 10/10
Georgien;-;way this game has a F** 90% review ?! i do not understand because this is most lovely game i ever played so i recommended it for u my friends this game has so many good thing buy this game guyes u gonna love this game i already played 543 hour and I'll resume to play
Eyuji;-;One of the only game where i spent more time on the graphic settings for optimal 60fps and training in the tutorial than actually playing the game. Aside that the control are smoother than arma 2 and feels more optimized but the content is still lacking. It become a great game if one get invested in it, otherwise pass your way if you expect playing it like a regular FPS with WASD and left click, you'll become a machinist on your keyboard.
GamerCantGame;-;Went on Atlis Life and it started to play Green Day! great start....Till some guy tells me hes Hijacking my Cat. 10/10 IGN would get told some guy is Hijacking my cat.
pilot_seelie;-;There's a famous World War I quote that says warfare is "Months of boredom punctuated by moments of extreme terror." Replace "terror" with "frustration" and this game does, indeed, give you the True Combat experience written on the tin. From the description and tutorial missions, I was expecting a military simulation with experiences like "The commander ordered my squad over the radio to go to grid point 134-190 and hold the bridge, so we mounted up in an APC and fought out way there to hold the line against the enemy advance." Basically, I expected a much deeper and more realistic version of Battlefield -- like the Falcon 3.0 and Gunship 2000 military sims I played when I was a teenager but with infantry and tanks and tactics and whatnot. What I got is... nothing like that. The single-player is more like what I would call a "walking forward simulator." Seriously, my left middle finger started going numb from holding down W while following the squad leader character across a field for 15 minutes while only encountering two enemies. Of course, when I DID encounter enemies I tended to get shot in the head pretty quickly because the AI can see right through the oh-so-realistic scrub brush that covers the landscape whereas all I could see was the tangle of bushes in front of my face with a big red "TARGET" box floating in the middle of them. Then the squad leader guy stepped on a landmine (the only one in the world apparently -- of all the luck!) and I started following some other guys across another field for even longer, only this time with an ambush of several lethal bushes a few minutes out from the save point. After snoozing my way all across the field and then getting killed in the same spot about a dozen times I thought "Okay, maybe the real draw here is the realistic chain-of-command combined arms multiplayer scenarios, let me try that." So, I popped into multiplayer... and didn't see any of that either. There were scads of "RPG" servers where I could play as a random villager, AKA playing Walking Foward Simulator toward the corn field at the edge of town and trying to earn a bit of money to buy food at the market and not starve. True combat gameplay, right? There were "Wasteland" servers where you spawn in the middle of the continent somewhere with nobody around and only a vague suggestion of what you'r supposed to be doing ("fortify a base, gather supplies and hoard them") and of course a half-hour walk to the nearest point of interest. I wandered around the airport for 10 minutes looking for supplies or a vehicle, found nothing, shrugged and disconnected. There were also "King of the Hill" servers which at least featured combat. Well, actually they mostly featured waiting for helicopters to respawn. The objective was to go from my team's base to occupy a town about 1.5 kilometers away, which equated to a half-hour walk, a ten-minute drive (assuming you didn't run over a bush, which would pop your tire and then it's back to the half-hour walk) or a one-minute helicopter ride. So, helicopter was the obvious choice, but those only spawn every few minutes. Half the time some jerk would crash his truck into the helicopter and destroy it so we'd have to wait again. On the occasions I actually got to the airspace over the town, I would jump out of the helicopter, open my parachute, and generally be shot to death while dangling in the air. The one time I parachuted out early and walked for a minute to get to the town, I survived for a good while sneaking into the town but didn't run into any enemies to fight... eventually I got bored of that and ran to a tower to see if I could snipe people from the top, but as soon as I peeked out over the railing I got shot in the head. So, was it realistic? You bet. Months of boredom punctuated by moments of extreme frustration. Was it fun? Not really. I had a lot more fun playing LUFTRAUSERS while waiting for it to download. Overall a colossal disappointment. I'm so glad it was a "free trial weekend" -- I would have cried tears of rage if I had actually paid for this thing.
Fox;-;its boring and you wont know what to do switching back to call of duty s
Fiddler;-;ARMA III In my eyes, personally i think this is a game. Thank you for spending time for reading my review:P
|BE AGRESIF;-;Do you like headaches? this game is headache game
(youtube) busskill2;-;you thats why
Chrome;-;With only 168.4 hours played I would have to say that Arma 3 is one of the best military shooters I have ever played in my entire life. Love playing steam games with friends and want a military shooter this is the absolute game for you. Arma 3 has an amazing community and amazing addons to go with it like Battle Royale, Epoch, Breaking point and many other addons that make the game endless fun for you and your friends.
thecyguy;-;the game is supper glichy
Blackwood;-;Worst game I have ever played!! I am 30 years old, I have been playing since SNES. Please please do not spend your money ($60) for this junk game. There is zero support. The servers are unstable and their admins are 3rd party. I have been trying to get into contact with members of their support and I have gmail server sending me replys telling me they cannot get contact to their mailing servers. Worst thing of all, Is I havnt played even 1 hour of the single player campaign and only played multiplayer. struggle to connect to servers over and over and have terrible fps when encountering other ppl. I play other games and get up to 170 fps. I asked for a refund (aka I only reinstall steam after years for this game) and I was told No. 60$! Save your money and go get ARK or even just play LoL for free.
Pfffffff;-;I Was kidnapped by some guys, they stopped by some road and told me to take of my pants, next minute they both went on road and my friend ran them other. 11/10 would take of my pants again.
pluto;-;walking simulator with 3 great modes: hills, valleys, and drowning!
LT_Jackson;-;Come Join My New Server! Help me expand my Player Base and help the server become popular Arma 3 Epoch with all-terrainpack enabled. - 88.150.150.250:2382 temaspeak 3 - 85.236.100.27:19147
Shrek;-;Arma III altis life = real life at 20fps
logan;-;Arma 3 the only game i have played where i was like hum this map is big be i wont see any one and then get shot buy a jet
Mr_Turtle;-;This game is really beautiful on Max Settings. Even on low settngs, the game is still visually impressive.The gameplay also is very good and smooth, especially when you jump down some stairs and appear on the roof of a building! 10/10
HiddenNinjaCatZ;-;Arma 3 is one of my top 5 favourite games, it has 2 massives maps to play on. And millions of mod like Breaking Point, Arma 3 Life, Battle Royal and many more. Overall this game is massively awesome so why not try it out?
cjM;-;n3xt g3n, load into a server nek m1nn1t crash
.JOKER.;-;Ok so the bottom line is, this is not just a shooter, its not just a multiplayer shooter similar to the likes of Black ops 2, AW or anything like that, it is as close to a military simulator. I love KOTH(King of the Hill) great game & can be played as alone wolf or with friends. I have to give this 11/10
AustraliumOxide;-;great game, massive improvement over arma 2, the editor mode is great because you can set up your own missions or just blow stuff up if you want. also there is a great modding communtity
Ghosty;-;-I asked my friend "How low can you go?" -He accepted the challenge -Flew close to water in a chopper -Touches water with the smallest part of the chopper for less than 1 second -We crash and die -Laughed our asses off 12/10 would crash again
:calm_creep:;-;I was there, and so was he. I saw him through my scope. He wasn't aware of my presence. He turned around, still not seeing me. His eyes were beautiful. I was aware of my orders. I didn't want to. He probably had family, a wife, loving kids... I pressed the trigger. I missed. For the 27'th time. 11/10 best game i played this month.
TAHUBLAD;-;its bloody crap fam
%&$/$&(#() v0.1;-;It wants you to feed it money.
ImCrazyRayhan;-;Hard to control!
[RPPK]tastefulthree;-;I would recommend this game! But do not run any cheat programs for other games while yuo have this one. I was battleye banned for running a trainer for Wargame Red dragon. I always played this game with friends! Need a good pc to run this though. I played over 1000+ hours in this game until banned.
Islamic State of iRock'n Cereal;-;I killed around 60 people on a server before dying. I found myself often staring off into the distance for no reason. I found out this was called the thousand yard stare, a symptom of PTSD. My doctor perscribed my some drugs. Drugs are good, so 10/10.
Camkin;-;CS:GO is maybe the best the best game on steam and has had me hooked for hours. I love the way this game can get really competative and gives you that rush of power when you one D that noob in pit! The game has many skins that i think can become some peoples focuses and can cause you to become distracted from the actual game. This game is the best FPS on steam and can get really fun with team mates. When you first get this game you will find the lingo very cofusing and may be raged at by many CS:GO "Pros". CS:GO is a very fun game and is easy to learn the basics but hard to become a master. I am recommending this game to anybody who loves a good shoot out and can! Shout out to - The Orge Lord, 4riy4, Alvero and the biggest bang out of all Ben!
Husky;-;If your social life sucks then this is also the game for you, be prepared to spend more hours than you wanted on this game. Word of WARNING After developing a small network of friends (And PTSD) you will spend excessive time playing this product that has been placed upon the Pc Master Race, for the good of humanity please occasionally sleep.
Arataaaaa?!?!?!?!?! >.>;-;Well, based from the time that I have been playing this game, I think you should really buy this game! :D 1000/10 really recommended ;)
langkopf;-;To play this game properly, I highly recommend watching Brandon Buzards Guides on YouTube on how to tweak your PC for higher Performance. Also his video on how to optimize Arma 3 was a huge help. I went from avg. 15-20 FPS to 40-60 FPS. Without these tutorials this game will be hard to enjoy. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-LwIfcW0EnY https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Sgckg16UC-Y (They are about 2h but its worth it)
SkyPirate;-;Millitary sandbox you can spend days and weeks imersed in epic battles, if you have a good ping... I've spent more time in RP servers, no other game comes even close to the RP experience arma has... well... garrys mod?... no... not really... but it does remind me of it. This is a great game.
Hecker24;-;Use your money to buy this instead of CoD!
Destroyer;-;Absolutely fantastic and never played before game. This game is a beast! I recommend this game with 9/10 Stars
Vgur;-;The Game Is Amazing 10/10 Altis Life Is the Best Part Of It Though
NugLup;-;So i give this game a 1/10. I was playing it and it started to bug out, and then i saw a person. This person was dressed like ben10 and was going yoooooy. so i walked up to them and i was like spongbob patrick and my friend is being a arma. So then that arma went yoooy yoooy yooo and it spongebobed all the way up to the house to mr krabs, who was weirdly dressed like vass from far cry 3 and pearl was dressed like jason.
:calm_creep:;-;I was there, and so was he. I saw him through my scope. He wasn't aware of my presence. He turned around, still not seeing me. His eyes were beautiful. I was aware of my orders. I didn't want to. He probably had family, a wife, loving kids... I pressed the trigger. I missed. For the 27'th time. 11/10 best game i played this month.
%&$/$&(#() v0.1;-;It wants you to feed it money.
ImCrazyRayhan;-;Hard to control!
TAHUBLAD;-;its bloody crap fam
CoconutBadass #Road2Global;-;Flying boats and many glitches i give it 9/11 Allahu akbar
RoshkoV;-;Ok, i recommended , this game is awsome ! .. but ! you need veryyy good PC... the FPS is the problem. i have i7 3.6GHz 16GB RAM and GTX 970 OC .. and the game run's on ultra 30FPS... this is kind of sucks .. but if you want to play this game. buy it only if you have a good PC ! if not , dont buy..
Arataaaaa?!?!?!?!?! >.>;-;Well, based from the time that I have been playing this game, I think you should really buy this game! :D 1000/10 really recommended ;)
Camkin;-;CS:GO is maybe the best the best game on steam and has had me hooked for hours. I love the way this game can get really competative and gives you that rush of power when you one D that noob in pit! The game has many skins that i think can become some peoples focuses and can cause you to become distracted from the actual game. This game is the best FPS on steam and can get really fun with team mates. When you first get this game you will find the lingo very cofusing and may be raged at by many CS:GO "Pros". CS:GO is a very fun game and is easy to learn the basics but hard to become a master. I am recommending this game to anybody who loves a good shoot out and can! Shout out to - The Orge Lord, 4riy4, Alvero and the biggest bang out of all Ben!
lxlFatalitYlxl;-;DAHA DN ALDIM 80 TL'YE BUGN 49 OLMU :'( NEYSE Y OYUN
ScandinavianSillySally;-;Very fun game. Need a pretty good system to run it but it is very good none the less. Performance issues no doubt it is fun. Not to happy on the price though
merty;-;Great game. Awesome mechanics, a great improvement from previous armas. Beautiful and astonishing graphics. Wonderful atomoshphere, extremely detailed. Now with the campagin there is much more to do besides creating maps or playing with friends on a server. My favorite is that it has its own workshop !
Playformance;-;9/10. Would give 10/10 if it was better optimized.
lxlFatalitYlxl;-;DAHA DN ALDIM 80 TL'YE BUGN 49 OLMU :'( NEYSE Y OYUN
merty;-;Great game. Awesome mechanics, a great improvement from previous armas. Beautiful and astonishing graphics. Wonderful atomoshphere, extremely detailed. Now with the campagin there is much more to do besides creating maps or playing with friends on a server. My favorite is that it has its own workshop !
ScandinavianSillySally;-;Very fun game. Need a pretty good system to run it but it is very good none the less. Performance issues no doubt it is fun. Not to happy on the price though
Elias230322;-;If you have friends, this is a great game to play with them. If you don't have any friends, this is a great game to play alone. If you don't have the game to play, get the money for it. If you don't have the money for it, get a job. If you don't have a job, rob the bank. If you get arrested robbing the bank, at least you tried [10/10]
M_Txrr;-;Terribly optimised, the only half decent thing to play on it is Altis Life, and no matter what you're doing the FPS seems to stick around 20-25. It's not just that, the gun play seems too clunky for a military simulator. When you get past all the FPS issues it's not that bad of a game, but certainly isn't worth 36!
FATAL;-;Kids play Cod Boy play battlefield Men Play ARMA
fuoeBaL aihS;-;This game smells.
[LC]LokeYourLord;-;They should really fix this game performace wise, performs like one of the first AAA games that were demanding on PC. Cant say i can recommend it due to all the performance issues, and i run 2x 970 STRIX in SLI and got a high end Intel CPU, and even with those startup commands it doesnt fix much.
Centhar;-;Fun simulator game with mods such as wasteland great game!!!!
python4161;-;I was once the greatest warrior ever embraced. Then i took 200 rounds of pure lead to the face. 10/10 I wouldn't recommend standing out in the battlefield like a ing statue again.
aut0_c0rrect;-;So I bought this game on the summer sale, it looks really hard in the trailers and in the gamplay reviews but, the controles are really messed up and its hard to do anything in the game. I think that when they make arma 4 they should put in normal controles and less controles like E should do more then just one thing. I really think that arma 4 should be a little less hardcore and more user friendly. thanks
Dvnte;-;Very Tactical, Strategy, I've enjoyed this game way too much, I recommend it. You'll have way too much fun if you bring friends.
GringoDingo;-;Laggs. Too many mods ( Multiplayer nearly impossible to play without downloading stuff every hour every day ). More and more laggs.
Deafeningleek7;-;This game is the BEST army simulator anyone will ever play. I like how you can pick about anything for your character to use or wear. Every thing is realistic in this game and i highly recomend this game!
Maksikosie;-;i dont even own this game XD
Hauker;-;Why no Gore Mod? :-----( Arma is a nais walking thru Forest Game.
Enjoi Life;-;Great game can't stop playing it
Destroyer;-;Absolutely fantastic and never played before game. This game is a beast! I recommend this game with 9/10 Stars
legonick2000;-;One of the best shooters out there. On ultra graphics the game looks real. The combat is so open that it is diffrent every time. I put 12 hrs on this game the first day I got it. With so many game modes it never gets boring. 10/10
Hecker24;-;Use your money to buy this instead of CoD!
Vgur;-;The Game Is Amazing 10/10 Altis Life Is the Best Part Of It Though
NugLup;-;So i give this game a 1/10. I was playing it and it started to bug out, and then i saw a person. This person was dressed like ben10 and was going yoooooy. so i walked up to them and i was like spongbob patrick and my friend is being a arma. So then that arma went yoooy yoooy yooo and it spongebobed all the way up to the house to mr krabs, who was weirdly dressed like vass from far cry 3 and pearl was dressed like jason.
Tragic;-;BOSS, End of story
DiRaven;-;Just another ArmA. Same bugs (with a bunch of new ones), same gameplay, same problems, same game. Absolutely worth buying for anyone who fell in love with tactical shooters (any of the OFP, ArmA series or BF2: Project Reality). And not recommended to anyone else.
Nigginator;-;gta battlfild adn zoombinies al in 1 evryting simolutar
Husky;-;If your social life sucks then this is also the game for you, be prepared to spend more hours than you wanted on this game. Word of WARNING After developing a small network of friends (And PTSD) you will spend excessive time playing this product that has been placed upon the Pc Master Race, for the good of humanity please occasionally sleep.
[RPPK]tastefulthree;-;I would recommend this game! But do not run any cheat programs for other games while yuo have this one. I was battleye banned for running a trainer for Wargame Red dragon. I always played this game with friends! Need a good pc to run this though. I played over 1000+ hours in this game until banned.
Islamic State of iRock'n Cereal;-;I killed around 60 people on a server before dying. I found myself often staring off into the distance for no reason. I found out this was called the thousand yard stare, a symptom of PTSD. My doctor perscribed my some drugs. Drugs are good, so 10/10.
FiftyPercentHealth;-;It's probably good, I've never even played it.
Elias230322;-;If you have friends, this is a great game to play with them. If you don't have any friends, this is a great game to play alone. If you don't have the game to play, get the money for it. If you don't have the money for it, get a job. If you don't have a job, rob the bank. If you get arrested robbing the bank, at least you tried [10/10]
langkopf;-;To play this game properly, I highly recommend watching Brandon Buzards Guides on YouTube on how to tweak your PC for higher Performance. Also his video on how to optimize Arma 3 was a huge help. I went from avg. 15-20 FPS to 40-60 FPS. Without these tutorials this game will be hard to enjoy. https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=-LwIfcW0EnY https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=Sgckg16UC-Y (They are about 2h but its worth it)
M_Txrr;-;Terribly optimised, the only half decent thing to play on it is Altis Life, and no matter what you're doing the FPS seems to stick around 20-25. It's not just that, the gun play seems too clunky for a military simulator. When you get past all the FPS issues it's not that bad of a game, but certainly isn't worth 36!
[LC]LokeYourLord;-;They should really fix this game performace wise, performs like one of the first AAA games that were demanding on PC. Cant say i can recommend it due to all the performance issues, and i run 2x 970 STRIX in SLI and got a high end Intel CPU, and even with those startup commands it doesnt fix much.
PaDussy;-;best game ever (y) worth money for this , i recommend to you guys buy this game :D
JB;-;Do not waste your money on this game. too many glitches and you need a super computer to run it. plus the controls are way to messed up this game is a BROKE game
realEE.;-;As a veteran ArmA 2 player, I can help you decide whether if you want this or not. First of all, you need a decent PC. I bought this game in Alpha, but my PC is kinda old and while ArmA2 runs pretty well on medium graphics, this one lags the sh*t out of my soul. Second, you have to find a good community (example: unitedoperations) who schedule events and has basic rules (teamspeak is a must have app, etc). Third: You need a LOT OF TIME. You have to learn the game. You have to learn how to communicate with teammates. And ofcourse, you have to learn to obey your commander. A normal coop mission could take up even to 2 hours. Yes, 2 hours of gameplay and sometimes even without firing your weapon. OR you get shot in the beginning and you can spectate how other guys play against AI. This game needs a higher level of will and commitment. I think these high specs are bad for the game, since players who love these realistic simulations are already a few, but if you take out those who don't have good enough PCs for the game: you get a really REALLY small community. I am still thinking about buying a new PC, but this game is not my main game at all and I think there are a lot of other players who think like me. I can't say anything about singleplayer, since I think it is not fun at all. If you have a good PC and a good community it can turn out to be a 9/10 game. If you have a good PC and a bad/no community it can turn out to be a 5/10 game. If you have a bad PC (community doesn't matter) it is a 2/10 game.
Scipio Aemilianus;-;yes i do recomment this game
Mr. Raizer;-;The best game so far
Machomitch;-;Sure there are bugs, many bugs, but the bottom line is that Arma 3 improves in almost every department over the second game. Well worth the dollar.
Nigginator;-;gta battlfild adn zoombinies al in 1 evryting simolutar
'Murican;-;Many Simulation, Very Millitary, Such Inensity, Many lag, such wow 11/10 - IGN - would blow  up again
DEG Anarchy [25th AG];-;I absolutely love this game
nuk.dll;-;PROS: -Great game with tons of mods and gamemodes -The community is huge and there is always going to be players -Graphics are simply beautiful CONS: -Game is unoptimized -Game may initially be overwhelming to newcomers of the series. -Lack of more in-depth audio options may be a turnoff for us 7.1 surround users or those who just want a greater level of control. MY REVIEW Your experience and mileage may vary depending on what you do with ARMA 3. You can go all vanilla, and play campaign or simple multiplayer, or you can go with the huge modding community. The mods are really what make this game great. Not in the mood for simple deathmatch? Play king of the hill with 120 players! Not in the mood for that? Try Epoch or Survival! The gameplay is solid and the experience is worth it. There is only one con and it may affect you depending on how you like to experience games. You are more than likely not going to get 60 FPS in this game, and probably will be hard to get a solid 30 without the occasional dips. This game is highly unoptimized on multiplayer. The game runs fine with single player campaign, but with multiplayer, the netcode is completely weird. Some mods i can get 60 FPS in, some i can barely hit 30. Regardless if i run on ultra or minimum settings, you will only usually have the same FPS the server has. This was a BIG problem initially, then i just got past it. The gameplay more than makes up for it, and the experience is more about the community. Hopefully this will be rectified soon, however i highly doubt it, especially if you look at DayZ. Audio customization is a problem i have in particular also. With all the customization ARMA 3 allows with the interface, they barely have any settings for audio. Mostly just the general "Master", "Chat", etc. I wish i could choose which sounds' levels i could adjust. I bought this game with the intention of playing EPOCH since DayZ' latest update ruined everything i liked about the game, and in the end i barely play EPOCH. Mostly Survival and King of the Hill. Great gametypes and i also highly recommend ATLIS Life. In ARMA 3's current state i would rate it a 7/10.
Clowney;-;Good Game But Too many Glitch,Die For No Reason (5.1/10)
bot zck;-;i wanna let everyone who is reading this the "DLC's" are fukin sh!ty. like i might as well have taken a sh!t and took a picture and made it a DLC. although that might be a better DLC than arma 3's. DON'T waste your money on this spend it on some boi pu-C..
bread;-;"One. Engage that man. Half a klick." "Oh no. One is down. Fall back." Has some fish A.I, too.
Fallenleaves;-;Great game :)
Kenert;-;Not a bad game, however, if you have to choose between this and ARMA 2 (OA) then go with the latter.
TheTankBurger;-;This game has more bugs than a bug nest.
NeKsis;-;Well... what to say about this game in two words. Its Bad. Arma 3 is terribly optimized for PC. Mine isn't the greatest, but I saw someone who had two 980s try running it, didn't even get over 50 FPS. Never knew you needed a $4,000 computer to even get over 60 FPS. The servers are terrible, there are rarely any servers that are populated with a <150 ping. Even if I try to connect to any of them, it says connection failed. People may have thought I made a bad review because of how difficult and realistic it was. I like games like this. Too bad bohemia interactive didn't put enough effort into making this game run really well, and to make the server connection good. Instead of fixing these problems and making announcements about them, they decide to release DLC after DLC to add onto this broken game. If you are stupid enough to pay $15 for two helicopters, you must not be too wise with your money. I should have mentioned, when getting into a server, you must either donate or go into ts to fly. Why can't they just use game chat? Guess I will never get my pilot license. They probably sould have fixed arma 2 as well, before making this one. I refuse to run this on the LOWEST POSSIBLE settings, because there is no reason I should. A game like this, you need good view distance, and things need to looks some what nice. You can't see an enemy a few thousand meters out, but they sure can see you. Please DO NOT buy this game unless it goes on sale. This game is nowhere near worth $60. I would say its worth 20-30 range.
Shinai Staiger;-;This is a Real Military Combat simulator
Turk;-;Absolutley Brilliant Game!
WhiteFool104 | Pornhub.com;-;Altis Life, DayZ, Wastelands and a great singleplayer, worth the cash, 10/10
Wolfy;-;Let's just say it's awesome
Spai;-;You either love this game or you hate it. If you like games with military tactics and GUNS and stuff this is the right game for you.
Sheepi;-;It's realistic in terms of graphics and gameplay. Lots of different game modes/mods which give the game a broad spectrum, thus catering for any type of player. DayZ players would enjoy it.
Vikingishly;-;I have almost 600 hours on this game it's one of my all time favorite war simulators out there mainly because of altis life and the so many other things you can do on it.
TacticalGamingXHD(B-Day Today;-;Overall this game is very realistic,fun and tactical ideal to play with friends; This game is solely for people who love Military Simulation and Realsim please if you are one of these people I only have one thing to say. GET THIS GAME! :D
NeKsis;-;Well... what to say about this game in two words. Its Bad. Arma 3 is terribly optimized for PC. Mine isn't the greatest, but I saw someone who had two 980s try running it, didn't even get over 50 FPS. Never knew you needed a $4,000 computer to even get over 60 FPS. The servers are terrible, there are rarely any servers that are populated with a <150 ping. Even if I try to connect to any of them, it says connection failed. People may have thought I made a bad review because of how difficult and realistic it was. I like games like this. Too bad bohemia interactive didn't put enough effort into making this game run really well, and to make the server connection good. Instead of fixing these problems and making announcements about them, they decide to release DLC after DLC to add onto this broken game. If you are stupid enough to pay $15 for two helicopters, you must not be too wise with your money. I should have mentioned, when getting into a server, you must either donate or go into ts to fly. Why can't they just use game chat? Guess I will never get my pilot license. They probably sould have fixed arma 2 as well, before making this one. I refuse to run this on the LOWEST POSSIBLE settings, because there is no reason I should. A game like this, you need good view distance, and things need to looks some what nice. You can't see an enemy a few thousand meters out, but they sure can see you. Please DO NOT buy this game unless it goes on sale. This game is nowhere near worth $60. I would say its worth 20-30 range.
WhiteFool104 | Pornhub.com;-;Altis Life, DayZ, Wastelands and a great singleplayer, worth the cash, 10/10
GermanQuasar;-;Fantastic and has a great community and Life mod
All American Yookan;-;Its like Arma 2, exept this one has graphics.
MichaelPilot;-;I'm a huge fan at the Arma Series but the one problemo about Arma 3 is, you guys think I'm absoulutly crazy but the price is way too high, $60.00! I wish it was at 40.00 for the most. But I get it why it's at a high price because what they use in the game
{Oz.oF} oldmidget;-;controls are clunky, horribly optimized, graphics suck, AI sucks and in some missions actively tries to get you killed. and yet i keep trying out of pure boredom.
GermanQuasar;-;Fantastic and has a great community and Life mod
All American Yookan;-;Its like Arma 2, exept this one has graphics.
Whilson;-;This game is beyond disappointing. It has so many elements to make it the best... whatever the  it wants to be, but it's too buggy and unoptimized. There really is no excuse for Arma 3 to run this bad at this stage of development. Honestly this game is in alpha, whether it says "full release" or not. There is a huge lack of content compared to the previous Arma. Arma 3 has just about 1/4 of what arma 2 had. The saddest thing overall is the fact that there has been no effort to fix this game in quite sometime. I am fairly certain that Bohemia has the resources, but they refuse to even bother with it. THEY SERIOUSLY USED RESOURCES TO MAKE ING KARTS (a presumably broken waste of money) INSTEAD OF FIXING THEIR  ING GAME.
Biggie C;-;10/10 Became a cop, helped drug dealers, got my money, got fired.... Worth!
Steedie;-;I think it is a bit over priced but it still is very fun. My Favorate thing is the Editor because you can spawn in anything you like and mess around with everything! Altis life is a really cool mod for arma 3 aswell so you should try that out if you get arma 3.
Poonault;-;Prepare your bang hole for one the buggiest PC war games of all time. D-sync across the desolate warzones, or die countless times from driving into a barbwire fence, or even a bush. It's a PC exlusive masterpiece.
Itse me SAM B;-;This game is very poorly optimized even though i got a gaming pc, a quarter of all people owning this game cant even play it properly without massive Framedrops, even at the lowest setting. this game is just a complete waste of money & patience. too bad i cant get a refund for this piece of crap.
Corrupt_Player;-;Do you enjoy 20 Fps? Are you willing to let a 10 year old commmand you like marines? Do you have a top of the line computer? This Game is slower on it Can you deal with constant Freezeing and or Game Breaking crashes? Are you willing to be trolled constantly by your own teamates that end up shooting you? Has your computer ever bottlenecked on low graphics? Are you looking for devs that take weeks to respond to troubleshoot? Are you Ready for PTSD? If you are looking for a game that does all the above daily Try Arma 3!!!
Benji518;-;Probably one of the best games I have ever played. It is very highly recommended that you do buy this game. I play it as much as I can!
Thorn;-;really good game fun and serious worth buying
Poonault;-;Prepare your bang hole for one the buggiest PC war games of all time. D-sync across the desolate warzones, or die countless times from driving into a barbwire fence, or even a bush. It's a PC exlusive masterpiece.
Corrupt_Player;-;Do you enjoy 20 Fps? Are you willing to let a 10 year old commmand you like marines? Do you have a top of the line computer? This Game is slower on it Can you deal with constant Freezeing and or Game Breaking crashes? Are you willing to be trolled constantly by your own teamates that end up shooting you? Has your computer ever bottlenecked on low graphics? Are you looking for devs that take weeks to respond to troubleshoot? Are you Ready for PTSD? If you are looking for a game that does all the above daily Try Arma 3!!!
CokeleY;-;waste of ing money
subotai;-;I really really wanted to like this game. It has a lot going for it, but unlike the previous games they changed the damage model so that enemies take 4 body shots by an assult rifle to die, and can take multiple shots to the head. You cannot change this in the options and I couldnt find a good mod to change it. Basically it went from a very realistic FPS to Call of Duty. What a bizzare decision for the devs to make.
GG|Bergen.HeatedCoffin;-;If you enjoy getting insta-sniped by terminator AI the second you try to sneak up on them, this is for you. If you enjoy not being able to see your opponents, but they can see you through all the bushes and trees with their x-ray vision, this is for you. If you hate fun, this game is for you.
StarFish;-;Games is fun and all, but i really hate how it like to " STOP REPONDING " When im looking for a gamemode to play, its really annoying.
Whilson;-;This game is beyond disappointing. It has so many elements to make it the best... whatever the  it wants to be, but it's too buggy and unoptimized. There really is no excuse for Arma 3 to run this bad at this stage of development. Honestly this game is in alpha, whether it says "full release" or not. There is a huge lack of content compared to the previous Arma. Arma 3 has just about 1/4 of what arma 2 had. The saddest thing overall is the fact that there has been no effort to fix this game in quite sometime. I am fairly certain that Bohemia has the resources, but they refuse to even bother with it. THEY SERIOUSLY USED RESOURCES TO MAKE ING KARTS (a presumably broken waste of money) INSTEAD OF FIXING THEIR  ING GAME.
Steedie;-;I think it is a bit over priced but it still is very fun. My Favorate thing is the Editor because you can spawn in anything you like and mess around with everything! Altis life is a really cool mod for arma 3 aswell so you should try that out if you get arma 3.
Biggie C;-;10/10 Became a cop, helped drug dealers, got my money, got fired.... Worth!
Hollow;-;Altis No-Life
> Bash;-;One of the best games i have ever played find the right guys and the right server to play with and i'll promise you, you'll have the time of your life.
Cpt. Faxe;-;The newest game in the Arma series from Bohemia Interactive offers a wide variety of new vehicles, weapons and gameplay options. If you like war-games, but want something a bit more realistic than 'CoD', Arma III is for you!
Jon Snow's Corpse;-;Huge open world sandbox. Multiplayer desyncs a lot, too many kill trades online. The content is created by users, so there is not that many good missions or multiplayer modes. Theres is about 3 Main modes that people play; King of The Hill, Wasteland and Altis Life. This is still a great buy and many people are working on creating new missions and improving current missions. Warning: There appears to be a high number of squeaky kids considering how kids usually are into more casual games. Must be all the Day Z fuzz arma has gotten into.
Estogamo;-;"I'm not going to pay this money for this game" - Totally not, you shouldn't. 1st you should get a better GPU, and I mean a VERY GOOD GPU, ARMA 3 still needs better optimization. 2nd wait for multiplayer fixes, it still has some desync insues here and there, multiplayer performance needs improvement. 3rd "Why do i need ot wait for multiplayer fixes when i can play Singleplayer?" - Well ARMA is made for Coop action, and by this I mean join a clan/ group/ unit that knows how to play the game correctly. 4th Buy it and you will see it will be worth it!
DiddlerOnTheRoof;-;WHATEVER YOU DO DO NOT BUY THIS GAME Bohemia is almost exclusively renound for their broken-promises and cash-cow attitude towards their customers. They released a broken game, let the UNPAID modders fix their screwups (most bugs are still VERY prevelant, even now in 2015) and then have the AUDACITY to charge OUTRAGEOUS amounts for DLC that should have been in the Original Title!! DO NOT SUPPORT THESE DEVELOPERS, THEY ARE NOT IN IT FOR THE GAMES
andreaXX 22;-;This game it's game that is really worth buying, if you like tactical gameplay or just messing around and create everything you want in the Zeus mode, or create a mission that you can public on the steam workshop or play it yourself. Also this game has a A LOT of mods that you can use and have fun with, and with these mods, like Epoch, Arma becomes a Survival game or with Altis Life it becomes a RPG. The only bad thing about Arma is that it has a lot of bugs that Bohemia Interactive is still fixing but i still love it,and i hope that you guys enjoy it too.
-Ethiopian Aids-;-;This game is a waste of $60, Bad Graphics, barely any multiplayer firefights (which is why i bought this game). I could relate this game to GTA 5 because a good percent of the players play RPG servers and you go around like feel life. I thought this game would be sorta like Battle Field 4 but nope it did not meet any of my expectaions. 2/10 stars
Cheerfulrose;-;Keep Calm AND SMOKE WEED EVERYDAY :P :P
Fuze_cap;-;I started of playing ArmA 2 but came out somewhat frustrated because of the controls and interface, the game explored new concepts but was not an enjoyable or intuitive interace. ArmA 3 and a completley different expirience for me. The game still looked and felt like ArmA 2 but they have fixed my few problems that I had with the previos game, making probebly the best expirience in a game ive had in a long time, The map "Armory 2" by Happy Comedy makes the game easier to learn alowing players to test out vehiclels, a must have map. The 60 dollar price point can turn people off but trust me, if you are looking for vehiclels, guns, boats, scuba diving, drones, tanks, cars, planes, helicopters, and a @#$% ton of amazing and cool mods, this game is definitly for you. -Fuze
Brent Rambo;-;Really cool game if you are used to shooter games. It is very intense and realistic, you can get killed pretty quickly and vehicles can blow up easy. Also the maps are very beautiful and great to explore with lots of hiding spots. Arma 3 has a large range of weapons that can suit all playing styles so I highly recomend it for people who are reasonalbly experienced at shooter games.
Beatlesfan117;-;refried beans go great with salsa
xxcursivexx;-;Patch 1.46.......There exists a bad crash of various display drivers.......yadda yadda yadda we know this patch will increase crashes and we suggest you roll back drivers on your graphics cards......I need to smoke whatever bath salts they are toking at BI because what they just told us is " we really really ed the game up and dont care. Good luck getting your 85 dollar game to work Kappa"
Creatures Lie Here;-;I think the forum post that I made sums it up well. Tl;dr, the game's community is terrible and the multiplayer is full of  mods that barely work, with the occasional gem ruined by the community that inhabits it. For a more detailed review of my free weekend day with the game, read below. After my dad bought arma 3 I thought I would try it out as well. I've been interested in a realistic modern FPS, but they don't really exist in numbers these days. After taking over an hour to install the game, I was able to play the tutorial while tweaking with my video settings. I eventually up to over 30 FPS while looking really good. Then I decided I wanted to try the multiplayer out. What a mistake that was. ARMA 3's player base is actually worse than ARMA 2's in that every single online server is some  reincarnation of the Hunger Games or DayZ without the zombies. I spent about 4 hours trying to have fun in these game modes. But to no avail, I was playing a really bad set of mods set in a gigantic map that might as well be a copy of Just Cause 2's getaway island, all in a modern FPS simulator. It was like trying to play paintball in playground that was clearly a copy of McDonald's playplaces. After some searching, I eventually found a Domination server, which was as close to vanilla ARMA as I was going to get. It was incredibly confusing, there was no tutorial to explain any of the game mechanics/mod additions, and people were wrecking the base's vehicles. I was desperate, so I tried to play anyways. After about 10-15 mins of gameplay I noticed that my FPS was lagging really badly. I had just found a team of coordinated players though, so I just tried to play through the pain. After the 5 of us singlehandedly took the next objective, everyone was complaining about FPS issues and I was getting 13-18FPS. There was clearly something wrong, but luckily for us a moderator just got on! He reset the server for us, which I thought was really nice. But it was to no avail. Everyone was still having FPS issues, and I guess that has to do with ARMA 3's terrible optimization and/or the custom map's or plugin's memory leakage filling up our RAM. Then, I encountered a new problem. The moderator. He was especially grumpy, and clearly over 40, so being so out-of-touch with not understanding everything he was getting really upset at all of the new players. He understandably kicked a new player that was spamming the minigun on our helicopter even after the moderator told him to stop. And then I got kicked for no reason, presumably because I was also in the helicopter? I came back in, told him that he kicked the wrong guy, and the moderator essentially blew me off. Whatever, screw him then. I found a FOB to spawn on that somebody set up on the enemy's flank. I was able to shoot a couple of guys before they shot me off the hillside. I spawn back in, and everyone is doing awesomely. The enemy has a Frogfoot firing missiles and bombs into the city, the Warthog is doing the same thing, we had mortars, they had mortars, and I was able to move into the town because it was getting absolutely hammered. So I set up shop in a 2nd story window down a street when I spot a couple of soldiers. I aimed at thier bodies but couldn't see a IFF tag so I shot one of them. After the other part of this ambushed squad came back out in the open, I shot another one. I was unsure about whether they were friend or foe still, so I kept an eye out for server messages in the lower-right corner. Loe and behold, this guy was a friendly, and I just shot him. The other guy must've been a friendly too, which means that I accidently killed 2 of my teammates. I immediately said sry on Side Chat, but it was too late. Apparently the immature community that seems to make up ARMA 3's multiplayer though it would be funny to set up a special plugin for teamkillers. Whether it was an accident or not, after 2-3 TKs you are immediately teleported away from the game and your position in the town to some prison with several annoying soundbites going on in the background, and nothing to look at but other TKers and a really low-quality repeated billborad of some kind. After I sat there for a few moments, I was also wearing pink clothing that had TEAM KILLER printed all over it. And there was a soundbite of a baby crying, because that's how annoying the moderators wanted to be. In short, I accidently made a mistake, and was punished in the most immature way possible. By being imprisoned in an annoying micspam room with nothing to do for 6 minutes. Wow. In every other FPS you either lose a bunch of points, get kicked, or are killed by the server. In ARMA 3 the s that run the only close-to-vanilla server throw you in a prison that forces you to listen to, once again, MIC SPAM that is against the server's own rules. I'm so glad that I got to try this game out this weekend, because I would have regrets had I bought it. Thank you, ARMA devs, for letting me experience the tiness that is your multiplayer. Glad I didn't waste my money on it.
Removable () Penis;-;Poor performance on high-end PCs, Low player count, huge learn curve. Good for people with nerves of steel, bad for anyone that does not have more than 3-4 hours of just sitting and waiting for something to happen. Not recommended.
Bond;-;Arma 3 broken game broken promises. Arma 3 alpha comes out, has great voice over quality, great hit registry, guns work when you shoot them. They update it. Broken voice over, broken hit registry (90% of bullets don't register a hit), car physics are for trolls, all the servers are run by admin and friends (donate money and they will ban whoever you don't like), planes don't work, AA shoot you down from 5 km away. The only thing fun is flying a helicopter. Running is broken in the game. Play epoch mod and get shot by a five year old hiding in the bushes in his underwear. Bad games made worse. Just pretty graphics, however half the servers run terribly and don't support high frames so even if you have a nice computer good luck getting good frames. Would have been great if they just left it in alpha instead of screwing it up.
br;-;Arma's popularity stems from the fact that it's a modern shooter with good modding support. That's it. The game itself is heavily flawed and buggy. Bohemia Interactive's strategy is to exploit the lack of moddable shooters by releasing a half- game and letting the modding community fix it. Sure, there will be some great mods for the game but their success shouldn't be attributed to Arma. Games like Battlefield 1942, Battlefield 2, and the Half-Life series were hugely popular due to all the great mods made for them. But the games themselves, without mods, were actually competent. With the shift to catering towards console gamers, modding support has fell by the wayside, and Arma, perhaps unintentionally, fills that gap. But Arma has horrible AI, horrible physics, horrible performance, a clunky UI, and so on. If Arma weren't moddable, I'm confident its metacritic rating would be more like 5/10.
Poob;-;Tried this for the free weekend to see if I could enjoy it. Played on normal and the difficulty was far too great for me to find fun. I respect this game and feel its good and everything, but even on the lowest difficulty I find it near impossible to find and shoot the enemy. Gun sway is really intense, and this is with me lagging behind the rest of the AI players walking to preserve energy (im aware of the extra stamina drained when moving crouched). Enemy seems to be able to see through foliage. If you like incredibly difficult things, this game is for you. I took my time to do the tutorial, learn the buttons, positioned myself carefully and usually just ended up getting shot. Theres time compression thank god, however a lot of people might not even realize its there. This game has its moments, but I would recommend Operation Flashpoint Red River over this any day, I find it much more satisfying moment to moment. I am an adult with a full time job, walking through the woods simulator isnt my thing, I gave this game a chance and I feel as though I wasted two hours of my life yesterday. I want to love this game as much as the original operation flashpoint...but I can't, I simply can't (in cleetus voice). Graphically things went well, I have a gtx 660 and 10 gigs of RAm on an i5, with shadow play on and recording I was getting somewhere between 25-70 FPS. FPS drops intensely around buildings. I am runnning it on ultra settings. If you have a system similar to mine you can be pretty much assured to play at an acceptable framerate. If you have friends to play with turn on OF:Red River. The friend I tried this with was too frustrated with the shooting mechanics to enjoy it. This game is good mind you, but not for me....
SpawnZero;-;You're basically buying the engine, the "game" itself is  the only satisfaction you'll get from A3 is from the community made maps and mods therefore i can not recommend this
Gnyu;-;20fps but more then requiment specs ;) gg Bohemia !
Edge;-;Paid $70 for this and I've spent more time trying to figure out how to join multiplayer servers than I have even played the game: Play>Multiplayer>any server - - Loads for a second then returns me to server list without saying why, as if it never happened before. Waste of money, thanks.
Slothcon 2020;-;Arma 2? Amazing. Decent DLC. Arma 3? Great. HORRIBLE DLC. For the simple fact they're charging 10.99 for TWO helicopters, I'm just done witht his game.
Elendil;-;Arma 3 is not a game you should pay $60.00 for. The game does indeed offer a few nice features but it does not offer the good, realistic, and tactical gameplay you would recieve from Arma 2
Swen;-;fix everything plz
Drizzt;-;All I can say is this is the worst POS coded game I have ever played. While I do not have the most current hardware, 280x, 3.6GHZ Proc, 16GB Ram and SSD the FPS are at best 24. When using autodetect I get 14fps. Really? I spent money on this? Save your money and buy something playable. I even tried the process prioroty and run scripts. THIS IS A WASTE OF MONEY
Bailey;-;Sad to see how far Bohemia Interactive has fallen. Dont buy this B$#@ S%$@ or the DLC, all DLC should have been in the game in the first place! ARMA 2 had chinooks in the game, for free, they released Cart Racing DLC before Helicopter DLC.... If you do own ARMA 3 already dont waste your money on DLC, the community will mod more Helicopters/Islands into the game for free then BIS ever will. Just wait dont waste your money. Stay Far Away
President Kukubird ButtClencher;-;Arma 3 is definitely more improved than Arma 2, the experience is much better and the graphics has improved and the maps seem to be bigger. However to play it with at least 30fps or higher, you need a supercomputer to do so as this game is horribly optimised. Here is a comparision of my frame rates playing different games Battlefield 4 - 70fps (ultra settings) Tomb Raider - 120fps (Ultra settings) Arma 3 - 40 fps (Standard settings) The graphics of this game is comparable to Tomb Raider. Verdict: Don't buy it unless you own a supercomputer.
TeamSpeakUser;-;WHY DO I HAVE TO PAY 15 DOLLARS FOR 2 CHOPPERS WHEN THE GAME ALREADY COSTS $45?????? SO STUPID
Fishii;-;Okay this game needs to fix it's . Now I don't remeber it being this badly before. I'm attempting to ing re-play through the campaign and I cannot get anywhere. They have a fatigue system to where if you run you get exhausted, cannot run, shoot, Ect. Now. Thats good. I like it. BUT. They need to fix it immensely. first time. Can't aim. I lay down for 3 minutes to let him breath. Didn't work. got shot at and killed cause I couldn't shoot back. This same senario happened over and over again. Finally I got sick of it and threw all of my gear on the ground. Had to be my weight right? Nope. It still got me extreamly tired immediately. Now. I wasn't injured (had medpacks on me. 2) I wasn't running up a hill I was walking. Casually. and if it considered the clearing I was in. then well. a bug this game needs to be fixed. I was on the same part for the past two hours. Until I see this fixed. NO. I don't reccommend this game. at all. I never had this trouble before. they broke something. Again
BO EH;-;10/10 Would not buy again -Gamespot
Brad_H;-;I like military sim games and this one has a lot going for it. But in the several hours I put in to try it out, I found a huge flaw (to me). It has way to many keystrokes to accomplish what you want. Just the simple task of engaging an enemy, requires you to hit 1/2 dozen keys almost. Many keys are dual purposed (press or press & hold) and have to be held with other keys - which means you don't always get your character to do what you want or he does something you don't want. You can of course re-bind any of the keys, but then you end up using every key on the keyboard... literally... even the num pad (if you have one on your keyboard). I think this is just bad design. Sure after a hundred hours, you probably could make it 2nd nature to tap all the keys you need, to do what you want quickly. But come on. I think this game could/would be great if they would simplify the controls. Doesn't need to be COD easy but certainly needs to improve. The one other thing that got me. Trying to play multiplayer and it's very confusing. There is not much to tell you what is going on and what you are doing - and that's just getting into the game (multiply screens to get thru with no instrutions or details). Once you do make it into a game, again no instuctions or details about what's going on and what you are suppose to be doing. I wasn't the only one, other people on the team seem to just be wondering around clueless. Such potential, such fail.
Menckenstein;-;The staff of this game was pillaged to make DayZ standalone, everything about it is just sad and it makes me nostalgic for vanilla Arma 2. Czech yourself into a mental hospitality if you buy this.
Stronkie;-;I was a fan of the ArmA series. I really played ArmA II totally grey.. But I had high hopes for ArmA III buying the alpha , promising us more stuff will be added later... Yes that part is true.. ArmA III on itself is totally empty... You have to get Mods and Payable DLC content to make the game interesting... It is like they gave you the engine of the car only.. You have to pay for the wheels , chassis , doors , windows , lights yourself. It is suppose to be MilSim , in order to have that label , it should give us also. What made me being so disappointed about ArmA III... It is that the Helicopter DLC costs 12 euro.. Like WTF
loose cannon renegade maverick;-;meh. i have a couple of issues with the game. 1. you need a fantastic cpu and decent gpu to handle this game. otherwise, you will be constantly playing at 20 fps 2. for how much processing they take up, the ai is downright stupid. they are still too slow and hardly use enough cover to blend in with players. -to make up for difficulty, the ai is incredibly accurate and good at detecting. 3. the vanilla campaigns are set so your teams are at poor odds with the ai. this is supposed to be realistic, where real world tactics are used. why is my team running into an enemy town through a valley? 4. the armor system is awful. it takes 5-6 shots to kill with the medium caliber assault rifles. i know they say its because of plate carriers. plates don't necessarily stop bullets, they take a lot of energy out of them so you don't die immediately. getting shot is still going to put you out of a fight. anything past .243 or 6.5 is going to start breaking bones; it would be amazing if you could even still move on your own let alone shoot back accurately. 5. the campaign is mediocre with missions that take too long and put too much responsiblity on the player trying to have fun. arma2 also had bad voice actors with bad lines, but this is a little better. its stilll not much of an improvement. 6.wonky user interface. this have improved on a lot over time, and there are mods to make it more intuitive. it still takes a while to do anything in your inventory though; maybe because in real life, it would take time to rummage through your pockets and ruck sack to find anything. it still sucks though 7. no tutorial. yes i know there is a 'boot camp' thing now. that hardly explains how to use anything. it still missed subjects like actual fighting, flying helicopters and jets, taking cover. 8. mission editor. how do you use it? i don't really know. ive been messing with it for years, i still dont think i know much about how it all works. 9. multiplayer. it doesnt happen. at least from what ive seen. just about all the servers are locked clan servers, or empty public matches. the server browser is cluttered and confusing with no explanation of what it all means. i mean call of duty was so successful partly because of its join a random lobby feature. i know i mentioned all the bad stuff. there is much good to this game, and im sure other reviewers will point it out. i played this game franchise until i got sick of it. now i play insurgency because its much more fluid and refined with the same idea of critical dammage and little hud.
0V3RKILL;-;I have an 8350 clocked at 5.0 and a video card 290x twinfrozer. I score 9250 on 3dmark and this game runs like crap no matter what. On top of all this I hate the amount of control buttons this games always have. They need to make them like operation flashpoint.
o/\o Future;-;At first this game was a lot of fun to play. But with the time it rather got worse than good. - The game does not go above 29 FPS for me (on i7 4770k, GTX 770, SSD) - It easily drops under 20 FPS when there is a bit of vehicle movement around the map - The AI is programmed really bad. Not finding paths. Not moving at all when told to. The game is just as good without AI as it is with them. Maybe some dummy targets for your enemies. Which again are overly OP compared to your AI... - Since the shutdown of GameSpy it is completely unavailable for Coop missions with friends. Hosting Steam servers was not working since the games release And last but not least the price is way too high for a game said to be "still under development" I regret every Cent of the 45 Euros which I payed for this game.
Xristos_cy;-;The game seems to be ambandoned from the developers... Has bugs and i cant find a multiplayer season with serious players to play. Also a hell of the lag
Ztridus;-;I cannot recommend this game, mainly beacuse it runs like hell. I have tried the game on two diffrent computers (one with gtx 580 and one with gtx 770 GPU) and still very rarely get above 40 FPS in multiplayer. And that is on standard settings. Battlefield 4 on the other hand runs with an average of above 100 FPS on very high settings (no AA though but 90 FOV). I like the concept of the game and if the performance issues gets solved I'll give the game another try, but as of now I have tried the game on multiple occasions since march 2012 and it still doen't work. Note however that while the game has superb scale and huge empahsis on teamwork - which is great - the core of the game is still far worse then any of the other major FPSes. Shooting in this game is irregular, laggy and the action menu is terrible. I really like the shooting mechanics in Red Orchestra 2 but in ARMA they are damn awful. Flying helicopters is quite fun though and very challening (unlike battlefield).
Funky Munky;-;Hardware requirements are rediculous. I can run most other games well on medium or high visuals. On ARMA 3 i can only manage to squeeze 9 fps Servers lag like  Buy it in a decade from the bargain bin. You'll be able to run it then
Jupiter;-;I really can't recommend this game in the state that its in. Bare bones content. Nowhere near the value for money or content that ARMA2:OA alone has. Stupid, awkward release schedule and lifeless world and content. I wish I could get a refund.
dimefan09;-;this game is not realistic at all really. recoil is garbage, the weapon sway is way to much, the damage you do to enemies is way to low, it shouldn't take more than 1 shot to the head to kill someone but in this game it does at times, when you fire a weapon fire doesn't come out of the barrel like how it does in this game, Also 90 percent of everything in this game is fake and the rest are prototypes/in use. the only things that i can think of in this game that are real are the 556 weapons which do barley any damage so you don't every use them anyways... this game would be better if it wasn't called arma 3, because it ruined the arma name...
sanction+drone=happy meal;-;Least user-friendly game I have ever played (or attempted to play). If you are an online gamer, good luck figuring out how to join a server. After spending over an hour trying and failing to play multiplayer, then searching Google for a tutorial, it's very obvious why this game will never succeed: IT'S IMPOSSIBLE TO JOIN ANY MULTIPLAYER SERVER. Stick with games made by professional developers and avoid this wanna-be bs crap
Aleyboy;-;As a previous ArmA player i couldn't wait to see the new technologies that were going to be used in ArmA 3. Then i played it. From a personal point of view, this game is a complete let down to the ArmA series. Yes it is enjoyable in some aspects, but it is nothing compared to ArmA 2 / OA. If you're looking for a more arcade type military game, you've found it.
ak3120;-;Dear Diary, Today, OpFor Was a  Only Hardcore Arma will get this. (srsly do get it game = gud)
Paincakes;-;Really fun game, it's worth all your money :D
[B.M.O] HAM (5);-;Are you looking for a milsim game that uses cooperation, tactics and all out warfare well  off this isnt the game you are looking for. You will be killed by the smallest graze to your arm and if you just so happen to live from your wound you will have the worst weapon sway that the universe has ever seen. The planes are ed up to a point where a pawnee will shoot you down by following you and random spraying its miniguns that have the power of the sun and dont even get me started on the physics oh jeez you can get shot in the foot and die and from the shear impact your body will fly to the ing clouds and back . Oh another thing if you so happen to be driving a car and hit a little mesh fence designed to keep rabbits out you will lose you engine, tires, hull and virginity to that mother ing mesh fence and thats only going 15kmh dont even dare go over that speed limit you daredevils. Ahhh the best of them all... the stamina update... you can be running for 50 meters and your guy will be having cramps and dying from pure exhaustion from the marathon that er just ran so calm your  son and walk that off while under fire from all them ers out there with little 9mm rounds that will behead you. Good day and do not buy this... ever... at all..... I MEAN IT
Shaman;-;Game is full of technical issues. Game braking issue from day 1 is no support for popular sound hardware in PCs that is: Soundblaster X-FI Titanium Pro (5.1 system) by Creative or Realtek ALC889 (5.1/7.1 system)... you do not hear most of the sounds, and ones that play are rendered in audio scene incorrectly and with issues (f.e. dissapearing volume while crossing center channel or directly in the back, muffled distorted sounds, missing dialogs, effects etc.) The only way to play it right with correct audio is to either channel sound via HDMI AUDIO OUTPUT to your basic TV built-in speakers or buy cheapest Skype USB headset for telemarketing. I am disgusted by the state of sound engine and since it is broken since Alpha stage *according to their forums, reported problem by numerous high-end users throughout 2013 and 2014 with complete ignorance from devs. http://forums.bistudio.com/showthread.php?157247-Surround-sound-problems-DEVs-take-notice/page12 , I spent several hours trying to fix this issue myself with help of feedback from the Internet. WHAT A WASTE OF TIME! Glad, it was worth it and I didn't buy this broken piece of .
TaylorSwiftFan2016;-;Some background: I first started playing Bohemia Interactive games in 2001, when I played the demo for Operation Flashpoint from a Computer Gaming World disk. I owned all of the Operation Flashpoint expansions, as well as ARMA II, and now ARMA III. This game sucks sh*t. All of them have, and all of them have depended on the addons to make the game playable. BI Has never made a decent game, only a platform with promise that modders/mission makers polish up. -I don't know why BI continues to make storylines, they've always been awful at them. -AI sucks. I just fired up a mission and was told to plant explosives on some mobile artillery. The Platoon Leader said "and everyone else take cover".. apparently a couple AI thought it best to run towards the mobile artillery, so I accidently killed them ---leading to a mission failure, and them shooting at me. -Before that two soldiers got killed running off on their own (funny, never saw that in the Ranger Handbook) -Most multiplayer servers with a decent ping are either RPG or DM... I should not have to explain why this is stupid. +Voice acting gets slightly less terrible each game. +Graphics are decent I don't recommend getting this unless it's like 75% off and you understand what you're getting.
Shaman;-;Game is full of technical issues. Game braking issue from day 1 is no support for popular sound hardware in PCs that is: Soundblaster X-FI Titanium Pro (5.1 system) by Creative or Realtek ALC889 (5.1/7.1 system)... you do not hear most of the sounds, and ones that play are rendered in audio scene incorrectly and with issues (f.e. dissapearing volume while crossing center channel or directly in the back, muffled distorted sounds, missing dialogs, effects etc.) The only way to play it right with correct audio is to either channel sound via HDMI AUDIO OUTPUT to your basic TV built-in speakers or buy cheapest Skype USB headset for telemarketing. I am disgusted by the state of sound engine and since it is broken since Alpha stage *according to their forums, reported problem by numerous high-end users throughout 2013 and 2014 with complete ignorance from devs. http://forums.bistudio.com/showthread.php?157247-Surround-sound-problems-DEVs-take-notice/page12 , I spent several hours trying to fix this issue myself with help of feedback from the Internet. WHAT A WASTE OF TIME! Glad, it was worth it and I didn't buy this broken piece of .
TurkeyWhisker;-;This game crashes constantly. I have yet to play a full multiplayer match because it freezes within 10 minutes of playing every time. I have a high spec computer and play other games on highest settings. When I try to play Arma 3 on lowest settings, it crashes. This game is what we call a complete failure. Save your money for a game that actually works.
Ettlinger87;-;Great game, But if you plan on playing multiplayer. Expect to get banned by Battleye. Played this franchise since Operation Flashpoint: Cold War Crisis back in 2001 up to the split between Codemasters and Bohemia Interactive. Onto the ARMA franchise. Never cheated and now it's completely unplayable on multiplayer. Battleye has ruined this game for me. They even ban your steam account. Can't just rebuy the game...
SGT R Lee Ermey;-;65/100 Pro's Very good scale, and detail in the world allows you to see things miles away. A large selection of well modeled weapons, gear, vehicles. Multiplayer if done right, can be epic and quite a bit of fun. These servers are extremely hard to find though. Cons Very poor AI - I'm talking drop dead liberal half baked hippie 2nd grade education type of stupid. NO CONTENT - took almost 2 months just to release a few single player missions No Multiplayer Support - no real official missions or servers to help keep the population high. BUGS BUGS BUGS Performance issues Missing a lot of must have vehicles and aircraft that would really add to the simulation. I would NOT recommend buying this game until about a year of patches and they complete the game. It is UNFINISHED as of right now.
Apocalypse;-;If you're a fan of ArmA 2 then you'll really enjoy this game. There have been tons of graphical improvement made to the engine which make it much more enjoyable. Personally, I didn't enjoy ArmA 2 or this release. ArmA 3 is just much of the same in the ArmA series. Most of the modules and features are half finished, the AI is god awful, and it seems that Bohemia just released an open world game and expected modders to do the rest of the work.
Sinic;-;i really don't give a  about this game until ace and acre is finished for this 0/10
LittleBoyLover;-;the games has potential, but i hope u like walking and driving cause the map is comparable to the real world, the map is so huge, it makes the game a joke, and unnecessary lag, i like the idea of being able to have more room to plan attacks better, but this is just insane, i possibly would have liked it, if they made it simple to play, but the instructions were horrible and not written, the games has way to much problems for me, and i can already see going through hell, just for 1 round of shooting. i would rather go play battfield 3, and not enough players all the games are empty except 2 and the admin kicked me out of the 1 lol and after that i tryed 1 more game, then i had enough, only can take so much problems, in a game.
ProximaCentauri -DGB-;-;Very frustrating game, overly complicated gameplay with a very unpolished combat system. Gun sway is completely unrealistic, and annoying. Navigating the different in game and in campaign menus very frustrating. Lots of bugs, random people walking in place. Not very impressed so far.
RadMan;-;The controls are all over the place first the mouse then the actions and you cant change walking controls but its a good game if i got feedback.
BENW;-;-Game content 5/10 This game generally lacks of content. Yea, i got 479.6 hours playing time in this game, but i spent like 470 hours for making the game content, which is not fun, this is not a game for me, this is just a development platform for us who want people enjoy this game. However after many years, BI still didn't want to add any decent player made content into this platform, I feel disappointed. There are a lot of awsome missions / content, but the chance you are playing the awsome content with public players is like something around 0. It is shame that BI depending on the player made content but lacking back-end support for the mods, the server client should be able to distribute the mods to the players and synchronize all contents of the connected players. Most of the active players are just kids while it says this game is for 17+ Mature players, and obviously BI is changing this game series to suit the appetite of the non mature players. If you are mature player like me, you will close this game immediately after seeing the server list, because 70% of the servers are running Altis life, To fully enjoy this game , you have to join a clan or form a group of players with same interest. You will lose interest immediately on this game if you did not do this.
Noodle!;-;While it is a game with many great mods and playability, the performance of the engine is beyond reprehensible. Even with every setting on lowest my i5 3570k with GTX 650 averages around 5-15 fps in multiplayer combat. It's unfortunate.
Agent Dana Scully;-;More demanding than a gay bank robber. 4/10 #NeedsOptumumizations
MeDuzZ-;-;I cannot recommend this game when ArmA 2 is still alive and well. First of all, the game is lacking in content, for example, most of the weapons and vehicles are the exact same for different nations, with different paint schemes. The map is huge, which is great, till you look closer at it. Most of the buildings are empty, no furniture, nothing. A lot of the assets are missing, even basic objects/buildings for some missions that were around since the OFP days like CTI just aren't there. The gun handling feels like something straight out of battlefield, if you know how to control the recoil, which by the way is not hard, it basically goes straight up, you can be completely accurate at 300m with a fully automatic weapon. The character handling feels very awkward, and this is coming from someone with 2000+ hours on arma 2, I know about awkward controls, there are like 3 movement speeds, all of which take around 3 keystrokes to get in/out of, what happened to the good old days of just pressing W then going? This isn't a damn car, I don't have to switch gears depending on the speed I am going at. Speaking of cars, the cars handle very awkwardly aswell, the acceleration is just ridiculous, it takes forever to get up to around 30kmh, then it just switches on the afterburner and off it goes! Hey look, an afterburner! Oh wait, it's a trainer jet, a stealth a10, and some freak su25 thingy. Oh boy there is so much wrong with the planes and helicopters in this game. I love aviation, hell I'm trying to make it my job, so this part hurts me the most. Where do I begin with this... Let's start with the easiest, L39, it's a trainer, it's not supposed to carry weapons, and you're gonna tell me it's gonna go up in battle with no other air support? Ha, good joke. I'm gonna be honest, I like the looks of the su25 looking thing, but it's never going to happen, much less in 20 years. The SU25 is still doing well, and if it were to get upgraded in the next 20 years, it would probably only be the systems and avionics, either that, or they will build an entirely new aircraft from scratch, or replace it with the already existing ground pounders. Oh boy here comes the big one. That damn stealth a10 freak. There is so, so, so much wrong with this it's not even funny. Alright let's start with what stealthing an aircraft is all about. Sharp edges to bounce the radar off in a different direction than where it's coming from, the whole aircraft needs to be sharp guys, not just the engines. Notice something about the stealth aircraft that are flying around today? Internal stores. You don't want those suckers reflecting radar signals now, do you? The a10 is a subsonic CAS (Close Air Support) ground pounder, It is literally designed  the enemy up, and they'll know what hit them, but it won't matter cause they'll either be dead, or their equipment will be too ed up to shoot back. There is no use stealthing a plane that will be flying at under 5000'. Everyone and their mother will be seeing that bad boy. It's also supposed to take damage, the whole titanium bathtub  and whatnot, by sharpening the edges, you are adding more structural failure points in the event of, you know, a missile hitting it. I'm no aircraft engineer, but to me this makes sense, if someone is reading this and actually is an aircraft engineer, please tell me how wrong or right I am. Same goes for stealthing helicopters I mean come on, how are you going to stealth a ing rotor spinning at hundreds of rpm, and constantly changing pitch/angle? The mi48... This is not how things work, you can't take 2 choppers, merge them together and add some stealth  on it and expect anyone to take you seriously... ArmA 3 is set in the near future. around 20 years from now. If you look at military history, in the 20th century progress was at it's peak in WW2 up to Vietnam, and then kind of slowed down till the mid 90's, and we're now more or less at a standstill. We're still using tanks, aircraft, and weapons designed in the 70's and 80's and perfectioned. It takes a world war or some major conflict of some sort to get us off our asses and to put our thinking caps on. So do you really think that 20 years from now, the ak's, m4's, m16's, etc will be out of service and replaced by a new standard of 6.5mm caseless shells? That we won't be still using abrams, strikers, t90's and BMP 90's? We'll probably have the f22, unfortunatly probably the f35, PAK FA and others, most of this stuff will most likely be old  with fancy new systems. I half blame dayz for how this game turned out. DayZ is/was a good mod/game, but it attracted the wrong kind of people to ArmA, it didn't attract milsim people, it attracted the general public that likes shooters and zombies. The funny thing is, most of the dayz servers you find on ArmA 2 are those stupid 10000 vehicles ones with military weapons in every corner and everyone shooting everyone else in chernogorsk, that's not survival, that's just glorified deathmatch, either way, I digress. Bohemia probably decided to make the game more accessible for those people, leading to this casualized shadow of what was once great. I could let the whole 'it doesn't seem finished' part slide if they weren't releasing DLC for the parts that aren't finished... You are expecting me to pay 15 bucks for 2 helicopters? When there are barely any in the base game to begin with? And I do agree that all of the future bs thing that I've been saying can be fixed with mods, but modded servers are not popular, and the most modding the general public wants to do is grab one of those all in one mods like dayz. TL;DR: It's a casual version of ArmA 2, designed to cater to the general public. If you want a military simulator, I'd recommend ArmA 2 over this. If you feel like arma 2 was overwhelming, then this is probably the game for you.
Dylan;-;Arma ... well what can i say? That haven't learned from the last time.. Make a better server list that doesn't suck your internet dry.. or makes you get kicked out for not being able to connect almost each and every time. I was doubing to purchase this titel, but when it got on the free weekend and i played it.. well ... let's just say i'm not turning my money into this game.
MJMX;-;---> Low FPS even in smallest settings with a computer which runs BF4 with good graphics easily ---> No proper single player campaing ---> Multiplayer servers full of rpg
1kimon0;-;For the first time in the series, the official campaign is actually playable and enjoyable. Play it before they break it with patches! ...was my thought on the first episode. The second episode is filled with uninspired generic missions that don't even have an aim, unlike the first episode where you could obviously tell what element each mission is trying to introduce. The story, too, is non-existent here. It's basically just repeating the point that the first episode already established. Repeating the same thing is completely fine in storytelling, but that's only if you haven't repeated it enough times yet. What's repeated in the second episode has already been repeated just the right amount in the first episode. To the surprise of no one, the third episode is even more uninspired and boring. The missions in the third episode don't contain a single unique idea, unlike the second episode which has a fistful of those. What's worse, the story is absolute garbage. Everything interesting happens off-screen, and the game doesn't even give answers to the questions it raised itself, while giving answers to the questions that didn't exist until that point. It doesn't even have a conclusion, and ends in an abrupt cliff-hanger. It's the definition of trash. All episodes combined, the campaign doesn't even use 1/8 of the interesting locations in Altis and Stratis. For some strange reason, even after the introductory first episode, there are so many missions that take place in Stratis, which is fairly small. If they make sense in the story standpoint, that's fine, but they don't. All of those would have been totally alright to take place in Altis, so it doesn't make any sense. Also, the missions in Altis take place in very boring locations. Even though there are tons of varied locations (e.g. huge town, stadium, ghost hotel, airport, vast desert, mountain full of windmills), they only use the same type of locations: small town. Even worse, the third episode takes place entirely around a single town, Neochori. Why did they decide to do that, we'll never know. The game itself is fine, though, and that's what matters in the end.
karasi;-;I have very low fps on low graphic settings in ARMA 3 while my PC is able to run BF 3 on ultra without any glitches having MUCH better picture. It is impossible to play this game. Very bad.
Winner;-;this game has horrible fps in multi player due to the horrible engines. 6/10
Onee-chan;-;Animations are more responsive, some of the new things introduced are nice, everything else is terrible. For the time being this game remains unplayable for me due to performance issues, lack of content, seemingly uncaring attitudes by the developers and a portion of the fanbase, and general disinterest in the story of this particular campaign. Unless by miracle I find a monster gaming rig behind my house one day and major changes are done to the game and to people's mindsets, I doubt I will return to this game any time soon. Seeing where this game seems to be headed, I doubt any major changes are coming. I'm quite happy with Operation Flashpoint and ArmA 2 in the meantime and for anyone looking for a good mil-sim or just a fun time with your friends, I suggest you buy one of the two aforementioned games instead of this. EDIT: To clarify, I meant Operation Flashpoint: Cold War Crisis, the first game of the Operation Flashpoint series, which I believe is now called Armed Assault: Cold War Crisis.
Vitamin_C;-;Its O.K and all but I really think some things need improvment. The sprinting animation is really unrealistic for me and when you play the game on minumin graphics, you get these weird light glitches across the sky. Also for $60, I think is too overpriced. I got the ArmA 2 complete collection for $40 and thats better value. The gunplay in ArmA 2 is somewhat realistic and the running animation is a whole lot better plus you can get DayZ free of charge. Overall im a little dissapointed with ArmA 3, I would've thought it would of been better. 5/10
karasi;-;I have very low fps on low graphic settings in ARMA 3 while my PC is able to run BF 3 on ultra without any glitches having MUCH better picture. It is impossible to play this game. Very bad.
Winner;-;this game has horrible fps in multi player due to the horrible engines. 6/10
MCW-Shrapnel;-;Hi I'm a big fan of Arma's. I have been, since the first release, back when it was called, Flashpoint I believe. And I have spent, Well over 20,000 dollars on Computer upgrades, and probably more then 2000 hours of my time making levels, over the years. All the time thinking, the next patch, will fix the bugs, plaguing this otherwise beautiful game. Most of the levels I created, never worked out because, of the bugs. I would leave, the level work over night, to see how the AI faired, and to check for Stability. It was always the same, You would find the AI, stuck on some tree, fence, or even just a rock. Now, anyone that drives, know how to avoid, and get out of this situation. But the programmers at BIS, must be pedestrians because, after all these years, these devastating bugs, are still, just as obvious in ARMA3. In fact, almost all the things, that make the game useless, are still in the game. The best you can do, is make little missions, keep it simple, and for god's sake, don't let the AI near a vehicle. Most casualties in an Arma missions, are AI vehicles driving over there own guys, and crashing into each other. Then taking shortcuts though the wood and cliffs. It's bad enough, that the men are 3 feet tall.(Really I'm 6'1"), I always think I'm on my knees. The vehicles are drivable, in Third Person only, the windows are to low, can't see out the side windows. That's why, I thing the Guys at BIS, are kids, without driving experience. Then, there's those annoying things,(not bugs) like, every time you go to the map, You come back crouched. The gun is always up in my face, the gun, should only be up, if I put it there. You can't hold a gun, in firing position, they are heavy. this is a terrible thing to do in a game. Any hunter will tell you, it's crazy and unrealistic, and very annoying. The gun, should always be shouldered, On your chest pointing up safely, or Hanging is hands, pointing down safely. Never in my face or anyone else's, unless you intend to shoot them. But AI has always been the main problem, especially driving and taking corners. The map look great, until you try and use them, the buildings are in the street. What happened to the 3 to 6 meters on both side of the road, even front a lawns. So it's not suppressing to see the game all jammed up, on a unrealistic street corner. And AI, don't understand Bridges, So you constantly find them, all stuck at one. I could mention, another 30 bugs, that have persisted in the game, making useless since the beginning. So instead of fixing Arma2, they just added a bunch of new modern stuff, and knocked out all the great stuff, we played for. So we lose all the work we did, NO backwards compatibility? Well I could live with that. If they fixed the plentiful persistent BUGS. If the sandbox, has just a few toy, and they are broken? Why do BIS, continue adding DLC, to add to the insult? (We played for this game, ahead of time, it's still in beta, and generates so many errors, the log have to be turned off, to use it). Why don't they just fix the main bugs, that have always been,(Like AI) , that would be the only thing, anyone could ask for PLEASE. I'm getting tired of wasting my time, making script, and mods, that can't be used, because of bugs in the game. Don't get me Wrong, I love this game, (for what it could be, if they fixed it). I think, it's the best game on the market. (if they fixed it). They just insist on ignoring the faults, and try to mask them, with other stuff. Ohh and FYI Lately everything is reversed, if your man say's enemy on our right, it's actualy left, and even, get in and disembark tag,s are reversed, Effects from some tanks are on the wrong side of the vehicles ? The speed of AI Vehicles, have the Hicups very annoying, and so does the camera, using Switchcamera, it just bounces back anf forth, making the camera views useless. In fact at present date, the game is not usable. This game needs some major repairs, but they just go on, with future features, and let the bugs ADDUP. and up. If your car has a flat tire, painting it, will not fix the problem. That's the way I see it anyway.
Onee-chan;-;Animations are more responsive, some of the new things introduced are nice, everything else is terrible. For the time being this game remains unplayable for me due to performance issues, lack of content, seemingly uncaring attitudes by the developers and a portion of the fanbase, and general disinterest in the story of this particular campaign. Unless by miracle I find a monster gaming rig behind my house one day and major changes are done to the game and to people's mindsets, I doubt I will return to this game any time soon. Seeing where this game seems to be headed, I doubt any major changes are coming. I'm quite happy with Operation Flashpoint and ArmA 2 in the meantime and for anyone looking for a good mil-sim or just a fun time with your friends, I suggest you buy one of the two aforementioned games instead of this. EDIT: To clarify, I meant Operation Flashpoint: Cold War Crisis, the first game of the Operation Flashpoint series, which I believe is now called Armed Assault: Cold War Crisis.
.smx.;-;I loved Flashpoint, but this game has one of the worst singleplayer campaigns EVER! At some points completely unplayable. If you are into singleplayer - don't buy this game. The only thing you can enjoy here is the multiplayer which can be AWESOME at some points and it is the only reason why I have bought this game - at some point I was hoping the campaign will be at least a little enjoyable, but I am very dissappointed now. I don't recommend buying this game until they fix all the issues in the campaign.
iAxX;-;Game is released and it's still an unoptimized piece of . Just like it was in the alpha... Just like Arma 2 is right now. Out for like 4-5 years still unoptimized and runs like .
ZYXelementXYZ;-;I have been playing Arma 3 for the past couple days (with the free trial), and I was really concidering buying this game. However, even with all the realistic featues that I love, I cannot stand the fatigue and weapon sway system. After running for 3-4 minutes, a short sprint, or getting nicked by a bullet, it becomes nearly impossible to aim. Even while focusing and holing my breath, the weapon is still moving to dramatically to accuratly hit a target at even a hundred meters with a scope. The army is trained to be able to shoot under stress, fatigue, and even injury. I myself have done 100 meter sprints, and half mile runs, then grabbed my AR immediatly after and can still quickly and accurately hit a man sized target at 100 meters. Also, I only shoot with iron sights. Until this unrealistic fatigue and weapon sway system is fixed, I will not be buying the game. Honestly, what is the point of buying it if I can't even engage the AI, (who, guess what, can still accurately shoot you while injured or fatigued!)
Discovery;-;No decent manual available. The training in the beginning does not show you how to use the sight on the gun. So, the next step where you have to shoot targets in a field you have to hit one 400 yards away but there's no clear way how to use the sight on the gun. The cross hair on the screen is not accurate enough. Wished it had a better manual because playability is paramount to graphics.
Mr Raindrop;-;This really is a poor game and should not cost 36, here's why: 1) Recommended system specs are a lie. I could not run the singleplayer campaign above 30fps at 1024x768, lowest everything including draw distance with a FX6300 and HD 7770. False advertising, and also extremely unreasonable hardware requirements. Fanboys will tell you Arma 3 is super advanced etc. so demands a lot of the CPU, but I believe it's just poorly optimised. You can have a lot of units moving about and framerates will stay smooth but as soon as people start shooting performance plummets, so I believe it's something to do with badly optimised effects, not demanding AI (which is pretty poor in any case). Multiplayer performance is even worse and when 20fps is considered 'normal' it's effectively unplayable. People should not accept 20fps due to game restrictions and the dev's ought to really address this. 2) Gameplay is terrible - so bad that it feels like it's buggy rather than poor design decisions. Jogging for about 10 seconds will cause you to start panting and creates extreme weapon sway - maybe they are trying to simulate a Wall-E future of fat soldiers? Again, really kills the gameplay considering the size of Arma 3's missions which require a lot of moving about. Recoil on weapons is ridiculous and feels like your guy is shooting with only one hand with the gun held sideways. Damage is ridiculous, enemy targets will take 2 headshots and some more chest shots to be brought down. It all adds together to completely kill immersion and makes the game feel like a chore. 3) Immersion - Again, keeping in mind how bad the shooting mechanisms are, the AI are utterly gamebreaking as well. You can empty a clip of bullets in a relatively small 1 meter area around an enemy target. He will not budge, he will not flinch, he will just keep on shooting you until you die, and you probably will die because of the awful recoil system in place which makes aiming for the player impossible. The AI are basically terminators who will simply run about from time to time, stand still and then shoot you to death. There is a mod which reduces recoil, and with this mod a player can mow down these AI like fish in a barrel simply because they don't move once they've decided to stop and shoot you. 4) Content - Really really lacking. Okay, they have a single player campaign (which is pretty dull). But what's really bad is that they seem to have left a lot of the content up to the community to develop. There is no ambient combat module in the editor, unlike Arma 2, there is no SpecOps module in the editor, unlike Arma 2, there is no quick mission creator, unlike Arma 2. This makes a huge difference in the game because it means if you want to actually experience the sandbox of the game with AI, you have to either 1) create relatively complex scripts yourself; or 2) download other missions or mods. It's not a pick-up and play game which is disappointing considering Arma 2 was. Arma 3 just goes wrong in so many ways, from the gunplay, to the AI, to the stamina and damage system (basically every aspect of a fps) and the lack easy to use content such as an ambient combat module or quick mission creator, to the incredible system requirements. It really is not worth 36 and, while the futuristic setting is very appealing and graphics look nice, there's no real reason to get this over Arma 2 which is much better overall. Save your money!
killanoid;-;I thought this game would fix the giant mess it created in the last arma game. I was so wrong and i wasted my money on yet another stupid pile of crap. When you cant finish the tutorial because it wont tell you how to aim down the sight or tell you what the hell barring 220 is supposed to mean i give up and shoot the drill sargent. Game DELETED!
Moisty;-;Make Arma Not War
[SHG] Nick;-;Once again Bohemia has delivered a garbage war simulator with mediocre graphics (in comparison to other war shooters in the industry) and optimization worthy of being related to the original release of Crysis 1. I'm using a gtx780, i53750k (3.4ghz), 16gb DDR (1600Mhz) and it ran pitifully. Not to mention the voice acting is once again terrible and robotic sounding and the gameplay is awkward and cumbersome with the worst control scheme in the history of shooter games. I get you're going for realism, but at least try and make it accessible. You don't need crap controls to make the world more immersive; you need smoother controls so that you forget you're even playing a game. You're better off reinstalling Battlefield 2 and downloading "Project Reality" if you really want an immersive War simulator.
Mr.Epic;-;with graphics made of clay and a price tag that is as bad as a call of duty game, this is truly the best shooter experience of the decade. This review is powered by NVIDIA Phyx
ragewhale;-;for the money... well no.. this game is worth 10 times less than what i paid for it. actually i have played phone games more exciting than this. my review for arma 3 is simple, i got it on steam sale, i played it 3 times. and its been pretty bad. - the servers cause FPS lag (because I get 40fps normally on some servers and others it crawls to 9) - the missions are basically to try and troll people - the maps are big and awesome but theres not many people and whoever you see just kills you - its just boring half the time. so if you like just exploring the virtual map and doing jack all half the time then this games for you. but you could be doing that in the real world and have an extra $30 bucks in your wallet (sale price). decisions decisions..
Reitan;-;A fun arma game with better graphics, but it dosent have as many vehicles at the moment as arma 2
Monster Fart;-;if you've got a fetish for first person shooters and the military and happen to be rejected by a real life military branch or happen to be a mechanic or cook in the military then this game is for you. other than that, move along in your real life and join the military. if you can't and happen to be in a wheel chair and love the military then buy this game and dream.
TriceraCop;-;If you read this buy me this game it taughts me about writing a review but i can't play if you buy me this i will give a blow job.
King Pootis;-;My first game on A3 brought me the most horrific experience I've ever had in any game, ever. We're on our way to the objective, a small dump east of a town occupied by enemy forces. I'm leading a team of 4 men. We come to a crossroad and I sprint across, telling my men to hold back. I cross a few more times, trying to get a response from any snipers. Nothing. I run, my LMG gunner runs, my medic runs. But I kept my Marksman on the other side to make sure we'd make it across. Anybody seen Full Metal Jacket all the way through? Remember the sniper scene? The marksman takes a round in the leg as we're running and goes down. He then takes two more in the chest. The kid who was playing had some mad acting skills, he played it up to 11 here. He screams as he's being shot. Crawling, drenched in his own blood. "SARGE? YOU AIN'T LEAVING ME OUT HERE LIKE THIS, RIGHT? I-I WANNA GO WITH YOU GUYS! C'MON SARGE, H-HELP ME! C'MON! PLEASE DON'T LEAVE ME!" he died after that. I cried and he respawned. 11/10, would recommend getting.
Peace;-;This is not a game for people who want fast action movie style gaming, this is a game for people who appreciate the finer things. Having done both military service and picked up MILSIM airsoft as a hobby this game is the closest you will get to what goes on in reality. There are experiences you will have in ARMA 3 that can not be had in COD or BF, experiences that will have you shaking from the adrenaline release. One that comes to mind was a mission to destroy an enemy comms tower, I was squad leader of 8 or so AI:s. As we approached the Comms tower and I told my men to go stealth, no firing unless fired upon. We moved slowly taking advantage of terrain, keeping an watchful eye for enemy patrols. Once the tower was in visual range pace slowed even more and I spent the better part of 30 minutes just looking for enemy patrols and advancing to about 200 meters from the tower. There I positioned my men to cover a wide firing arc as I had spotted quite a few patrols moving in and about the tower. I considered opening fire and probably being able to drop a good portion of the enemy before they could zero in on our position. But a firefight is always a risk, and these AI had been around for a few missions and I had started to anthropomorphize them a bit and secondly I might get hit and killed. As I considered how I would start the engagement a sudden hole opened up in the patrol pattern, I realised the tower is unguarded and I had an opportunity to do something I had not considered. I got up and ran as fast as I could towards the tower, all the time expecting the bullets to start cracking above my head. I kept scanning as I ran whizzling through bushes trying to pick a path that the least visibility to any patrols. After what seemed like far too long I reached the tower and threw out a satchel charge and another for good measure, if one would not bring the tower down it would sure attract attention. I turned around and made my way back, as I closed on my men I started ordering them to fall back, hope growing that I might get out of this alive. Falling back to about 400 meters I finally detonated the satchel charges and the tower fell, from there it was just a short run to the truck and back to Command. I had done it. I had pulled off the perfect mission, not a shot fired and all under my command back alive. That is what this game is about.
[13th] Danius;-;Oh man. Where to even begin with this one. It would be an extreme disservice to simply call Arma 3 a shooter, as it is so, so much more than that. Arma 3 is a military simulator. This is a distinction that its developers hold sacred and are proud of, and one to which I can attest is completely accurate and deserved. But its even more than that. Arma 3 is a gaming platform, upon which so much has already been and will continue to be built for years to come. At its core though, Arma 3 in a supremely excellent military sim. The graphics are stunning, the gameplay is excellent, the mechanics are solid, and Bohemia Interactive has done an absolutely amazing job packaging this all together. New comers to the Arma series (as I was) may initially be overwhelmed by the games complex mechanics and decidedly different pace from your typical FPS/shooter. Enemy engagements happen at much greater distance than is typical in the genre and are often brief, brutal, and more times than not will conclude with your demise. There is no handholding here. No mini-maps, no enemy UI icons/indicators, no hit markers, no health bars. If you get shot a couple of times, you will find yourself unceremoniously dispatched. While this creates a high barrier for entry and a steep learning curve for new players, it provides a unique and distinctive play style. Situational awareness, cover, teamwork, suppressive fire, and generally moving purposefully and as if your  depended on knowing what was behind the next ridge or hiding in the bushes are paramount to your success. Add to these infantry mechanics the amazingly rendered vehicles, armor, helicopters, and planes, each with their own realistic mechanics to learn and master, and you end up with a truly amazing military simulation experience. Out of the box, Arma comes with a great single player campaign comprised of 3 separate acts, each containing ~12-15 missions. The campaign focuses on a well crafted story of a military conflict that has erupted over Arma 3s two HUGE islands of Stratis and Altis. You play the part of a NATO soldier who finds himself stuck in the middle of a complex engagement. The campaign is rewarding, and challenging. (I have yet to complete it as Im stuck on one mission that I simply cant seem to complete.) However the single-player campaign is FAR from the end of this title. The mission editing tools have allowed this amazing community to develop some absolutely awesome single player missions, all of which can be downloaded free of charge from the Steam workshop and numerous other sites around the interwebs. I would also recommend you check out the supremely excellent full game conversion single player mods Whole Lotta Altis and Dynamic Universal War System which will provide countless additional single player hours and could be completely stand alone titles in themselves. Oh and the multiplayer, oh god the multiplayer. Wasteland, King of the Hill, Invade and Annex, Battle Royale, Breaking Point, so many Co-Op opportunities, the amazing looking upcoming Epoch (currently in closed Alpha). Im sure there are so many others that I havent even discovered yet. Each of these represent COMPLETELY USER GENERATED and totally disparate ways to play Multiplayer within the Arma 3 platform. By purchasing Arma 3, you immediately have access to each of these completely gratis and each could essentially be considered totally separate game. In wrapping up this lengthy review, Arma 3 is an amazing experience and a true accomplishment in game development. It is the only game in recent memory that I can say with confidence that I never get bored with playing. Bohemia Interactive has made it clear that they plan to support this game for years to come, and they have built something amazing on which the possibilities are truly endless. Purchase this game. Purchase it now. Thank me later. (IF YOU DO NOT FIND MY REVIEW HELPFUL, please leave a comment as to why. I welcome the constructive feedback.)
ArtificialApple;-;This is quite possibly the most emotional shooter I've ever played, and it's not because of the campaign. Crowd around, children, it's story time. One day, not so long ago, my squad had just destroyed an anti-air battery. Our pilot landed, and the rest of the squad boarded one by one. I was about to get in when the rockets started flying. The chopper lifted off, with my pilot saying that he would return in a few minutes. Unwilling to die before then, I rushed to the nearest cover, a small house by a narrow road. I entered to find a ten year-old player who had also been left behind. He explained that he was a sniper and invited me to join his "clan". I politely declined, explaining that my own squad was inbound. As I finished, a Ghost Hawk flew over the horizon. My squad had arrived. This noble child soldier and I were sprinting to the helicopter when the bullets started hitting. The sniper screamed as a 6.5 mm cartridge entered his leg. His shrieks for help were cut short by one final burst of carbine fire as I climbed in the transport. My new friend was dead. 10/10, would experience survivor guilt again.
Sir Quad Kill aka Sir Charlie;-;If you have friends, this is a great game to play with them. If you don't have any friends, this is a great game to play alone. If you don't have the game to play, get the money for it. If you don't have the money for it, get a job. If you don't have a job, rob the bank. If you get arrested robbing the bank, at least you tried.
theconjuring;-;Children play Call of Duty Boys play Battlefield Men play ARMA
Durga;-;After some 1,400 hours on the game, I can say with FULL VALIDITY this game has ruined my life. If you like realistic physics, teamwork, and every form of warfare, this game is for you. 10/10
Runekn;-;Can't tell you if you should buy it or not, but I can tell you this. You will find annoying bugs, highly requested features that isn't there and lack of content if you're not satisfied with what you have. But when you really get down to it, and experience some of the awesome scenarios you can get in multiplayer and custom sp mission, it's something magical you just can't find in any other game. Arma is not a game which you pick up at launch, play the campaign and a bit of mp, and then trow away. You buy it, love it or hate it, and then play it forever or trow it away immediatly. Arma is a game which you can never called finished. There will always be added to it, be it user or official content, fixes, features or optimizations. Hope I expressed myself correctly and that you learned something from it :) If you like realistic shooters and organized large scale multiplayer warfare, this will be your gem! I'll give it a 9/10, simply because: screw bugs, I've used hundreds of hours on Arma 3 that I would never take back. READ: I will not accept random friend requests! If you have a question, please post it in the comments.
Solly: Panparam;-;It's not a good 'game' for newbies. No, it's not... I use to sit at a place and watch the sunset. I have no idea how to actually shoot, drive and complete missions. It's like my personal sunset simulator. And it's damn beautiful. 10/10
Mr. Bong;-;I have owned this game for a number of weeks now and I have been completely hooked. Great game for the more serious war gamer, not for those who prefer the fast paced combat that you get from Call of Duty series which I consider more for the younger gamers anyway. Arma 3 moves a lot slower and is more squad based than other war games, similar to Battlefield series only slower than that when playing online and you may find yourself on 10 minute helicopter rides just to get into the battlefield and you will be highly satisfied with each kill you make as you know a single round landed by your enemy could be fatal regardless of the weapon they are using. You will have to make good use of any cover you can find and hit the dirt as soon as you hear a bullet crack over your head and then very carefully survey the surrouding area and work out where you are taking fire from as it will usually not be obvious where the fire is coming from and you will find yourself having to hold up for 10-20 minutes in a single location (sometimes longer, I personally have gotten pinned in one location for over an hour) because you are either pinned by enemy fire or it is too dangerous to move forward. You will need to buffer up on your mic communication skills as most players use proper phonetics etc when relaying information to each other on the battlefield such as coordinates and other reconaissance. You can not respawn as quickly as you can in CoD if you are taken down by enemy fire so staying alive is more crucial than any other war game you have played and you wanna hope you are moving up with a squad that has a medic. The graphics are great, the game is a little glitchy at times and the controls take a little getting used to. I recommend buying this game to any serious war game enthusiasts who want to get as close to war as possible (unless doing paintballing or airgunning), and if you do buy the game - I recommend completing the whole VR Tutorial before actually joining a server or playing the Campaign as you will need to really learn all those different keys that may make the difference in a hairy situation in game.
bl6PArU,M;-;Tried playing on win7 x64/Intel celeron 1037U/4GB ram/HD graphics - 20-30 fps@800x600(everything low/turned off) and pemanent problems with the game UI and mouse - it starts working only after I switch the ui scale. Multiplayer crashes (tried playing some RPG mode)
Fuzion;-;worst game ive ever played how about you fix simple mechanics like walking and jumping before releasing this public MORONS........
alascer;-;DO NOT BUY THIS GAME this game is amazing, it is fun and multiplayer can be a real challenge. BUT DONT BUY THIS GAME BECAUSE IT WILL CRASH ON EVERY UPDATE AND THERE IS NO FIX FOR IT DO NOT GIVE YOUR MONEY TO THIS COMPANY honestly, how hard is it to patch a game to fix these crash bugs, fresh install doesn't fix it, restarting computer doesn't fix it, hell.. even installing it on a brand new computer i have which has never seen steam until before, YEP, still didn't fix this f-ing game best game, worst support.
Guanjyn;-;The game crashes to desktop as soon as I join a server and even support can't help. 35.99 for a non-functioning product. Be careful with your money.
YayitzMatt;-;Arma 3 is suddenly marked as a complete game, and they come out with a big DLC a week later? Better idea, how about you suck my  Bohemia?
Wattsy;-;Probley the worst simulator ever made, full of bugs, really really bad optimization, op enemies even on recruit difficulty that can 1 shot you from the most ridiculous distances with no scope!, hidden mission timers that make the game feel rushed and unable to enjoy and to finish the game has the most  fatigue system ever! you can watch a film before your soldier gets up a hill. its a shame to see a game with great graphics & sound ruined by certain factors.......
who;-;I love arma 2 but arma 3 is one of the worst games i have ever played. one of the reason i like arma 2 is the warfare game mode but there isint a good warfare mode in arma 3.
Blyatman;-;Just get Arma 2 Combined Operations.
Ernst_Barkmann;-;If you like to DIE play this game......
Darkpurple66;-;Awsome Game! Worth buying! :D
Buzzkill66;-;It sucks it has the worst campain, it crashes all the time, the phyics suck, it has the worst A.I., and also if your playing on sever that does saves your progress then when you crash which happens all the damn time you have to ing start over
Hoppin Around;-;i wish it was still free ;;;;;;;;;;;;;;;;;;;;;;;;'''''''''''''''''((((((((((((((((((((((((((((((((((((
No Wax;-;Confusing piece of crap, poorly optimised, can not get ANY decent FPS even with everything minimum, which is un-playable. Key binds are ridiculous.
Ghostty;-;I would suggest you don't buy this game and just go play other stuff and try to be happy because quite frankly it gave me the worst gaming experience I've ever had after 12 years of gaming.
[808]LindenxOrigin;-;I didn't even own the game for 30 mins, didn't even get to play except when they we're offering to play it for FREE! And I was GLOBAL BANNED. wtf. That isn't right, that's called fraud.
dalton11417;-;its too expencive
CrAsHiNg CoBrA;-;I like this game. I played my first FPS years ago starting with Doom and at that time I was blown away, and could never of dreamed of anything better. Boy was I wrong. The next game to capture my imagination was Meadal of Honour and the single player world captured my imagination and heart. With Meadal of Honour came the first real multiplayer action that I enjoyed and I couldn't stop playing. Next game to follow was Call of Duty, a great series of games that offered plenty of run and gun action... Great stuff. The Progression to Battlefield for a more indepth experience blew what came before away. Now Battlefield looked to offer with its later installments a more realistic battle experience, but it fails. infantry are fine but the vehicles,which look great,in my opinion start to ruin the game series. That brings me to ARMA 3,, wow ,, once again I am blown away and once again what came before falls into history. Animations, lighting, movment and the environment are a dream come true. This is a truely epic game.
Nadroj147;-;shit i just paid 60$ for this game and now its on sale. . steam plz refund
NCR Veteran Ranger;-;Hello, welcome to Arma 3 Where Hardware Requirments are made up and your hardware doesn't matter.
Bohemia Interactive Sucks Dick;-;Absolute ing  of a game. BI can suck my  for their DLC policy. They release a game that isnt even 50% finished and then without even coming close to finishing the game, they release DLCs that SPAM YOU IN GAME. Its absolutely ridiculous that I am a PAYING CUSTOMER and Im bombarded with ADs for their DLC while I'm playing the game I ALREADY PAID FOR...  you BI I will never buy any of your -not-finished-games ever again.
apradedov;-;The worst game in the series. 1 run - 1 screenfreeze. The issue has been reported to BIS many times but they do nothing. Waste no money! Don't buy the game!
Bee;-;Just get Arma 2 its better and cheaper.
Fed;-;like am relly a sowjer, gunz an tankz anss then big asplowshunz
Jordanjor2;-;Spent 40 on this game and my computer doesnt even let me run it really annoyed. You need like a super computer to be able to run this.
[Get Dirty!] SpewKs;-;Was playing a Altis Life server and I was driving in a truck I just recently bought and then I seen a helicopter landing so i decided to yell in direct communication "ALLAHU ACKBAR" and then I crashed into a helicopter killing about 10 people and then proceeded to  myself laughing because I survived and everyone else died 10/10 Would suicide bomb again
Turkeyboy;-;LITERALLY the worst game I have ever played
USAgent;-;Fantastic Graphics, could be a really good game if they would stop screwing with it. The AI walk through things all the time, shoot through things, Fall into hills, mountains, you name it. Every time they do an update it screwes all the maps up and some things now cannot be fixed yet Like Events and objectives. This does not occure 1 or 2 times its everytime they update. They are not interested in fixing it just make the mappers do it. Im not wasting my next 6 months with this crap. and BTW if you think the bare min requirements will work fine then I hope you like playing solo. We have all had to do major upgrades and still runs buggy. I just do not undersdtand why the hell you would make a game that cant keep up with todays processors,
lolingdevil;-;DO NOT BUY THIS GAME. THIS GAME HAS BEEN GOING DOWNHILL EVER SINCE IT CAME OUT OF BETA AND IS STILL BARELY EVEN PLAYABLE.
ibanez0r;-;DO NOT BUY THIS ABISMAL ATTEMPT AT A GAME! It is by far the buggiest, crappiest attempt at a game ive ever come across, theres pre-release software on steam that works better, you have been warned!
Keistl;-;Really neat game, realistic, fun, and totally worth the money.
MattM;-;This game is amazing. Its all you want from a game. want to kill people? DONE. want to fly? DONE. want to fly a goat? DONE
Wehrmacht Bunny;-;Great game, 8/10!
Fenz;-;The only game I've purchased in my entire life that I regret buying. Look at more reviews to find out if this game is for you or not. It appeals to many, but not to all. Do your research and don't end up a shmuck like me.
FatSquirrel;-;The Single Player is alright, but multiplayer is the  in this game. Life Mods/Battle Royale/Wasteland/King of the Hill are all incredibly fun. Main issues: VERY high system requirements, low frames in altis multiplayer on even the best PCs 6/10 Single Player 9/10 Multiplayer
HiRoGliFiQ;-;I was half way into a mission. Driving a truck. I was told to stop at a check point. I don't know how to stop, so I hit the "S" key. Apparently that's reverse. I was still moving forward, but the INSTANT I hit the S key, the truck changed from going forward to going backwards about a foot, which defies physics a bit, and it said I failed the mission for failing to follow orders (I guess going backwards 1 foot instead of "stopping" at checkpoint). Have to start the whole mission over. Not sure if I'll play the game anymore.
--|MooN|-|WoLf|--;-;"failed to start" (no license) really??? I have 10 hours left to play this game for a test run, and cant play it?!?!?
Leeu;-;Over-priced, Over-hyped, Lacking in content - NOT WORTH IT. The developers re-use broken code from their earlier hits like Arma 2, Arma 1, Operation Flashpoint etc from 2001. The netcode is a DISASTER! Servers can barely handle more than 50 people and even then it's super laggy, rubber-banding and warping all over the place. The developers are now beginning to start releasing over-priced DLCs - 1. because they were too lazy to release the same content WHICH THEY SHOULD HAVE ANYWAY in the game initial release 2. without fixing the basic game, typical money-grabbing tactic.
LastReign;-;A game that only exists because of a mod that hardly works for a game that also hardly works, This game also hardly works. Overloads most routers
Froo;-;RIFLEMAN, TWO HOUNDRED METERS, FRONT. KERRY SHOOT THAT MEDIC. OH  MAN DOWN. KERRY GET THAT UAV. KERRY SHOOT THAT MACHINGUNNER. MOVE THREE HOUNDRED METERS, FRONT. OH  ENEMY FIRE. *kerry ragdolls*
JimmyJack;-;I use to like this game but by charging for some helicopters has me fed up. Hell the game is $60 unless you got it back in the day. I'm just getting tired of here buy our unfinsihed game ok heres some new stuff pull out your wallet this is some ubisoft crap.
Tarleto;-;Your really going to charge people for extra vehicals. The reason i stoped playing Battle field is they kept realasing DLC that you had to pay extra for. Looks like this game is next.
Cocainum;-;Don't buy BI games. You will regret it.
General F1uffy Butt;-;Ai take forever to kill weapon sway is rediculous for player more so when shot and ai dont have reduced accuracy when u shoot them 5 times in the chest
slaughter;-;this  wack dog
senraXD;-;Amazing military simulator. Pros: Looks amazing. Mods. LOTS of great mods. Realistic-ish feel Even if you don't like multiplayer there are lots of scenarios and campaigns in Steam Workshop Cons: Bugs. Feels cluncky in some situations After all it's a great game and I recommend you buy it!
Rolf;-;Just buy Arma 2, its performs better and doesn't have the bulk of its content locked behind DLC. Also it doesn't crash nearly as much.
Keistl;-;Really neat game, realistic, fun, and totally worth the money.
MattM;-;This game is amazing. Its all you want from a game. want to kill people? DONE. want to fly? DONE. want to fly a goat? DONE
Unfortunate Pyro;-;This game is lacking lots of features that other popular RTS games like Call of Duty have and it also has hours of extremely boring gameplay. The helicopters dont even land right either with the engines always exploding I honestly can't stand playing this game for more than 30 minutes especially with how the multiplayer community is filled with little kids who can't even shoot a gun properly.
Wehrmacht Bunny;-;Great game, 8/10!
Fenz;-;The only game I've purchased in my entire life that I regret buying. Look at more reviews to find out if this game is for you or not. It appeals to many, but not to all. Do your research and don't end up a shmuck like me.
Seor Meow;-;I haven't even bought this game yet but it lets me reveiw it :D anyone wanna give it to me for this acheivement? :D cuz that would be very nice since i'm poor :)
No Name ();-;i liked it its just The FPS is so ed up though i have a Strong PC and a Strong Moniter that even supports G-Sync
Fattox;-;Great improvement on an already amazing series.
Jim Carrey;-;yeah she goes alright
PFC R.Arnold[173rd];-;There needs to be more female characters.
Californication;-;Tip of the week: try turning off arma to have fun.
Telefrog;-;My actual review of the game: http://www.quartertothree.com/fp/2013/09/25/arma-iii-pushes-boundaries-combined-arms-warfare-patience/ Summery: Think of Arma III more as an editor bundled with dedicated modders instead of an actual game. I can recommend this only to dedicated fans at this time.
Travdark;-;Arma 3 is the definite game in the military simulation series from Bohemia Interactive. From massive and highly-detailed environments to expansive collections of weapons and vehicles, Arma 3 is a modern military sandbox for both players and modders. Arma 3's most exciting aspects are the built-in editor, Steam Workshop support, and near endless possibilities of community-created scenarios. Arma 3 refines and masters the military simulation genre.
im back for a min;-;doesnt run well even tho its optimized
Dream Da Le Meme;-;its awsome
Saiko;-;Not the game for me, it has very good graphical detail but that is about it. Multiplayer is very laggy and borderline unplayable, controller support is listed as a feature however only a select few controls can be mapped to it - Making playing with it extremely difficult. I bought into it when it was 20 in early alpha, I would not pay 40 for it now, and I'm glad I didn't.
felton;-;top game
g0at;-;The worst. The campaign is lame and lacking, to say the least. I had to restart it because of 'friendly fire' 10 seconds in while I was driving the truck at least 4 times, for no reason...? As soon as you come across enemy forces, which were your allies 10 seconds earlier, you have to shoot them 4 times with your  weapon while they shoot you twice and you're dead and you have to restart from 5 minutes prior, sitting through the same horrible coms talk between leaders. Tried some multiplayer, wouldn't even let me chat to ask them how I can move considering I started as a citizen with my hands cuffed behind my head on a random island no where near anyone or anything... what the  is that? I'm hoping steam will refund my money, this is my most regrettable purchase yet. Don't buy this game.
JRCOBRA;-;Worst game I've ever played. Bare bones in terms of content. The campaign is utterly stupid. Super marksman enemy AI from the first Arma game is back. Perfoms like crap. Campaign missions are awful. Worst game in the entire series not worth the price of 59.99 not even worth the price of the early alpha that I paid for if I could get a refund for this garbage I would. This is the last Arma game and the last game from BIS I will ever purchase.
Callum92;-;unfinished, so its bad
Reggie;-;This is an army shooty game where no one wants to actually shoot at real players. There are only servers for co-op AI-hunts or playing pretend dressup with their armyguy dolls on RP servers.
Unfortunate Pyro;-;This game is lacking lots of features that other popular RTS games like Call of Duty have and it also has hours of extremely boring gameplay. The helicopters dont even land right either with the engines always exploding I honestly can't stand playing this game for more than 30 minutes especially with how the multiplayer community is filled with little kids who can't even shoot a gun properly.
Rolf;-;Just buy Arma 2, its performs better and doesn't have the bulk of its content locked behind DLC. Also it doesn't crash nearly as much.
senraXD;-;Amazing military simulator. Pros: Looks amazing. Mods. LOTS of great mods. Realistic-ish feel Even if you don't like multiplayer there are lots of scenarios and campaigns in Steam Workshop Cons: Bugs. Feels cluncky in some situations After all it's a great game and I recommend you buy it!
Bucky;-;You'll shoot your eye out kid! Well, maybe if you could figure out how to shoot.
Seor Meow;-;I haven't even bought this game yet but it lets me reveiw it :D anyone wanna give it to me for this acheivement? :D cuz that would be very nice since i'm poor :)
Californication;-;Tip of the week: try turning off arma to have fun.
Zag;-;Missing Alot. Enough sed.
Dream Da Le Meme;-;its awsome
s;-;This game freaking sucks big balls!
0o-Nomad-o0;-;An excellent soldier sim, made for the grown ups, no CoD kiddies here! The game is massive, the multiplayer is extremely good, has a great mod community thanks to the stellar Steam Workshop and the visuals are fantastic! Definately worth a buy!!
{LAN} MrNockz;-;Do i recommend this game? Is the sky blue?
Zag;-;Missing Alot. Enough sed.
Crowley;-;This is more of an "infantry simulator" than a computer game. It's an FPS but with Flight Sim controls and realism. The tutorials are called "showcases", which is not at all helpful or descriptive. If you're coming to this for the first time you'll likely make the same mistake I did and try to do the campaign first. The sim itself is insanely hard. The realism means you'll often come under almost instantly lethal fire from shooters who are completely invisible to you, and that's just in the tutorials. Even when you can see the enemy, they're often dots on the horizon who can nevertheless pick you off behind cover with unerring accuracy. Ammo is incredibly restricted, meaning I was actually glad when one of my team got killed because it meant I could resupply. There may be a way to get resupplied without your teamates dying, but like so much of this game, it is not obvious how to accomplish that. The controls are far from intuitive. It took me the better part of an hour and some editing of the control menu to get the gun optics to actually come up reliably when I clicked the right mouse button. Much of what you are supposed to do happens through the "order menu." I think you're meant to use this (maybe? again, it isn't clear) to order NPC team members to do stuff, like attack a particular target, but it is far too unweildy to use in combat. To select the "order menu" you have to press '0' or '~'. '~' didn't work and the font chosen means it isn't obvious if you should be typing 'o' 'O' or '0'. It's zero, btw, but zero on the number keys at the top of the keyboard. Zero on the keypad does something else. The keys can also do different things when modified by alt and ctrl. In the middle of a firefight. Where you die instantly to targets you can't see. Navigation seems straight forward until you try and apply it and realise that waypoints don't actually appear in your HUD, or maybe they do and I just don't know which button/menu item to select to make them visible. Even the inventory system is overly complex. If you try and loot a corpse you have to loot each individual part of their kit separately (clothing, webbing and pack). Not realising this for the first hour and a half contributed substantially to my shortage of ammo. I've tried the campaign and the first 2 showcases. I can't complete the 2nd showcase, because on the rare occasions I don't get insta-killed by the hostiles, the anti-aircraft missile is unguided and I don't have the knack for hitting moving targets with it. I've died at least 100 times so far, >20 of those to land mines, which are also invisible. A punishing exercise in misery and frustration. Not recommended.
FatSquirrel;-;The Single Player is alright, but multiplayer is the  in this game. Life Mods/Battle Royale/Wasteland/King of the Hill are all incredibly fun. Main issues: VERY high system requirements, low frames in altis multiplayer on even the best PCs 6/10 Single Player 9/10 Multiplayer
Frankish Empire;-;Pretty good. Graphics do cause a few glitches. Sadly I keep dying in the campaign as Kerry. But besides that, its not bad. 10/10 would bang.
Way;-;Maybe if it was possible to use sights.
Focus^;-;One buggy game is this game
Shadow;-;worst arma game in history. it feels more like COD or Battlefield due to when you run you can see your wepon on the screen. the graphics are amazing but the graphics dont make the game. the realism is there due to the new stamina system and in vehicles you need more than one person to make it effective but they really didn't do what they promised like putting the take on helicopters flight model in so the helis feel like VTOL planes when you fly really fast. i also dont like how it is set in the future because it cant be a simulation if it is in a era we have no clue about. and the weapons sound like your firing marsh mellows at people the 50. cal machine gun on the pickup trucks sound so quite when i fire a mounted gun i want to have the feeling that im shooting a 27mm gun with my hands not that im just firing another LMG. finally the NATO forces dont have any jets in the vanilla game but the OPFOR and indpendents do it should be the other way around and also the lack of planes, helis and IFVs is terrible there should be more IFVs than tanks and thats not the case, if i want to take a patrol out im not going to take 2 MBTs and a IFV im more likely to take a MBT and 2 IFVs im patroling not trying to take an airbase. those are the reasons you should not waste 60 dollers on arma 3.
Sunneh;-;I walked in on a dead man in a shanty 10/10
Universe2000;-;this game just makes me feel incredible, it feels like your in the game going with it. i love it its really nice textures nice detail and best thing of all its best game you cuold posibly buy in might cost alot but its worth it. its a simulation,military,multiplayer,action,tactical,realistic so many things you cuold think of. ill give it 10/10 the best shooting action simulation tactical game i've ever played thx developers! :D
NOVA;-;Awesome ***** Have only played a few minutes of the single player, NPC asked me to shoot the medic WTF ? But 50+ hours of Altis life (mod) has me hooked, not since the early GTA games have I experienced the wonder of an enormous game world. Add the pvp elements from dayz and a thriving community, its the best thing going.
Moonbiter;-;All around excellent game. The campaign was very well put together, the graphics are amazing, the combat very realistic, and the squad movements are very realistic. It does take some time to get used to all the various controls, there are a lot of them, but once you figure it out you can move your squad through any level with ease and destroy everyone along the way. The mod content is getting better everyday! If you like quick PVP then wasteland and the battle royale mods are great for that. Currently they have a "DAYZ" version of Arma3 called Breaking Point that is an independent spin-off that is also quite fun. I personally cannot wait for the Arma3 Epoch (DAYZ) to come out because I have played the Arma2 mods for a while now. There is also Altis Life and Lakeside if you're into the RP scene but that is all preference. Overall, it's a well put together simulator that ex-military, which I am, or civilian with no experience can learn to enjoy and appreciate. --MB
deathforgot1213;-;This is a very immersive game, with high attention to detail and a seemingly limitless amout of possibilities. Every peice of your gear is changeable... i mean sh*t you can run around the battlefield in nothing but your underwear and a t-shirt if you so please. You can change your camo and helmet and LBV and backpack and every other thing you carry. Everything that is in your inventory can be dropped or moved from bag to LBV or pants/ shirt pockets(and vice-versa). It provides a very similar experience to hardcore milsim airsoft (if thats what you're into... I am into airsoft) without the "Hey call your hits" or "Hey are you dead" BS. You are even able to create your own missions somewhat easily with the in-game mission editor. Anyway I figured I'd share one of my most memorable experiences in any operation in Arma- or any game out there. I was playing on a mission that I created on Stratis(One of the in game maps). I was leading a 10 man assault on Air Station Mike 26. We were all riding in an APC. My gunner was doing great taking out ground troops, and even took out an Ifrit or two. Out of nowhere an enemy hit the APC we were in, popping all left side tires, stoping it dead in its tracks. I immidiately got out and threw a smoke grenade to either side and told my men to disembark. Unfortunately only 2 men made it out before the APC exploded. In that same explosion the 2 men that had made it out were killed. worried, I threw one more smoke grenade and waited for the smoke plume to build and ran straight back behind a small hill, dodging what seemed like the bullets from 1000 angry hostiles. Once behind the hill I healed my self, and radioed in for a helicopter extraction. I waited and waited until the heli showed up. All I could hear above me were the screams of the miniguns that the 2 door gunners were operating, and the swooping of the rotor. The heli flew right over my head and began to circle around the base, taking out enemy after enemy. I knew the helicopter would not last long, as it was simply a helicopter meant for extraction, and not any sort of combat, so I called in an attack heli for some added assistance. After the attack heli started to engage targets I sprinted inside the base behind a large H-barrier. I could see lots of enemies. I quickly engaged one enemy and started to advance to another H-barrier when I was hit. I quickly went prone and healed up, and threw my last smoke grenade inside the base. After about 10 seconds of letting the smoke build I ran up to a building and began to take out target after target, in some sort of spec ops manner(Yeah I was that good). I ran around the base with the supressive fire of the helicopters and cleared the entire base of any threat. After I called in the evac heli and flew myself back to base because the pilot was killed on landing because my area clearing is garbage. It was quite the experience to get the juices flowing. This game never fails to impress, and I still find myself learning new things about it every day.
Snafu;-;If you like tactical realism! there's no other game better than this one 100% recomended
Krackenslammer;-;Pretty awesome! Loads of mods and sweet singleplayer plus Battle Royale or Dayz, this game is easily worth the 60 you pay. With the immersive gameplay and treating it like real life you will feel and act like it is war and thats what sold me on this unique game. NOW IF THEY COULD HAVE PUT IT ON SALE BEFORE I BOUGHT IT THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN NICE!
Star31;-;nice shoot :D
FaPH;-;arma isn't like cod,bf its more like gta but more realistic, i mean you don't rly steel ppls cars you need a key/lockpick to the car and its not that easy to get money either. To get money u have to like pick apples or sell weed. It was boring when i started to play this game but it did become funnier and funnier every time. To play this game u need a lot of time i say.
Mailstorm;-;7/10 Single player is fine. Mods can make SP a fun experience. But once you try MP, that's a solid no unless you play wasteland or on a private server. The FPS on any server running a custom game mode is terrible. It is higly unlikely you will get above 30 FPS on a public server. I can't speak for private servers but if you want to play MP, play wasteland or find a group that has their own not-bad private server. Only recommended because of SP
Duckumz 31;-;SP or anything that isnt a mod is a no go, wish i could have given my cash to a few mod devs instead! If you do have it you should definately get the Breaking Point mod, plays better than the rest of the game. *Update as of 1/13/15* Still a better flight sim than a tactical shooter by far...
FapTic;-;This game has a massive emphasis on realism. That means the graphics are realistic. And everyone knows realistic graphics need a good graphics card for a computer. And everyone knows they need a good computer to have a good graphics card.
Dyfe123;-;This game has brought me hours of fun and i'm sure it will bring me many more. If you have the cash, pick it up ASAP!
twitch.tv/Envro;-;I drove a go-cart, and ran somebody over. Rating: 10/10
kaEfbaMl;-;This game is awesome really fun to play with your friends. Lots of game modes and endless fun. Got it when it was 50% off so well worth it!
YAKUB;-;this game is over a ing year old and still $60?!?!? ing jews
Sunneh;-;I walked in on a dead man in a shanty 10/10
Universe2000;-;this game just makes me feel incredible, it feels like your in the game going with it. i love it its really nice textures nice detail and best thing of all its best game you cuold posibly buy in might cost alot but its worth it. its a simulation,military,multiplayer,action,tactical,realistic so many things you cuold think of. ill give it 10/10 the best shooting action simulation tactical game i've ever played thx developers! :D
NOVA;-;Awesome ***** Have only played a few minutes of the single player, NPC asked me to shoot the medic WTF ? But 50+ hours of Altis life (mod) has me hooked, not since the early GTA games have I experienced the wonder of an enormous game world. Add the pvp elements from dayz and a thriving community, its the best thing going.
Moonbiter;-;All around excellent game. The campaign was very well put together, the graphics are amazing, the combat very realistic, and the squad movements are very realistic. It does take some time to get used to all the various controls, there are a lot of them, but once you figure it out you can move your squad through any level with ease and destroy everyone along the way. The mod content is getting better everyday! If you like quick PVP then wasteland and the battle royale mods are great for that. Currently they have a "DAYZ" version of Arma3 called Breaking Point that is an independent spin-off that is also quite fun. I personally cannot wait for the Arma3 Epoch (DAYZ) to come out because I have played the Arma2 mods for a while now. There is also Altis Life and Lakeside if you're into the RP scene but that is all preference. Overall, it's a well put together simulator that ex-military, which I am, or civilian with no experience can learn to enjoy and appreciate. --MB
deathforgot1213;-;This is a very immersive game, with high attention to detail and a seemingly limitless amout of possibilities. Every peice of your gear is changeable... i mean sh*t you can run around the battlefield in nothing but your underwear and a t-shirt if you so please. You can change your camo and helmet and LBV and backpack and every other thing you carry. Everything that is in your inventory can be dropped or moved from bag to LBV or pants/ shirt pockets(and vice-versa). It provides a very similar experience to hardcore milsim airsoft (if thats what you're into... I am into airsoft) without the "Hey call your hits" or "Hey are you dead" BS. You are even able to create your own missions somewhat easily with the in-game mission editor. Anyway I figured I'd share one of my most memorable experiences in any operation in Arma- or any game out there. I was playing on a mission that I created on Stratis(One of the in game maps). I was leading a 10 man assault on Air Station Mike 26. We were all riding in an APC. My gunner was doing great taking out ground troops, and even took out an Ifrit or two. Out of nowhere an enemy hit the APC we were in, popping all left side tires, stoping it dead in its tracks. I immidiately got out and threw a smoke grenade to either side and told my men to disembark. Unfortunately only 2 men made it out before the APC exploded. In that same explosion the 2 men that had made it out were killed. worried, I threw one more smoke grenade and waited for the smoke plume to build and ran straight back behind a small hill, dodging what seemed like the bullets from 1000 angry hostiles. Once behind the hill I healed my self, and radioed in for a helicopter extraction. I waited and waited until the heli showed up. All I could hear above me were the screams of the miniguns that the 2 door gunners were operating, and the swooping of the rotor. The heli flew right over my head and began to circle around the base, taking out enemy after enemy. I knew the helicopter would not last long, as it was simply a helicopter meant for extraction, and not any sort of combat, so I called in an attack heli for some added assistance. After the attack heli started to engage targets I sprinted inside the base behind a large H-barrier. I could see lots of enemies. I quickly engaged one enemy and started to advance to another H-barrier when I was hit. I quickly went prone and healed up, and threw my last smoke grenade inside the base. After about 10 seconds of letting the smoke build I ran up to a building and began to take out target after target, in some sort of spec ops manner(Yeah I was that good). I ran around the base with the supressive fire of the helicopters and cleared the entire base of any threat. After I called in the evac heli and flew myself back to base because the pilot was killed on landing because my area clearing is garbage. It was quite the experience to get the juices flowing. This game never fails to impress, and I still find myself learning new things about it every day.
Snafu;-;If you like tactical realism! there's no other game better than this one 100% recomended
Krackenslammer;-;Pretty awesome! Loads of mods and sweet singleplayer plus Battle Royale or Dayz, this game is easily worth the 60 you pay. With the immersive gameplay and treating it like real life you will feel and act like it is war and thats what sold me on this unique game. NOW IF THEY COULD HAVE PUT IT ON SALE BEFORE I BOUGHT IT THAT WOULD HAVE BEEN NICE!
Star31;-;nice shoot :D
FaPH;-;arma isn't like cod,bf its more like gta but more realistic, i mean you don't rly steel ppls cars you need a key/lockpick to the car and its not that easy to get money either. To get money u have to like pick apples or sell weed. It was boring when i started to play this game but it did become funnier and funnier every time. To play this game u need a lot of time i say.
Michael E.;-;i dont reccomend arma 3, its just not up to my standard's, it needs to completely remake its engine and then i would be happy. Performance = Rubbish (even on a high end systems) Gameplay = great for playing with people Muiltplayer = mulitplayer is almost unplayable due to the performance issues Content = the content is really good, just that most of it is useless and the work should have been spent working on optimizations. they are working on dlcs and other things for the game but hardly any work is spent on making the game more playable Final conclusion, this game is half complete and need serious work to be up to par with modern game engines.
Sparhawk122;-;Arma 3 is a miltary simulator through and through, but unlike most simulators Arma 3 has a campaign with in-depth story to boot and competitive MP that's more then decent. The AI is of a standard above what most games have to offer out there and each weapon, ground or aireal vehicle strive to give as realistic experience as can do when operating said equipment. Weapons need to be zeroised and as per actual warfair Artillery or Mortars need to be given a Grid Reference (GR) before effective fire can be achieved; and you yourself can operate fire support weapons. The campaign is set into episodes and each episode has just below ten missions that offer a challenge in every aspect. Although your AI teammates need to be babysitted somewhat and the game could use some more optimisation but that's a small price to pay in a game that is overall great. I score this game a 8.5/10.
moon man;-;very high quality. outranks CoD, Battlefield, and MoH in my book.
Starbug;-;Fake war = No casualties = Good
!K1NG_$LyeR;-;I love this game,It's make me feel like a solider in a big, very big battlefield
RazoR;-;This game is great! Even though it currently has some interface issues, the gameplay is awesome, the mods and different gamemods keep you playing for hours on end, and the graphics look almost real as you see each individual piece of grass sway in the wind... If you like "War Simulation Games" then i'm sure you will probably get your moneys worth out of this.
DaChiimp;-;AWESOME! GET IT!
PartyPickle;-;yes, i recommended this game, but its not that great. this is only my oppinion, to me the game is ok i guess, but it has a lot of bugs. Also, its not that fun. The game would be more worth it if it was about 25 bucks, but nooooo it has to be super expensive. Yes the game looks nice but it didnt change at all from arma 2. (again not worth it) well, if your into this kind of game, go ahead and buy it, don t let me stop you. but if you are not that into super hard core serious games than i suggest you dont get it, its a waste of money.
Bebop;-;Alpha was fun. Beta was fun. Release was FUN. 10/10 open world military infantry sim, loving every moment my computer can handle running it.
SupRemE;-;Great Game, but the thing i really dont like is that you need a good graphic card to play it! but overall great game
Venti;-;Best Game Ever Played!
ROFL_COPTER;-;A lot of potential for a good game but alas it is . Terrible campaign, Horrible AI, More bugs than there are types of insects. Clunky slow interface. Would not recommend getting this game to my worse enemy
SEAL6Operator;-;Played this over a free access weekend, I have a high-end gaming rig so no problems there - liked what I saw. I really wanted this game, but decided to do some research before I pulled the trigger. I really wanted a game that would let me play with modern vehicles. I couldn't wait to jump in an Abrams or Apache or a Leopard 2 or a T-90... or jump in a Tunguska to try and shoot down a A-10. I had visions of massive armored battles with supporting infantry, artillery and drones oh my! All with badass graphics, and realism only a simulator can give - beyond the laughable dumbed down versions found in the likes of Battlefield and CoD. THEN I came across screenshots of what initally looked like a Russian Mi-28 Havoc (Sweet!) With... the dual contra-rotating main rotor blades of a Ka-50 Hokum?! Apparently, Arma III, much vaunted "hardcore military simulator" doesn't even have real-world vehicles in it. Fantasy island nations with ficitious governments to battle in I can handle. Completely made-up armored vehicles, tanks and helicopters in a supposed high-end military 'simulator'? No Thanks.
ILoveMeSomeWetPussy;-;Good for Altis life, little else to say thats good.
Cpt Syphilis;-;I say no simply because the Arma 3 main game multiplayer (Including Wasteland) feels like it is still in Beta with the amount of bugs, glitches, lag etc. It is worth it for the Mods Takistan Life and Altis Life but i still wouldn't pay 35 for it. If its going cheap and your tempted? Get it, otherwise avoid it. I still enjoy Arma 2 more its smoother.
Warchild;-;The game looks good, the audio is fantastic and the style of play when considering other FPS is very authentic. The mission designs and training are great and well thought out. I can clearly see why many people are taking to this game franchise as it provides a much more realistic diversion then one would get from CoD etc. So why am I giving this a negative review? Because this game does something with its control format that I just do not like. In an effort to make the game more realistic the developers provide too many customization options for the keyboard. It took me roughly 1.5 hours to tweak the controls to the point where it was halfway playable and even then because you have a button for what feels like everything, it isnt smooth. I know some will disagree with me but despite the unrealistic approach to the CoD etc franchises one thing I feel they always get right is how intuitive they make the controls feel. That is really the best way I can describe it. I can say from experience that with enough training and practice weapons manipulation, tactics, movement etc becomes second nature and smooth despite the chaos that a battlefield provides. It has to be said this game gets most things right, but whatever fun or joy there is to be found in it (in my opinion anyway) is taken away by an overly complicated controls layout.
Xyli;-;not very well optimized, has a learning curve on figuring out how to have fun in the game, garbage controls and responsiveness 5/10
jason_guy_yeah;-;Software is buggy, I'll get stuck between water and land and have to restart the level. Also, I can do 2 direct head shots and nothing happens but, the character can take a single hit anywhere and die; this is on novice. If I take a differnt path, the level gets hung, and nothing will progress unless the level....again has to be restarted. My team members will have super human powers and they take off leaving me in the dust, while my character never recovers from exhaustion. I understand they try to make this a realistic as possible to being a foot soldier but, I spend most of the time "walking" from one end of the map and back. I wish they did more R&D before releasing this and spent more on combat; I wish I could have my $ back.
Chefkoch182;-;Arma 3, yes. A huge game with lot of fine stuff in it. Its really fun to play actually..... BUT; you gonna reconize very soon what ruins this game again: - if you think you put 1500 into a gaming machine and though arma would run proper.... forget it.... in singleplayer you wont get troubles, but in multiplayer. Some server run with 50 players or more, and thats simply too much for this game. Gotta be honest it depends on the mod you play, but compared to singleplayer its a huge framedrop-difference. - as you noticed, its 2014..... this games has bugs that takes you back in the 90s..... it seems to me as its still in alpha, maybe beta now; 45 aint justifiable!!!! ..... and for sure not the dlc that includes 2 chopper for 13..... cmon, the community can make better add-ons and doesnt want any money for it! - if the fun isnt ruined by the stuff i already mentioned, it will after you noticed youre hard work was wasted by a hacker. You need to seperate a good gamer and the fact that 3rd person can be very tricky if used smart or the fact that its not like hitting stuff in COD or it can take up to 5 bullets or even thermal-attachments was used, with a hacker-child that uses god-mode and hits anything with his aimbot..... or even more annoying stuff like finish a whole game by probably 1 click...... 80 peoples will lose all their stuff by 1 hacker..... how can bohemia make it that easy to hack its game?.... im not talking about a hacker once a month....... if you have some game experience after a while (im personally talking about 600h+) you will notice them in almost ANY SERVER!!! and dont think they get caught...... steam wont support your work with finding and banning the hacker... of course not .... its like "hmm the more hacker there are, the more player dont wanna play this game anymore.... and what will they do? ..... buy a new steam-game!!!!! perfect lads"..... this game is death, good bye!
XxX_Fulvic_XxX;-;It can't run properly but Arma 2 is optimised to do it, if the devs would put better optimisations on it would be a thumbs up
Commissar Jeves;-;Runs like sh*t dont even try playing multiplayer, it dosent work for shiz nig, refresh is broken, cant join a friends game through steam.
+RaVen+;-;Would probably be a good game but buggy as hell.crashes all the time.If im lucky i might get to play 10 minutes before it locks up,but most of the time its about 2 minutes. I have a quad core processor,Radeon R9 200 HD,4 gb ram so i know my cpu is well above requirments.So dont waste your money unless you like hours and and hours of trying to troublshoot the game just so you can play for 5 minutes.
NanShanker420;-;This game is amazingly optimised for the pc, i love getting 13-15 fp-ing-s on multiplayer, and also it's full of dirty russian pageans.
IronSquid501;-;Lackluster, boring, and not even realistic. Go and buy Arma II - It's far, far superior.
seanxgarcia;-;sucks, my out of shape soldier can only run like 50m before running out of energy, starts crying, and huffs and puffs. apparently he needs his 1sg to put a boot in his  during PT.
This Guy;-;Possibly the worst game created so far, even compared to really  indie titles. This game was never optimized for a computer from the look of things. If you run intel anything you'll be fine, but god forbid that you run AMD you'll get 0-20 fps no matter what situation. The developers for this game are autistic  who have clearly never cared for gameplay in anything, sure you can argue "It's a simulator, not a game" but it's still a "Military Simulator". There is no effort for gunplay whatsoever in this torm of a simulator. All the guns feel the same, bullets never connect where they're supposed to, you run around feeling clunky as  shooting nerf guns at nothing. TL;DR Pros: It's a game Cons: It's a really  game Low/nonexistant FPS  gunplay Models are ugly Server list sucks Just about every game out there is better than this , and that's terrible seeing as there's a full dev team that made this. Just take your $60 and spend it elsewhere, that's all there is to it.
This Guy;-;Possibly the worst game created so far, even compared to really  indie titles. This game was never optimized for a computer from the look of things. If you run intel anything you'll be fine, but god forbid that you run AMD you'll get 0-20 fps no matter what situation. The developers for this game are autistic  who have clearly never cared for gameplay in anything, sure you can argue "It's a simulator, not a game" but it's still a "Military Simulator". There is no effort for gunplay whatsoever in this torm of a simulator. All the guns feel the same, bullets never connect where they're supposed to, you run around feeling clunky as  shooting nerf guns at nothing. TL;DR Pros: It's a game Cons: It's a really  game Low/nonexistant FPS  gunplay Models are ugly Server list sucks Just about every game out there is better than this , and that's terrible seeing as there's a full dev team that made this. Just take your $60 and spend it elsewhere, that's all there is to it.
-YETI- Paula Deen;-;What do I look for in a good military first person strategy shooting? Great graphics. Check. Great gameplay. Check. Great multiplayer and user generated structure. Check. Array of budder blocks and swords. ING FALSE. THIS GAME IS MISSING BUDDER. NO SWORDS. NO ARMOR. NO BLOCKS. NO BUY. 0/10
Nikolie;-;this is a ing  game breaking point does not working for me gayness and you cant alt tab out cuz its ing  gaame.
TheCodHead;-;too expsensive, pls make less exspensive thx game people.
sp33dy torti11a;-;i was watching frankie on pc play this game i thought yea i should get this game when i got the game i keept getting spawn killed. when you master the games animations and movement features (i could not drive a helicopter when i got it ) it took me two hours to master helicopter driving two $$$$ hours of my life wasted 10/a waste of money (1) arma 2s dayz is better
StrenggenPrime;-;cool game,quite realistic, when i destroy the tank the explosion is very beautiful
DUSTY MMG;-;this game is awesome if you like real operation mission this is the real deal
BLUEROCK;-;Just no! This game is not even worth the time just to get 10FPS online! Stay away...
John;-;So many cool gamemodes to try out and have fun with your friends with!
Hools;-;Great game :D
ZyC_FR3SH;-;GREAT GAME 9/10 LUV the graphics and game play
Doc. Omaly;-;This is a Mitlitary Silulator Not another C.O.D. the level of detail is amazing the visuals are stunning.....why are you still reading this and buy this game
[U][A]-Internet Monster;-;absolutely love it
[SC] Sir-Sizzle;-;holy sheet balls dis game doh, be lak we'w good init
Jack;-;This game is amazing!!!
Kingrey;-;Ah, Alas Arma 3 is finally getting the last campaign and the Fixed Wing vehicles we have been waiting since launch for. Since launch the game has taken a good 5 steps forward in the right direction. Adding in the Zeus mode will ensure the survival for most hard core CO-OP players. With Arma being a series relying completely on the community to build machines of war I hope plenty of modders continue to add content to Arma 3. The series has proven its worth and I feel the strength of the Arma series is just now getting recognized. The community is the backbone of the Arma Franchise so I encourage anyone loyal enough to create idea's. The Arma community is accepting we accept new players who need help and guidance were not like Call of duty where your whole team is a bunch of 10 year old kids calling you names. So if you decide after reading this review to buy Arma 3. Good Luck, Your going to need it.
(NNO);-;Basically Arma 2 with less everything but nicer graphics and less bugs.
HeyJon;-;its a fun game but i cant play it for more then 20 minutes without crashing due to a DX11 error ( DX11 error : buffer Map failed : DXGI_ERROR_DEVICE_REMOVED) and its just annoying because even though i have the minimum requirements for the gpu part its still crashs and its just not fun when that happens every 5-10 mins. hopeing they fix it soon
[CTB3] noc9109;-;It's THE BEST.
Rancorusia;-;One of the best mil-sims / combat-sims ever made, definatly worth the $60
On Vacation;-;Imagine this: You're sprinting. Under heavy fire. Trees look like turds. Sand looks like a solid block of chocolate. Clouds are disabled because your computer can't render them. Oh baby, and those shadows...that you have to turn off because your game will crash. You lay prone and pull out your sidearm. Suddenly! The frames skip. The game lags. You are shot and killed by a sweaty greasy 40 year old man. Your game crashes. You came all over your PC. 11/10 Much Lag Very Death Such Unfair P.S. Still is amazing
Jub Jub;-;Arma 2 was better
Devoldo;-;A definite upgrade from Arma II, the controls act more like PC controls of the 21st century (not feeling like your wading through pudding when trying to look, strafe, etc.) and the graphics of course are much improved. There have been some issues with PhysX crashes, but only from those with AMD cards in my experience. Sa-Matra wasteland alone is reason enough to pick this up! The only gripe I really have is that they still have not made the client/server multi-threaded. One of the most idiotic things to overlook when the AI calculations and such really make this game/engine heavily CPU-intensive. If you love realistic shooters without all the kill-streak B.S. and handicapping, pick this game up.
Alsanjuro;-;This game used to be good but since Bohemia which doesnt listen to people have made this game into a drunk simulator 2014 just as they did with walking simulator aka DayZ standalone. They have taken weapon machanics to next level of unrealistic where your soldier has no muscles to control and hold a gun in his hand since it has unrealistic exaggerated sway in a shape of number 8 and will be adding unrealistic inertia into the fact where when you move your weapon even a bit it starts to rock from side to side. They need to stop changing things that werent broken and fix a million other problems in their game. I do like how they spent a lot of time to imrove some stupid door sounds and yet when you wanna open a door you have one of the worst action menus in the world where you have to scroll your mouse to do anything. On their forums they dont like any negative feedback and only wanna hear all praise on how awesome their unrealistic sway and inertia are. I will be uninstalling this game cause its just unplayable especially since this game cant even give you 30fps online and usually goes down to 20fps or worse and then you realise how horrible the sway becomes. Save your money on a finished game and support developers who actually listen to the customer.
narcolepsya;-;Wish I could get a refund, it crashes everytime I try to play. Even after following guides to fix all the problems, I even factory reset my computer twice and asked support for help. Yet, nothing. GG. Maybe stop breaking the game with every update, it'd be nice.
Brunderdome;-;Amazing game. possibly the best game i have ever owned.
TeaMAD|#GETREKT;-;Beautiful game nice game if you have 60usd buy this game im trust
CFGCM;-;MEH...Dont get exited for this game its kinda bad!
Spazz6768 [SGT Sodomy];-;Buy this.
Adenru;-;The only game series which is progressing from installment to installment instead of degrading.
Zahlfire;-;Great game! I love realistic FPS games like these, and can't recommend it enough! Teamwork and tactics are a necessity.
winterloggan;-;This game is an interesting concept, but is NOT for everyone. It is a modern military "simulator," and it does this pretty well. Tiny little nuances of the miliary experience show up: leaning around corners to aim, having spotters for sniping, and switching fire modes on a gun, and healthy amounts of bullet drop are all things you will have to get used to. Those things aren't that bad, and some can even be fun. ESPECIALLY the artillery targeting computer, which has a maximum range well beyond the edge of the map, has different types of shells, and shows how long the bullets with take to get to their destination (and it will take time if you shoot from one end of the island to another. Sometimes, however, these nuances can just get annoying. The keyboard is cluttered with keys assigened to different things in places that don't make much sense (let's just say I wasn't expecting to have different buttons for my watch, my compass, and my very real map.) There is no typical first person shooter radar, showing where enemies or self made waypoints are (although mission waypoints do show up.) Long story short, this game is incredibely complicated to control, and will not be controller friendly. The big draw for me, and for most people after seeing reviews from people like NerdCubed, will be the map editor. Appearently this is what the game's developers were expecting as well, because the game didn't even come with campaigns at launch (they are being added as DLC over the next few months.) The editor is incredibely detailed, to the same extent if not more than the rest of the game. Unfortunately, it is even more user-unfriendly. Particularly concerning non-physical items like spawnpoints and mission objectives. Some of these require you to CLOSE THE GAME ENTIRELY AND EDIT THE TEXT FILES FOR THE SCENARIO. Other things like controlling where you want units of the map to go and who they will attack is another mystery entirely. The learning curve is a monstrosity. I'm not particulary concerned about graphics, but this game is pretty underwhelming in that respect. It's textures are uninspiring, and driving physics are woeful. Where the game makes up for this is in scale. The game is freaking HUGE. It will take and uncomfortable long time to cross, even in a helicopter. I believe the estimates are something like 270 square kilometers of space. In other words, very very large, and possibly of the largest maps of any game. It is pretty empty, but there are some small towns, churches, and all sorts of terrain to give a lot of creative leeway when designing a scenario. If you can figure out how. If you know to/are willing to code, and have a lot of free time on your hands, Arma III could actually be a lot of fun. But for everyone else it's probably best that you don't fork over 60 dollars for something it takes dozens of hours to fully comprehend.
Ache!;-;The best realistic simulation shooter
Vio;-;Military "Simulator", tons of community content, flexible modding. Still some bugs that needs fixing though. 8.5/10 - highly recommended.
WendellThrewUp;-;This is a deep and engrossing Game. Really I'd say its less of a game and more of a simulation framework. You can tell it's grounded in real world military simulation by the lack of training wheels. Good support from the developer and community, there is some epic content here if you are willing to put in the time. New releases constantly improve the core and add additional content. At first I was put off by the "future world" setting coming from Arma 2 and expecting something more grounded in today's tech, but this game is growing on me and seems like an improvement in every respect. Have not had any performance issues as of yet, but I went out and bought a new Graphics adapter solely for this. I'm not disappointed.
nangle;-;An excellent addition to the series. Some of the most fun I've had in any game would be in the Arma series. Of course you could play it as a sim but the most fun is not taking the game seriously and just having a good time. A+
NoahTheCreator;-;the game is awesome and i really love it. beware of the fact that its more sim than an fps, it is hard and it will kick your  from time to time! if you like a change of combat style (mostly slow, mid\long range) from your normal fps try this! you wil love it
b1gm4c10;-;One of the most realistic military tactical shooters!
severenze;-;Like ARMA 2, Got to be the best game around.....forget battlefield and CoD, just buy this, you won't be disappointed.
complexgamer;-;everyone need to try out this game
TTSnabber;-;This game is awesome and really realistic with cool graphics! Good Job!
RapidNoob;-;Price is to much from Alpha by 2x.
THE VDV;-;If you liked arma 2 you will like this game. If you havnt played an arma game, i would definatly recomend watching a few videos to see what its like. Personally I would give it a 9/10.
Jozeff;-;This is the best millitary simulator since operation flashpoin. Game play takes in account many aspect of real world millitary scenario. Complex operations or just a simple single missions with tons of inventory and vehicles.
Gushue95;-;Fun game when you have a group going. I would definitely suggest checking out the workshop as there are some quality missions for team play.
FirstRock;-;awesome game but.....dev are f'in idiots....how do I join on riends that are in the same clan????????????????? can not do it ..... after 2 games u "smart people" cannot figure out how to get friends into the same game???????????????? Wiskey Tango Foxtrot????????????????????
Purple;-;gam is shibt
phearseamus;-;completely worthless game. textures don't load more that 100 feet infromt of you. Controls are so unresponsive it is not worth playing. not even worth playing for free. this game missed it's mark. all the nice landscapes and footage you saw in the video was cutscenes. total marketing lie
Phil McHunt;-;where are the zombies? 1/10
GhoulSlayeR;-;If you're looking for a in-depth military simulator, look no futher, because this is the best you're going to get. Also look out for it's extensive catagory of mods such as Breaking Point.
Dondo;-;Buy Arma 2. More content. More better.
TheLustyWalrus;-;9.5/10 When People Finaly Realise That CallOfDuty Is Not A Real War Game I Think They Sould Play This Or Battlefield But Enyways. This Game Is A Great Way To Either Play Sirius Or Not Its Fun Either Way I Highly Sugest It I Personaly Love Atlis Life,Wastelands Abd Patrol Ops So If You Want A Realy Great Multiplayer Game Buy This.Or If Your Want A Great War Experience Play The Singleplayer Its Probably The Best SinglePlayer Ive Ever Played On PCI Hope This Helped You Dicide If You'l Be Geting It So Thanks For Reading :D
Biohazard;-;YOU BATTLEYE, I GOT GLOBAL BANNED FOR NO ING REASON? WELL  ME. I CANT ING PLAY ANYTHING THAT USES BATTLEYE THANKS TO THE HEAD THAT SET UP THE BAN SYSTEM, YOU THINK YOU HAVE ALL THE KINKS WORKED OUT OF THE BATTLEYE THING, WELL YOU ING DONT.  THIS , IM OUT.
Happy;-;DO NOT BUY THIS GAME IF YOU ARE GLOBALLY BANNED IN DAYZ STANDALONE. THE BATTLEYE BANS YOUR ENTIRE STEAM ACCOUNT. SO YOU ARE ALSO BANNED FROM ARMA III EVENTHOUGH YOU HAVE NEVER PLAYED IT.
darryshan;-;This game is the best armed forces simulator out there. It's customizability is it's strongest point, allowing players to create missions, and to run these on servers, allowing a infinite amount of possible scenarios. If you liked ARMA II, get this. If you played Battlefield 3 or 4, and thought, 'I like this, but I want more realism', get this. Cannot recommend enough.
Rooster;-;Feels like I wasted my money. Game looks beautiful, but it got too frustrating when it felt like everyone else was going on with the mission and combat, and I was left looking around for the enemy. Outisde of waiting for some tracers to show up and give the enemy away, my efforts to eliminate my target were futile 99% of the time. I'd use up all my ammunition, and they'd land in a perfect shot, every single time. It got to the point that I would end up sitting back while the AI on my team took care of it- after all, they knew exactly what to do while I'm just sitting there shrugging my shoulders. This is not your typical combat FPS. The controle are wonky, and I spent a hard-earned $60 on frustration. I have a Titan video card. It runs all of my games on maximum settings flawlessly. With Arma 3, it seems like all I do to ajust the graphics settings makes no difference, as I'm hit with major framerate issues. After a few days, I reinstalled the game to give it another chance, but I just couldn't get anything accomplished. I personally don't recommend the game.
Phil McHunt;-;where are the zombies? 1/10
CFGCM;-;MEH...Dont get exited for this game its kinda bad!
Spazz6768 [SGT Sodomy];-;Buy this.
On Vacation;-;Imagine this: You're sprinting. Under heavy fire. Trees look like turds. Sand looks like a solid block of chocolate. Clouds are disabled because your computer can't render them. Oh baby, and those shadows...that you have to turn off because your game will crash. You lay prone and pull out your sidearm. Suddenly! The frames skip. The game lags. You are shot and killed by a sweaty greasy 40 year old man. Your game crashes. You came all over your PC. 11/10 Much Lag Very Death Such Unfair P.S. Still is amazing
Jub Jub;-;Arma 2 was better
Devoldo;-;A definite upgrade from Arma II, the controls act more like PC controls of the 21st century (not feeling like your wading through pudding when trying to look, strafe, etc.) and the graphics of course are much improved. There have been some issues with PhysX crashes, but only from those with AMD cards in my experience. Sa-Matra wasteland alone is reason enough to pick this up! The only gripe I really have is that they still have not made the client/server multi-threaded. One of the most idiotic things to overlook when the AI calculations and such really make this game/engine heavily CPU-intensive. If you love realistic shooters without all the kill-streak B.S. and handicapping, pick this game up.
Alsanjuro;-;This game used to be good but since Bohemia which doesnt listen to people have made this game into a drunk simulator 2014 just as they did with walking simulator aka DayZ standalone. They have taken weapon machanics to next level of unrealistic where your soldier has no muscles to control and hold a gun in his hand since it has unrealistic exaggerated sway in a shape of number 8 and will be adding unrealistic inertia into the fact where when you move your weapon even a bit it starts to rock from side to side. They need to stop changing things that werent broken and fix a million other problems in their game. I do like how they spent a lot of time to imrove some stupid door sounds and yet when you wanna open a door you have one of the worst action menus in the world where you have to scroll your mouse to do anything. On their forums they dont like any negative feedback and only wanna hear all praise on how awesome their unrealistic sway and inertia are. I will be uninstalling this game cause its just unplayable especially since this game cant even give you 30fps online and usually goes down to 20fps or worse and then you realise how horrible the sway becomes. Save your money on a finished game and support developers who actually listen to the customer.
narcolepsya;-;Wish I could get a refund, it crashes everytime I try to play. Even after following guides to fix all the problems, I even factory reset my computer twice and asked support for help. Yet, nothing. GG. Maybe stop breaking the game with every update, it'd be nice.
Kung Fhrer;-;Absolute garbage. Complete Alpha Crap. Buggy as all . 2/10
General Mills;-;I don't know if i did not give this game enough time or not, but from what I have played I hate it lol.
Silentskills;-;This game is  compared to ARMA2. Gear loadout saving process is  and not working, optimization is , AI is . In other words, it's a downgrade. Keep playing ARMA2 until this game is patched/fixed
FolX;-;Such a great military simulator you can't turn your head around in a car to look around where are you supposed to go... A Z-category shooter but you still have to use controls like if it would be StarCraft. I don't play an FPS to use my whole keyboard to issue broken commands. Don't buy this game. For a strategy game there's only horribly-done strategy elements, and for an FPS there's horribly done FPS elements in it. For squads and commanders, buy Battlefield or any other non-garbage tactical shooter, this game is just bad.
Zahid;-;worst simulation game
Mindfields;-;I hope most if not all of the bugs and issues there are fixed through beta and release. For an alpha it was very impressive but I feel there is still some work to do to make the game the best it can possibly be and with a price of 19.99 ($32.99   24.99) is almost idiotic to pass up. I imagine on full release that price will go to the normal price for a new game on Steam, either 29.99 or 39.99, so get it while its hot.
Dutch246;-;Played the first two missions; Super real and crazy fun, it definitely caught me off guard. Gameplay time: 2 hrs. Played Altis Life online; Got hacked and nuked, wonder if I still have the 24M he gave me. Gameplay time: 42 mins.
white;-;"None of your friends have played this game recently. Tell them why they should." They shouldnt.
drew;-;game isnt realistic tbqh if i was really a solider i wouldbe owning n000bs and  womyn like are they mad?
Kung Fhrer;-;Absolute garbage. Complete Alpha Crap. Buggy as all . 2/10
General Mills;-;I don't know if i did not give this game enough time or not, but from what I have played I hate it lol.
Silentskills;-;This game is  compared to ARMA2. Gear loadout saving process is  and not working, optimization is , AI is . In other words, it's a downgrade. Keep playing ARMA2 until this game is patched/fixed
FolX;-;Such a great military simulator you can't turn your head around in a car to look around where are you supposed to go... A Z-category shooter but you still have to use controls like if it would be StarCraft. I don't play an FPS to use my whole keyboard to issue broken commands. Don't buy this game. For a strategy game there's only horribly-done strategy elements, and for an FPS there's horribly done FPS elements in it. For squads and commanders, buy Battlefield or any other non-garbage tactical shooter, this game is just bad.
Zahid;-;worst simulation game
Mindfields;-;I hope most if not all of the bugs and issues there are fixed through beta and release. For an alpha it was very impressive but I feel there is still some work to do to make the game the best it can possibly be and with a price of 19.99 ($32.99   24.99) is almost idiotic to pass up. I imagine on full release that price will go to the normal price for a new game on Steam, either 29.99 or 39.99, so get it while its hot.
Vigilante;-;The base game I would give 80/100.....with all the great mods people put together for it I would give it a 90/100. This is due to the fact some of the mods are still.....meh....to say the least. Great game overall and highly suggested to realistic shooter enthusiasts.
FullAutoNinGyou;-;First thing I'm getting once it's 75% off (bless the family sharing and thank you Tora). Pure gem for military sim, with next-gen icing on top.
G1r3D;-;I'll be quick and clear. I'm amazed how Bohemia Interactive has worked on this game, and the best is the support it has, performing the game every day. One of the best things about Arma is the modding, and people developing it for our delight. I fully recommend this game. btw for DayZ players, Arma 3 Breaking Point is great, for now better than DayZ Standalone (EA) period
FLABBY24;-;THE BEST GAME I HAVE EVER PLAYED IN MY LIFE !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
#WEEBSCUM;-;The most realistic military simulator (that is open to the public) that I've seen.
EatPeople;-;Goes great with the Breaking Point mod! Way better then DayZ!
Aneris;-;I bouth this game in Alpha for 20 euro, now its for 45 euro. Enjoy
Rubber;-;This game was released as an incomplete game, but content is added on a regular basis. In a couple of years it'll actually be worth the $30 price tags it'll be by then. I don't recommend it at its current price, but overall it's a very solid military simulation game.
el fatal;-;The un-usual real Alpha!
OLi;-;3570k @4.5ghz 780sli at 1050mhz apprently gives sub 30fps. EDIT i dont get these kinds of fps in 1000man multiplayer but in the singleplayer.
knd27;-;to be honest i might go for arma 2 this time, i dunno i think it has more... besides it's cheaper, and it has dayz as well, nice community (both actually), but there is something arma 3 has never came up with..... bikes, man i use bike as weapons here, real talk... what are you going to do when you are out of AMMO!?, i till what to do, use a bike simple as dat, deadly yet, convenient.
Caitlyn: The Last Genderbender;-;run in the forest for 3 hours, get sniped simulator
randydisher;-;This is the most bugged  i ever played. I absolutely don't recommend it.
reborn;-;I did not have fun playing this game. I gave it a fair chance but the gameplay is just so mundane and mediocre that it was an effort to have fun even in the first few hours. There are better games out there to spend $60 on. If you are totally bored and you kind of like shooters or can get this game on sale, ($10-$20) then buy it. In any other circumstance just pass it by.
CheGuevara&Fidel;-;This game is for people who has a lot of free time. Only training process takes hours and hours. Without training it's very difficult to play. I just start my training and understood that it will take a lot of time. Not easy. Not so beautiful like on videos and photos. Will deinstall without playing.
Xxx_Nipple-Ripple_xxX;-;If your into army , tactical , strategy , co-op , then this is the  for you! one of my second favourite games, as arma 2 still holds my heart! But arma 3 comes in second with all the content, fun, roleplay, and just good times and memories you can make!
willyb;-;worst game i have ever purchased
LIFE IS AWESOME!;-;0\10 buy if you wanna get bullied 24\7 by jews, swedish autists, british balloon poppers, fedora users and edgy s
Palemer;-;fantastic shooter/milatary sim butstill need to fix mini bugs but they dont really matter :D
Jax;-;Best Game Love Th Realism Of It Must Buy!
Galactic Dash;-;Too many neckbeard Santa Clauses.
Mr.Bananonymous;-;The One and Only i can be a soldier without training feel the battlefield keep this game alive
Melsom;-;Realistic, beautiful, and good gameplay experience. There are bugs here and there, but they usually get fixed, the game in my opinion is a bit boring due to it being in the future, with non-existing weapons. It is too bad there aren't any popular PvP servers though. the game looks and feels much better with loads of good mods to it and is extremely fun to play with others.
JonnyPee;-;Yes, yes, yes....... Great game to play with your friends. It has a lot of variation.
Microsoft Word;-;Ran towards a tank butt naked firing a pistol. Got blown to hell.10/10.
The Boss;-;The best Military simulator ever!!! Pros: Ballistics is realistic Alot of Multiplayer mods Awesome sound effects + graphics Gotta love the option to customize your gear Great Factions to play with You can play this game even if you don't or have friends (And..........Girlfriend :D ) Cons: Physics are off You would need a nice computer Vehicles when bumped backflips You can't destroy houses (So far in my experience when firing alot of rounds with a tank) Limited weapons to use (Preferablly to add some AK-47s, AKM, M4, etc.) Overall rate this game 8/10, I hope this would help! See you in the Battlefield
Ninja_Reaper;-;Worst experiance I ever had. I constantly get kicked from servers for having a high ping, but in reallity my ping is always 80 or below. The game seems fun but, i'll never get to find out.
Socalboy2001;-;Good Game. Game Good. Price-Not good. Dont buy it yet.
clapinp;-;Not what i expected. What a waste of money.
PhatMixN;-;I just bought this game last night off steam and my Arma 3 wont even connect to the servers or anything. The news feed on the main menu is supposed to say the latest news and . It always says news offline. when i go into multiplayer no servers pop up. I dont have any mods on it. This game is a waste of money. Reset router uninstall and reinstalled and even verivyed files and still nothing.
michaelguitar1989;-;the controls are very bad in this game the stamina has to be the worst a gun and a few mags after walking 20ft i have to stop because the guy is tired, he's a soldier not a 90 year old man. Not realistic or game realistic tbh....
Matthew McConaughey;-;Literally NOT FUN!!!!!! 0/10
Else-;-;dumb game got take out of my account.
chris10563;-;this is the best game
2gay2lift;-;do you like wandering around in the middle of no where for 2hrs just to get killed one min into combat? do you love admin abuse? well boy do i have a game for you! its called arma 3 , if you like a whole lot of walking around and doing nothing , your gonna love this
KFCOCK;-;fantastic game...but fowck the people in the game, bunch of fowkin d1ckheads
[pG];-;i7/16g memory everything on low or turned off - MAX 20fps. Nuff said.
SharkByte;-;20 FPS what the hell Bohemia fix that
DocHoliday[CW];-;The next generation ArmA awed reviewers with promising graphics and an intense single player campaign. What seemed like a would be GOTY quickly has faded away. As people slowly, possibly dreadfully make the switch to ArmA 3 they will see it is a myriad of misfortune. With very little solid content to speak of compared to its predecessor it has left people in want. The game has been an overall disappointment for me, with a lowered sense of viable large scale combat, and very little aircraft to be talked of I was sorely disappointed at Bohemia Interactives next generation game in the ArmA series. The only thing that has made it playable is the limitless community made mods to add things that the developers seemingly forgot from ArmA 2. This causes me to not recommend this game.
Remember, No Skill;-;Not Call of Duty - Did a 720 quick-scope blaze it across Altis on the first try - 10/10
TimaHawk;-;Very good game. Buy Now!
Rustling Intensifies (DL porn);-;Everything about this game improves on Arma II except for one key point. The game simply does not run. Not on high end machines, not on anything, it is so poorly optimised and coded that no system can run it smoothly (60 fps). Online games lag all the way down to 10-15 fps in cities just because the server code is poorly written and results in server side lag that effects frame rate as well as hit detection. If this game was actually able to run at a decent frame rate that stayed decent online it would be a wonderful game. Until that time i cannot recommend this game.
Lonely  Cat;-;I Don't have the game lol
eat beat meat sleep repeat;-;i dont even own this game.
Dogsbody;-;love the game would like a dynamic campaign to be included
Zyron;-;A very good simulation and game. So many things to! good buy if u like these sort of games!
Aferistas csg0.com;-;Nice game !
IBUYFLOUR;-;I hit a jump and randomly catapulted 1km in the sky, then got taken out by an anti air missile. ing 10/10
Hydraxon;-;Accidentally got a RUS VPN version so I can't play the game D:
Tesla;-;Its le meme tastic "10/10 its ok" -ign
Mr.Leaf;-;1000000 / 1000000 GOTY BEST MIL SIM !!!!!!!!! TRADED IN MY SOUL FOR THIS GAME.
uben Dark;-;Arma 3 is a semi-new game that was released in 2013, and it is thriving with players! From game modes of Team Death Match, King of the Hill, Zombies, and Roleplay, Arma 3 has tons of game modes for you to play! My absolute favorite game mode is King of the Hill, where three teams pit themselves off against capturing and holding a point, there are vehicles, a leveling system, and different weaponry and perks all included with a cash system. Arma 3 is open for modders in the Steam Workshop, and this increases great chances for the game to survive upon the universe of gaming in general. Modding is perfect for games, because players can do the work, they can create what they feel is needed, what they want to see in a server, and what they know is perfect for the community. Good things: -Great combat -Tactical combat, and meant for strategy, not run & gun -Has Steam Workshop support and availability, great for modders who want to help the Arma 3 community out! -Plenty of gamemodes, ensuring to keep you endlessly drooling for what may happen next -Plenty of vehicles -Large, full scale maps with the ability to go inside almost every building -Destructible enviroments (limited to some different entities) -Amazing campaign, and tutorial (the tutorial kept me entertained for a good while) Bad things: -The game has a semi-steep learning curve to it -Some minor bugs like playermodel glitching, etc -Things arn't fully destructable like in the Battlefield 4 engine (but good enough) -Graphics may seem outdated on some models -It's abit hard to get into the game as a new player, but you'll grind into the game eventually Neutralities: -The game requires teamwork, and a mic if you want to be involved in so, although there are many lonewolfs out there -Your average PC might be able to handle it, it all depends -Cats enjoy watching you play it (atleast mine does) -You may have tons of fun in this game if you know how to play it in your own special ways, wether it is transporting toops via aircraft, or by infantry squads/ground missions, to full-fledged combat in the many suburban towns of the maps in Arma 3 Overall, I do recommend this game to anyone and everyone that is around 14+ of age, whom can understand how to work things, and avoid the sharp learning curve, along with that I really do hope that for any of you that have quit the game because of the learning curve, to give the game a few more tries, as I did this before, and I came back loving the game. If you'd like, you can add me and play with me on Arma 3, Garry's Mod, TF2, CS:GO, Battlefield 4, and many other games that all of you should commonly know if you're an average gamer, anyways, take care.
Al Capwn;-;Where to begin? I've been a longtime user and fan of Bohemia Interactive's Arma and Operation Flashpoint series since the original Operation Flashpoint. While I have always enjoyed the series, there was always something.........missing. Some intangible thing that I could't quite put my finger on but left my experience not entirely fulfilled. Because of this, I wasn't even going to bother with Arma 3. However, with Steam's promotion allowing play for free this weekend, I thought I'd try it out. I installed it, played the tutorial and played some of the showcase missions and campaign missions. What do I think? Well, THE DEVS FINALLY GET IT! They finally, finally made the game I always wanted since the first Operation Flashpoint! No more herky-jerky animations, no more bad, bad dialogue. They've overhauled the graphics engine, got, what sound like to me, professional voice actors and they really turned out a top-notch product! This is a serious military sim that is unforgiving and pulls no punches. You aren't some rapidly healing super soldier. You get hit, you'll probably die. Even if you patch yourself up with a medkit, you are still in pain, and that is reflected in the gameplay. This is a thinking man's military sim, this isn't a "Call of Duty" or "Battlefield" game. This is to first person shooters as Microsoft's Flight Simulator is to flying games. Its amazing. On a rig that can run it, the graphics are absolutely amazing. The weather effects are top notch. And its all on a huge, huge map! And an insanely detailed one at that. So far, the campaign is quite entertaining if not a little unforgiving. My only quibble with Arma 3 is that the A.I. is a little wacky. Either you find yourself up against eagle eyed super snipers that can see in the dark or complete morons who will stand stock still and fire at you. Often, the A.I. is fairly good, but man, once in a while....... I haven't tried multiplayer yet, but I cannot wait to give it a shot. I would give this game 4 and a half stars out of 5. A nearly perfect military simulation. Well done Bohemia Interactive, well done!
<>,,,<>CompLexity<><>;-;Great game, The campaign is supprisingly epic ( i don't like campaigns that much ) Battle Royale mod is just amazing to play :3
pugs;-;good game, can flip cars with go-karts
Nightwater;-;Man, max this game out graphically and you are in for quite the treat! This game is incredible in the short time I have played it. Did most of the tutorials and simulators and started Campaign mode. I absolutely love the realistic way of the shooter (if you can even call it that). They did plenty of research and work for this simulator and it shows. I would recommend this over any other title in the genre any day. Looking to take a break from the run and gun? Arma is your answer.
Vershetes;-;-Awesome Graphic -Great Military simulation -Have many mode worth to buy 10/10
WindyRain0212 [GER];-;Gameplay: 9/10 Graphics: 11/10 Optimization: 4/10 Sound & Music: 7/10 Base Content: 6/10 Bugs, exploits, etc.: 5/10 overall: good game, but buggy, as hell. Drove with a tank, hit another vehicle, got airborne and made frontflips without taking damage; booping a rock, front wheels broken, engine broken, -80 health. If the developers would fix the issues this game has, it would really be THE BEST AND MOST REALISTIC Military Simulator ever and be worth every single cent. I can understand it might be hard to fix the bugs, but trying is gold. My 2 cents if you should buy it or not: if you enjoyed Arma II, or like slow paced, realistic simulators and can live with the bugs, what aren't THAT bad , get it. It's worth it, and its fun. This is not CoD, not BF, not anything else; This, is Arma, and who can't understand this, well.. sorry for them :P
DatGrapeGuy;-;the gud guds
Precursor7410;-;It's fun with friends and without them.... I had some really fun times in this game
Ted;-;Decent Game with lots of different game modes to choose from, however it still has a few bugs here and there which needs fixing. I can then give the game 10/10 but now its 8/10
Quarto;-;One of the best games Ive' played...just no jumping
Kaz;-;ZOMG BBQ PWN, need I say more?
BulldogsLV;-;OMG Best Game ever i played :D I Recommend This game! *Wasteland Situation!* :D Drove with friend in quad then Helicopter was starting to shoot us, so we jumped out of quad and ran into forest, so my friend got injured legs so i was angry so taked out mine RPG and when he flyied under us,i shoot him, with my Rpg,and they just blowed up :D then we started to loot them :D so this game is so cool!
legoclone09;-;I don't have this game....
Raptor Man;-;broke my legs on a bunny. 12/10
Roaxed;-;I can crash my computer by spawning 1000+ units fighting each other. 10/10
dopefish;-;If you have friends, this is a great game to play with them. If you don't have any friends, this is a great game to play alone. If you don't have the game to play, get the money for it. If you don't have the money for it, get a job. If you don't have a job, rob the bank. If you get arrested robbing the bank, at least you tried.
Arrite;-;You only have 2 arms, not 3 like the title says.
Kermes;-;i used drugs 10/10 this is a very scary game a helicopter came down and burned my eyes out and i died
Kamil;-;pretty gay.
Spectre;-;Brilliant game, can use some Help though some bugs are annoying..
Gearhead;-;The Game does have some pretty minor glitches but other than that Arma 3 is a great game for community development. Dev's out there create some pretty fantastic mods and addons for the games because of the huge open world maps and functions Bohemia Interactive provides in Arma 3. Many people buy this game just for the AMAZING addons to the game which allow very unpredictable scenarios to happen. Arma is Intriguing to me because the game is UNPREDICTABLE. Games that are unpredictable are more of a way for players to choose how they play and gives a slight immersion. There can be scenarios where you see a heli crash onto a building which is 100 meters away and that building had one of your best soldiers now knocked out waiting to ambush the enemy who is surrounded with OPFOR. What do you do? Arma is fantastic because its your choice of how you want to play the game where other games have straight up orders to do stuff, why would you want to do that? I would give this game a 9/10
InfamousModernSecret;-;Amazing game the createors realy out did thereselfs this time. and there is something for evryone there is many many different type of gamemodes.
Fresh Prince of Liberia;-;Ebola Recommends this game
JCon;-;Ran for barely a minute, couldn't run anymore. 10/10
Krystal;-;I Really enjoyed this game but i mostly enjoyed the multiplayer! Everything about this game is just great but i would say its a bit overpriced! The community is amazing not like Gmod which is filled with kids! 9/10
Kaii ~;-;Great game with the Breaking Point Zambies Mod :)! You need a good PC to run it good though xD
Bosskilla;-;This game is to fun i cant believe they put this much time on this game. I wonder if their going to make Arma 4
Trevor;-;I sucked a guys  10 out of 10 would  again
the rice shield;-;It crashes all the time.
PreX' S7orm;-;Children play Call of Duty Boys play Battlefield Men play ARMA 3
Tronix;-;I'm making this review to offset the bad reviews
Mr. Whale;-;11/10 I love this game, it has gave me so many amazing moments of epicness. (Get Battle Royale and Breaking Point mods). lol and noscopes are included kbye
MegaQuan;-;LOVE IT.
Our Mighty Hero Bullet Spunj;-;Arma 3 is a Side-Scrolling 2D Platformer developed by EA. In the games' main mode (competitve), you play as one of two factions; the Terrorists, crazed madmen who seek to destroy the world by unleashing ravenous chickens infected with the Ebola virus, and the Counter Terrorists, who desire to stop the fowl plague. Armed with $800 and their wits, players seek out the various chicken sites and fight over control of the worlds destiny.
A very hot piece of Kek;-;For what this game tries to be (Which is a war simulator) it fails misserably at that. The movement is clunky, the A.I Is dumb and overpowered as hell. So if you get into this game being all like "Yeah, this is what war is like, this is realistic and really precise" Then sorry. You need to get out in the real world pall. Because I don't consider a game that when you shoot the enemy in the head they are able to do a 180 turn and shoot you 3 times in the head before dying very realistic. Same goes for boosting of stairs when walking down from them to quickly and breaking your legs. This game is however one of the funniest games I have ever played with friends. The amount of vehicles, the guns, the destructible enviorment. The overall map is not to shabby either. If you get this game for fun gags with friends and just cause overall chaos then this game is perfect for that. If you get it to play it as a serious war game then i'd say the clunky motions and faulty A.I ruins that emediatly
Kewster;-;I love this game and i wish to have.
Alaskan Glitch;-;If you enjoyed Codemasters Operation Flashpoint in 2001, then you will absolutely love ARMA III. ARMA III takes place on two different islands: Altis & Stratis. Stratis is 19 square kilometers (7.3 sq. km), with few roads and rugged forested terrian. Altis, on the other hand, is huge at 270 square kilometers (104.2 sq. mi.), with lots of roads and terrian of mostly rolling hills. However, only ~5% of the roads on Altis are paved. There is a lot of detail put in this game, including some indigenous fauna, such as snakes, rabbits, goats, dogs, insects, and a wide variety of fish and other sea critters. They do not do anything but move around, but it adds to the realism. Did I mention snakes? There are a huge number of snakes on Altis. Movement is not restricted. Meaning, you can move anywhere you like. Including using a re-breather to dive off the coast of either island to investigate ship wrecks, just for kicks. There are lots of vehicles to choose from, both civilian and military. Weapons, ammunition, and equipment can be taken from the dead. However, only take what you can carry during the missions. If you put anything in vehicles they will disappear once you return from your required mission or scouting mission. You will only be allowed to keep the items you are actually carrying. The game includes a single-player campaign broken into three episodes: Survive = 8 required missions, plus 6 optional scouting missions Adapt = 9 required missions, plus 8 optional scouting missions. Win = 6 required missions, no optional scouting missions. When you complete the first required mission for each episode, return to base, and told to report in  don't. If you report in, then you will be assigned the next required mission. Instead, go to where a group of your fellow soldiers are standing/sitting, and listen to what they have to say. This is how you get optional missions. Then go off on a scouting patrol to complete the mission, if you so desire. When you have completed your scouting mission(s), then return to base and report in for your next required mission. All the missions, except for the last one, are linear and static. Meaning, nothing you do will change the course of events. Except for the last mission. In the last mission you have to make a decision, and that decision will determine the outcome of the mission. There is a steep learning curve, and that can get a little frustrating at the beginning. If you are new to ARMA III, then I recommend enabling the Save Games in the Game Options settings and save often to help alleviate that frustration. The Survive missions are all solo, so you have time to adapt and learn the controls. The Adapt and Win missions team you up with a fireteam at your command. By the time you complete the campaign (~30 hours) you should be familiar with giving your fireteam commands, both individually and as a group. ARMA III is more than just a First-Person-Shooter, it is a first-person combat simulator. The weight of your equipment is taken into consideration and will effect your movement and endurance. The three different stances (prone, crouching, and standing) will effect how much your weapon recoils, which will effect how quickly you can target an enemy. Standing while trying to hit a moving target at 1,000 meters is not recommended. ARMA III allows user-developed mods, and also includes DLCs. Once you have completed the campaign, and want more single-player or multiplayer campaigns, then I recommend subscribing to the Dynamic Universal War System in the Steam Workshop. The DUWS mod will randomly create new campaigns, with as many missions as you desire. The goal of the campaign is always the same  control of the island. There are still some minor bugs that need to be worked out, but it is very playable as is. I definitely recommend ARMA III.
data48;-;good fun game with lots to do
Xx_P00ns1ay3r_xX;-;Arma 3 is an interesting game with all the god awful driving physics for the trucks... But hey! let's get past that one con. Arma 3 in general is a frun game, But when you have friends that play it, when i first bought Arma 3 i played scenarios and got bored as hell in ten seconds flat, but when you really get into it and start playing Altis Life and make a gang with your friends and do all that kind of stuf like my friends and i do all the drug dealing, it really hits how the fun this game is, and how pretty it is depsite the driving physics.... 8/10 realy fun game Pros: Gameplay Altis Life Online Multiplayer Cons: Physics Single PLayer
The Real Satan;-;The best MilSim out there by far.
Lieutenant Lou;-;Banned For No Reason and wont respond to my unban notice 10/10 would buy on my other account
BigCat;-;a very good all around game
John Marston;-;Arma is one of the best games ever made.
Jeod;-;Best army simulator ever
Clean Criminal * Sharkoon;-;A good modular game, you want a shooter... you got it... you want a RPG game... log on to a server... you got it... Workshop support, active community.... and a bunch of play-time!
Apollo;-;Great Game, Great modding community, and plenty of options for basically all types of players
psycho banana;-;bumped my tank into a rock my tank flew 50 ft 2 back flips later it stuck a perfect landing. would drive that tank agian
Javert;-;Amazing game. Well optomized. Will run on a cereal box with 30+ fps on full graphical seetings. Amazing multiplayer experiences and well worth the money.
mags;-;i was drving then my wheels blew out and i was kidnapped
SnoozerSNS;-;My ARMA Story, I was a war jornalist for BBC news and I was assigned to report the war efforts of NATO forces on Stratis. When was I was on base, I was invited to tag along "Bravo 1-1" and they insured me of my safety. So, we hoped on the Ghosthawk and headed north of the Island. The men of Bravo 1-1 were very speechless along the ride as if they were getting ready for the worst and this concerned me because what could be worst than getting shot at? As we have landed, Bravo 1-1 had begun advancing towards a town near the coastal line. I try to keep up with them, but the smooth task force squad effectively glided every inch of the way as they scan for enemies. Once we've reached the coast, we were already taking shots by enemy fire from over the horizon. Bravo 1-1's squad leader, callsign "Toast", yelled my name while firing his weapon saying,"GET TO COVER!!!!". I ran towards his safety only because I was in shock and did not know what to do. He completely disapproved of my reaction and lead me to the nears wall. After a couple of minutes of the violent firefight which felt like hours, a loud count down appeared, "5...4...3...2...1..." and a bright white flash blinded us. BOOOOOOOOOOOOOOMMMM A NUCLEAR MISSILE EXPLOSION!!!!! A large mushroom cloud had risen into the sky causing and blocking the sun. Everything was so shocking and sudden! All communications were just filled with confusion. Luckliy we were far away enough from the blast zone. Finally, the mushroom cloud had disappeared and we were ordered back to homebase for a debriefing. Thanks Bravo1-1 and Toast for the great online cinematic ride. From, Paddington
saulhdz;-;This game is a waste of money.... It's the buggiest game I ever played, sounds are late like Mexican movie... Player gets tired like he has a hangover, and the AI its on speed, its almost impossible to catch up... Man just don't buy this game I wasted 40 bucks on this terrible game....
BroYo SonGuy;-;Too much DERP not enough MERP lacks in the UMPH
CommandoCarson;-;Must buy. Great game, gameplay is much more fluid than Arma 2, and mods and user created content provide endless gameplay. grab some buds, make a squad, and go kick some !
Keeganlogan;-;I like this game mostly for breaking point but i will still play the game
kk;-;ArmA 3 is the most recent edition to the series, it is a greatly improved in almost every aspect. Improvements First of all this game is excellent, it is a vast improvement from ArmA 2 and has less clunky controls, runs better performance wise, many new features such as scuba diving with underwater shooting (can't get to them all), steam workshop support, and many active players at a time. This game also requires a beast of a PC to run, it is optimized very well though for the vast open world it is. My specificiations are an i5 4690k, 8gb of ram, GTX 760 Superclocked , and I get on average 30 fps on Ultra, 45 on High, and 70 on lowest at 1920x1080 resolution. (Bohemia based games also run better on Intel processors usually) Hmm? I really don't have much to say that is bad about this game. I do dislike the desync that happens in this game but they have managed to get rid of some of it in this game compared to ArmA 2 were it would happen alot more frequently. Also, more content please Bohemia. :) TLDR; Good game, buy it if you liked ArmA 2, or you want a realistic combat scenario. Worth it even at full price.
Uncle Phil #OnHoliday;-;Best CoD running simulator Walk 10 meters, start having an asthma attack
ScarsoLP;-;Arma 3 is an amazing shooter. way better then games like Call Of Duty and Battlefield 4! It is a must have for anyone that likes shooters but even if you don't like them. It has things like Altis Life, Arma 3 Life (NOT RELEASED YET) and much much more!
Piece of Bacon;-;To have fun in this game you MUST work with your teammates. Communication makes this game fun (or funny, you'll meet great guys on this game). Going somewhere alone if the most boring expierence you'll have. Get to that city with all your teammates and find a town to take over, plan your assault then execute. You might be able to get some good mods on this game too (Battle Royale, Breaking point) that will only expand your game expierence. When you first start off your frames will be absolute crap, google stuff to find fixes, you just have to change some stuff in your game files. Stick to certain servers too. They may be the only ones with good frames/those cool guys you were playing with earlier. All in all you gotta trust my review because i only write long reviews for games im passionate about. Single Player: Creates that epic feel that multiplayer has, with a story. 8/10, a little clunky Multi-Player: Epic stuff. Great community. You can let that tactical guy out of you that says "Tango" or "Hostile" instead of enemy. 10/10 Mod support, in-depth video settings. Overall: 9/10 game. Does not deserve to sit in your library and rot.
The Revolution;-;Brain damage isn't the word.. If you love walking about hill sides & empty towns for hours on end then by all means knock your self clean out. Really good graphics, Half decent engine but just awful gameplay. Trying to even see who is launching nades and rounds at you is a fecking personal nightmare. Could feel myself falling asleep in one game where a guy was flying for an hour with me in the back of a chopper.. and yes.. we met no enemy the entire time. 4/10 just for graphics
Havik94;-;waste of freaking money. the game runs like crap, the aiming freaking sucks and theres freaking invisible enemies that can kill you even though yoju cant see them. worst game ever i regret buying this piece of crap!
DevilsKnight2669;-;I have fallin in love with this game. Altis Life is the best mod on this game. The roleplay and every situation is diffrent every time I long on. The flying, Driving, Diving, Selling drugs, taking kindnies, robbing , minning and much more. The single player is alright but all the mods and the community make up for it.
Sightblack;-;If you played BF1942, you've played this.
RedOcelot;-;I think this is one of my best games i have right now. My favourite thing is on arma 3 that it is realistic and not like call of duty.
Ryan Gosling;-;Step 1: Buy the game after making sure I meet all requirements. Step 2: Install the game. Step 3: Click play. Step 4: Get "ARMA III has stopped working" Error. Step 5: Try running as administrator. Step 6: Get "This aplication has failed to start because d3d11.dll was not found" Error. Step 7: Look for DirectX Folder in the ARMA 3 folder, as that is a file related to it. Step 8: Find there is no DirectX folder in the ARMA 3 local files. Step 9: Re-install. Step 10: Get same error. 0/10 - A salty person
Schu;-;When it comes to writing a review for this game, I really don't even know what to say. This series has always been a go to for me, basically since the beginning of my PC gaming days, I was playing OFP in 2001. Over the years this series has entertained me longer than any other i've ever played. There is absolutely no competition to ArmA, no game/simulator comes even close to what arma has to offer, or even comes close to the gameplay experience ArmA has. As any ArmA veteran knows, there is some humps you need to tackle to get use to the game. It's not a game a where you can just join a server and play like battlefield or red orchestra. That's not how the game is structured. It's not a game where you can play it natively, it is not designed in a structured gameplay style what-so-ever. This isn't a game where you can play by yourself( Well, you could...). It's hard to explain to the average-gamer what this game is about. It's a platform and if you're playing it without utilizing the very nature of the game is not going to result in the ideal experience you have heard about. You need to have a community of players, small or large, and 3rd party content to form the game into the GAME you want this PLATFORM to be. The average content pack is at least 10gb, but you should expect 20+gb of content. The game is designed to be modified. Arma 3 has no asset content and ArmA 2 is merely a skeleton of a game body. Explaining to the average player that they need to download a special program and install 10s of gigabytes of content is difficult, it sounds like hard work. Your average player doesn't want to 'work' to get the game into a playable state. That's understandable, but that's not what this game is about. It's so versatile for a reason, so groups of people can make the game exactly how they want it. It's really almost too much to explain, all I can say is that if you give this game a chance, and you put in the work for the first time around to set it up, it's amazing. It is absolutely unmatched. Almost every issue you are going to hear about this game comes down to user error. If people are complaining about the AI, and the futuristic content( or the lack of content), that is entirely because they are not using the game to it's potential. If you don't alter the game meant to be altered, you're going to have a bad experience. The same concept can be applied to performance. I'm sure if you've looked up ArmA, you're probably wondering if you can run it. It is true that arma is a heavy game to run, but that usually is not the source of the problem. 90% of the people complaining about lag are running the game on weak computers that just cannot run arma. The game is not considerably unoptimized, it does have some networking issues, but they are hardly the cause of any major performance problem. This is an intensive game, 5 years ago you could not even dream to see what arma is providing. In a couple years, it will be much more easy to run given the bound-to-happen advancements in hardware. It also comes down to the mission maker and the server hoster, if you don't run your servers right, you are going to give your players bad performance. This game does not babysit you, and you should not expect it to. If you know what you are doing, and you have a decent computer, you will run this game with no problem at all. I hope you take the time to try it, and don't blame everything you are uncapable to do on Bohemia. There is very few things I can say that have made an impact on my life that aren't real, maybe 1 other game out of the hundreds that i've played. ArmA is one of those, there is some great, hilarious experiences in ArmA that I think I will remember the rest of my real life. Not many games can do that.
Niggadrinkscoolaid.com;-;Overview: Arma III, such a beatiful game and it's also really fun! Enjoy Arma as it is, or try out one of it's many fantastic mods. Arma is known for modding in the community, along with countless other addons to the game for free. The DLC for this game is fantastic and should really be considered when buying the game. Overall I think Arma is a game that needs more contrIbuters and with that we could see many new exciting mods and gameplay that you can't find anywhere else. It's worth every dollar and even more worth it for the communiy gameplay that can come from it. REVIEW: Arma is a beatiful game, the graphics are fantastic and all. Although for $60 price tag, you will need alot more than that if you are looking at running the game at a reasonable framerate and trying to insure that the game can look at its finest. Another fault of this game is the campaign, boring and preety much a waste of time and resources by the developers. I believe the resources put into the campaign would have helped the multiplayer much more. Multiplayer, what we are all here for right? The multiplayer aspect of this game is just briliant! Is roleplay your thing, running away from the cops or getting into high speed pursuits - growing cannabis or mining salt, the roleplay game mods have it all. Or do you think you would enjoy king of the hill, on a massive server and trying to control a centre objective with 3 small army's fighting to the last man to take control. I do think if you don't already own this game, just get it! 8/10
lnoblit78;-;Best Military Game 10/10.
benjicougalin;-;Love it. Hate it.
travis868;-;10/10 would get sniped again.
Sheep;-;The butt-crawling makes this game the most tactical game ever. 10/10 will crawl to victory.
ROBOTS?!?!!?;-;And we're running, and we're running, and we're running, and we're running. Running. Walking. Running some more. A little more running. Alot more running. Is good track simulator. Strong, like Bear.
Mr. Whale;-;11/10 I love this game, it has gave me so many amazing moments of epicness. (Get Battle Royale and Breaking Point mods). lol and noscopes are included kbye
MegaQuan;-;LOVE IT.
Our Mighty Hero Bullet Spunj;-;Arma 3 is a Side-Scrolling 2D Platformer developed by EA. In the games' main mode (competitve), you play as one of two factions; the Terrorists, crazed madmen who seek to destroy the world by unleashing ravenous chickens infected with the Ebola virus, and the Counter Terrorists, who desire to stop the fowl plague. Armed with $800 and their wits, players seek out the various chicken sites and fight over control of the worlds destiny.
A very hot piece of Kek;-;For what this game tries to be (Which is a war simulator) it fails misserably at that. The movement is clunky, the A.I Is dumb and overpowered as hell. So if you get into this game being all like "Yeah, this is what war is like, this is realistic and really precise" Then sorry. You need to get out in the real world pall. Because I don't consider a game that when you shoot the enemy in the head they are able to do a 180 turn and shoot you 3 times in the head before dying very realistic. Same goes for boosting of stairs when walking down from them to quickly and breaking your legs. This game is however one of the funniest games I have ever played with friends. The amount of vehicles, the guns, the destructible enviorment. The overall map is not to shabby either. If you get this game for fun gags with friends and just cause overall chaos then this game is perfect for that. If you get it to play it as a serious war game then i'd say the clunky motions and faulty A.I ruins that emediatly
Kewster;-;I love this game and i wish to have.
Alaskan Glitch;-;If you enjoyed Codemasters Operation Flashpoint in 2001, then you will absolutely love ARMA III. ARMA III takes place on two different islands: Altis & Stratis. Stratis is 19 square kilometers (7.3 sq. km), with few roads and rugged forested terrian. Altis, on the other hand, is huge at 270 square kilometers (104.2 sq. mi.), with lots of roads and terrian of mostly rolling hills. However, only ~5% of the roads on Altis are paved. There is a lot of detail put in this game, including some indigenous fauna, such as snakes, rabbits, goats, dogs, insects, and a wide variety of fish and other sea critters. They do not do anything but move around, but it adds to the realism. Did I mention snakes? There are a huge number of snakes on Altis. Movement is not restricted. Meaning, you can move anywhere you like. Including using a re-breather to dive off the coast of either island to investigate ship wrecks, just for kicks. There are lots of vehicles to choose from, both civilian and military. Weapons, ammunition, and equipment can be taken from the dead. However, only take what you can carry during the missions. If you put anything in vehicles they will disappear once you return from your required mission or scouting mission. You will only be allowed to keep the items you are actually carrying. The game includes a single-player campaign broken into three episodes: Survive = 8 required missions, plus 6 optional scouting missions Adapt = 9 required missions, plus 8 optional scouting missions. Win = 6 required missions, no optional scouting missions. When you complete the first required mission for each episode, return to base, and told to report in  don't. If you report in, then you will be assigned the next required mission. Instead, go to where a group of your fellow soldiers are standing/sitting, and listen to what they have to say. This is how you get optional missions. Then go off on a scouting patrol to complete the mission, if you so desire. When you have completed your scouting mission(s), then return to base and report in for your next required mission. All the missions, except for the last one, are linear and static. Meaning, nothing you do will change the course of events. Except for the last mission. In the last mission you have to make a decision, and that decision will determine the outcome of the mission. There is a steep learning curve, and that can get a little frustrating at the beginning. If you are new to ARMA III, then I recommend enabling the Save Games in the Game Options settings and save often to help alleviate that frustration. The Survive missions are all solo, so you have time to adapt and learn the controls. The Adapt and Win missions team you up with a fireteam at your command. By the time you complete the campaign (~30 hours) you should be familiar with giving your fireteam commands, both individually and as a group. ARMA III is more than just a First-Person-Shooter, it is a first-person combat simulator. The weight of your equipment is taken into consideration and will effect your movement and endurance. The three different stances (prone, crouching, and standing) will effect how much your weapon recoils, which will effect how quickly you can target an enemy. Standing while trying to hit a moving target at 1,000 meters is not recommended. ARMA III allows user-developed mods, and also includes DLCs. Once you have completed the campaign, and want more single-player or multiplayer campaigns, then I recommend subscribing to the Dynamic Universal War System in the Steam Workshop. The DUWS mod will randomly create new campaigns, with as many missions as you desire. The goal of the campaign is always the same  control of the island. There are still some minor bugs that need to be worked out, but it is very playable as is. I definitely recommend ARMA III.
data48;-;good fun game with lots to do
Xx_P00ns1ay3r_xX;-;Arma 3 is an interesting game with all the god awful driving physics for the trucks... But hey! let's get past that one con. Arma 3 in general is a frun game, But when you have friends that play it, when i first bought Arma 3 i played scenarios and got bored as hell in ten seconds flat, but when you really get into it and start playing Altis Life and make a gang with your friends and do all that kind of stuf like my friends and i do all the drug dealing, it really hits how the fun this game is, and how pretty it is depsite the driving physics.... 8/10 realy fun game Pros: Gameplay Altis Life Online Multiplayer Cons: Physics Single PLayer
The Real Satan;-;The best MilSim out there by far.
Lieutenant Lou;-;Banned For No Reason and wont respond to my unban notice 10/10 would buy on my other account
Ascron;-;Hate new "in-app purchases system", looks like you playing in free2play mobile game.
GromGromUK;-;Wouldn't recommend, it's a broken game with lots of bugs in it. Need to mod it up to make it look half decent.
Votix;-;This game has the worst lag out of any game i have ever played, I get about 60+ on single player but when i try to play king of the hill or sandbox it drops to about 10-25fps so pretty much unplayable multiplayer wise, something intresting i discovered also is that epoch and breakingpoint (MODS) Run better than the actual game and actually get me 50fps+ so yeah true fact Arma 3 mods run better than the game, Would not recomend unless you have a $5000 Gaming PC, Might reccomend when the game is fixed.
Photonwelsh;-;I decided to try Arma 3 as everyone was recommending online.I am going to start out with this game does need some work to be put in not worth to spend full price on this pick up when on a good sale other then that this game isn't for people who like fast paced action now performance issues I apperently run into with other complications. Firstly so I got 20 fps everything maxed to lowered it still some 20fps terrible port needs to be compressed properly controls are also clunky I would say the simulation at the start was 60fps but once it ended fps dropped drasticaly. Secondly I would recommend trying to run with a single GTX 980 & 970 or AMD equevelent never crossfire or SLI not responsible if fps will stay the same usually I get over 60fps maxed out in games but this one you probably should use a controler since it's not K&m friendly. Lastly lets not forget the story you run to point A to B. I know it's supposed to be realistic but we customers need playable material this rant is to prove that servers have connection problems sometimes you get kicked from online most of the time I get messages saying Arma 3 stopped working as I play through don't get this garbage unless this is below $10/7.89 EU or $5/3.95 EU please Bohemia Interactive fix this trash and make it playable.People with 770s,780s,and 280s,and 290s are really dissapointed that this game doesn't run well on their machines an utter dissapointment to people who dedicated their money on powerful pc hardware just to have 20 fps? In summary not worth buying this game since it isn't demanding but more unoptimized unfinished product this is a spit on PC Gamers and their rigs and before you say something to defend early access let me tell you something Valve needs to work on testing this games before letting them be published on steam conclusion don't buy it not worth your time unless you like capped down ports then support the video game monkeys who make video games this bad and horrible. Final rating 5.5/10 for Walking Simulator
ChunkySpark6;-;one of the best games i have ever played defently worth buying :D
Madigbo;-;This game is optimized like a piece of dog . Other than that, the GoKarts are the best transport in the game. Don't waste money on this garbage unless you want to harass it with friends.
BlackSpaceJesus;-;Great game. Definitely not your average shooter, as you really need to know what you're doing otherwise you will not succeed.
Skippy;-;You can shoot fish while scuba diving. 11/10 Best Call of Duty
Ceviin TheTopKEK;-;10 cheeseburgers out of 10
Spoderman[on vacation];-;Feddback: +lots of mods +great maps +nice sp (never thought) -the egine makes problems 9/10 SP 10/10 MP
Chris;-;This game is not even good enough for a comment
Murckia;-;I have played 6 hours of this game. I absoloutly love it. It is a huge leap forward from arma 2, which is still a good game, and it has very nice game mechanics and physics. If you are part of a big sqquad and useing teamspeak or in game chat, this game really delivers on that. Im my opinion a 9.8 out of 10!
MOOSEMAN;-;Arma 3 is the most expensive game on steam. only people who work at Nasa can aford it, this is because you require a degree in quantum physics to be able to remember the controls.
Conorrob;-;such freedom, very tactics, much stress wow
Brian E.;-;Best, most realistic army game I have ever played. I strongly recommend this game to anybody who has a computer.
360 NOSCOPE;-;Best game evea all i play tho is epoch mod XD it's like the better versoin of all dayz related games(better than H1Z1 too)
dlseim;-;this game sucks
Tesco Value Ketamine;-;10/10 would shoot a police officer again
Zoidberg;-;Love this game! you need to play altis life!
Stuart;-;10/10! Absolutely love this game. Almost so much, I'm eventually going to upgrade my computer, that means paying about 1,000 Euro's or more just so I can get this game on highest specs looking AMAZING! If you're an ArmA fan than you're going to love this.
GeneticDwarf;-;awsome game.looks awsome and are awsome.
*GSU|BaNneDGR;-;after 15 mins the game shuts down my pc and crashes , spent 30 euros to ruin my pc , thanks bohemia
DrKrinklez --EBG-- BUSY;-;Arma 3 is probally the most realistic First person Shooter i've ever played. Try the Atlas Life Mod for sure! 9/10!
TheBlackBaron231;-;Way to complicated and it is more travel than their is fight. this game makes Battlefield look amazing
Legitgamer1261;-;This game is a great strategy team based shooter but... It has a lot of bugs like the most hated and common DX11 buffer map fail and everytime I go to multiplayer it crashes My pc Intel i3 Intel hd 4000 16 GB ram laptop
fullyuki;-;You can run this game with 20 fps in multiplayer on your GTX 970 and i7-4790k desktop. AMAZING OPTIMIZATION!
[HBS] CrAZyGaMeR;-;I found a car, went 140 mph and crashed into a rock. 10/10 Would crash car again.
Pronkers;-;Great successor for the ArmA series. The game itself plus its modded game modes will never get old.
Danniesweetiepiemunchymunchkins;-;Absolutely love this game so far! Spent hours and hours only on A3Wasteland and I have yet to try other mods with friends! Optimizing the game for good FPS is a little tricky (considering I'm running 2x 970s in SLI and a 4790k...) but once you hit the sweet-spot in the settings menu, you are ready to go. Like any other games by Bohemia Interactive, it takes a while to grasp the controls and over-all feel of the game. Having previously played over 400 hours of Standalone, I thoroughly enjoy the vehicle and base-building aspects of game modes like A3Wasteland (Atha & DADDY) which is a hell of an experience when playing in a small or even large group. I recommend the [AMG] A3Wasteland Par Antha & DADDY server as I have enjoyed every second on that server. Overall: 9/10.
Lt. Aldo Raine;-;Omg ten outta ten so good lol hashtag yolo
cmd.exe;-;Great Game, 9/11
GeT_RekT-A-Razer;-;This is actually a really good,innovative,and realistic game.But I give this a 'No' due to the lack of server with good pings.I live in Indonesia and the nearest available server in my country is China with 200-350 ping.Uninstalled it after I realized I won't be able to play a single multiplayer game from Indonesia. Pros : + Super realistic in almost every single content + Stunning graphics + Fun multiplayer games (never plays it but saw it at YouTube) + Lots of cool mods from the community + You can use vehicles rather than just being an infantry like in other games + You can create your own levels Cons : - Extremely confusing controls - The single player campaign is really hard to beat.I got killed over and over by stepping on mines which are invisible - It seems the devs ignores the difficulty of the campaign and only allows us to save ONCE every level. - They should offer cheat mode. I don't get any fun from playing this game.Only frustration.My multiplayer's dead and my single player's impossible to beat.If you're from Asia,don't waste your money on this game.
Ylang - Ylang;-;The DLC policy of todays game developers is the worst possible thing that might ever come. Arma 3 has limited content, but guess what? If you pay extra, you get extra content. Why sell full game once, when you can divide it into pieces and sell in parts? I do not recommend.
Loretta Cristiano Amodio;-;Best Simulator game I've ever played.
Jbbiiiii;-;diiis game sucks because fps is  in mult 0/10 this gave will destroy your eyes
hessujew;-;Very yes. 5/5
|Like| <3;-;Trash You need to spend 10k $$ for new PC unless you want to play with 10 fps. Totally unrealistic , you basically need to hit someone like 20 times to kill him.
Hornet;-;This game is hard. You jump out of a building-splat-dead. You are walking aroung- bang-dead. You are in a tank-mine explodes-dead. However,once you learn all of the tricks(about 75 hours for me) it starts to get really rewarding. This game is very immersive from the fact that you can shoot enemies from over 2 klicks, you can fly helicopters, fixed wing, and drones. You can drive tons of vehicles, or you can just walk around as a rifleman. Use the mission editor to create a mission to your liking, download mods to (nearly) perfect your game. A.I. is kinda glitchy, some textures aren't perfect but overall, FANTASTIC GAME. Seriously, one of my friends NEEDS to buy this so we can play together.
Dr. Professor Boaty;-;i joined the army, i made it momma
Caseyetf32;-;I Love Arma 3 still doing the campaign though but the desynch on multiplayer is horriable everything except for that 10/10 so right now i would give it 8/10
dindibo4;-;is a great game and i wanted to buy id but its too much expensive even with the 50% disscount 30 $ its very expensive for a game
Wespa *Siwa;-;nice work dreamworks studios, expensive and fun shooter.
[PTMC] Allexio;-;I dont really know what to say about this game. I perfectly understand that some people may like it but I know that I certainly didn't... Basically if you're not a hardcore military fanatic do not buy it. The main problem I had with it was that I bought it thinking it was a more realistic battlefield with bigger maps and more accuracy concerning vehicles, weapons, weapon mechanics and that stuff. And as you probably know, because you aren't me, it isn't. First of all, the game mechanics themselves are in my opinion faulty and sluggish. It doesnt feel like you're in control of your character, whether youre controlling a vehicle or the character himself. The UI is the worst I have ever seen in a game. Especially when it ocmes to looting one of your victims. Then, the AI is completely bugged/overpowered, in the singleplayer campaign (which is ridiculously bad btw) I was grenaded by enemies from 300m away. The multiplayer is bad too because servers are very badly managed and end up with your spawns being so far from the war zone that you spend most of your alive time in a chopper to get to the warzone and then end up getting killed after 2 minutes on the ground by a camper in a building who knows the map better than you. And trust me, this gets very frustrating after a while, it just becomes a cycle of death -> long helicopter ride -> death -> long helicopter ride, etc. The only context I would recommend buying this game is if you have maybe a squad of a friends with the game and mics who will play with you in co-up community made missions. But that's pretty much it.
[SUK] Comanche;-;pretty good, but very laggy for my pc, ill buy the full version once i buy myself a super computer
HotStuffs;-;Amazingly fun, I love altis life and wasteland.
[TGP] Burnsy;-;get this
Chany;-;This game is awesome!!!
=DRK= amg433;-;Don't let the screenshots fool you. You have to have an amazing computer in order to play like that. For most people, trying to play the game on the higher settings will result in more lag than game. Unfortunately on the lower settings the game looks 7 years old. Graphics aside the gameplay is excellent and realistic like it should be. The episodic campaign is the biggest downside. It shows quite a bit of laziness on Bohemia Interactive's part. It's been almost 6 months since the full release and we still don't have the end of the campaign, Also, the campaign isn't very good, but multiplayer makes up for it. I personally love Wasteland and Altis Life. I would recommend purchasing this game primarily for its multiplayer.
Xandillion;-;90/89 I only got this for the Dew and Doritios package.
Elite;-;Not that much my style of game, i like Altis Life. 7/10
trieu;-;If your into a militarty realism/simulator, and have a passion for the balisitcs system, play this ing game please. You will love it!
GrizzlyBear55;-;Great game!
kill my ass;-;Barbra Tree is the greatest Wii U Racing Sim I've ever played. The amount of content and side missions is about 5 times as much as every GTA combined, and the RPG elements really added a whole new level of depth to the game that really made the game stand apart from the other Wolfenstein games. 100/1 Piece of crap game. I would buy a four pack.
TheIceyAndroid;-;It is a great game well the editor is anyway but the fact they didnt have missions from day one was annoying but still its great to see the missions now! but overall i think this is a great and fun game!! :)
dessenger;-;Arma... that is a soldier and one life, lots of helicopters, tanks and other things
CronalLogical;-;I LOVE THIS GAME!
Quacks Magee;-;game is sh!t
ARXON;-;No tutorial and no easy way to figure out how to play this game. A case of trying to make a simulator but not realizing it still needs to be a fun game. Not fun at all.
bwag174;-;Arma 3 hates me. (Steam free) Every server I join it says there is a battleeye error and kicks me, after getting back to the lobby menu arma 3 crashes. This sucks, pretty pointless. Every other game that uses battle eye has no problem with me.
Defailed;-;This is the gripping story of a boy and his beloved dog "Dog". The story takes place in medival US, when President Nixon was a stablehand in the Angarville Castle. We get an unparralelled experience of frienship and eventually love that transcend boundaries as species and gender. Truly heartwarming!
The Caffeinated Crusader;-;Arma 3 is very much an improvement on the previous games and I enjoy the smoother combat and animations than Arma 2s clunky movement but the optimization issues and bugs still remain although not as heavy as Arma 2s. It can be a pain to get into games on public servers where everyone just acts like its your typical arcade shooter or the other side where everyone is being a pain by trying to keep it ultra serious and kicking everyone who doesn't say tango down or whatever every two seconds which is why I recommend finding a good group of people like Shack Tactical to play with. But hey you could just ignore it all and play wasteland or arma life servers and never play anything else which is the great thing about gaming. Anyway hopefully this paints an alright picture in your mind about the game good luck and happy hunting!
foamchild;-;game. It takes a whole mag to kill someone and it takes on bullet to the knee for you to get instantly killed. And evey Altis life server is .
[CoRE] Cobra__Gold;-;Very poor design for new users, this is my first Arma game and i found it almost impossible to play, there were no clear training missions and any that they did have did NOT give clear instructions. It took me 30mins of mashing buttons to figure out how to crouch :(. Was really looking foward to this game as all reviews and videos looked really good, the Multiplayer is very laggy and the players are rude and not helpful i was kicked 45 times, i counted, for being a newbie. Very dissapointed will hopefully grasp the controls and basics soon just feel like ive wasted fourty-pounds. Do NOT buy this game. I do not reccomend it.
TheLegitBrit;-;Great game would recommend for action and RP
Starfishman12;-;Steam took it away from me, But i loved it whilst i had it.
[BST] Headshots;-;Very good and enjoyable game, however has very bad optimization causing very bad framerates even for many good rigs.
Jester Thomas;-;almost as good as cod
Ewan Mcstab;-;You can run around naked in a fur hat and shoot things, what's not to like?
Irsh;-;it has wierd controls but nice graphics
sierrafoxtrot30;-;progress is very very slow so its kind of boring but still a pretty good game i guess
Set;-;i buy all arma and i not got money to buy this arma ||| if you want steam you can send me the game for free please i love this game and i really want it From, Hellokitty Mean:Spring Mean:=Set=
Azorek;-;Low fps (very bad optimization), bad graphics and boring gameplay. The game feels like if it was made in year 2000 by few bad programmers in their basement. Definitely not worth a penny.
Sir Pug;-;Its amazing, you can add things to the game, better graphics, better driving and better hit shooting
Soviet Bear;-;So much to do. Just tons of fun to be had.
MC_FC;-;gun &car&my frined ilove arma 3
Skior The Paladin;-;DON'T READ THIS. YOU WILL BE KISSED ON THE NEAREST POSSIBLE FRIDAY BY THE LOVE OF YOUR LIFE.TOMORROW WILL BE THE BEST DAY OF YOUR LIFE. NOW YOU'VE STARTED READING THIS. DON'T STOP. THIS IS SO FREAKY.1. say your name ten times.2. say your mom's name five times.3. say your crushes three times.4. paste this to four other games.If you do this, your crush will kiss you on the nearest Friday.But if you read this and do not paste this, then you will have very bad luck.SEND THIS TO 4 GAMES IN 143 MINUTES. WHEN YOU'RE DONE PRESS F6 AND YOUR CRUSH'S NAME WILL APPEAR IN BIG LETTERS ON THE SCREEN. THIS IS SO FREAKY BECAUSE IT ACTUALLY WORKS LOL
KainKiller1993 [NL] Uber Te@m;-;Why is it Night Time?
| Meme Police;-;20/10 would bang
Nitzan;-;this game 11/10 piece of niv manyak
PsYcRoNiX;-;Got bored after 10 minutes.
5py;-;Multiplayer is crap, unoptimized. SP is very very fast and fun to play. Campaigns are very well made too.
Melons;-;Very good, yes.
7000 Skeletons;-;An overall waste of money.
RushMyPancake;-;Battle eye for arma is not good a hacker join the game and got all the player and me banned for life on DJG the server had to shut down to the lake of admins and moderators its a waste of money getting banned for no reason
Reckless;-;Awsome game full of action and fun.
Marticus;-;Just real enough. Be sure to have a nice Graphics card if you want to play 1080 with high details.
Okottekoneko;-;Arma 3 is a brutally hard military sim, its not your regular First person shooter. This is the platform the military uses to train soldiers because the guns and cover systems are so realistic. the AI is unforgiving, and if you take even one bullet you are in a world of trouble, you get wet or in the cold without the right clothing your going to freeze to death, take too much of a fall your going to break your legs. You also are not a 1 man army toting around an armarda of weapons, you take a side arm and a main weapon with a small ammount of ammo, if you have a pack maybe you can fit a spare smaller gun, and a few more rounds. But the main story is not why most people buy this game, Arma is a modders wet dream, there is a TON of modded game modes, the 3 majors ones being; Arma 3 Epoch Altis life Arma 3 sandbox. there are also a good many more in development. the game is a little pricey, but it does go on sale fairly regularly, but if you have a few friends and find a mod you like you have a game that will keep you entertained for a long long time.
Crossedbow;-;Fun to play (with friends), even if you're new to these militairy simulation games. Editor is so fun to mess around with and the community is one of the best!
SIMPLY NICK;-;Arma 3 in summary is simply brilliant! There are so many game modes and role playing games which lie within this game to keep you wanting to come back to this game! Along with a good community which mods and creates more fantastic games and scenarios to play The game looks great and sounds amazing along with the physics to the most part very good And the Military Simulation is epic and also intense but very fun to plan your strategic tactics to ultimately finish whatever goal you are faced with Arma 3 is great alone or with friends You can guarantee that the mass amount of time which you will spend on this game is spent well as the pricing of this game is fairly high Arma 3 is addicting and I would recommend this game to anyone! 9.5/10
CoMmAnDeR;-;Great Single player, FPS isn't too good even with good computer, Needs patch badly. Multiplayer isn't good as the FPS drops 1-20 FPS not good at all, Needs patch asap, since it has been out for a long time I guess they don't want to fix it at all.. Making packs without patching the FPS problem is a problem. Other than this is good graphics, and good game. Will not recommend till they fix the FPS problem, seems like a waste of money..
Bloopey;-;I really don't like this game. I wouldn't recommend it to anyone with a successful life.
.Benny;-;great game, lots of fun with all the different game types! 8/10 would recommend
PixelPiledriver;-;Confusing -------------------------- CHOOSE YOUR RULE SET! What? 3, 2, 1, GO! What? Weird controls -------------------------- vaulting, changing weapons, everything else, no jumping or climbing. Strange HUD -------------------------- sub missions pop up on screen. Look at map. Nothing relates the two together. Non-Intuituve -------------------------- dragging and dropping items, using vehicles, flying helicopters, reloading, crouching, etc all feels weird. Empty -------------------------- even on a full 64 player, seeing anyone was rare. You can only find weapons in vehicles, Boring -------------------------- Combat feels stiff No indication of bullets hitting Sounds aren't great Lots of lumpy hills and trees with no unique features that tell me where I am on the map. Joined a co-op mission that consisted of riding on a boat for 20 mins to reach the start of the mission. $60 -------------------------- I could have bought any other game on steam, or 6 other cheap games. Other -------------------------- I will probably put some more time into this game and try the player made missions. But as of right now I don't like this game very much. :[
dun;-;the greatest vehicle simulator
I Play On an IPHONE;-;awesome just awesme if you liked arma 2 you will love arma 3
Petromilli;-;Me and a friend were doing a massive co op mode and we decided to take a quad to the objective. Later on about 6 KM away from the objective the quad breaks so we start walking there. We gave up and said "Screw it" and shot eachother / grenaded and my friend was bleeding out so I gave him a medkit. Then we walked more and the objective changed to about 13 KM away and we gave up again so we shot eachother. Now we are both bleeding out on the ground and stranded in the middle of nowhere. Until suddenly a friendly Tank came moments later and patched us both up. Then we are inside the tank and I go afk for some juice. By the time I got back, the tank driver left without giving me nor my friend permission to drive it. So my friend brought up that while I was gone a helicopter was here and a guy offered to take us with him. My friend said "Ok, but lets wait for my friend to get back" (being me) So when I get back my friend gets in the chopper and said "Cmon lets get in" I was wondering where the pilot is so I got out to find him dead underneath the heli. So then me and my friend got out and walked to the nearest air base 2 KM away. halfway there I realised there was a respawn button so me and my friend used it and spawned at the air base to find dead allys everywhere. So we looted them but then the server restarted so we got on gmod. 10/10
RaysJD;-;It's pretty damn awsome, from gameplay to graphics this game is the bawlz.
Professor Boink;-;I rarely play online, and don't do much single player. I have no idea how i have 100 hours, it must be good.
TACTICALnoob;-;a little fusterating at first, but once you get the hang of its alot of fun, i had to re-bind some of the keys to make me more comfortable but other then that i love this game!!!!
2001 [];-;Good Campaign, Exellent Graphics, Fun RP
Yoko Senpai <333;-;i liked the game at first, i liked the details, i liked the HUD, i liked the control setup, and so on. What i did not like though is the fact that it is not that good at multi-core rendering, so if you have an AMD 8-core processor, then it may lag a little bit, (for some reason 6-core processors work better than 8-core processors on this game, even if all the cores ahve 4000MHZ both on the 6-core and 8-core)
Chris;-;Its a very good game.
Migliosi;-;Cool Cool 10/10
op;-;the war game of my dreams.
eliteblast7;-;i love it I LOVE ITTTTTTTTTTTTTT!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! OOM SOOOO GOOD
EuphonY;-;I play this game more for the mods than anything else, really. Mod-wise it's cool. BREAKING POINT!!!
Fizzy Lifting Drinks;-;Best Multiplayer Shooter Ever. If you like DayZ, and like the feel of Battlefield or something. GET THIS GAME. The Multiplayer has MASSIVE maps with amazing combat and realistic systems. Good simulator. Buy it now! Definetly worth your money! P.S. DONT EXPECT TO GET GOOD INSTANTLY... It takes some time... I can tell...
TheAPT;-;battle royale is the best! very good mod. (the game is ok too :P ).
Yellow Power Ranger;-;Singleplayer -It has it's own Unique Features in every aspect of the Game it has it's own style. -The Game is just Simply Perfect. -It has loads of fun playing in Singleplayer. Multiplayer -Once you've step up on Multiplayer, I think you couldn't go back on Singleplayer, unless if you haven't have an Internet Connection. -The different Gamemodes of Multiplayer is just Simply Fantastic! -The Gameplay of different Gamemodes is stunning! -Tons of good words that I could say. **HIGHLY RECOMMENDED** What are you waiting for? Buy it, Try it, and Play it now!
[Pure]Cpt. Shadows;-;Stunning gameplay and graphics
acus;-;Best Simulation game a lot of fun JUST buy it and  it when you are looking at your game IGN 10/10 420
Hude;-;Best Military Simulator Ever. 12/10
Proinprogress;-;It's fun... if you have 3 Titan GPUs.
counter-strike ustomer;-;me this game is super-cool, play it and enjoy it!!! ;)
Galactic Tea;-;Killed by puhed the car 10/10 The best game ever+Best texture . Buy it !!!!!
Mrjorma67;-;great war simulator game had lots of fun but theres some bugs with rocks and objects.
boski;-;Brilliant game... lol. Be good if it would run decent on MP
Knapperx;-;NOT CALL OF DUTY. NOT CALL OF DUTY. NOT CALL OF DUTY. NOT CALL OF DUTY. NOT CALL OF DUTY. tl:dr one of the best military simulation games available nevr stop plyin dis
YouCatfish;-;This game is awesomly fun when you are completly aware of the situation and focused in on the game. I noticed that as soon as I lost that immersion factor I got sloppy with my movements and that often resulted in my demise. It can be very frustrating at times, especially if you have no idea what you are doing and cant remember many of the controls but once it clicks, it gets a little easier. Definatly do the bootcamp training!
Maxofaus;-;Its Fun especially Altis Life :D
Hell-ish | Red Trauma;-;Brilliant Military Sandbox. Don't let the crappy trailer fool you. this game kicks .
Bot Nick;-;Took a while to get used to but then really got fun, many different game modes and lots of experiences to be had!
Redcake;-;THIS GAME IS SOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOOO EIPC MAKE MORE UPDATE BEST GAME!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Sir RoughWater;-;Great game for good gamers
Gojets81;-;I love all the realisticness of everything!
cwirawan;-;Outstanding game, with open environment and wide option of completing the mission.
fir3sky;-;Best warfare simulator out there. Not only teamwork is a requirement but the knowledge in all vehicles as well as zones, weapons, pace & victorious beastings on all levels of your senses. This is NOT like COD This is NOT like Battlefield This is a real time warefare simulator. (You need a pretty sharp machine to run this game at a respectable rate so be aware) 9/10
SU-METAL;-;This is the perfect game for people who have always taken themselves to seriously when playing shooters, and casuals alike. It's hard to pick up but once you get the hang of the shootsing mechanic and slight lag issues, kills become very satisfying,
Ipsy;-;Buy this game or die trying!
M.;-;Great game! Probably the closest you will get to a Military Simulator.
RizK;-;Really great game! better than the last, and really worth the money!
|RIL| RexIsAlive;-;NJHHBVNWGHJQBNVJVHWVBNBVHB HM BHJKHMNBJKNMB NBJHMBHBNN MB BJNNNHBVHV GHB BH JNHBVHBMK<MBJHNBBVBMJHMVJHGVBHVHJJGVGCJCGHCFCJHGCJGHCGHCGCGCCGCGCGCGCGHCGGCCCCCHGJCGHCGI DONT HAV DE MONYS TO BY DIS GAME, BUT I WIL GIV IT 1,000/10 YU CNT BT ME SKILLZ
Dan Twinkletoes;-;I give this game an 11/10 because i like taking my cloths off and running arond the battlefield...
<{N.T__G.T.A.V>;-;best game actully worth the 60 buck and im really getting into altis life.
Sly fresh;-;Loving this game so far, I like to play role play alot so with Altis Life it shows of to be very good when your playing as a trained police officer :) 10/10
Tyrone Smith;-;Good game and very realistic :D
DirtDiver;-;Great game, a must have for fans of fps games. There are so many different things you can do with this game.
dave2bull;-;this is a great game hours of fun i played the altis life mod great will recommended to anyone
normie;-;it's alright
A slice of cheese;-;Fan-freakin' tastic! Its all you'd want in a wargame, unfourtunately i cannot say the same about the download space. Still great game overall.
House;-;Great game, hate that the dlc comes up in my game, I would buy for the right price, purchased carts, maybe if helicopers was priced around $5.00 that would be exceptable, Since at this time I dont have it, I would like to see the DLC ads in my game gone, Mods and DLC are great dont get me wrong, just no need for it in game.
A very scared cat;-;Spent 60 dollars for this game played it alot played the alpha and beta to test the game then today got battle eye banned for no reason and can't play one of my favorite games ever, it seems like bohemia interactive is so cheap they have to use battle eye, a screwed up hacker security setup that bans people who do nothing I was on yesterday play altis life then today I get on to go play with a friend I get a ban message, they are too cheap to use VAC that actually works and doesn't ban people that do nothing it bans people that do hack and break the game I have also been banned on arma 2 OA and I sent a support message to battle eye, and bohemia interactive, and then I got a bot that messaged me back saying that I need to go to steam and I did I went to steam and I got a message from one of they're support consultants an actual person not a freaking bot I commemerate steam for this and I scould bohemia interactive and battle eye. I will be missing out on arma 3 life, city life, battle royale, and many other fun game modes because I get banned for no reason by battle eye.
eSportWarrior;-;Its a nice Game.
TrustDeal;-;It was` Free Week-end` when i fall in love with this game. But i can`t aford it !
Farfromjokin;-;Great game if you like Military simulators. large variety of guns, clothing and tactical options as well as vehicles, for land sea and air warfare. and, has tons of community made scenarios, missions, and mods to keep you playing the game over and over.
Bob;-;Great game i would Buy it.
[TBH] Mj Griffin;-;I like shooter games, and I always saw my brother playing them and they looked very fun. when I was old enough, i got call of duty and had a blast. i kind of expected that kind of fun from this game, but i was dissapointed. even on beginner difficulty the soldiers take 30 minutes to kill, and you take 2 shots to the foot and you are dead whereas you can shoot them in the chest five times and they ill crouch and order their whole squad to fire on you with their unrealistically impeckable accuracy. if you like pulling out your hair and the feeling of overwhelming rage, this is the game for you. if not, you are wasting your money.
Screaming Mantis;-;While Arma 3 is a good game, it is still has issues. Myself as well as a lot of other players have experienced multiple problems while playing, one such problem would be when we are launching the game, a message pops up saying "Handle is Invalid". Don't risk your $60 - $65 on a game that still has issues. Dissapointing... EDIT: There have been a few things that I wish to add to this review. I think it was a poor decision on BIS part to add DLC's that cost money with little content. The Zeus free DLC/update hasn't done anything to the game multiplayer wise, the karts DLC looks a bit fun, but still needs more stuff, the helicopter DLC only adds 2 choppers and a few new gameplay mechanics that should have been in a free update, which costs $15. Also, like I have stated before, my game often crashes on even at the lowest possible settings. I'm overall dissapointed in this game and its just a HUGE waste of money that could be put to games that are ACTUALLY enjoyable and not riddled with bugs and costly DLC's.
[.o.W.n.] Joekiller385;-;This Game has its moments and it deserves credit for being a great Arma game the engine pretty much aint realistic like Arma 2 but this game is pretty fun to play with.
Poo Tin;-;such a joy to look at and play especially if you are a fan of the ARMA series. I would also like to point out the BREAKING POINT absolutley pisses over DayZ Standalone, Breaking Point being the ARMA3 mod that used to be called DayZ Breaking Point on ARMA2. this is due to having vehicles, craftable storage and a  ton of weapons. grab it !
elix;-;Simple best game on the market
Brutus;-;I buy Arma 3 "on sale" and after the weekend sale they bring out the Helicopter DLC for $15.99. Ok, I got bit, but, remember when things like helicopters in a game were part of the game not a "here are 2 helicopter for $15.99" DLC money grab? I didn't know this was a pay for DLCs that really should already be part of the game. I would not recommend this game to anyboy.
Mozaik;-;I expected this game to have way more zombies in it. 2/10
gone until the 31st;-;It's better than Bad Rats. You know you want it.
macca *NUTTY;-;one of the best pc games i have played only down sides are the optimisation is pretty bad but apart from that awesome game
Lord Gartax;-;Great game, even better that daniel doesn't have it!
tforce;-;great game if you like simulated army games
War. War never changes.;-;Play with me maybe.
Hands,,l,,(o_O),,l,,Up!;-;cant play free weekend cause a bug .... if i open the game it just open an emty steam window-.-
Bobcat4848;-;Sweet game, only requires an awesome computer to run it.
sKadoOshH;-;Great game alot of fun alot of chaos!
SB_a_Player;-;Not as good as Arma 2 but ok might get better with the time.
Trinidad;-;Peach farming and hiking simulator 2015.
DMStewart;-;You will never play anything like ARMA...period. I bought this along with ARMA 2 Combined Operations. I did so only to play various multiplayer mods (DAYZ, Wasteland, etc) and then just figured since everyone seemed to love the series that I should have the most recent version as well. It's safe to say that I have barely played the multiplayer mods and have spent most of the time playing user created scenarios and the standard campaign. I am thoroughly impressed with how involved this game is in every possible category. Furthermore, I fully understand now how people become addicted to this game. The modding community is the most impressive thing I have ever seen and unlike any other that I have encountered in the PC gaming world. There are some things that any newcomer like myself should know before buyiong this. First off, this game is difficult. It is difficult because it is exactly what it says it is, a tactical military simulator with focus on infantry. Do not expect any aspect of casual FPS. Sure, you may find that in a user created scenario (add-on free missions from the Steam Workshop) but most likely not, as most fans who create those also focus on the true-to-life simulation potential. Coming from Battlefield I figured that this was probably just like BF with a little more tactical realism. Boy was I wrong. But it was a mistake that became welcomed and well received. There is so much to learn in this game that it is almost mind-blowing...it actually only ends up being "mind-bending". The Add-Ons/Mods seem to be endless. Since I am still learning how to properly use them I cant speak on the topic with any authority but only know that they are impressive. Check out the PlaywithSix launcher/mod browser/installer for the Arma series along with armaholic.com and get ready for a new, never ending obsession.
Literally Cancer;-;I just wanted to play a better improved CTI mode with modern weapons, vehicles, etc. Instead I'm having to buy Go-Kart DLC for 15$.  this game, Arma 2 is better than this game is nearly every way, esepcially with mods.
ristar85;-;ARMA 3. a lot of walking, tactical, etc. fun. but the ridiculously mind blowingly stupid AI is so stupid that u wont believe it. do i also need to wipe their rear after they take a dump? it's stupid like hell. when in danger, they cant even run, they'll just act smart (even though they're stupid as hell) and walk "tactically" even though they'll be cut down in no time. these stupid crap cant even take cover properly and stand in the middle of the street. never mind about the cover, they cant even follow the player properly. bloody disgustingly stupid. stupid. stupid. stupid. stupid. as it stands, the AI are just virtual meat shields. i have never completed a mission without all of the STUPID AI dead. and they deserve it for being so mindblowingly and disgustingly stupid. i only wish that the body parts are detachable in ARMA 3, so that i can view their stupid dismembered corpses because they're so bloody disgustingly stupid that make u go WTF all the time. whenever the AI i lead dies, i say "yeah, f u, u deserve it. i hope u burn in virtual hell and i hope it also hurts like hell." leading the AI is worse than babysitting, where the player, being the babysitter, has to resist the temptation of emptying the entire magazine into their stupid faces every single second of the game. i hope somebody makes a mod to turn all the AI on the player's side into clowns. because that is exactly wat they are. --- now that i got that off my chest, time for the actual review. as the story goes, the year is 2035... but the NATO forces still wear the old school camouflage. damn stupid decision not to give everyone pixelated uniforms. also, year 2035, where's the TALOS suit? where're the high tech gadgetry that u'd expect? FLIR goggles? NOPE. everything's the same as the 80s or 90s, except now u have rifles with different names, that's all. the explosives in the game are totally useless against infantry, because there's no chance in hell u'll kill the AI with it. the splash damage is too small, damage is too little, and this is totally stupid because ARMA 3 claims to be a military simulator. i've been to grenade ranges and let me say that the ballistic glass more than 100 metres away is full of marks from the fragmentation of the grenades. wat do u think that'd do to weak flesh and bones? according to ARMA, nothing, or nothing a simple first aid cant fix. oh, and lets not forget that every injury can be patched up and the character returned to normal function after some first aid. HA. and u call this a military simulator? total nonsense. this is also why i want to be able to blow limbs off in ARMA. the injury system is STUPID, just like the AI. well, beside the cool factor of seeing somebody cut into half after getting hit, or become a red smear on the floor after getting run over by a tank, or have his arm hanging by the skin after getting hit, etc. u may say that im being graphic, but let me just say that this is supposed to be a military simulator, and therefore there is absolutely no need for any type of sanitisation. if anything, these are features that were overlooked by developers and needlessly accepted by the ARMA community. anyway, if u want to have fun, play multiplayer (but then there're concerns with cheating). if u want future soldier combat stuff as u'd expect in the year 2035, stay the hell away. if u want to play single player only, forget it. it'll only make your blood boil. if u r into heavy breathing, buy it now. u'll love it, because the player character runs out of breath quickly.
Kris;-;This Game Is Mint! Tactical gameplay...
jjhumphries92;-;for the little i have gotten to play i have fallen in love with the game my problem is i keep getting a D3D error and i cant fix it so the games just quits on me but im gonna build me a better pc soon and ill just play on it
eliteblast7;-;i love it I LOVE ITTTTTTTTTTTTTT!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! OOM SOOOO GOOD
EuphonY;-;I play this game more for the mods than anything else, really. Mod-wise it's cool. BREAKING POINT!!!
Fizzy Lifting Drinks;-;Best Multiplayer Shooter Ever. If you like DayZ, and like the feel of Battlefield or something. GET THIS GAME. The Multiplayer has MASSIVE maps with amazing combat and realistic systems. Good simulator. Buy it now! Definetly worth your money! P.S. DONT EXPECT TO GET GOOD INSTANTLY... It takes some time... I can tell...
TheAPT;-;battle royale is the best! very good mod. (the game is ok too :P ).
Bootylicious;-;Terrible game unless you plan on playing it on single player only, MAJOR fps lag on multiplayer you will get 3 fps for ever even lowering all settings to low or disabled.
El Duderino (MeGuustav [NL]);-;It doesn't work. You have enormous lag on PC's with quad-PC's. The engine uses only 1 core -_- So if you somehow still use a dual-core PC you can play this game. If you have a really new quad-core processor you can play this game too. That aside, the game feels like it's unfinished and just a money grab. They didn't invest in a new engine that actually works, you have no story and it totally depends on mods which still doesn't make it any good. You are thrown on an island with a pistol and there are some vehicles on the island. That's pretty much ArmA 3 in a nutshell.
Steel Talon;-;What exactly improved from Arma II, graphics & thats it! Seame exact  get carried over with some bonusses. Graphic glitches Invisible walls (geometry glitch) AI is AI sees trough foliage, u can't even turn it off anymore Body armor system makes a feel u fight ING T-600s AI aim iscompletely random, it can miss whole clip point blank or insta-kill u from 300m. I can't remember when i managed to insta-kill AI. optimisation sounds scripted events controlls It has mod support tough, but should the mods be needed to fix basic game mechanics one would expect from a simulator? It's not a simulator, it is sanbox game u can mod to make a simulaor.
Project T.A.M.A;-;i really hate it. the campain sucks,the mutiplayer is unplayable and i didnt even want to try the rest of the features because of how stupid the things i had played
Hands,,l,,(o_O),,l,,Up!;-;cant play free weekend cause a bug .... if i open the game it just open an emty steam window-.-
Bobcat4848;-;Sweet game, only requires an awesome computer to run it.
sKadoOshH;-;Great game alot of fun alot of chaos!
SB_a_Player;-;Not as good as Arma 2 but ok might get better with the time.
Trinidad;-;Peach farming and hiking simulator 2015.
DMStewart;-;You will never play anything like ARMA...period. I bought this along with ARMA 2 Combined Operations. I did so only to play various multiplayer mods (DAYZ, Wasteland, etc) and then just figured since everyone seemed to love the series that I should have the most recent version as well. It's safe to say that I have barely played the multiplayer mods and have spent most of the time playing user created scenarios and the standard campaign. I am thoroughly impressed with how involved this game is in every possible category. Furthermore, I fully understand now how people become addicted to this game. The modding community is the most impressive thing I have ever seen and unlike any other that I have encountered in the PC gaming world. There are some things that any newcomer like myself should know before buyiong this. First off, this game is difficult. It is difficult because it is exactly what it says it is, a tactical military simulator with focus on infantry. Do not expect any aspect of casual FPS. Sure, you may find that in a user created scenario (add-on free missions from the Steam Workshop) but most likely not, as most fans who create those also focus on the true-to-life simulation potential. Coming from Battlefield I figured that this was probably just like BF with a little more tactical realism. Boy was I wrong. But it was a mistake that became welcomed and well received. There is so much to learn in this game that it is almost mind-blowing...it actually only ends up being "mind-bending". The Add-Ons/Mods seem to be endless. Since I am still learning how to properly use them I cant speak on the topic with any authority but only know that they are impressive. Check out the PlaywithSix launcher/mod browser/installer for the Arma series along with armaholic.com and get ready for a new, never ending obsession.
Literally Cancer;-;I just wanted to play a better improved CTI mode with modern weapons, vehicles, etc. Instead I'm having to buy Go-Kart DLC for 15$.  this game, Arma 2 is better than this game is nearly every way, esepcially with mods.
ristar85;-;ARMA 3. a lot of walking, tactical, etc. fun. but the ridiculously mind blowingly stupid AI is so stupid that u wont believe it. do i also need to wipe their rear after they take a dump? it's stupid like hell. when in danger, they cant even run, they'll just act smart (even though they're stupid as hell) and walk "tactically" even though they'll be cut down in no time. these stupid crap cant even take cover properly and stand in the middle of the street. never mind about the cover, they cant even follow the player properly. bloody disgustingly stupid. stupid. stupid. stupid. stupid. as it stands, the AI are just virtual meat shields. i have never completed a mission without all of the STUPID AI dead. and they deserve it for being so mindblowingly and disgustingly stupid. i only wish that the body parts are detachable in ARMA 3, so that i can view their stupid dismembered corpses because they're so bloody disgustingly stupid that make u go WTF all the time. whenever the AI i lead dies, i say "yeah, f u, u deserve it. i hope u burn in virtual hell and i hope it also hurts like hell." leading the AI is worse than babysitting, where the player, being the babysitter, has to resist the temptation of emptying the entire magazine into their stupid faces every single second of the game. i hope somebody makes a mod to turn all the AI on the player's side into clowns. because that is exactly wat they are. --- now that i got that off my chest, time for the actual review. as the story goes, the year is 2035... but the NATO forces still wear the old school camouflage. damn stupid decision not to give everyone pixelated uniforms. also, year 2035, where's the TALOS suit? where're the high tech gadgetry that u'd expect? FLIR goggles? NOPE. everything's the same as the 80s or 90s, except now u have rifles with different names, that's all. the explosives in the game are totally useless against infantry, because there's no chance in hell u'll kill the AI with it. the splash damage is too small, damage is too little, and this is totally stupid because ARMA 3 claims to be a military simulator. i've been to grenade ranges and let me say that the ballistic glass more than 100 metres away is full of marks from the fragmentation of the grenades. wat do u think that'd do to weak flesh and bones? according to ARMA, nothing, or nothing a simple first aid cant fix. oh, and lets not forget that every injury can be patched up and the character returned to normal function after some first aid. HA. and u call this a military simulator? total nonsense. this is also why i want to be able to blow limbs off in ARMA. the injury system is STUPID, just like the AI. well, beside the cool factor of seeing somebody cut into half after getting hit, or become a red smear on the floor after getting run over by a tank, or have his arm hanging by the skin after getting hit, etc. u may say that im being graphic, but let me just say that this is supposed to be a military simulator, and therefore there is absolutely no need for any type of sanitisation. if anything, these are features that were overlooked by developers and needlessly accepted by the ARMA community. anyway, if u want to have fun, play multiplayer (but then there're concerns with cheating). if u want future soldier combat stuff as u'd expect in the year 2035, stay the hell away. if u want to play single player only, forget it. it'll only make your blood boil. if u r into heavy breathing, buy it now. u'll love it, because the player character runs out of breath quickly.
Kris;-;This Game Is Mint! Tactical gameplay...
cHuwowsus;-;the best
Dipsy;-;This game is the most realistic war simulator there is. It takes a bit of time to get used to it but then after a while the game gets a bit easier. It is a hard game but thats what makes it realistic.
jordanlee2198;-;i personally love this game would be better if more modes became available but it is basically a great game overall well woth the money
Yeasty Bread;-;amzing worth evrey pound payd
Brind.D VGHS;-;awsome ame
[D$L] aus_at_war;-;top fun game to play coop on
dEVILMayCry;-;Reallistic FPS and third person! GUNS, PLANES, CARS , TANKS , JETS , HELICOPTERS this is war! in game mods! Role playing game! 9/10 NO Lag No Bug
checkmark98;-;the story sucks, but the multuiplayer is fun sometimes but overall confusing if you dont know what your doing
[FL:RP]Gordon301;-;Arma 3 is truly the next Gen in war simulation, the community for it is large with many mods to choose from, why wouldnt you play arma?
Zero_Percent;-;This is a really good game, provides many hours of goodness. Favorite thing to do is wasteland with freinds.
TheLegendaryLighterThief;-;buy buy buy, awesome game so in shiney :D
Hrfn;-;I don't even own the game. 10/10
hellscoop;-;THE ROCKS!!!! THE ING ROCKS!!!!! I SWEAR THEY ARE OUT TO GET ME!!!!!!!!!!!
ReaLOpTiC Mia khalifa;-;Top  t
Trillzy;-;RDM everywhere 10/10
Col. Jack O'Neill;-;Love this shooter, Really fun play!
Leimone;-;It is very fun
eNvy;-;I did enjoy the gameplay and story of the game, and i'd definetly play another sequel. It was worth the purchase.
BibleClinger;-;Arma 3 is a cross between a game and a military simulator. It is more complex than the usual big-name games like Call of Duty and Battlefield, making the learning curve potentially intimidating for beginners. In reality, however, if you can handle typical FPS games, you can figure out the basics of Arma 3 in about a week. The reward of sticking with it is immersion in massive, beautiful, outdoor environments (the smaller island of the two is about 20 km while the larger one is 270 km), tactical play, and epic encounters. There is something different about scrambling for cover as you're being shot at by an enemy patrol, and not knowing where it's coming from -- and then after you find out, having to use compass readings to share that knowledge with your teammates. It's also incredibly fun to take an AI squad under your command close to an enemy position, assigning targets to them individually, and then ordering them all to open fire at the same time on the unsuspecting soldiers. Notwithstanding all of this, quite possibly the best part of Arma 3 is its open nature. While you'll probably enjoy playing the stock Escape missions, you'll soon discover that there is a treasure trove of custom scenarios created by the community. This is one game that is worth the price just for the community creations alone.
ExoTic_LeGenD87;-;This is my favorite game ever it is really fun i rate it a 10/10
AHyperionSpy;-;It's overall not a bad game but for the price I wouldn't recommend it. Pros: * Beautifully detailed world spaces teeming with wildlife * Extremely large maps make for fun and challenging combat as well as virtual site seeing * A nice assortment of weapons and equipment to choose from Cons: * Poor help system and no tutorial for new players - One was later added but it was not super useful * Overly complicated and over numbered controls with a large portion of the keyboard being used as well as the mouse * Poor sound effects; especially for guns * For as detailed as the world and NPCs are, the guns seem to overall be lacking in both function and appearance * Although certainly more realistic than most FPS games, the fatigue system is a little troublesome considering how large the world is and how far you often need to travel from objective to objective without a vehicle. Even walking with an average amount of gear can almost completely stop your progress fairly fast forcing you to stop and rest Overall score from 0 to 10, 10 being the best: 5-6
[Thab] Butter Cup;-;over priced
<3 Smiley <3;-;I recommend playing Dayz first, as the community taught me all the tips and tricks about playing Arma or an Arma based mod. When I first picked up Arma 3, even after staring at the config screen, I was still confused and got stuck repeatedly. With Dayz it kinda progresses you from how to change from first person to third, shooting, then figuring out how far your target is away so you can compensate for it. Arma doesnt really teach you that right away, thats way I was lost. Also, the campaign in arma (what ive played of it) is pretty cool, aswell as the multiplayer, but its big hitter is definetly the mods. Battle Royal, Atlas Life, theyre all great and super fun, as well as the community. I definetly recommend you get this game as there are endless posibilities.
k00pa;-;The perfect war sandbox! Anything from small squad assaults to full war! Arma3 is one of the few modern games that provides good support for modifications. Also the regular updates to the game are really nice. If you want a little slower paced game than CoD, with more thinking. This is a good game for you.
firetruck boy;-;dis gaem reel bad optimizine but its k cuz i get los of fps so its sweglyf
Fab "Supa Hot Fire";-;One of the best games ive ever played! :) <3
Lil2live;-;This Game is not worth it, stay with arma 2,  arma 3
Jaek;-;Arma 3 is a great game, especcially game modes such as Altis Life. Altis life is a gamemode where you can play as a civilian or rebel, and do things like produce cocaine and do high speed persuits away from the police. A good server I play on is end days. 217.23.7.117:2302 This is a great server with lots of good role play, enjoy it!
Mooseknuckel;-;Call of duty is better than this
Nelag;-;This is the most realistic war game in existence at the moment. DO NOT buy this game if you enjoy Call of Duty or other similar shooting galleries. This game is hardcore with its precise controls, realistic damage model, and complicated battles. The singleplayer campaign is something to be marveled. It blends realistic war with an intriguing story. This game is for those who want more from the everyday shooter. You must be dedicated if you want to play this game. I will easily reccomend this game but only if you know what you are getting into.
Chewbanter;-;Although there are many faults to the game, which are in the current process of being fixed, the game as it stands gives my friends and I endless capabilties through the use of the online community.
Rauk;-;Bohemias third Arma! More polished and a lot of things improved from the previous Arma 2! + Sandbox + A lot of Weapons, vehicles and modifications + Big and Massive maps + Loads of hours to spend + Good community + A lot of good and fun player created content If you haven't played an "Arma" game before and looking for a more realistic/strategic military war game, buy it! Totally worth it!
All7Dwarves;-;If you can get into a god server and have friends that will play with you Arma III is worth the buy!
DisGaT FlatRook;-;Great sandbox milsim. This game is not COD or BF4, it is a sim. If you take the time to learn all the controlls you will be rewarded with great gameplay.
p1nkles;-;Very nice game :D
ADF-Dennis;-;Great Game!!!
Catalyst;-;This game is awesomeballs. It's so pretty and the guns work well too. On top of that, the landscapes are huge and pretty. The vehicles are probably its only issue since they sometimes feel like jelly.
Prowill;-;The game is great and can be played for hours without a break, the action is smooth and unforgiving one mistake can lead to half your team being slaughtered in a matter of seconds and a swarm of enemy combatants suppressing your position. The epic landscapes that the series is know for is best represented in Arma 3 with Altis and Stratis, two mediterranean paradises that have become the setting for a full scale conflict. My only qualms with the game is the lack of playable content thus far. Though the game features three conventional factions and a guerilla faction, only two of the factions have full ground capibilities (NATO and CSAT) leaving the other two at a disadvantage. Compared with Arma 2 combined operations it holds up pretty well. Another problem that doesnt bother a lot of players but bothers me personally is the lack of a full campaign. The only Issues that came to mind for me have been noted by bohemia and they are adding the campaign and more content for FREE. I would totally recommend this game if you have any interest in strategic shooters, if you liked rainbow six, battlefield, or even the less popular reboot of operation flashpoint youll find a warm home in the Arma 3 community.
Olives;-;This game is great but if your looking for a shooter its not its a military simulator. And its just bad @$$
ODIN;-;This game is amazing, even though it has some rather big optimization issues. I can deffinitely recommend it for something like the Wasteland gamemode!
Halcyon;-;top
Spinosaurus;-;Very fun :D I like it more than arma 2 mostly because there is swimming underwater :3
ColossusKing;-;This is a great military simulator. The community is a great one, and talented therefore giving you great mods to enhance the game.
Urinal Cake Launcher;-;Its pretty intense on the right moments. If you want intense firefights you should play domination.l But if you like to play strategic. You should also play that lol. Wasteland on the other hand. Is boring as . Lots of vehicles planes and helis. You can bomb  and there LOTS of weapons. 8.2/10 Best war simulator of the year -PC Gamer
Bjornen01;-;This is a funny game but its small bugs in it :( But i recommend this game if you like war simulation games.
der Regler;-;One of the best game ever <3 !
CrazZz;-;the best war simulation game ever
Ares;-;Everybody should buy it! You can do almost everything in this game and its really cool as an army simulator...
Kybz.;-;Best shooter game.
Sgt Thomason (USMC);-;Arma has gone a long way. The game is great, but it could still use some more realism. Still too many glitches and the game still doesn't have that feel to it. I do love the game, but still could use some improvements from it. Can't wait to see some more realalistic action packed the game has to offer. Maybe Arma 4 if it happens will bring even more of that and get rid of the robot voices and the big majority of the glitching AI and glitches in general. More planes offered by many countries. The F/A-18, F/A-22, F/A-35, Eurofighter, you name it. Bring in more planes. The game has the vehicles and the tanks but not the planes.
Cpt. Amare;-;One of the most beautiful games I've EVER played, and one of the most challenging. Arma III is an essential game for any would-be FPS player as it exclusively immerses the player and requires co ordination and immense teamwork. I recommend it simply because it is a beautiful game.
Ty0530;-;I love this game and if you want the intenceness of a real battle but dont want to die , heres your solution
JamCake;-;Really fun! Super tactical! Awesome when planning pays off :)
Raptor;-;This game will lagg if you dont have a good graphics card or have a good hard drive so watch out and have FUN!!!
DeoValente9[KRYBIETJIE];-;TOO LONG BROTHERS, HAVE WE SUFFERED MEDIOCRITY- and have come to lower our standards.. TOO MUCH HAVE WE BECOME COMPLACENT- and we have seen AAA games ignore what might have been.. SEEN THEM BECOME RECOATED YEAR AFTER YEAR, taking a franchise and driving it too the ground. WELL NO MORE, Here we have ArmA3, a game that stands against the tide and wants to do more, be more, give more. Here is a game where you cannot simply walk into mordor or compare it to any other notable shooter. Mission editors, powerful moddable platform, amazing graphics, as close to realism you can get with regards to weapon and vehicle dynamics, incredible maps and attention to detail. To name but a few elements that make ARMA3 great. My absolute highest praise for ArmA 3, for being what they set out to be, and not seeying the players as ATM's. TLDR: You are whats wrong with the world.
danielrockstreet;-;LOVE IT
Gluten Freeman;-;If you like this game than get it
TheMoondog107;-;Better than Battlefield.
CareFreeNinja;-;This is an excellent military simulation game that the military bases their own simulator off of. This game is hands down the best FPS I have played.
brianbowers2;-;its the bomb.com
Corrodan;-;It calls itself a realistic simulator game and it is. -Great Graphics -Good Campaign missions (scenarios or showcases) -Full sandbox mode -Multiplayer -Wonds affect the player One bad thing is you will never stop looking at the control menu for the first few hours until you figure out what keys you will be using.
Purple Face;-;I can't play Arma 3. It's the Arma 3 free weekend and It's telling me to Purchase the game. Can someone please help me?
EggDabes;-;BUY IT fOR GODS SAKE
satnaM;-;I want this . NO . I NEED THIS .
Fuzzyfox20 - TurtleSquad;-;It was feckin' amazing. I recommend it to everyone but the only downside is you need a good ammount of cpu's otherwise you will struggle to get even 10 fps
Briskit;-;Seems like a good game only did the training part but seemed good
BenPlaysGames;-;I love this game! But they should make a free version! OR MAKE A WEEKEND WHEN U GET THE GAME FOR FREE FOR EVER! cuz 66$ is a lot of money! Awesome game though... played it for two days
MrGhost154;-;loves how it does things in real life but in a game
Deathadder;-;was great but cost to much
8itches8trippin;-;Says its running till the 27th, my free weekend no longer works on the 26th bit upset about it.
hergh;-;mean as
CronalLogical;-;I LOVE THIS GAME!
trieu;-;If your into a militarty realism/simulator, and have a passion for the balisitcs system, play this ing game please. You will love it!
GrizzlyBear55;-;Great game!
Ernicio;-;Don't buy this if you plan to play with friends. Couldn't join public servers that my friends joined, and they couldn't join public servers that I joined. Sad.
kryptik;-;game is a joke, can't believe anyone is willing to spend 60$ on this  of a game, cluncky,laggy, lots of dsync and the list goes on,
Fader Hansson.;-;Well its a pretty expensive game, but if youre looking for a fun multiplayer experience with realistic gun damage and accuracy along with tactics this is the game for you!
[TGP] Burnsy;-;get this
Chany;-;This game is awesome!!!
=DRK= amg433;-;Don't let the screenshots fool you. You have to have an amazing computer in order to play like that. For most people, trying to play the game on the higher settings will result in more lag than game. Unfortunately on the lower settings the game looks 7 years old. Graphics aside the gameplay is excellent and realistic like it should be. The episodic campaign is the biggest downside. It shows quite a bit of laziness on Bohemia Interactive's part. It's been almost 6 months since the full release and we still don't have the end of the campaign, Also, the campaign isn't very good, but multiplayer makes up for it. I personally love Wasteland and Altis Life. I would recommend purchasing this game primarily for its multiplayer.
Maximus;-;Everything is amazing except the game needs more gunzzzzzzzzzzzzz like in arma 2
MonkeyFaceJr.;-;this game wont let me play and just now when i tried playing it says i dont have it.... STEAM REALLY!!!!!!
By-Tor and the Snowdog!;-;hosnetly not that fun. The controls are very clunky and the interface is unintuitive.
Kramernickj;-;Its fun but there is a problem with bad FPS unless you have a super computer
Irsh;-;it has wierd controls but nice graphics
sierrafoxtrot30;-;progress is very very slow so its kind of boring but still a pretty good game i guess
Set;-;i buy all arma and i not got money to buy this arma ||| if you want steam you can send me the game for free please i love this game and i really want it From, Hellokitty Mean:Spring Mean:=Set=
Azorek;-;Low fps (very bad optimization), bad graphics and boring gameplay. The game feels like if it was made in year 2000 by few bad programmers in their basement. Definitely not worth a penny.
Sir Pug;-;Its amazing, you can add things to the game, better graphics, better driving and better hit shooting
Soviet Bear;-;So much to do. Just tons of fun to be had.
MC_FC;-;gun &car&my frined ilove arma 3
Skior The Paladin;-;DON'T READ THIS. YOU WILL BE KISSED ON THE NEAREST POSSIBLE FRIDAY BY THE LOVE OF YOUR LIFE.TOMORROW WILL BE THE BEST DAY OF YOUR LIFE. NOW YOU'VE STARTED READING THIS. DON'T STOP. THIS IS SO FREAKY.1. say your name ten times.2. say your mom's name five times.3. say your crushes three times.4. paste this to four other games.If you do this, your crush will kiss you on the nearest Friday.But if you read this and do not paste this, then you will have very bad luck.SEND THIS TO 4 GAMES IN 143 MINUTES. WHEN YOU'RE DONE PRESS F6 AND YOUR CRUSH'S NAME WILL APPEAR IN BIG LETTERS ON THE SCREEN. THIS IS SO FREAKY BECAUSE IT ACTUALLY WORKS LOL
KainKiller1993 [NL] Uber Te@m;-;Why is it Night Time?
A-10;-;Absolute fantastic game. Very good simulation and good physics. Big open maps for dramatic scenery.
AgentFluffy99;-;This game is AWESOME if you like simulation. This is a tactical army simulator. It has really fun multiplay and a editor where you can create missions, and co-op missions. You can also post your map creation on steam. It does not have many mods on the workshop but I dont think it need alot of mods for a cool game like this. I totally recommend this for anyone that like shooting games. But of course I got my copy on sale for $38.99, or around there but thats the Digital one, I think its called something like that. I like this game so much I'm thinking about doing a series on this game. Thank you for anyone for taking the time to read this. :)
ARPAWN;-;CAN YOU GUYS HELP ME? I can't get on <ARMA 3> i bot it and i can not it on the game it cost me $59.99. so can you guys help me ?
tonymcg237;-;Absalutly brilliant il give it ***** stars hope i get the full game soon i would sugest more classes it is fun with them but mabe something like a spy with a knife amd suppresd pistol (any just if it can have a suppresor ) and maby a juggernaught with duble health and a lmg brilliant if u can get this on the fulll game
n3uTr4!;-;This game is just wonderful, it is beautifully done, very good and magnificent. It is a bit hard to play, but not as hard as Arma 2. So I recommend this game for everybody and seriously, you should rather buy Arma 3 than Arma 2. :D
Xandillion;-;90/89 I only got this for the Dew and Doritios package.
Elite;-;Not that much my style of game, i like Altis Life. 7/10
<#SoloQ.io>;-;Love it. So much fun.
Friendzy;-;this game is 10/10
Angel of Sorrows;-;great game but if u have a bad computer without good specs DO NOT GET i can almost smoothly run editor and play that on lowest setting
Versace The Fridge;-;A great game. addictiing sometimes as well
J_F;-;Great
mr lonely;-;somebody ran me over with a quad and broke my leg and I had to crawl 2km to a town..
redwards90;-;I have been a fan of tactical shooters for as long as I can remember, my first one being the original Rainbow six and all of its additions. Hidden and Dangerous, Ghost Recon, And the game that spawned this one Operation Flashpoint. As buggy and screwed up as that game was I was still able to eveintually play it. Not the case with this game. There is no excuse for the graphical bugs and gameplay issues present in this game. There has been ample time for this game to be optimized and yet it is still a mess. I am able to play every graphic intensive game out there on my system yet this one is barely playable. It seems some people have been able to get it to work but no luck here. This is unfortunate as it looks like I would love this type of gameplay based on my history however looks like I'll never find out since I can't even get it to run properly.
VulcanKnightWolf;-;Very versatile. Mods and a great campaign make this one of the best PC actions games out now.
kelele;-;awsome game buy it now and play some wasteland and life i realy recomend this game its very big maps and realistic
tintti12345678;-;JU NIID TIS
rawr #TinyArms;-;Pro: The game is realistic Con: It is expensive and it may lag for players.
gnike2141;-;DON NOT BUY THIS GAME UNLESS!!!!! You want to vanish into your computer for hours on end ignoring you wife, friends, and family....... The standalone game is amazing alone and then you have the MODS.... Altis Life is the most fun you can have in RP. You can be anything, cop, criminal, fisherman, dope dealer, anything! They keep making it better and better.
al3moodi;-;good game but it needs pationt and to play with your friends .. if you like arma 2 , you'll like this one
RageAsNeeded;-;Oh yes. This game is everything right with Military Simulators. Realistism at it's best, (Minus some of the ARMA physics). Get it.
RTK | Kav the Psycho;-;It's Arma....... Although Arma 2 is still better in my opinion. 10/10
T A Z I O N;-;A+++ 10 of 10 amazing game
Reddogsapper;-;Arma 3 is very relistic. Deff not a run and gun type of game. But best feature of all is Breaking point zombie mod. The mod works great
{E.B.C} soul;-;Its a great game for the player who likes realism, multiplayer, and sandbox games in one deal. by far the best military game i've played. 10/10
CaptainRDF ^TunnelSnake;-;I have to say that this is probably my favorite game of all time. I'm able to spend countless hours in Arma III and still have a great time doing so. There are gamemodes that everyone will enjoy and support for modding is pretty good as well. I would rate this game a 9/10 for its awesome action packed gameplay. While on mission there is hardly ever a time when I'm not on edge being aware that the enemy may be anywhere. Whether you want to play Arma III as tatically as possible in a video game, you can. If you want to just play casually and shoot some bad guys cause it's fun.... Go right ahead you can do that too. I overall just love the game and play it mostly multiplayer because although the campaign is great multiplayer is where it's really at!
Odessie;-;its such a great game! just omfg GET IT NOW GET IT NOW GETTTT IT!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Lynx;-;ITS KOOLZ (Did U see what i did there i said cool with a k and z)
Zuba-;-;Great game
Dong;-;YES! Everyday I play this I just  to the graphics!
Mazzle Dazzle;-;This game is brilliant but has decent system requirements. I cannot play the game on high settings however I can still enjoy it regardless. If you are the kind of person that wants to have the capacity to create an infinite variety of scenarios for yourself as I am, this is a great game to play. The game is difficult and brutal, you can freely make your characters look like a civilian or a hardcore military operative. You have a staggering amount of freedom in this game and lots of strategic options involving vehicles including ATVs, helicopters, tanks, and even UAVs. The maps are extremely large and the game does not fail to deliver on any point.
schmaltzhector;-;One of the best games I have ever played. The realism is outstanding.
upbeatz108;-;fun and has a good comunity backing it
KuTThoat5150;-;Killed a goat, best game ever
mst;-;it took forever to download and was a complete waste of seven hours of my life
mst;-;it took forever to download and was a complete waste of seven hours of my life
Bigkev Actual;-;The best war sim out there.
Wonders;-;This game is very tactical and makes you think strategically, the community is great and the game has almost anything you could want in a military simulator, from community made content to extremely detailed maps and weapons. 9/10
dabigfattuba;-;i loved flashpoint dragon rising and red river and i love this too. XD
Duckman73;-;Drove 10 minutes to get to the objective, i hit a tree and my ATV broke. Had to run for 20 minutes to the obj. and got immediatly shot. 10/10
MaChOMaN^;-;The best military SIM Ever
WOLF-KINDLY;-;This PC Game is a must have for All High/medium end PC owners! ThIs game is what i consider, next gen gaming!
SGT RP Command;-;An awesome game with a great community, worth the money and more.
xXFoEBoEXx;-;I need a better GPU!!!!
HawkEyeFrank;-;Simple.I loved it gj.Putting money on this game.
William;-;Bought it for 30 nigs, good deal, great game.
MaDLuck7;-;very realistic game
Faustus Titius Garilianus;-;AI bugged out and wouldn't let me carry on with the campaign. 0/10 would play.
Kraemer311;-;easily the worst game I've ever played. TLDR: Waste of money.
WWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWWW;-;For the small amount of time that I have played this game I have found it to be extremely boring and monotonous. You might think that it would be fun with zombies or karts or other stuff but no, its not. If you want to play a moddable game might as well play Garry's mod, which is much much cheaper. The game is full of bugs and the controls are all backwards. Half the time I find myself looking at settings when I'm actually trying to open a door. Overall this game sucks and I reccomend that everyone steer clear from it. I also forgot to mention that it is poorly optimised. 9/10 If you want realistic 0/10 If you want fun
wall rust;-;any amount of  up :>
BadBlueWolf;-;Don't get me wrong, this game plays fine and is really, REALLY pretty so if you are after good graphics then this is your game. It just didn't appeal to me because at the end of the day it is really boring. This is coming from a guy who has played previous ARMA's and Operation Flashpoint games and this one is by far the worst. Pick up ARMA 2 instead and install a graphics mod. It's cheaper and is more fun overall. Just my opinion btw so you may totally disagree if you have the game.
Barkittinz;-;A youtube adventure with multiple choices that are about a bunch of toy army men and indians would be a better military simulator than this, this is very incomplete, full of bugs and hackers, tons of servers who have admins that don't do anything but ban people at the snap of a finger. I would of rather pre-ordered sims 4 honestly, and I don't even like sims. Biggest waste of 60$ i've ever seen, Cannot BELIEVE More than even a thousand people bought this crap. It's just a re-skinned arma 2 with way less content. All hating aside now, It does have good graphics. But bad physics. So you're literally paying for graphics.
That Waffle;-;It runs realllyyyy bad on my gtx 760 . i would not recommend this game untill they get rid of some of the bugs EDIT- Get Battle Royale !!!!!!!! its amazing
Ferrariic;-;You will die from anything. Cars have no physics. They make no sense. Best sandbox game of 2013. 8/10
G4L|TTwerty;-;such graphics much shoot very sand woof
Unknownn;-;SEXIEST GAME ALIVE! <3<3<3<3
3.14;-;Very good if you have the comr to run it.
Bloopey;-;I really don't like this game. I wouldn't recommend it to anyone with a successful life.
.Benny;-;great game, lots of fun with all the different game types! 8/10 would recommend
PixelPiledriver;-;Confusing -------------------------- CHOOSE YOUR RULE SET! What? 3, 2, 1, GO! What? Weird controls -------------------------- vaulting, changing weapons, everything else, no jumping or climbing. Strange HUD -------------------------- sub missions pop up on screen. Look at map. Nothing relates the two together. Non-Intuituve -------------------------- dragging and dropping items, using vehicles, flying helicopters, reloading, crouching, etc all feels weird. Empty -------------------------- even on a full 64 player, seeing anyone was rare. You can only find weapons in vehicles, Boring -------------------------- Combat feels stiff No indication of bullets hitting Sounds aren't great Lots of lumpy hills and trees with no unique features that tell me where I am on the map. Joined a co-op mission that consisted of riding on a boat for 20 mins to reach the start of the mission. $60 -------------------------- I could have bought any other game on steam, or 6 other cheap games. Other -------------------------- I will probably put some more time into this game and try the player made missions. But as of right now I don't like this game very much. :[
liorbenda90;-;Amazing army game, I really like the designs, the weapons, and the missions, It's a great game to play with friends, Altis life, Domination, and more !
ImportedHam;-;I really hate this game, because minecraft is better.
The Caffeinated Crusader;-;Arma 3 is very much an improvement on the previous games and I enjoy the smoother combat and animations than Arma 2s clunky movement but the optimization issues and bugs still remain although not as heavy as Arma 2s. It can be a pain to get into games on public servers where everyone just acts like its your typical arcade shooter or the other side where everyone is being a pain by trying to keep it ultra serious and kicking everyone who doesn't say tango down or whatever every two seconds which is why I recommend finding a good group of people like Shack Tactical to play with. But hey you could just ignore it all and play wasteland or arma life servers and never play anything else which is the great thing about gaming. Anyway hopefully this paints an alright picture in your mind about the game good luck and happy hunting!
foamchild;-;game. It takes a whole mag to kill someone and it takes on bullet to the knee for you to get instantly killed. And evey Altis life server is .
mark;-;Concept and everything else about the game is pretty awesome. Only downside is getting 5-15 fps no matter what your setup is. If you don't mind playing a game with 5-15 fps then GO FOR IT. Otherwise it's definately not worth the 60 dollars, more like 20-30
TeironCZ;-;For me is this the most realistic game ever! Campain is less boring than in Flashpoint and previous Arma series. For me is main Editor. You can create what you want. You can make funny scenes etc. This game is really originally and one of few games what are good for buy. Authors are looking after this game -> thats next reason. THIS IS NOT WASTED MANY !
Sed Excel;-;it is realy fun i recommend buying it there are mods like wasteland and altis life those are really fun
Chti'r;-;This is the most amzing strategy fps war simulation game ever , and i have been playing who knows tones of those type , but here the amazing Team Bohemia interactive just show again a huge quality and talent behind ARMA 3 and its DLC ! If you like editing this is even better you will never be bored, the game is endless and offers you a way to create your own campagn or mission or just simply what you want to be challenged of on a warfield ^^ Arma 3 is so far to me the best War game simulation :) looking forward to play again ! Stop reading now and go get it ...
ShortcutToHell;-;One of the most realistic games I ever played, and I played...
THE OUTKAST'S INITIATIVE;-;DOWNRIGHT THE BEST MILITARY SIMULATION GAME EVER.....ITS A MUST PLAY GAME highly recommend
Ulfgaar;-;Get your Arma fix today!
Dr. Nigga Man road to 2k mmr;-;Solid 5 minutes of fun.
Conk Bronc;-;Awesome game with many mods, buy this if you like the strategic and tactical side of warfare...
MaxTenzion;-;Very good game I love it 9/10!
TheFearlessPug;-;A better version of Arma 2, but needs more content for its price point. If you are gonna buy this just to play single player, wait, but if you wanna fun game you can spend hours blowing your friends up in, this is the game for you. So in a sense, 12/3
Roeney;-;Best military sim!
filipkrivacek11;-;Very nice game for rage :D
Bruhrito;-;the only game i will ever recommend
McComish;-;Easily the best game ive ever played :D
Dan;-;really amazing game that is really hard because everyone has fully automatic grenade launchers with 10x thermal scopes making it impossible to spot people easily gosh 10/10
Zuut;-;Absolutltely NO , big No, do not buy this game. This game is super worked, is for geeks that like details to te point that is no fun. To many keys, to hard to figure stuff and when you figure it you need to many keys to make it happen. I buy it, if i could have the chance again to not bui it i would not buy this game. Grafics = awsome, hard worked, like i said a game for perfectionists, but a common folk will HAVE NO FUN. NOT RECOMENDED
PROPHET79;-;I really tried to give this game the benefit of the doubt , and as you can tell i did buy it '' but majority of you would like to know , is this game worth it '' Well to answer that question , first you must know that this is a Military Simulation type game , and second is about team work and comunication , just like in real life combat situations.I have to give my Kudos to developers at bohemia studios , for embarking into a such ambitious sandbox open world combat game , however the amount of bugs that represents , from graphical bugs , frame studders , and don't even get me started with Online Multiplayers , the servers are so laggy , that is simply unplayable .I understand that guys at Bohemia Studios are working hard to fix all these issues , but at the moment , this game is only 50% finished , there is still a lot of work to do in order for this game to run smooth .I hope this gives you at least an idea , on what you gonna expect when you buy this game , and 59.99 is a bit too much to swallow for a game with so many bugs issues , Relax ..BF4 is on that list too , so far the TITANFALL has the smoothest experience on PC I have high hopes and will support "Bohemia Interactive " Studios , cause i like their ideas and they are not afraid to take the risks . So is this game for you? Well that will depends on what sort of player you are ? if you are someone like me , who adores and loves simulations , then yes go ahead get the game , but be prepared for bugs for time being , I think down the road '' they will improve the experience but we as community need to help them by reporting bugs and giving them support . I hope this opinion of mine , made you realize my take on this game .
AdoptableBark;-;IM GETTING SOMETHING CALLED ERROR CODE 80 WHEN I TRY TO LAUNCH ARMA 3 I PAID A LOT OF MONEY FOR THIS GAME AND NOTHING.
Tallibanhammer;-;Note: You can't run this game on a Potato. You're gonna want 40 fps to play comfortably I shouldn't have bought this game for another year.
lw24;-;Bath was a spa town
Wallace!;-;an Aquired taste. I have this aquired taste.
Based Frog;-;Arma 3 is one of the best open world games i have ever played. It has a wide variety of gamemodes and mods for everyone. unlike Arma 2 its graphics have hade a massive step up and the first person is a whole lot smoother not like arma 2 choppy first person.
Symmenix;-;I love this game. There is so much you can do with it considering how flexible the simulation is. Bullet physics are realistic and it is really satisfying when you get that kill. I highly reccomend it if you have friends to play with or are looking for a large amount of teamwork, because this game is great for that. Now I just need someone to play with..
buntchman;-;theres no multiplayer and the control scheme is confusing, and the campaign is super ing hard, but it looks good though
Skelybones | twitch/Imodzcinema;-;I have had this game since Alpha and i have now loged over 300 hours in it. The amount of Things there is to do inside of this game is unreal. There are loads of server hosting diffrent mission. The arma comunity is very good bring out mods that make the game alot better and adding in some cool stuff. The campaign in this game is one of the best ones i have played in years. How it is planed and and playes out is amazing, The start of the campaign you walk to a helicopter and then it flys you around telling you what you are doing. Then you have a little bit between mission where you can walk around and get given mission. when you are walking around you can listen to what the other soliders think about what is happing. Some of there Server that are out there are: 1. Altis Life (RolePlaying) 2. Domination (PvE with Missions and side Missions) 3. Invade & Annex (PvE with Missions and Side Missions) 4. King of The Hill (TvT 3-Teams) 5. Blitzkrieg (TvT Caputer and Hold) 5. Wasteland (Survival PvP) 6. Coop Player made mission 7. Some ofther fun game modes. Some of the cool thing to do in Arma 3: 1. Play around in the editor and make missions and use diffrent scripts 2. Use diffrent Mods Like the DayZ breakingpoint and F18 3. Play The Campaign. 4. Play the little mission Made by the comunity. 5. Fly around the massive map and see what there They are all the good points about the game and there is some bad ones but they are not that bad, There is some anoying little bugs and a little bit of a lack of content but somtimes it can matter on what server you are playing. The game is new and missions are still getting made so some of them are alittle bit buggy but noting that would really effect yoru gameplay that much.
BloodFartOnYourChest;-;you dont have the skill or the patience for this game - ing shame
example-John;-;300 game crashes per second when trying to join every server.
Joe Biden;-;One of the Best games I have ever played. The amount of simulation Aspects in it are incredible. And the Steam Workshop is like a never-ending DLC jackpot. 10/10
A;-;very good, only problem is the server lag on mp 5/5 (Editor, Solo etc..) 1.5/5 (Multiplayer) 5/5 if it had no lag
MIKEHATESYOU;-;The editor is powerful and impressive. I made a scenario where we played as Blackwater and wasted a bunch of civillians while speeding through the streets. 10/10 would commit war crimes again
Donetsk;-;Arma 3 a good improvement more so than the previous ones, but the game still suffers from minor faults. Arma so far is on top of my favorites list.
Zain;-;One of the best games i have played to date, AltisLife.co.uk with this game is perfect
[TOOL] Col. Klutz;-;If you have ever played any of the Arma series, this is by far the best one yet, has a decently good campaign, with a decent storyline, and multiplayer is pretty sweet, even though most multiplayer servers are custom missions, I have yet to find a server that runs stock Arma 3 multiplayer, but even the custom missions are pretty cool. Would definitely recommend this game to anyone, especially with Epoch coming out for it soon. So those of you that play DayZ: Epoch, don't waste time, get this, play it, enjoy it, then enjoy it even more when Arma 3: Epoch is released.
Putins Left Nut;-;Addictive game, good game in the sequencial series and a good representation of the entire genre, 8/10 Love it so far, reason why its 8/10 is because i constantly get a BEX crash 9/10 times i try and join the server.
ibluestone;-;Runs sooo bad! 24 hours and deleted...:(
Jeff Fungus;-;GET IT
Pirate Panda;-;Hey i was randomly global banned :( can anyone help???
JukeboxGaming_;-;ARMA 3 is awsome !!! lags a bit. the best part is playing Altis life :D
jahritchie;-;not a game that i would enjoy. just get frustrated. no reward for playing not fullfilling. in my trash games folder
Benvolio;-;An absolute great military sim! The commmunity mods are wondeful and the game's editor/campaign is bugless and very enjoyable. Overall, this game's new mechanics and engine make it a must buy for an avid military gamer!
EmoMasstha;-;well what can i say, massive mp game, this is what u are looking for, alot of action,cars,tank,helis, all that u need
Matchu;-;No because it has been taken away from me and now I cant play it anymore thanks alot.
Puggetty;-;Best Game I have ever played with my mates. Ok, ok. It is buggy and glitchy as hell but to be honest thats arma. I would recomend this game to anyone who wants to have a good laugh with some friends. If you are alone most of the community is friendly enough to chat to but if you have a social anxiety disorder and don't like other people it's good fun to  about in the editor. (E.G: Place lots of jets and watch them hit each other.)
Ddude;-;Dont buy this game in it's current state. Its worse than playing with a melted GI. Joe
rapha;-;its 2 freaking good!
Cheeky Nandos;-;This game is ing fantastic. Download the "BattleRoyale" mod. It's the most addicting thing you'll ever play
shooter;-;yes awesome
Babby Stomper;-;You have to be literally  to not give BIS all of your money.
Padawon DickSharK v2.0;-;Very very tactical game, and a lot of fun to play with friends. 9/10
Greed;-;I know this is still in development, however the game mechanics were not smooth enough to enjoy the gameplay.. 3/10
mitchell;-;very good game love it it is nice i play it all the time !!
Grim;-;This games interface is horrible it is not intuitive or natural by any means. Would have loved it if the interface was more like Battle Field 4. Also the game feels very choppy and I am not referring to frame rate. I guess you either love this or hate it do not think this is anything like any other shooter game. I am sure the game will appeal to fans of the previous releases but at this stage I feel like I wasted my money
Sharkey;-;Lol I like how there's people who have hundreds of hours in it and leave it a bad review. This game is probably one of the best purchases I've made, I can always come back to it and have fun. The ammount of possibilities in the game is endless and for the most part has a great player base. Your experience really depends on where/who you play with.. Arma3 can either be a Running simulator or a intense military simulator with moments you won't find in any other game. When you do happen to join an awesome server with coordinated people there is much fun to be had. Buy it, don't look back.
Dr Dumbass;-;I got global banned from both Arma 3 and DayZ SA because I piked up hacked money in an Altis life server. Complete
hobohosie;-;Great game, epic battles, beast graphics and amazing gamemodes on multiplayer
AttiA;-;Realy good
defakos;-;Sucks big time!!! I have a i5 @ 3.0Ghz, 250Gb ssd, R7 260 ati with 2Gb, 4Gb ram, 600W power, Windows 7 home premium 32bit and the damn thing says that my adapter does not support Direct X 10... It took me 3 days to download from server. I have 50Mbps internet connection and when finaly it was complete, it didn't even start!!! Sucks big time!!!
Zebraboy;-;dont buy if u dont owna $500 to 600 gpu or it in sucks
Spice Diamond;-;The game is damn good. But it has worst optimization ever. I probably need 2 Titans to run arma on medium setings. Do not recoment for weak pc like mine. (970 phenom, 560gtx.)
hotbbqwing;-;This game has great potential, but is killed by engine issues in multiplayer.
Mudpuppy;-;Too many bugs. Can't finish the first campaign due to a bug. Multiplayer is boring, very slow paced.
M90;-;This game is tight.
Austinfowler;-;This game is freakin amazing mang. This and Dayz is the way to go.
Armin;-;kill all your team mates begin a war with in a war
XxH1DD3N_W0LFxX;-;epic game got a sever for any body
White Privilege;-;many graphics. much improve. wow.
Marc Intes;-;The most epic movie military survival simulation i have ever played. Wanna create your own action movie simulation where you decide what to do next? Then this is the game for you. I only play on wasteland servers coz i find it more challenging and yes the survival is there which made it more interesting. This game is fun playing with friends. You need to have a working mic, you can't go typing in chat while in a gunfight right? :) got low frames or performance issues? I have one solution for you, upgrade your system. I just did and it worked like a charm. Have a nice day.
T-800 Chicken Fish;-;Its is a good and amazing sim and you should all have the chance to play it you will love it.
beckasin;-;This is the best shooter simulator on Steam.
Lyssis;-;Nice game!
Lyssis;-;Nice game!
Novaboi Mk.2;-;this is the best milsim up to date
Special Eyes;-;arma to others but it is not a game for everyone and even inside the game there will be aspects of the game you like such as [Military reinactments] and dislike such as [ Battleroyal call of duty deathmatch] so everyone will want to play the game differently, but remember its game where no one has to tell you how to play it. Overall 7/10 The game has problems in its polish but when you look past it you get a gaming experience like no other. NOTE: This review has alot of spelling mistakes and missing subjects as I came up with this in 30 mins, future reviews will be written on proper writting software and also days in advance. I hope this review has helped you! NOTE2: 743 CHARACTERS TOO LONG!!!??? sorry I couldnt provide enough info but steam has a character limit so in the immortal words of awsome people I say "Test review, please ignore".
Lee;-;Great game, worth the money
Relentless NI;-;not the best shooter but if you like being picked of by snipers this is for you
UltraFish;-;Arma 2 was better for messing around, this is better for everything else 1/1
ScarTaln;-;campaign is veru frustrating but multiplayer makes up for it. if you have time and spare money, pick this game up. campaign is 5/10 multiplayer is 9/10
WhiskeyNarwhal;-;Buggy and not even worth the discounted price. I wish I could get a refund.
AHyperionSpy;-;It's overall not a bad game but for the price I wouldn't recommend it. Pros: * Beautifully detailed world spaces teeming with wildlife * Extremely large maps make for fun and challenging combat as well as virtual site seeing * A nice assortment of weapons and equipment to choose from Cons: * Poor help system and no tutorial for new players - One was later added but it was not super useful * Overly complicated and over numbered controls with a large portion of the keyboard being used as well as the mouse * Poor sound effects; especially for guns * For as detailed as the world and NPCs are, the guns seem to overall be lacking in both function and appearance * Although certainly more realistic than most FPS games, the fatigue system is a little troublesome considering how large the world is and how far you often need to travel from objective to objective without a vehicle. Even walking with an average amount of gear can almost completely stop your progress fairly fast forcing you to stop and rest Overall score from 0 to 10, 10 being the best: 5-6
[Thab] Butter Cup;-;over priced
<3 Smiley <3;-;I recommend playing Dayz first, as the community taught me all the tips and tricks about playing Arma or an Arma based mod. When I first picked up Arma 3, even after staring at the config screen, I was still confused and got stuck repeatedly. With Dayz it kinda progresses you from how to change from first person to third, shooting, then figuring out how far your target is away so you can compensate for it. Arma doesnt really teach you that right away, thats way I was lost. Also, the campaign in arma (what ive played of it) is pretty cool, aswell as the multiplayer, but its big hitter is definetly the mods. Battle Royal, Atlas Life, theyre all great and super fun, as well as the community. I definetly recommend you get this game as there are endless posibilities.
Green Giant;-;Great fun, some good mods
twitch.tv/Jude_M;-;ARMA 3 is a great game that you should buy if u like; Dayz, rust, Any of the ARMA franchise and other FPS!Wasteland is also great survival addition to this game
I am not Immortal;-;Even though I only get 15 FPS in a city/town and 30 FPS in the countryside on this game, I still think it is one of the best games I have played. It still has some work to be done to it but thats just what the series is like, a bit glitchy. Some of the good points are 290km map with no limits, its a sandbox so you can do whatever the hell you want and a quite good campaign (well, thats what I think). Some of the bad points are that it is quite boring for some people. It can run pretty well on PC's without having a very good Graphics card. (I have a AMD Radeon 7730m 2GB graphics card and a i7 Core in a laptop and i can run the game!) This is one of my favorite games from one of my favorite series and I am glad I brought it. 9/10 If you like sort-of realistic first person shooters, then I would recomend you get this game.
pls mercy [AUT];-;Its a nice Game.
muZ;-;Really great game i recommend many downloadable mods and playable servers for everyone to enjoy!
Admiral Hacket;-;Arma 3 i think incorparates some of the best shooting mechanics ive seen in military sim, how ever the mechanics overall can become quite clunky. You need a fairly beefy PC to make it look playable. it was gifted to me and i actually enjoy but i dont know if id invest to heavily into it. Its as close you want to get to combat and for that i give it a thumbs up.
llama;-;>shoots ifrit >rocket goes through ifrit and hits countryside 10/10, would play escape altis again
Kyle;-;I only have 4 favorited games in my library. This game is one of them.
Scrooge McDuck;-;Played Arma 3 for a half hour during free beta. Liked what I saw, definitely would buy.
Poolooskoo;-;It's like arma 2, but playable!
ezzyz;-;Yes many guns, much death. The struggle is real.
ezzyz;-;Yes many guns, much death. The struggle is real.
FreeBird2k;-;This game is reconmended, its fun and it will get better when dev keeps working on for the rest of their lives. Its a really cool game and I enjoyed it, its nuthing like battlefield series or americas army, But I wish I didnt paid $60 that really over priced and no poster, map, book, case, toys, cd, video cards, keyboard, mouse.. cuz its just electronic download :(. been 3 1/2 weeks since i purchased this and I will not spend $60 ever again, stuck with 1 game that I could gotten more games with $60. Now its on sale so I would have bought the digital deluxe edition for $39. Expect this game is covered in bugs, server DDOS, etc. Hopefully dev fix and add good stuff for the game. I expect this game gotta be much much better, bigger, than any game cuz I spent 60 Friggin dollars. I was told it will never drop the price down for long time. I have been lookin forward for deluxe edition but nope. I reconmended get the deluxe edition ASAP if you like combat or altis life RPG. Common get it!
Po;-;If you live simulator games like GTA and DayZ and stuff of that sort, you will love this game. I have clocked almost 1000 hours into it, and I don't regret it. Its got endless things to do with mods, Altis Life, Battle Royale, Breaking Point, and tons more. 10/10 BUY THIS GAME WORTH ANY AMOUNT OF MONEY.
Johnson [=TFB=];-;ive been playing arma 2 for about 6 years and this game killed the fun for me. great visual and weapon modifications. however its unplayable in this state and has be for some time.
Crazy Creevy;-;brilliant game.
TSM // FANBOY;-;very nice, very good, very fun, very cool
(64bc) HD-Moneyshot;-;best army game ever!!! nothin else to say :D
cannonballkid;-;Arma 3. Well what can I say about this piece of . For a normally 60 dollar game the graphic are unappealing to say the least. Alright, that's it! I'm done with this game! I'd rather press my face against a Hippopotamus' butt while it 'muck-spreads'! That's when a hippo takes a , rather than allowing the  to drop from it's , it presses it's tail against it's own -crack, waving it back and forth, shredding the  all over the place! That's how much fun this game is! Like putting a turd in a fan or a band-saw, you just don't do it! In other words dont buy it save ur money.
Risimo;-;I love this game!Is very real and the graphics are beautiful. The game is very good optimized because my video card has 64 Mb and I don`t have lag or problems.Thank you for this amazing game!I will play it unlimited!
Dedpul;-;It seems that nobody can get a solid 60fps in this game. Great game, but please optimize it.
urban;-;Fun Game Its best played with friends though however it does feel very realistic and it takes a bit to get used to if ur used to more close ranged FPS
Cerberus-Prolog;-;it's ayt, just need an enough beefy computer
BFG9000;-;Never played it, I guess it's good?
JalapenoKid;-;Was hiding in a house from the gunfire. Someone blew up the house with an RPG. I survived. I laughed. I cried. The Feels bro. Feels/10. Must Feel Again.
assasin.brotherin;-;So, this game runs fine, but seriously with the 80% off deal a week after I bought it? What's up with these stupid scams? Steam & these games need to schedule upcoming deals & offers. I've wasted 100$+ on scammed deals.
ItsBlakeFTW;-;This game is amazing with all the moving stuff raiting 10/10 no regrets
JavioSpaghettiO;-;I had a life. Then I downloaded Arma 3. Haven't seen the daylight for 3 months.
JoeZy * LGN;-;Graphically, this game is amazing.
_ Chicken _;-;I WANT THIS GAME
Carbon Tuna;-;Only get if your crazy about first-person and third-person simulators. But, bottomline this game has tons of guns, and as I say, "Still better than CoD!"
<[-=> Cookiez <=-]>;-;It would have been better if Call of Duty actually tried to simulate this game. PROS 1. Informational I think ARMA might be informational. Shows you how to read a map, though basic geography in school is approximately the same thing. CONS 1. Too semi-realistic While it might be interesting to learn about real combat, it is not fun. The gameplay is very similar to playing World War II first person shooters. I am unsure if they were trying to make a realistic shooter or an unfinished game. The crosshair still exists for some reason, which isn't realistic. The run speed is at a maximum of 18km/h (5m/s), which isn't realistic. In game fatigue is like an assumption of what real fatigue is like. Bots actually require 3 bullet hits to die, they bounce backwards each time they get hit. 2. Too clunky Movement keys are too clunky. Z for crouch, X for high knee. Just press once for crouching, two for high knee. 3. Weapons It's horribly backwards. As if the ARMA military was stuck in time.
justiN | Dinohops;-;Played wasteland and fell from a tiny ledge which resulted in killing me. Too hardcore for me.
[REkT] Xx_EstusScrub_xX;-;In the short ammount of time that I've played this, I must say that it is quite fun. Sometimes that map feel too large for the small ammount of people on it, but after a bit of wandering I always found something interesting to do.
I Love Centrelink;-;Trust my luck. Bought this game yesterday for over $80..... and today it's less than $40. Why have you betrayed me GabeN?! .................. On the plus side. The game has been fun so far. 10/10 would buy for full price again.
Karma Arma;-;its Wow.
Argyll;-;The game really tries to re-creat combat experience at a platoon level. The interaction with team member is good. However, there are some problems with the game. Enemies usually takes 4 shots to take down. There does not seem to be a difference between a head shot and a shot on the hand. All the enemy ever does when shot is twisting a little. It's rather boring to pull a head shot and still have to land another 3 bullets on the enemy. The shots do not penatrate grass or leaves very well. There is an obvious bug where your aim is snapped to the nearest object when close behind that object. For example, when you stand behind a tree, your aim will be snapped to the trunk. The zoom with the scope is very fake. You look into the scope, yet you see everything in the peripheral also zoomed. So on and so forth. The game needs more work.
ahanmalli;-;The PC Exclusive Title "Arma 3" is a perfect example of a gaming masterpiece. Set in the later 2030s in the fictional island nations of Altis and Stratis. Arma 3 boasts a map a little smaller than twice the size of Washington, D.C.. Arma 3 also has an extraordinarily large and challenging campaign, which I am still struggling to complete. Also, the game is known to be extremely graphically demanding, but I can still run it on my Macbook Pro 13" on low settings on 60fps. Also, Arma 3 boasts a variety of wonderful fictional vehicles ranging from civillian vehicles to army transport. One of the best traits about Arma 3 is the fact that is has so many free mods supported on it, the most popular being Arma 3 Life (Real-Life Roleplaying Mod). The only con for Arma 3 is the demanding price, as a game that costs $60 is pretty expensive. Otherwise, I highly recommend Arma 3 due to it's great contribution to PC Gaming.
Jet-Games;-;Great game keeps me amused for hours. However slightly buggy here and there, but overall a great game!
Eagle;-;This game is the best Action game I have ever played. It is realistic but no to close range combat like COD. Its also VERY intence. It gets your heart pumping. In my opinion BEST GAME EVER!
KMG623;-;If you were the smart shopper that decided to read reviews before by this game, congratulations. You already outsmarted me. I bought this game because I had imagined something relatively like Battlefield or Call of Duty but on a much larger and more realistic scale. Well instead, I got an overly realistic, laggy, impossible campaign game that breaks if you try to play 1 mod. Personally, I would not recommend this game to anyone. I found absolutely no enjoyment in this game. I've played with some friends on a Wasteland server and it was fun until it became Minecraft faction servers in which case you build a base and wait for it to get raided while spending days trying to find someone else's base just to return and find that an x-ray modder has already taken it out. If I was given the opportunity to get a refund for this game, I would in a heart beat. The campaign is impossible even on the easiest difficulty because 1: The guiding voice (example: World at War sniper mission with Reznov when he tells you to wait for the bombers) gives you the most basic and obscure directions and expects you to figure it out (i.e. the mortar team in the forest. finding the mine detector.), 2: The hostile AI will drop you in less than 3 shots and you'll never know where they came from and just keep respawning at a check point and trying to find a way to get past them without dying, 3: You're friendly AI can and will die in combat and the medic rarely heals anyone or tries to revive anyone. Multiplayer wasn't as bad as long as you were among friends. A friend and I would play Zeus (a gamemode in which one player is able to do anything while the other players just play and wait for the Zeus player to do something) and mess around with vehicles. The vehicles were probably the only thing about the game that I didn't hate except for the artillery. There are no instructions or help tips or anything to help you fire the artillery vehicles. There is no hit indicator as to whether the shell even made contact with the ground or hit four miles to the right of the target. The aircraft are another thing I hated mostly because the were nearly impossible to fly. If you tried landing a jet or a helicopter, you were better of grabbing a parachute and hoping for the best because more than likely the aircraft was just going to explode on contact with the ground even going less the a half of a mile per hour. So overall, I would rate this game 2/10 just because not all of the vehicles and gamemodes sucked.
hesh838;-;killing people in real life almost seems mundane when you compare it to killing people whilst playing arma 3
Hashbrown Kushter;-;Gotta pay the cost to be the boss
Private Tubbs;-;This should be titled running simulator. The combat is shallow and is not good. The vehicle combat is terrible compared to battlefield. And onece again u run and run and run not to mention all the bugs and glitches u encounter. dont buy this
inhumaiN - CSGOFAST.COM;-;Great game, would reccomend for anybody. Just read the requirements or you might be a game you cant run -_-.
like_the_death;-;A realistc Game with a few bugs, but aweson to play in a team of tactical players!
kian_mz;-;but how do u wite list
SlowWalrus;-;car physics, fatigue is pretty dumb. good looking , Runs
Skamatik;-;Very good army simualtor favorive in fact
HollendHund;-;1-10 fps on medium settings, waste of money and time.  DLC pratices include sniper bipods and helichopter gunner slots.
(C4)Romme434;-;well had game for a bit, not worth the $$ id say dont buy this game, this game feels like it was made for the year 2005. games choppy its not a smooth shoooter, mapes are boring looks like a shity run down russian cold war town..
WesleySniper187;-;recommendgame
Laamapalmu;-;Very good war simulator game, no easy peasy BF/CoD stuff. Good graphics, good sounds, large map, alot of game modes and mods, the realism on the bullets etc. Absolutely awesome on Invade gamemode as being dropped on 2-5km away and after that have to silently get on the objective, the communication of the team and CAS. Only thing that is bad is the performance on Multiplayer, some bugs on the doors and inside the buildings and stairs.
BULE*RETURN;-;good the game
DELTAFIRE000;-;For just $15.99, you can now get the Helicopters DLC, which includes, for that one low price, just two helicopters ! ! In addition to this awesome deal, you get to shoot from vehicles, which should have been in the game in the first place ! Order now and we'll double your offer. **Just pay separately for core game mechanics.
Commander-Hoss;-;my friend got downed and i carried him only to get shot in left nut 10/10
Le Shibe;-;At first I was like - (   ) But then - (   ) And then a bit after- (   )
JAckChArtres;-;One of the most realstic game i have ever played everything about it works for example: +graphics are amazing +Eventually 3rd and 1st person decent shooter +Nice storyline +Fun multiplayer Somthing however wasnt so great was: -Bit glitch (at times not alot) -Missions last forever I would rate it 9 out of 10 and i reccomend getting it!!!!!!!!!
Elliott (One of those cunts);-;Great game, 95% of community is literally cancer.
Frank P.;-;After the update with the launcher ARMA and Bisudio can GO TO IN HELL i uninstalled the game and hope they burn up in hell
Kevin J.;-;Reviewing games are boring as ..
Amir.Hw;-;when do u get rid of your global ban i did have it over 1 years and 4 months
Nurrvillian;-;Absolute crap in recent updates have always been a loyal ARMA player but Optimization in the last few updates have made the game unplayable on mid-high range systems you need a BEAST of a rig to run this game now i stronlgy reccommend for the averge player dont waste your money on this anymore
IM A LLAMACORN!;-;Love this game
Armality;-;After playing this game for about 20 minutes I decided to leave most every other shooter game behind. The scale of this game, what's possible and what you can do in it is next to none. You can create your own mission or try ones that other people have made. In that sense the game is infinite. This game has realism, tactics, stealth, weapons, vehicles and so much more. You can approach any task in a million different ways. 20/10.
[87CF] Sargo;-;Plenty of fun mods and gameplay, I would enjoy playing this with anyone.
..xValliance;-;Worst than DayZ Standalone .Game always crash for no reason
Cool Guy (Jack);-;yersh das is gud
Juan;-;The Paragon of a Mil-Sim, it is more fluent, and less buggy then Arma 2, but some issues with it (like its  body armor system) Can way it down.
Bag of Purp;-;60? WAY TOO buggy for a game to be 60 bugs, this is insane
SMRocket;-;The worst game I've ever bought.
Crycer;-;Best game ever :) but i cant buy it :'(
Aiden Pearce;-;i only have $0.2 and i want this
jugg_mike;-;eli if u are reading this  you and this game is great
Enragement Child;-;DON'T READ THIS. YOU WILL BE KISSED ON THE NEAREST POSSIBLE FRIDAY BY THE LOVE OF YOUR LIFE.TOMORROW WILL BE THE BEST DAY OF YOUR LIFE. NOW YOU'VE STARTED READING THIS. DON'T STOP. THIS IS SO FREAKY.1. say your name ten times.2. say your mom's name five times.3. say your crushes three times.4. paste this to four other games.If you do this, your crush will kiss you on the nearest Friday.But if you read this and do not paste this, then you will have very bad luck.SEND THIS TO 4 GAMES IN 143 MINUTES. WHEN YOU'RE DONE PRESS F6 AND YOUR CRUSH'S NAME WILL APPEAR IN BIG LETTERS ON THE SCREEN. THIS IS SO FREAKY BECAUSE IT ACTUALLY WORKS
Bootylicious;-;Terrible game unless you plan on playing it on single player only, MAJOR fps lag on multiplayer you will get 3 fps for ever even lowering all settings to low or disabled.
El Duderino (MeGuustav [NL]);-;It doesn't work. You have enormous lag on PC's with quad-PC's. The engine uses only 1 core -_- So if you somehow still use a dual-core PC you can play this game. If you have a really new quad-core processor you can play this game too. That aside, the game feels like it's unfinished and just a money grab. They didn't invest in a new engine that actually works, you have no story and it totally depends on mods which still doesn't make it any good. You are thrown on an island with a pistol and there are some vehicles on the island. That's pretty much ArmA 3 in a nutshell.
Steel Talon;-;What exactly improved from Arma II, graphics & thats it! Seame exact  get carried over with some bonusses. Graphic glitches Invisible walls (geometry glitch) AI is AI sees trough foliage, u can't even turn it off anymore Body armor system makes a feel u fight ING T-600s AI aim iscompletely random, it can miss whole clip point blank or insta-kill u from 300m. I can't remember when i managed to insta-kill AI. optimisation sounds scripted events controlls It has mod support tough, but should the mods be needed to fix basic game mechanics one would expect from a simulator? It's not a simulator, it is sanbox game u can mod to make a simulaor.
Project T.A.M.A;-;i really hate it. the campain sucks,the mutiplayer is unplayable and i didnt even want to try the rest of the features because of how stupid the things i had played
Epic_Fail_123;-;ME WANT BAD
DeadlyFox;-;Kick  game, worth the buy; been a fan since Arma 2. Realism to its fullest and requires skill. You should not find too many young call of duty players playing this.
nicker_17815;-;worst controls ever, and i cant even change them. I just died because i couldnt get the water i bought! Every other game out there is pretty straight forward with the controls, i think i literally hit every key on the keyboard, couildnt get the water/food in my backpack and died.... this game was never finished, and its probably something really silly.... thx arma for the crappy computergame. dumbest controls in the world bar none. i cant even figure out how to stop my head from looking around vs my body!!!
Epic_Fail_123;-;ME WANT BAD
DeadlyFox;-;Kick  game, worth the buy; been a fan since Arma 2. Realism to its fullest and requires skill. You should not find too many young call of duty players playing this.
nicker_17815;-;worst controls ever, and i cant even change them. I just died because i couldnt get the water i bought! Every other game out there is pretty straight forward with the controls, i think i literally hit every key on the keyboard, couildnt get the water/food in my backpack and died.... this game was never finished, and its probably something really silly.... thx arma for the crappy computergame. dumbest controls in the world bar none. i cant even figure out how to stop my head from looking around vs my body!!!
IndustrialDonut (Wertz);-;Best out of breath simulator ever!!!!
Mickry Mouse;-;Possibly the best fps game on the market
Azzer;-;quite good once played yopu get the hang of it but if you like war and have a great pc get it
Jusher84 (Trading Skins);-;the game was great and I really recommend others getting. I know I will be getting it
Franki1213;-;Is a super coll game i played this for the weekend and what can i say i will probably buy this game very very soon :)
Skunkx;-;One of the best games i have played. 10/10! It has great graphics, gameplay and an all variaty of guns, vehicles and has a ton of servers.
GetDaLoot;-;it is most best fun fur whole family. I love da bugs da loot and Dag00t
skullghost102;-;this is great for free arma 3 weekend
Australian McUseless;-;The game is very, very good. The graphics and the fact you can't just rush into battle makes this seem like a great game.. However, wait for a really good sale. ArmA 3 is poorly optimized, and you will get LOADS of lag on-line. Multiplayer (Domination, at least, Co-Op missions with 2-4 players are fine.) is a mess. Most of the time you'll be confused and one-shot by aim-bot A.I. Also, 10 for helicopters. GG. Overall: Graphics: 10/10 Optimization 6/10 Gameplay: 11/10 A.I: 5/10 Multiplayer: FOR THE LOVE OF GOD WHAT IS THIS LAG/10 Community: 8/10 Overall : 9.5/10 Also dem business practices. Edit: DayZ and Altis Life basically ruined the community, you'll now see 90% of the people crashing the helicopter on the base or just shooting everything in sight. GG, DayZ, GG.
El_Vendetta;-;I can see how much fun this game can be, but when I'm 1m from the objective and can't get closer to interact with it, and can't continue the mission until I interact with it... and it's only getting in the vehicle, well sorry I'm not gonna' spend 30$ in today's market on such a game - I don't care how good people say it is. I like the graphics, didn't mind the long install time, love the mechanics - crawl, compass, etc. I guess I'm pickier than most however, and wary of spending money on a game that starts out rather slow and buggy. I know we all wonder why someone can't get it right whith so many trying. This game feels closer than most others to achieving that rightness.
QuantumTweaker;-;Very fun, a big improvement in the Arma series. That fatigue system though :P
[5TH] SARGE [LOD] [ASOS];-;i liked it during the free weekend...so much to the game...too many controls to cover. by the time you see the target you cant react fast enough to kill a target IRL time. but the enemy can. If you are into that, i highly recommended. the MODS make it more fun. If 327 button command isn't your thing and you dont feel like being left by yourself on a map that covers like 400 km...having to run to your next destination on foot...then I do not recommend this.
technick;-;The game is definitely for the hardcore gamer who wants complete immersion. I've been away from FPS for awhile and this game proved to be difficult, even on novice level till I spent some time practicing. Also recommended specs should be higher, my video card mets recommended specs and I can barely play this on standard video mode.
COLDBEATS FROM SKYPE;-;Recommended
|AVG| White Wolf;-;well ive tried out the demo and its not too bad of a game but i think im gonna stick too battlefield 4 until the price drops to about 20 bucks
Wex_the_X;-;A very realistic and exciting war simulator. The thing that makes Arma so different for all the otehr fps'es is that it is so realistic. The campain really gives you a realistic feel and the multiplayer has a lot of extrordinairy gamemodes that is fun. Really reccomend it and that you look into how good it really is, because a lot can play this and give up because it is so hard, but it's really really one of the best FPS'es there are and the most realistic one i have come over. It is so different you can't compare it with CoD and Battlefield, they seem like this ones little brothers when you really get into this one.
HGWXX/7;-;please let me play a couple of days longer!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
TheAlphaMan;-;The game is fun I only got a chance to play free weekend till it was over :( I wish it was free on steam so I could play again.
Calpol75;-;Really very, incredibly good!!
Rye Bread;-;Found 2 shrek mobiles. 10/10
Thelus;-;This game is the closest to real combat conditions of any game I have played. The graphics are decent and the scenery is very dynamic. The game feels better than ARMA II with the ease of doing actions. Though due to the complexity of the game i would recommend a keyboard that can macro every thing. This is not Battlefield or Call of Duty this is more of a simulation than a combat based game. I think though with it being out for a while now the publisher needs to lower the price as the game ages and stop making dlc like its an Ipad freemium game. I do like that it is modable, something most AAA game developers now forbid.
ABS3NTM1NDED;-;Awsome game with great mechanics.
kRUGER;-;Love it! the grapic and with 3 monitors.. THAT IS EPIC! Great game <3
Deathtoast;-;I have only played it for the weekend, but man do i love it. Despite the minor few glitches its great, and man did it make you have to pay attention to your surroundings.
Snowdog;-;If you love REALISM this is the game for you. If you are a BF or COD fanboy, you probably wont like it. Unless you are like me, one who was scratching his head at the absolute sheet FPS on the market atm screaming into the wind..."is anything real anymore!!"....I hate them so much and by themyou all know which big 2 im talking about. All absolute crap, garbage. I cant believe i paid hard earned bucks and continued in the hopes something finally would come out that would be decent. Burned!! Then...like the kool aid man..."oh yeah!!" Arma 3 came crashing through the wall, tipping me over in my chair socks blown off. My monitor flashed free Arma 3 weekend. Ok...sure..i have nothing to lose. I have heard of Arma franchise..even watched some youtube vids on them all. At the time, nothing really leaped out and said you had to play me. But hey, its a free weekend so why not. Now, im just down right depressed. This game is so amazing. I finally found my gem. A game thats just so intense. The atmosphere, graphics...aww god i could go on and on. Why am I depressed...you ask, well, all the money I have spent on the other "two" I couldve put here. Where it belongs. Trust me in saying i have lots of titles of the other "two" and now Im having to scrounge for loot so i can buy this. I paid for sh*t when sweetness was staring me in the face. Awesome game Lots and lots of different servers with different mods. Every game is unique and different So, stop reading this and go buy it PS. If you dont adjust your play style from the other "two" fast, you will get owned and die a lot. This community does not  around, you will have to deal with many personalitys and the majority of them keepin it real and hardcore. Headsets greatly improve your chances of survival.
IIExodiusII{D4L.com};-;this game is very fun and continues to supprise me every second. i highly recomend it to even to short minded people
Liam | Swiftnode.net;-;Its a must buy. Love the graphics. Love all the mods. I enjoy modding in this game, Best game I like thats mod friendly. You must buy this game, You are missing out on all those cool multiplayer gamemodes like ARMA 3 life, Wasteland, Altis Life, King Of The Hill, Breaking Point and Epoch Mod. Buy Now!
aironic8;-;This game is awesome and you must get it, Nuff said!
The157Gamer;-;Great
Mackey;-;The best army game there is!
MAX_C199 *GlorifiedGaming*;-;aessome war sim but i wouldnt play if you have a low end pc (like me) cause its disconnects you from servers sometimes after saying no message recieved but i would defo reccomend it.
YaBoi_DanAykroyd;-;meh, its ok, not what i expected but still good
McLimpz #RoadToLE;-;This is an absolust beast of an game. Recommend it to everyone! Stunning graphics and many hours of brutal gaming. 10/10
Spartan M23;-;I haven't gotten a lot of play time in, but the time I have had was a lot of fun. Great game over all from what I've played. Huge amount of player generated content. However, horrible controller support. If the controller support were to get overhauled, this would be the perfect shooter.
Not gay but $5 is $5;-;GAME IS GOOD. REMOVE KEBAB FROM DESK INSTEAD OF LUG LARGE WEIGHT OF PACK ACROSS BATTLEFIELD. REMINDS ME OF CHECHEN CONFLICT OF 1999. OVERALL GOOD GAME 10/10 IVAN APPROVE!
Premitted;-;Do you want to feel like you're about to die, when you're actually not? Do you want to feel the fear of almost being shot when you escape by just one hair? Well Arma 3 is the game for you, one of the most intense and nailbighting games ever. When you come so close to living the dream in altis life and you die can be annoying, but when you escape near death can be just as amazing as killing someone and picking up their loots! Arma 3 is one, if not the greatest millitary sims ever! -PS you need a good pc. :P
Skooozz;-;YESYESYES - I NEED THIS! Tried it for the free part and it was AWESOME! Tons of things to do and the showcases were cool, just watch out because it's very CPU intensive and is more single-threaded. Sorry AMD FX Cpus
Garutas;-;I'm liking the storyline so far. First multiplayer i joined i was naked and had no weapons, no idea where i was or what to do, some guy yelling about a box shot me point blank with a sniper rifle. 10/10 oh and you run out of breath if you move forward for more than 4 seconds making aiming impossible, because that's fun.
Frantic;-;Great game and a must buy for in the summer sale!!
I Play On an IPHONE;-;awesome just awesme if you liked arma 2 you will love arma 3
VulcanKnightWolf;-;Very versatile. Mods and a great campaign make this one of the best PC actions games out now.
Petromilli;-;Me and a friend were doing a massive co op mode and we decided to take a quad to the objective. Later on about 6 KM away from the objective the quad breaks so we start walking there. We gave up and said "Screw it" and shot eachother / grenaded and my friend was bleeding out so I gave him a medkit. Then we walked more and the objective changed to about 13 KM away and we gave up again so we shot eachother. Now we are both bleeding out on the ground and stranded in the middle of nowhere. Until suddenly a friendly Tank came moments later and patched us both up. Then we are inside the tank and I go afk for some juice. By the time I got back, the tank driver left without giving me nor my friend permission to drive it. So my friend brought up that while I was gone a helicopter was here and a guy offered to take us with him. My friend said "Ok, but lets wait for my friend to get back" (being me) So when I get back my friend gets in the chopper and said "Cmon lets get in" I was wondering where the pilot is so I got out to find him dead underneath the heli. So then me and my friend got out and walked to the nearest air base 2 KM away. halfway there I realised there was a respawn button so me and my friend used it and spawned at the air base to find dead allys everywhere. So we looted them but then the server restarted so we got on gmod. 10/10
Zero_Percent;-;This is a really good game, provides many hours of goodness. Favorite thing to do is wasteland with freinds.
AKARekz;-;Would be better if i could actually play the game for more than 20 minutes.... but no.
Mr JJ Gaming;-;There isn't mutch to say other than THIS GAME IS AWESOME
xSolid_Altairx;-;War is hell
drynoa;-;A black guy shoots you in altis life and then gets beheaded by a chopper 10/10
EggDabes;-;BUY IT fOR GODS SAKE
satnaM;-;I want this . NO . I NEED THIS .
Fuzzyfox20 - TurtleSquad;-;It was feckin' amazing. I recommend it to everyone but the only downside is you need a good ammount of cpu's otherwise you will struggle to get even 10 fps
Briskit;-;Seems like a good game only did the training part but seemed good
BenPlaysGames;-;I love this game! But they should make a free version! OR MAKE A WEEKEND WHEN U GET THE GAME FOR FREE FOR EVER! cuz 66$ is a lot of money! Awesome game though... played it for two days
MrGhost154;-;loves how it does things in real life but in a game
Deathadder;-;was great but cost to much
8itches8trippin;-;Says its running till the 27th, my free weekend no longer works on the 26th bit upset about it.
hergh;-;mean as
denial-UK;-;Worth every penny, but theres still alot of improvement to be done like fixing the eject from moving vechile and stuff like that there just quite alot of little stupid bugs like that. But would recommend.
Stoners4life_420;-;ing awesome love playing wasteland
Mr. TooTightTee;-;Hooked! when i got it on the free weekend deal.
Xenocide;-;If you like Realism and low fps like real life you'll like this game.
Yosemite_Ham;-;This is my first dive into military games, but so far so good. Would like a little better controller support, otherwise enjoyable game. It doesn't have the polish that BF or COD has, but the open world aspect is pretty cool.
Texas Ten Gallon;-;I got the weekend deal and wow... Its messed up that I have ti oay 25$ to get the rest of it and I can't play it ever again until I pay... this is BS I love the game but what the hell?!?!?!?! I'm not paying that ,,,
Mr.Wolf;-;Awesome gameplay, awesome maps!
Ace Morte;-;Another great game, and the one and only realistic military simulation. I honestly didn't think they could pull the whole future concept off, but they DID! And it's not too futuristic like other gaming companies go overboard with. Just advanced weapons but still bullets and lead. Different vehicles and the only downfall is less aircraft but the editor and mods makeup for the lack of aircraft combat!
pyth0n;-;I approve this message!
Angel;-;Beautiful and stunning game. I would recommend it for any fan of Arma 2 or anyone who likes the military genre.
BigMike;-;Honestly, i don't recommend paying more than $15 for this game. No ironsights, have to completely stand still to change weapons, driving is a joke... too much to really name off.
SpeedKiller;-;Its Alpha...
==;-;It always glitches out and messes up.
Urinal Cake Launcher;-;Its pretty intense on the right moments. If you want intense firefights you should play domination.l But if you like to play strategic. You should also play that lol. Wasteland on the other hand. Is boring as . Lots of vehicles planes and helis. You can bomb  and there LOTS of weapons. 8.2/10 Best war simulator of the year -PC Gamer
Bjornen01;-;This is a funny game but its small bugs in it :( But i recommend this game if you like war simulation games.
der Regler;-;One of the best game ever <3 !
T-800 Chicken Fish;-;Its is a good and amazing sim and you should all have the chance to play it you will love it.
Mudpuppy;-;Too many bugs. Can't finish the first campaign due to a bug. Multiplayer is boring, very slow paced.
Cpt. Amare;-;One of the most beautiful games I've EVER played, and one of the most challenging. Arma III is an essential game for any would-be FPS player as it exclusively immerses the player and requires co ordination and immense teamwork. I recommend it simply because it is a beautiful game.
Ty0530;-;I love this game and if you want the intenceness of a real battle but dont want to die , heres your solution
Frahsty;-;BUY IT RIGHT NOW OH LAWDY
bob #letromaunch;-;omg NO u cant have 3 arms irl
ClaptonIsTheGodMan;-;The previous title, Arma 2 in my opinion, is in ways better than the third installment.
xTyrez;-;Buy it, use it, fix it, mod it, upgrade it......oh yeah buy this :) 9.5/10
George - Rambete;-;10/10 Game, would play again and again (what I do) - BWG Altis Life <3
ever_frost;-;what is this  after update all kinds of errors game james ,did you fix sniper mag going from 8 aclip to 1 a clip i guess not you broke the game id say wait 1 but i yell you now you twits
AKARekz;-;Would be better if i could actually play the game for more than 20 minutes.... but no.
Morphine;-;This game is for the hard core milsim. It has a large learning curve. This game should only be played with a clan. It is a very awsome game but due to its complexity you will need a clan to help you out. They will set what mods will be used in the game and teach you what you need to know. I do recommened the 48th Mechanized Infantry. I ran with them for a long time before I had to quit and get back to school.
OcalaMasaacre;-;Amazing,and so beautiful.
Cloud9 | Rambin0 <G2A>;-;Amazing game could be better optimized tho
Kazansky;-;X52pro doesn't work, works perfectly with other games, just not this one.
A$AP George;-;STILL CANT BELIEVE I PAYED 60 BUCKS FOR THIS BORING PIECE OF ...
Leoman;-;It's a military sandbox game set in 2030. It's a very good game, worth the money. If it's on sale, it's a  oblivion that you'd buy this.
BangBus;-;awesome game and a great step forward. how ever all the nato guns suck dowload a U.S weapons mod and it makes everthing better.
MentalExperience;-;Very good game: by far the best military simulator game that there is. Is much more fun than arma2
Charliebrownau [HIGH];-;Update: March 2014 - This game has become one of my most fav FPS/TPS games, for US$20 (CJS) or US$35 to US$40 this game is so enjoyable with clan/mates via coop , it has free dedicated servers, server browser , ping displayed, music can turn off , graphics are so better then BF4 and COD GHOST, TONES OF free maps and mods. I now play this on a haswell with great frame rate. Also has multiple FREE DLC's. Worth the investment. Dont get COD GHOST, buy this instead Recent game play footage I recorded - https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=DSOfOGoGACw Arma 3 looks like it could be a really good game of 2013 to replace GRFS and BF3. My guess is once they optmise it for Duel and Single core CPU's , fix multiplayer, fix textures and Release Standalone Dedicated Servers without needing Steam for Linux and Windos, People are going to play this in droves. Flying is an art so dont assume you can jump in and fly straight away. My Duel Core 2Ghz Socket 775/560ti/8gig ram system gets 19FPS out of this game, which was the same FPS I got from GR Online Open Beta and Crysis 3 MP Open Beta. WARNING LITE FREE GIFT COPY IS SINGLE PLAYER ONLY. Big let down on that
Holonga;-;10/10 Would get stuck in a rock again! In all seriousness this game really puts it all on the table, realistic bullet drop, realistic combat and AI (you'll die a lot), expansive maps, team effort, and a fun time. Anyone looking for a replacement for combat sims, or shooters need not look further! Just watch out for rocks :)
Odyssey;-;This is the best sandbox shooter i played in my life you definitely have to try this one with a mod like wasteland
RidiculousnessX;-;This is the best game ever made for PC. It servers as a base for the 52 mods I use
Snake;-;Its a good game just needs bette optimzation and some key bugs need to be fixed.
Flarin;-;Way better than Battlefield 3 and Arma 2. It plays smooth, it feels right. Just. ing. Awesome.
{81st}COLT;-;Requires beastly computer to play on good FPS but can get very addicting if you play on the right servers.
Qualle;-;Perfect game for TACTICAL and MILITARY STRATEGIC Gamplay! not for fun like running around and trolling. if you want to do that go f**k yourself and go get a life.
Bombiliu;-;This is the best game i've evere had and recommend if you like millitary games!! The only thing with I'm disappointed is that the campain has some really annoying bugs....but is ok!
Hudddysan;-;Recommend to anyone who likes any sort of combat game. Has great balance of first person combat and vehicle (sea, land and air) combat. The weapons don't customise very much, but that doesnt matter so much as there is a VERY wide range of weapons and attachments. Very well optimised and runs smoothly on all occasions. The only problem is if you are playing online with a computer running at low settings, as you cannot see enemys as clear or as far away as those with higher grade computers can, and sometimes becomes annoying. But the game is worth the purchase just for the campain.
TheOnlyUser;-;It has dumb cops 21/10 ign
GroxazGaming;-;I can write a review, but I don't own it? Loominati comfuurmed! Duuhhhh Seems like a good game, i'll recommend it. Cool cool.
ultratoilet;-;its very fun game buy it now !
Slick Willeh;-;Doesn't suck
Morgan;-;put this game on sale again do it NOW please now DO it ple
{The}DanCan;-;this game is better than existence
Riley;-;Playing at 8 fps such good wow Can't wait for new computer to max out at 60+ fps have to wait until xmas eve to get it whhhhhhhhhhy
CrazyIsaac837;-;Very fun but you ned a CRAZY computer to play, also not a wide selection of cars wich is why alot of people deciced to play A3L so that they got a better RP emperience
Grandma;-;Best military simulation on the market!! Definitely worth your money!
a_bird_GR;-;most realistic action,shooter,strategy game of all times
Bandit[Freeze];-;This is the perfect military game and if you are into tactics and positions in a fight this is he game for you. With several thousand hours of multiplayer gameplay and dlc there is so much to do:)
hulaboy616;-;better than arma 2 still hard to have fun flying helocopters is fun though i think i got my moneys worth
Grab;-;this game brout me 2 tear first time i play.... wow...!....wat a xpereance. truly beutifull game play 12\10/7
Ask your mom about Snowballing!;-;Totally worth it. But I will wait for the price drop again. Untill then ARMA 2 :)
Pumpernikkeli;-;Arma series has always had faithful fanbase and for a good reason, while not the most optimized or most fluid gameplay wise, they've brought a one-of-a-kind twist to whole FPS genre with realism and simulation. Arma 3 continues this trend and does so very well. This game offers INSANE value in terms of varied gamemodes. There is an endless ocean of great and not so great mods for arma which alter the gameplay in many different ways. Mods are the reason why you should buy this game, you quite literally get dozens of games' worth of content by buying Arma 3. You can play survival, role play, play massive war scenarios, just shoot for fun, it's all there. Visually this is one of the most impressive looking games to date. Huge maps with absolutely massive draw distance, fair amount of texture detail and good lighting effects really add up to a spectacular feel. Night time is especially impressive with really dark nights and tracer shots lighting up the sky. All this comes with a hefty price though, this game really brings even most poverful computers down to their knees. Optimization isn't great this time around either and multiplayer performance suffers quite a blow. Please do your research before buying so you at least have some clue if this'll run at all. Sound assets are good, guns sound beefy and other little details such as bullet impacts really bring immersion and feel of danger to gunfights. Built in VOIP communication is absolutely necessary and it's done well, with VOD and everything. Voice chat does get bit crackly sometimes though. Gameplay has always been both the high and low point of arma series and this doesn't change. Luckily enough some features are bit better this time and I especially like the new inventory layout. Controls are still somewhat clunky and mousewheel has way more functions bound to it than ever necessary. Also arma doors are legendary for being annyoying... Buildings have some clipping issues which combined with awkward doors and bit jerky movement can lead to sticky situations. Vehicle controls are for the most part fine, but cars blow up if you look at them funny. Gunplay is a thing I've always loved in Arma. Realistic effective distances for guns and decent bullet physics make shooting and hitting really satisfying. Assault rifles can still be very, very deadly up to 500m or so and draw distance allows for extremely long range sniping (sniping is real hard though, don't expect point and click). Combine this with good gun sounds and visuals and we've got one impressive package. Close combat is sometimes bit iffy in multiplayer as lag and desyncing can make hit detection not work perfectly and it's common situation for 2 players to end up killing each other in CQB. This is a war simulation game though, so if you come expecting some fast paced shooting action for a 30 minute session every now and then you should probably look elsewhere. Arma 3 takes dedication, and even if there are some gamemodes designed for casual action, they're still slow paced compared to other shooters. People camp for hours just to snipe you in perfect oppourtunity, people try to avoid fair engagements, you will die to players you never thought were anywhere near you, you will be brought down by massive hail of bullets from attack helicopter mile high in the sky. If you're fine with the things in last paragraph and have a good PC, get Arma 3, you won't regret it.
FragTagFrenzy;-;they say its the best combat simulator and say it has the best physix, well to tell you the truth its absolute , very glitchy, annimations are , and how is it you cant jump, shots dont register half the time, and flares do almost nothing to defend against anti air, somehow i cant pull myself away from the fact that i feel like im playing a beta, this game is not worth 60 dollars, hell its not even worth 30 dollars, how can they put out this garbage and say its "the best". 1/10
Veta1assraper;-;this game is op plox nerf
Mr.BottomFragger;-;i got Arma 3 Digital Deluxe Edition and i dont know how to add the dlc. Also for my review its a great game will play no-stop if my Mom doesnt tell me to stop playing
Swag;-;I have just bought the game installed it opened the game and was global banned for no reason terribal game
Riley^^;-;+Graphics +Multiplayer Best game i ever played
sexy bagel;-;Right from the git-go you are in a virtual reality which is basicly training, you get familiar with the controls and play it a few good 3 or 5 mins Then you get farther in the game and you realize, the entire game is about driving around a basicly endless map that has a few houses and such Pros and Cons Pros Fun multiplayer shooter, even eithout the multiplayer great level design Cons Really terrible graphics it haunts me to this day, like those targets AFTER the vitrtual reality looked like tan pieces of plastic The controls were so sencetive I couldn't go down a simple flight of stairs. My overall rating? 3/10 still better than cod though
MrAlwaysKarma;-;Can someone please buy Arma 3 as a gift to me please :(???? You see, I am very poor and I just cant afford a game like Arma 3. I just love this intense game and it has a wonderful sensation. I wish I could just get my hands on it but I dont have the required amount of mey just yet. Im just begging anyone out there that is kind to buy me this game as a gift. It would touch my heart deep inside me ;). Im crying now as I type. If anyone out there has a heart that is strong enough to be generous I would Highly appreciate it :). Most people won't listen but it will be awesome. THANKYOU!!! ;)
Soap;-;I don't know what to say about this game but heres a pancake recipe! Ingredients: 100g plain flour 2 eggs 300ml semi-skimmed milk 1 tbsp sunflower oil or vegetable, plus extra for frying pinch salt Method: 1: Blending in the flour: Put the flour and a pinch of salt into a large mixing bowl and make a well in the centre. Crack the eggs into the middle, then pour in about 50ml milk and 1 tbsp oil. Start whisking from the centre, gradually drawing the flour into the eggs, milk and oil. Once all the flour is incorporated, beat until you have a smooth, thick paste. Add a little more milk if it is too stiff to beat. 2: Finishing the batter: Add a good splash of milk and whisk to loosen the thick batter. While still whisking, pour in a steady stream of the remaining milk. Continue pouring and whisking until you have a batter that is the consistency of slightly thick single cream. Traditionally, people would say to now leave the batter for 30 mins, to allow the starch in the flour to swell, but theres no need. 3: Getting the right thickness: Heat the pan over a moderate heat, then wipe it with oiled kitchen paper. Ladle some batter into the pan, tilting the pan to move the mixture around for a thin and even layer. Quickly pour any excess batter into a jug, return the pan to the heat, then leave to cook, undisturbed, for about 30 secs. Pour the excess batter from the jug back into the mixing bowl. If the pan is the right temperature, the pancake should turn golden underneath after about 30 secs and will be ready to turn. 4: Flipping pancakes: Hold the pan handle, ease a fish slice under the pancake, then quickly lift and flip it over. Make sure the pancake is lying flat against base of the pan with no folds, then cook for another 30 secs before turning out onto a warm plate. Continue with the rest of the batter, serving them as you cook or stack onto a plate. You can freeze the pancakes for 1 month, wrapped in cling film or make them up to a day ahead.
Masterpeing;-;Need some pulish the game its really cool with physx and good graphics. they need fix multiplayer for now . beta ends soon on september.2013 , i hope the game will have more freatures and stuff overf pass the beta test, thanks for this good game
THCMedic;-;Waste of money too complicated for how much it costs.
ADv. carlito841;-;any 1 givin arma 3 away i would be most gratefull
Old Curry;-;Uh Not too sure what to write here so heres a recipe for Pancakes instead Ingredients: 1 1/2 cups all-purpose flour 3 tablespoons sugar 1 tablespoon baking powder 1/4 teaspoon salt 1/8 teaspoon freshly ground nutmeg 2 large eggs, at room temperature 1 1/4 cups milk, at room temperature 1/2 teaspoon pure vanilla extract 3 tablespoons unsalted butter, plus more as needed Now to make it 1. In a large bowl, whisk together the flour, sugar, baking powder, salt, and nutmeg. 2. In another bowl, beat the eggs and then whisk in the milk and vanilla. 3. Melt the butter in a large cast iron skillet or griddle over medium heat. 4. Whisk the butter into the milk mixture. Add the wet ingredients to the flour mixture, and whisk until a thick batter is just formed 5. Keeping the skillet at medium heat, ladle about 1/4 cup of the batter onto the skillet, to make a pancake. Make 1 or 2 more pancakes, taking care to keep them evenly spaced apart. Cook, until bubbles break the surface of the pancakes, and the undersides are golden brown, about 2 minutes. Flip with a spatula and cook about 1 minute more on the second side. Serve immediately or transfer to a platter and cover loosely with foil to keep warm. Repeat with the remaining batter, adding more butter to the skillet as needed. 6. Procedure for adding fruit to pancakes: Once the bubbles break the surface of the pancakes, scatter the surface with sliced or diced fruit, or chocolate chips, nuts, etc. Flip with a spatula and cook for 1 minute more, being careful not to burn toppings.
Madpack;-;I love this game but it's hard to review since the mods change the gameplay a lot so, I made a list of reviews for the mods that I've played. I'll update the list once I play more mods and I expect to play this game a good amount so, expect many updates. If you want to recommend a mod I recommend you recommend it in the comments. Battle Royale This was the first mod I played and, it was what convenced me to buy the game. I really enjoyed looting and having to slowly move closer to your enemys made the gameplay super intresting and, I think really shows Arma 3 capabilities. 9/10 Battle Royale: Ghost Hotel AKA Call Of Duty, easy to win. Nuf said. 3/10 Breaking Point One of the first mods I played was Breaking Point, after a while I got a working plane but, on my way to the plane I got shot at. I thought it was all good untill I passed out while flying. I crashed straight into some people t-baging a dead body. 7/10 Also whats up with me only playing mods that start with "b" #LOLZ!
Solra;-;good game! graphs astounding and gameplay quite good;) much better than any battlefield series!!! bom jogo!! graficos fora de serie e jogabilidade bastante boa ;) muito melhor do que qualquer battlefield series!!!
Vinnie Moretz The Mountain;-;Mods Mods Mods Mods Mods Mods and more Mods
WhoToTrus;-;Couldn't get passed training.
UncleStanBana;-;In a trial of ARMA 3, I managed to buy and sell drugs and play passenger with a buddy. I also went alone and found food all over the land and got free badass weapons. A great game for DayZ and ARMA fans!
Forlornblade;-;$16.00 US for 2 bad helicopters, or to even be able to sit in the back seat of one No content No shotguns Buggy like every other arma game Realistic military/war simulation, helicopters and planes explode when they touch water. Impossible to try and survive a crash landing even if you are hovering and descending 2 mph Most  admins on any server It's fun I guess.
AcePilot;-;Alpha is . The terrain detai is seriously lacking. Shadow and lightening effects seem not to be working properly. And the most important thing is the performance is HORRIBLE! With 660ti, I am only getting 35+ fps putting on "medium" quality. Definitely looking forward to Beta and full game. But ALPHA IS JUST .
HoldTorsken;-;Arma 3.. I just don't like it. It feels incomplete. it's a great military simulation, but eh. feels empty, and very pointless.
Old & Decrepit;-;Biggest waste of 60$ Even if this game were free it would still be a waste of disk space. Driving is clunky, shooting is clunky, flying is clunky, everything about this game is clunky. The only saving grace of the game is the Life mods, but they're full of trolls and little kids who don't have any sort of bedtime. This game is junk.
Lawson (AAT);-;A really awesome game if u got the money to get it get then! It's only $60
Taco land;-;I was having a fun time on this game. It's a next generation Military game for sure. With it's Amazing Graphics, Heart racing battles and realisim, I am going to say 10/10. But, For fans of Arma who have been playing for a long time like me, They will notice major changes that will make them feel like noobs all over again. And it just does not have that feel arma always had. Nore does it really have the same setting. But still it is a great game. Also, If you intend to play offline or with a buddy against the AI, I seriously recommend getting the FFIS (Fire-Fight Improvement system) Mod. It will make the AI much smarter but also more realistic and make there precision with guns less accurate. Originally the AI will Lay down or crouch and sit in the same position for the whole battle while firing with in-realistic accuracy and sometimes even instantly snap there aim to you regardless of where you are. The Campaign has improved majorly since the last time I reviewed Arma 3; Enemys seem to be placed better and move toward you better, Some items that make the game easier or harder have also been removed, Some AI are as stupid as hell though. Also, If you find the current factions to be a bit bland or lacking a lot of content then take a look at the RHS: Escalation Mod. It add some new factions with countless vehicals and weapons and customization options to the game. I also recommend downloading addons from the steam workshop. These include: Gamemodes, Missions, Some weapons, New Units and much more to improve Arma 3 or repair something wrong. That is what I have to say for now. To divide the review up in numbers. Content on purchase: 7/10 Dlc content: 5/10 Free down loadable content (Mods): 8/10 Community: 6/10 True to genre: 9/10 Overhall: 10/10.
SSTR;-;Do not buy this game untill developers fix this problem! you will be sad a lot... (explaining the reason in following) shortly demostration whom needs visual proof: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vDMdzwanxnY for those whom just wants to read: This game's engine is not using your graphics card & cpu properly to give you a good gameplay. even if you have 3000$ gaming rig the best you can get is 20-40fps. If i put every single graphics to very low or disabled(shadow etc.) ... i get 22 fps... If i put everything to ultra settings including AA & renders guess how much i get... ... ... 21FPS! ... ... this game is veeeery badly optimized and engine is failing hard on hardware usage. Developers are not caring about the issue since arma 2 its same problem all around!
{TRP} S.E.N.I.T.A.L;-;Amazing game!, has many things to do and have never been bored playing. full of cheap dlc's you can easly spend 50+ hours on this game, for what it costs its worth it!
Nerd;-;This game has alot to offer and is really fun
peener;-;I didn't know what to write about in my review, so here's a recipe for pancakes instead: 1 1/2 cups all-purpose flour 3 1/2 teaspoons baking powder 1 teaspoon salt 1 tablespoon white sugar 1 1/4 cups milk 1 egg 3 tablespoons butter, melted 1. In a large bowl, sift together the flour, baking powder, salt and sugar. Make a well in the center and pour in the milk, egg and melted butter; mix until smooth. 2. Heat a lightly oiled griddle or frying pan over medium high heat. Pour or scoop the batter onto the griddle, using approximately 1/4 cup for each pancake. Brown on both sides and serve hot.
ManWithYourPlan;-;Graphics are very good and the open world is amazing. Make sure you have a godly computer if you want to run 60 fps though!
Der Waldlufer (Das);-;Best game ever. It has a realistic shooting enviroment, and on higher tier graphics, it looks great!
Leighton;-;10/10 I have probably spent too much time in this game! The game has so many areas to it so there is always more to do. For example, there is RP mods, DayZ like mods and even servers like CTF. It is so much fun and it is a total must have!
raffe_66;-;i havent played arma 3 for a long time but now wen i want to play i start the update and when its done it only says update paused and i have tryed to update it like 10 times but its the same every time.......  game
Spasx;-;DayZ Breaking point Mod amd KotH is Bae with a group of 2-5 competent friends who can get over the steep learning curve and unforgiving deaths. But with all that nonsense you get LOOT and you can kill people and establish houses and territories. Very Sandbox mil-sim Game 9.75/10 (Add more to BREAKING POING MOD)
Field-Tested Pleasure Machine;-;Point, Aim, and click to shoot,( am I missing anyth- Oh! ) and don't forget to adjust for any unwanted... what is it called again? Screen Shake? I think I said it right... Q: Should you Play? A/Q: Are you High?
Alec;-;10/10 player once liked it
Grommett;-;Who reads reviews anyway. Just buy the ing game, It's worth it.
SKLD;-;This game is good specially when you go in to the ice age level and smash down a tree with a microwave.
Voodoo;-;From OFP Cold War Crisis to Arma 3. Best Game I have got my hands on.
Jewslavia CSGORIVER.com;-;One of the best games ever. This game has been made better with modding community adding various gamemodes and other fun things. BUY IT!!
Razor;-;It's okay I guess...
SicKnight;-;RPG , CO-OP , PVP , Wastleland are all awesome
Don't go bacon my heart;-;The most fun you will get from Arma 3 is when you play with friends, even if non of your friends play Arma 3 just go out there and make some friends.
Im a Mighty Taco;-;Sorry to say but this game is wasted potential at this point. I hate to say it because you can see how much work they put into the maps, and guns, and im not a programmer but it seems like an amazing feat for a company this size, also the. I put 68 hours of gameplay exploring the content, and online, and trying to enjoy the game, and it is very good sometimes, mostly online. So what issues does this game have? Well first the A.I is still subpar, better than arma 2 but still subpar. Many times my entire team has been wiped out by 1-2 guys because they happen to not be facing them and don't react the way they should, OR one squad mate goes to the other side of a wall and gets shot, and no one comes to his aid. I have managed to be successful, but I have to control every single action of my team to prevent them from getting shot, that it takes away any fun from being a squad leader. The other problem was the graphics and UI of this game make it impossible to spot enemies, I know that they are wearing camofluage but the jagged looking foliage and low contrast make it unrealistically difficult to spot who is firing at you. I think that most of the people giving this game good ratings managed to find a good online server, because that is the only time you get competent teammates and the game could definitly be good then. But much like Arma 2, most of my time online was spent waiting to get picked up, or trying to find out where to go. not the devs fault, but it needs to be known for anyone thinking about getting this game. If you have the patience to find good people to play online with, than I could see the game being fun. If you have the patience to do this, and like simulators you could like it, but the issues this game has killed it for me. If they would just fix those 2 things, I would recommend this game, because they are major issues and would need to be overhauled completely.
Lt. Colonel smith;-;bohemia did somthing right!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! love you bohemia but dayz fix it.
AirAssassin;-;This Game.......Its a large map sandbox designed game.It takes a beastly pc to run it however it will freeze alot over the time that you get it.The trick to learning how to be good at it is teamwork,strategy,tactics, and common sense.You don't need to be the best sniper in the game to have fun and be good at it.Every person counts in combined operations since every person is a part.It has a good modding community and in general a great game.
[EGS]{ARG}HERO;-;why can i write a review don't even have the game lol
DELTAFIRE000;-;For just $15.99, you can now get the Helicopters DLC, which includes, for that one low price, just two helicopters ! ! In addition to this awesome deal, you get to shoot from vehicles, which should have been in the game in the first place ! Order now and we'll double your offer. **Just pay separately for core game mechanics.
Commander-Hoss;-;my friend got downed and i carried him only to get shot in left nut 10/10
Le Shibe;-;At first I was like - (   ) But then - (   ) And then a bit after- (   )
Chris2578;-;if your pc can handle the amazingness then get it 123.5445454 out of 2
Walrus;-;Terrible game, not even worth the money
MEGA cHik1N s4cK Ca5Ro Cunn7;-;WHY IS YOUR ING GAME BROKEN??!! I TRY TO INSTALL AND IT JUST DELETES ITSELF..
pickles;-;PLS GIFT ME THE GAME I ONLY HAVE THE FREE ONE ;-; I WILL GIVE YOU A GAME BACK! HERE THE GAMES I WOULD LIKE TO GIVE YOU: Goat Simulator, Arma 2 bundle (if on sale again) or any other games that cost 10 or 5 dollars. Please and thank you! :D
The Green man Dead;-;An in depth game about; what else? Military combat and war. I love Arma 2 but this one expands on that and then some. 9/10
Luke's;-;Recommending this game is a no-brainer. If you are even into shooters with a nag for realism Arma 3 is inevitable. The game won't let you in easily; it has a steep learning curve, and starting out can be quite frustrating. Also, you are less likely to find good public servers; it hardly is hop-on and play like CoD or Battlefield. The best way to experience it is in a clan or community group. Groups range from run-and-gun type gameplay up to strictly milsim stuff, so there should be something for everybody.
smobooks;-;Amazing how this game works. Best game yet!
Zeren;-;I love this game. It's got the realism, heart pounding action, and community that I love. However, it does have it's faults. It's main one is it's multiplayer FPS. In single player I get between 80 and 60 FPS depending on how heavy the action is, but the moment I join a multiplayer server (even one I host myself on a blank map) it struggles to stay over 20 with the same settings in the same areas. I have a pretty beefy rig as well, so unless you have a true monster, be warned. My specs CPU: Intel i7-4770K @ 3.50GHz RAM: 32 GB GPU: Nvidia Titan Z OS: Windows 7 Ultimate 64-bit
PinkFloydian;-;This is a fantastic FPS/TPS Shooter. For those of you who play CoD & Battlefield, this is hardcore FPS Here. Beautiful graphics, fantastic freedom, but whats the catch? Well, you need a MEGA PC To run this  game. Anything beyond a gtx 690 should run it well on. Not sure on AMD Though. Plz CoD 9 yr olds, do not ruin this game with your stupid raging. KTHXBAI
Maverick;-;Tis good.
Arch Dornan;-;Hello im gona review Arma 3. Its a military First Person Shooter. This game has a pretty high learning curve with stances weapons modifications and other things. as i said this game is not your typtical shooter where u storm buildings and shoot fast firing guns.In this game u need strategy to complete missions. The guns in the game can kill people really fast so u need to be creative and not run and gunning. There is Coop,Singleplayer,Multiplayer,Even a real life Altis life gamemode. I would greatly recommend this game but be careful if u havnt played a game before or havnt played a arma at all its gona be hard to learn this so u must spend some hours just to get used to the mechanics.
Ispharel -3C-;-;If you need a tactical, teamwork filled adrenaline rush then ARMA is the place to be. You need to spend a long time learning the recoil patterns and even the wind speed changes how your bullets fly through the air. This game is not for the Call of Duty or Battlefield player who just likes to run and gun. There are lots of places to explore in the map because it's so big but in a gamemode like Domination or King of the Hill, you'll be deployed to one area only so it will be a close engagement in that place only. Lots of workshop content to keep you busy after that campaign is over but the muiltiplayer is where it's at. 9/10 - Only for the hardcore military player who loves teamwork and long engagements.
Juan Wetback;-;This is a really fun game with infinite possibilities. But it is buggy as hell sometimes when I enter a vehicle I die instantly
Phoenix;-;This is definatley the best sandbox game out there, it has a great and creative community which have created amazing variants, such as Wasteland or King of the Hill. It is always action packed online and it runs smoothly on most PC's. There is so much to learn and do which is why I find it so addictive and would recommend it to anyone I know.
Cyborg Chicken;-;Amazing graphics!
O.G. PoNcH;-;Yeah  this game. Buggy as  and increasingly so with every god damn update they release.
Spuddy;-;really good game and very enojyable!
PoRSeO;-;Old graphics autodetect set all on ultra and i had 20 fps on high 50 but still feels weird, i run crysis 3 maxed out better then this piece of s, freezes costantly even on menu screen, aweful game. 1/10 the price of this game is just insane worth less then 5 euro
ProGamerElite4U;-;Found out how dlc=money Previous one actually did something better with dlc.
ProGamerElite4U;-;Found out how dlc=money Previous one actually did something better with dlc.
Tyker;-;Fantastic game with a lot of mods. The best military simulator i have played, you should get it if you have the money. The arma 3 Life Mod actually reminds me of GTA V but a lot of more role play in it. I recommend this game 10/10.
Sir Spaghetti of Meatballs;-;Easily the most complete, feature-rich, and versatile mil-sim on the market. Just go look at the Make-Arma-not-War contest that recently highlighted a bunch of that sweet community-made goodness.
MyNameIsNorm;-;very nice game got a bunch of options for game mods
Mr.Face (YT);-;Very good wish i had it played it for free and it is amazing
j0e;-;Worth the buy
alecjaffee;-;this game is odly boring and the games are always never enough
Chiz;-;the aiming and shooting is , ive tried everything i could think of, changing mouse sensitivity and quality but it doesnt seem to have any kind of effect at all, its unplayable, waste of money
Fushko;-;There is a lot to say about this game, I don't even know where to start. Arma 3 is an excellent open world military sandbox, with a focus on realistic elements, and endless possibilities. The infantry play is simply superb, the combat feels extremely fresh and different from other games. The part I love the most about it is that it gets the VERY BASICS right. Rounds are fired from the muzzle of the weapon model itself (rather than from the center of the screen, unlike just about any other FPS), there is the ability to move your head around, and you can see your own body and legs in first person. The maps are huge and detailed, without mentioning the plethora of user-made maps. You can also download maps from the previous games. There is a map editor that let's you do anything, and I really mean it, ANYTHING that you have in mind. Which translates to endless fun. Want to make an urban infantry firefight in the middle of a city? You can. Want to make an air battle with jets and helicopters, and take part in it, or simply watch it from the ground, in the middle of the night? You can. Want to make a tank battle? A combined arms war? A scripted campaign-like mission? Want to just spawn 300 goats at once? All up to you. Co-op with friends is simply one of the most thrilling and fun activities you can experience in PC gaming. PVP combined arms battles with 90 players can be downright insane (although it can be laggy as hell). This game never feels old, given the regular, huge updates, which add core game mechanics to the game (without mentioning the gigabytes of various fixes and improvements). The developers are very active, from discussing with customers to implementing feature requests (even very big ones such as weapon resting and bipod deployement, firing from vehicles, sound overhauling, etc.) And to top it all off, bees cast shadows.
microbrew;-;This game is awesome, i once hit a tank with a hunter, blew him up and no damage to my hunter. Physx's are also amazing i mean like just hit a bump in a atv and does 3 backflips and also IGN rated 69/10
joshb91;-;The graphics are amazing and weapons not to bad.. i have to recommend if you want a combat simulator go ahead. if you like battlefield/cod you will not most likely enjoy it to much...
Peter_Where's_Files? (Djrynn);-;ING BROKEN* SINCE NEW UPDATE....
Welcome to the Rice Fields;-;Tl;DR game is gud, DLCs are  unbalanced . I Have been a Fan of bohemia interactive after the whole Arma 2 Dayz mod craze, i purchased and played arma 2 operation arrowhead and played the Dayz mod and base arma 2. year or two later arma 3 came into beta for 29.99. Naturally i purchased it after how much i loved arma 2. it showed so much potential, i fell in love with Arma 3. The game came out of beta a year or two later not a whole lot added but the core mechanics were there. April 1st 2014, The Karts DLC came to be, offered fun little karts for 4.99, still accessible with out paying that fee. November 4th 2014, the Helicopter DLC came out, offered new helicopters which i was very excited about. i did not have the dlc at the time but I was playing king of the hill and someone spawned in one the new helicopters. I was really infactuated with it, i went up to it to check it out and all i got was a little window telling me to purchase this DLC to have access to this content. I was a little upset but understandable its DLC. It is now April 11th 2015 the new Marksmen DLC just came out and i played it for the first time in a while. me and my buddy hopped on the new end game ctf game mode, everything seemed fine headed out to secure the intel. i hear a lot of distinct gun shots. the new VSS vintorez and the .338 lmg that i fail to remember. I spot an enemy down the street from me near the objective. I take cover, and then peek him with my vermin .45 acp submachine gun. i take 3 shots at him, he is hit notices my position aims and shoots me once in the body and i am immediately dead. Annoyed i respawn and head back out to gather the objective (Intelligence) the site has been cleared and me and three guys move in. i round by a corner and see an enemy player crouched in a firing position. I switch to fully automatic and spray my whole magazine into him (i mean why not) his player model visibly displays the damage done, and yet the man still lives! He turns to look at me with his large lmg (Chambering the new .338 Caliber round) and puts a round straight into my chest once again im put to the respawn screen. yatatata shoot more dudes, kill a guy (Miraculously :]) and attempt to retrive his fire arm. A little window pops up telling me to purchase the DLC to have access to this weapon. At this point i was rather upset, learning i cant use the new weapons without purchase of DLC, The devs even stated the game was lacking something in terms of weapons so this was created. So for something that should have been a free update (Kind of like the weapon resting and face paint etc;) i am quite livid, these weapons completely change the dynamics of fire fights and weapons in general. with these weapons chambering such large caliber rounds every kill requires 1 or two rounds to kill an enemy. How is it fair that because someone paid 15.99 they can decimate infantry as well as vehicles, one of the new DLC LMG's that chambers .338 can destroy almost 3 stryders with one "belt" so thats really fair. that people who bought the dlc have access to weapons capable of destroying the planet while im here with my  on my hand.
King Pootis;-;My first game on A3 brought me the most horrific experience I've ever had in any game, ever. We're on our way to the objective, a small dump east of a town occupied by enemy forces. I'm leading a team of 4 men. We come to a crossroad and I sprint across, telling my men to hold back. I cross a few more times, trying to get a response from any snipers. Nothing. I run, my LMG gunner runs, my medic runs. But I kept my Marksman on the other side to make sure we'd make it across. Anybody seen Full Metal Jacket all the way through? Remember the sniper scene? The marksman takes a round in the leg as we're running and goes down. He then takes two more in the chest. The kid who was playing had some mad acting skills, he played it up to 11 here. He screams as he's being shot. Crawling, drenched in his own blood. "SARGE? YOU AIN'T LEAVING ME OUT HERE LIKE THIS, RIGHT? I-I WANNA GO WITH YOU GUYS! C'MON SARGE, H-HELP ME! C'MON! PLEASE DON'T LEAVE ME!" he died after that. I cried and he respawned. 11/10, would recommend getting.
Peace;-;This is not a game for people who want fast action movie style gaming, this is a game for people who appreciate the finer things. Having done both military service and picked up MILSIM airsoft as a hobby this game is the closest you will get to what goes on in reality. There are experiences you will have in ARMA 3 that can not be had in COD or BF, experiences that will have you shaking from the adrenaline release. One that comes to mind was a mission to destroy an enemy comms tower, I was squad leader of 8 or so AI:s. As we approached the Comms tower and I told my men to go stealth, no firing unless fired upon. We moved slowly taking advantage of terrain, keeping an watchful eye for enemy patrols. Once the tower was in visual range pace slowed even more and I spent the better part of 30 minutes just looking for enemy patrols and advancing to about 200 meters from the tower. There I positioned my men to cover a wide firing arc as I had spotted quite a few patrols moving in and about the tower. I considered opening fire and probably being able to drop a good portion of the enemy before they could zero in on our position. But a firefight is always a risk, and these AI had been around for a few missions and I had started to anthropomorphize them a bit and secondly I might get hit and killed. As I considered how I would start the engagement a sudden hole opened up in the patrol pattern, I realised the tower is unguarded and I had an opportunity to do something I had not considered. I got up and ran as fast as I could towards the tower, all the time expecting the bullets to start cracking above my head. I kept scanning as I ran whizzling through bushes trying to pick a path that the least visibility to any patrols. After what seemed like far too long I reached the tower and threw out a satchel charge and another for good measure, if one would not bring the tower down it would sure attract attention. I turned around and made my way back, as I closed on my men I started ordering them to fall back, hope growing that I might get out of this alive. Falling back to about 400 meters I finally detonated the satchel charges and the tower fell, from there it was just a short run to the truck and back to Command. I had done it. I had pulled off the perfect mission, not a shot fired and all under my command back alive. That is what this game is about.
[13th] Danius;-;Oh man. Where to even begin with this one. It would be an extreme disservice to simply call Arma 3 a shooter, as it is so, so much more than that. Arma 3 is a military simulator. This is a distinction that its developers hold sacred and are proud of, and one to which I can attest is completely accurate and deserved. But its even more than that. Arma 3 is a gaming platform, upon which so much has already been and will continue to be built for years to come. At its core though, Arma 3 in a supremely excellent military sim. The graphics are stunning, the gameplay is excellent, the mechanics are solid, and Bohemia Interactive has done an absolutely amazing job packaging this all together. New comers to the Arma series (as I was) may initially be overwhelmed by the games complex mechanics and decidedly different pace from your typical FPS/shooter. Enemy engagements happen at much greater distance than is typical in the genre and are often brief, brutal, and more times than not will conclude with your demise. There is no handholding here. No mini-maps, no enemy UI icons/indicators, no hit markers, no health bars. If you get shot a couple of times, you will find yourself unceremoniously dispatched. While this creates a high barrier for entry and a steep learning curve for new players, it provides a unique and distinctive play style. Situational awareness, cover, teamwork, suppressive fire, and generally moving purposefully and as if your  depended on knowing what was behind the next ridge or hiding in the bushes are paramount to your success. Add to these infantry mechanics the amazingly rendered vehicles, armor, helicopters, and planes, each with their own realistic mechanics to learn and master, and you end up with a truly amazing military simulation experience. Out of the box, Arma comes with a great single player campaign comprised of 3 separate acts, each containing ~12-15 missions. The campaign focuses on a well crafted story of a military conflict that has erupted over Arma 3s two HUGE islands of Stratis and Altis. You play the part of a NATO soldier who finds himself stuck in the middle of a complex engagement. The campaign is rewarding, and challenging. (I have yet to complete it as Im stuck on one mission that I simply cant seem to complete.) However the single-player campaign is FAR from the end of this title. The mission editing tools have allowed this amazing community to develop some absolutely awesome single player missions, all of which can be downloaded free of charge from the Steam workshop and numerous other sites around the interwebs. I would also recommend you check out the supremely excellent full game conversion single player mods Whole Lotta Altis and Dynamic Universal War System which will provide countless additional single player hours and could be completely stand alone titles in themselves. Oh and the multiplayer, oh god the multiplayer. Wasteland, King of the Hill, Invade and Annex, Battle Royale, Breaking Point, so many Co-Op opportunities, the amazing looking upcoming Epoch (currently in closed Alpha). Im sure there are so many others that I havent even discovered yet. Each of these represent COMPLETELY USER GENERATED and totally disparate ways to play Multiplayer within the Arma 3 platform. By purchasing Arma 3, you immediately have access to each of these completely gratis and each could essentially be considered totally separate game. In wrapping up this lengthy review, Arma 3 is an amazing experience and a true accomplishment in game development. It is the only game in recent memory that I can say with confidence that I never get bored with playing. Bohemia Interactive has made it clear that they plan to support this game for years to come, and they have built something amazing on which the possibilities are truly endless. Purchase this game. Purchase it now. Thank me later. (IF YOU DO NOT FIND MY REVIEW HELPFUL, please leave a comment as to why. I welcome the constructive feedback.)
ArtificialApple;-;This is quite possibly the most emotional shooter I've ever played, and it's not because of the campaign. Crowd around, children, it's story time. One day, not so long ago, my squad had just destroyed an anti-air battery. Our pilot landed, and the rest of the squad boarded one by one. I was about to get in when the rockets started flying. The chopper lifted off, with my pilot saying that he would return in a few minutes. Unwilling to die before then, I rushed to the nearest cover, a small house by a narrow road. I entered to find a ten year-old player who had also been left behind. He explained that he was a sniper and invited me to join his "clan". I politely declined, explaining that my own squad was inbound. As I finished, a Ghost Hawk flew over the horizon. My squad had arrived. This noble child soldier and I were sprinting to the helicopter when the bullets started hitting. The sniper screamed as a 6.5 mm cartridge entered his leg. His shrieks for help were cut short by one final burst of carbine fire as I climbed in the transport. My new friend was dead. 10/10, would experience survivor guilt again.
Sir Quad Kill aka Sir Charlie;-;If you have friends, this is a great game to play with them. If you don't have any friends, this is a great game to play alone. If you don't have the game to play, get the money for it. If you don't have the money for it, get a job. If you don't have a job, rob the bank. If you get arrested robbing the bank, at least you tried.
theconjuring;-;Children play Call of Duty Boys play Battlefield Men play ARMA
Durga;-;After some 1,400 hours on the game, I can say with FULL VALIDITY this game has ruined my life. If you like realistic physics, teamwork, and every form of warfare, this game is for you. 10/10
Runekn;-;Can't tell you if you should buy it or not, but I can tell you this. You will find annoying bugs, highly requested features that isn't there and lack of content if you're not satisfied with what you have. But when you really get down to it, and experience some of the awesome scenarios you can get in multiplayer and custom sp mission, it's something magical you just can't find in any other game. Arma is not a game which you pick up at launch, play the campaign and a bit of mp, and then trow away. You buy it, love it or hate it, and then play it forever or trow it away immediatly. Arma is a game which you can never called finished. There will always be added to it, be it user or official content, fixes, features or optimizations. Hope I expressed myself correctly and that you learned something from it :) If you like realistic shooters and organized large scale multiplayer warfare, this will be your gem! I'll give it a 9/10, simply because: screw bugs, I've used hundreds of hours on Arma 3 that I would never take back. READ: I will not accept random friend requests! If you have a question, please post it in the comments.
Solly;-;It's not a good 'game' for newbies. No, it's not... I use to sit at a place and watch the sunset. I have no idea how to actually shoot, drive and complete missions. It's like my personal sunset simulator. And it's damn beautiful. 10/10
Mr. Bong;-;I have owned this game for a number of weeks now and I have been completely hooked. Great game for the more serious war gamer, not for those who prefer the fast paced combat that you get from Call of Duty series which I consider more for the younger gamers anyway. Arma 3 moves a lot slower and is more squad based than other war games, similar to Battlefield series only slower than that when playing online and you may find yourself on 10 minute helicopter rides just to get into the battlefield and you will be highly satisfied with each kill you make as you know a single round landed by your enemy could be fatal regardless of the weapon they are using. You will have to make good use of any cover you can find and hit the dirt as soon as you hear a bullet crack over your head and then very carefully survey the surrouding area and work out where you are taking fire from as it will usually not be obvious where the fire is coming from and you will find yourself having to hold up for 10-20 minutes in a single location (sometimes longer, I personally have gotten pinned in one location for over an hour) because you are either pinned by enemy fire or it is too dangerous to move forward. You will need to buffer up on your mic communication skills as most players use proper phonetics etc when relaying information to each other on the battlefield such as coordinates and other reconaissance. You can not respawn as quickly as you can in CoD if you are taken down by enemy fire so staying alive is more crucial than any other war game you have played and you wanna hope you are moving up with a squad that has a medic. The graphics are great, the game is a little glitchy at times and the controls take a little getting used to. I recommend buying this game to any serious war game enthusiasts who want to get as close to war as possible (unless doing paintballing or airgunning), and if you do buy the game - I recommend completing the whole VR Tutorial before actually joining a server or playing the Campaign as you will need to really learn all those different keys that may make the difference in a hairy situation in game.
kassontv;-;i like this game very much
(Dain101);-;it was fun willl it llasted
-NGG- Banished;-;8/10 Excellent game, great tactical shooter with first person and third person perspective. Lots of game modes and even more coming out all the time, so many to name and not enough words for them all. Great Campaign very challenging with many challenge modes to also play. Play with friends or by yourself in land, sea and air combat. Weaponry ranging from Pistols to Rocket launchers ATV's to Tanks Hummingbirds to Jets.
Bluetorch;-;400 hours played. Game has really high learning curve but after player gets hang of it there is alot to enjoy. Tons of mods for more hardcore players and others for more casual players. Best played with group of friends but alot of social players who want to team work out there too!
brainboy56;-;this is a very good game
BanishedCloud;-;This is a great game. No matter what you like: a game to mess around in, running around as chickens or a tactical shooter where teamwork is the key. It is pretty well rounded, any role: if it be a fighter pilot or an infantry soldier, is available for use.
Zuikutis;-;This is a very good game I recommend it to every1 the mods are awesome like DayZ and stuff :) 11/10 - IGN
Caliber8600;-;Gotta Be One Of The Best Games i Ever Played i came from playing arma 2 dayZ Mod But When i First played Arma 3 its Was a Whole New Game! New Cars And New Guns! and Mine Blowed of How many Mods There is
jonesdk;-;cant play it,game execution not found
Tuco22;-;I CAN DYVE UNDER TEH WATERZ NAO ERMAHGERD SO KEWL
Pinkamina;-;This game isn't that bad, it lacks quantity of weapons and vehicles though. I would have to say in the long run, ArmA 2 and ArmA 2 OA are better in terms of quality and quantity.
Russian Bear;-;If you like  controls and lack of immersion this game is for you!
Eliphas;-;just don't think of this game as another brainless shooter-runner, this is infantry tatical sim i think. it makes you feel your motal. if you like counter-strike, this may make you crazy. but if you are a sim-gamer, this suits you for the infantry part.
Admiral Akbar;-;Amazing i love it its so realistic :D would say its a amazing game.
Owen;-;Arma 3 is the biggest pile of  I have ever played. It is the worst game engine on the planet and is not optimized at all. It makes gaming pc explode. Its terrible like its gameplay! Do not buy this game at all, for your own safety!
gypterLwe;-;worst game ever i played whats this  graphics and  graphics engine ?????!!!! it eats graphics card without give u at least good graphics note : card is gtx 660 ti sc , ram 16 gb ram and p is core i7 3770 k laggy graphics ,low fps, high ping and high bandwith u need a super computer and 10 mb connection to play this at high graphics and u will still laggy go and see battlefield graphics or games which depend on havok engine how graphics is awesome at long range without any lagg att good pcs
uwiish;-;Great all around game!! Many game types that will keep even the most ADD gamer entertained.
Brohemia;-;When its not glitching, its a great mil sim with a good engine. 15/10
just a potate;-;Best sequal to minecraft since call of duty.
DeluxeQuackers;-;If you like realistic warfare games than you'll love this!
Serapaxson [ABK];-;Buggy as hell, Dlc is basically updates that should have been included in the game for free ? What the hell bohemia, I was excited for arma 3 to be released as i thoroughly enjoyed arma 2 Oa When arma 3 was relelase i was very disapointed I don't think i'll be buying another bohemia game due to the amount you ed your customers around.
Mix;-;This game is very difficult but still awesome, different from any other fps/tps. Get it.
Ferrmosity;-;Awesome game, I love epoch.
Kajman;-;Best Game Played Till Now....
Dead But Dreaming;-;This game sucks... straight up....worst $60 game I have ever bought in my life... its boring...and the controls are stupid as ****
DEMA;-;Buy if you like hacking and greiving! Highly recommended if you are a cheater! Enjoy
Dubstep;-;It's awesome!
AstroSloth;-;I have changed this to a positive review as originally i was very dissapointed with the vanilla of this, only with weapon mods and a3L will you have a fun experiance witht his game
Ritualistic Dave;-;Buggy and unrealistic
SSgt.Kattmat;-;I have played this game nearly 400 hours and it is really worth the price. SO MANY ING GAMEMODES!
McD3rp;-;Great addition to the franchise. Graphics, like usual, look amazing. Draw distance goes forever. Falling 4 feet still kills you. The clouds are pretty. Jumping is still impossible.
Kray;-;Great Mods, Need a decent PC to run it smoothly
TurtleGamer;-;My 1st real experience with ARMA 3: SO, I join this random server, everyone at base, grandpa commander was yapping on to everyone telling us all to get to our squads and so on, didn't really pay much attention, some random bodies on the floor, t-bagged em' while looking at fellow team mate. Suddenly see a group of guys in scuba outfits, thought they looked call, the goto grandpa commander asking for heli, he calls one over, they say I need to join their squad to go with them (whatever that meant) 3 more guys followed me and the scuba guys into the heli not knowing what we were getting into. Inside the heli I joined their squad, after a white we get dropped off on a cliff near the ocean, and team leader says to follow him. we walk like 1k till we see the radio tower, our objective, looked like no one was there, looked easy. Team leader assigned us all a buddy so we'd work as small teams. We move on closer to it, come upon a small hut 300m out of the radio tower and team leader says he's going down with a couple of us while the rest of us stay up to support him. He moves down and they plant the C4 on the tower, team leader says "its gonna blow stay clear" and it slowly falls down. We suddenly start to spot enemies moving on the hill over the tower, veichales, with big guns, small infantry teams, moving quickly apon them. So they get behind a small area covered by bamboo, me and the others including a sniper start taking out enemies on the hill. Teamleader called us all to move in except the sniper, we quickly move in and join upto them. We hold off behind the bamboo for a while and a veichale starts moving in, we all panic and fall back a bit, but he eventually goes away. Teamleader orders us to move up into the small house there was near the tower so we do, we get a small resistance force as we moved in, didn't take long to take them all out, we hold position for a while and teamleader says we were suddenly the only attack force in the AO. Everyone else was at base listening to grandpa commander. We fight off a few more small forces until it began to get dark, all of a sudden it went quiet, all we could hear were crickets. Then out of no where contact from the west, contact on the north we were scattered out around the house, some of us including me take hits, medic came and quickly patched us up so we could continue to fight. Fighting became impossible, some were low on ammo, without night vision you couldn't see a thing and most of us didnt come with nightvision scopes on our guns. Quickly a bigger force moved onto us, veichales battered at us from all sides, grandpa comander says the main assault force had moved in, all souteast of our location, our medic ran out of medkits, we struggled to keep off the enemy and then our sniper left, cut down to a 6 man team we struggled to keep the enemy away. The main force had battled to the center of the AO, when then our team leader gets hit, medic can't revive him. We struggled to fight off the enemy, no more infantry were around but an enemy veichale had us cornered near the house, I realise my buddy wasn't here and we called for him, no answer I told my superior i was going to check on him, as i move up to his position i realise he was out, shot by an enemy, I call it and carry his body back. We try reviving them but no luck, so my superior says we were going to move up to catch up with the other squad, as we began they say the AO was captured and mission was ended, the superior said for us to move up to heli and leave the bodies behind. We sprit toward the propellars we hear of a near by heli, as we approach it, it suddenly begins to take off, the superior shouts "WAIT FOR US WAIT FOR US!" it waited as we all got on, another squad was already on it, we waited for another one of ours to cath up, and he then says the heli was full, and couldn't come back for us, as we all looked at him, he took his own life. The heli began to take off, we didn't say a word the journey back. That, Is ARMA 3.
JamesTP;-;Amazing War Simulator, beautiful with Mods and all-in-all a brilliant game. Many 'o hours really show peoples effort they put into the game, and every minute (even in the load up) is worth it. A must buy. Add-on: The games a heavy load. Really CPU heavy. If you have a good Graphics Card and a bad CPU (which YES I have) run the game on MAXED settings - the FPS boosts a heck of a ton. IT transfers the load onto the card. Happy hunting.
Samisk troll;-;this game is awesome for its multiplayer and campaign and dont forget the editor part, oh gawd how many hours i have spent on editor so yeah i recommend this game if you like action and tactical combat. the dlc's on this game is great, my personal favorite dlc is the heli dlc cause i love to fly helicopters in that game, it has also a go-kart dlc and that's very fun with friends to race with. so yeah i rate 10/10
SOCOMpro12;-;Only played this a couple of hours. I'd say it's all right. Yeah, probably recommend it.
XLGaming;-;This is a great game and i think that you should play this game. This game has fun multiplayer and has mods like battle royel and atlis life.
ToxicSense;-;I love the realism and the many game modes! And there are so many awesome workshop scenarios.
Energize;-;I got a quad kill with a lightning bolt in Zues.
xKrZ;-;A must have!
Nyan Cat;-;Its alright i guess
skret [*] skins;-;rip baconland med leth
Bell Cranel;-;Good game end of story :D
PancakeCats;-;If only this was set in an uncivilised country like Canada or Sesame Street and I could slay the queers and hang them from the back of my pickup and drive down a road in Pakistan.
SpooKy;-;In my opinion, It's not optimized for the PC, but If you have a beast PC and you like realistic war games get it.
DeluxeGamer;-;Its the best, way better than arma 2, way better than i expected it. I highly recomend this to those who play Arma 2, or those who like combat games with huge free roam maps and tons of addons. 11/10
ReCritz;-;If someone asks me what is the best game I have ever played, then without contemplation, I will definitely choose ArmA3. It has the best graphic I've ever seen, it satisfies the ultra-realism I've been looking for (I thought BF series were realistic) and last but not least, it makes gamers to jump into game-making. I doubt games better than this would come out any time because I strongly insist this is the most breath taking and innovative game I've ever seen.
Nevan;-;7/10 - An evolution from previous installments. Nice graphics and solid simulation. Great squad placed multiplayer over a massive 400km sandbox. Lack of content hurts it's score although more is being released and developed. More campaign missions coming this December. Pros: Nice graphics, solid shooter simulation mechanics. More accessable compared to other titles but looses none of it's depth. Great combined arms MP. Cons: Lack of content, only a partial campaign. No training missions and still plenty of bugs remains.
Koala;-;Very Smexy :)
DappaDan95;-;Awesome game from and awesome company. This game has given me hours of fun and with the DLC and free platform updates its juts keeps getting better and better. Highly recommend but you would need a good PC to run.
SpoderMan;-;Beatifull game had a lot of fun banging people.
Russell Slade;-;Amazing Game. So much to do and hours of fun. It is worth paying full price 10/10
SwedishPancake;-;The best game of the 2010s, I have to admit, it is even better than Skyrim. The level of simulation and reality in this game, coupled with the combination of fun and play is amazing. I never thought that a simulation could be this realistic and fun at the same time! Must buy, 17/10, ABSOLUTLEY AMAZING!!! You are an idiot if you don't buy this!
Lvcian 'Guardians';-;Do not purchase.
DontDeny;-;Another great addition to the arma series
Guard Dog;-;Most realistic first person shoother i have ever played
T.Nark;-;I suggest waiting for it to come on sale, then it is definitely worth it. I will forwarn you, the game does not really seem complete at purchase. However, the modding community is amazing and their mods have not ceased in amazing me. I would strongly suggest the mods that add the old arma 2 units and maps (MARSOC and Spetznaz maybe on armaholic for units?). It is really great to go back and see these remastered maps, then playing on them with the updated engine.... WHEW BOY, thats some good stuff. Id say that finding people to play with is really important too, I dont do the altis life games, but i have friends that do and they enjoy it. Finding squads that are nice enough to allow pubbies on are generally the way to go. If you will be playing MILSIM, then for the love of all that is good.... GET TASK FORCE ARROWHEAD RADIO! It will enhance the gameplay experience tenfold. The only real con to it is that sometimes good games are few and far between, but the time you spend to find one is well worth the reward when you get to play! Make sure to star it in your server list. I am not a part of a squad, but if you really want to boost your gameplay, then i would strongly suggest it. Overall, Im not impressed by BI's work, but moreso the modders. (AND TO ALL THE MODDERS OUT THERE... THANK YOU :D) If you wanna game thats run and gun, this isnt for you. If you wanna game that will challenge you and put your skills to the test, this is it. I will honestly say one thing that pisses me off more than anything is the AI's accuracy, but it is possible to change. Nothing like getting capped in the head by and AI with a pistol 45 yards away... I would definitely recommend it to people who are tired of COD or BF, or are like me and never really liked those other two in the first place because I jumped into arma :P Enjoy it and have some good times, you may even make a friend along the way!
Major. Lennox;-;Game not worth the money! UNLESS! You have a super hightech computer! Waist of 45Euro!
Wanye Kest;-;60+ hours later this game still makes no sense. Multiplayer is buggy and laggy. Gamemodes are poorly designed, the only thing that actually makes me play this game is the great editor, it can be really fun to just make giant battles and play though them in different positions and perspectives.
kangaroo166;-;why wont my game start?
Slavic Hitler;-;0/10  microsoft vc redist worst communist software will not install plz halp much kill
Murderface;-;UNABLE TO PLAY MULTIPLAYER, BECAUSE NO LIST OF HOSTS POPULATE THE WINDOW
Hepari00;-;I hate this stupid game. So you stand up in the back of your enemies, standing around the campfire, and they turn around and one-shot me. Seriously, CoD is more tatical than this piece of crap. And the bad thing? One year has passed, but the AI is as godly / dumb as ever. Why did I even bother buying this in Beta... It's laggy as hell, barely playable once  his the fan, and on many multiplayer servers, you can be happy if you get 30 fps, even if you set all graphic options to low. Don't even call this a tactical game. SWAT 4 was tactical. This is not.
Dextrix;-;Can't even explain how good this game is! Love realistic shooters? Theres no doubt you will like this. And if you don't, you're insane!
iNDEPENDENT PiG;-;This game is the reason for my sleepless nights and being late for work. 14/10 would miss work again.
iNDEPENDENT PiG;-;This game is the reason for my sleepless nights and being late for work. 14/10 would miss work again.
A Fluffy Alpaca;-;Can play as goat, 11 out of 10 would reccomend to local radiator
Hentai Grill;-;Great game
IcedVenom;-;Arma 3 isn't for everyone, but if you love milsims then this game does it's job right
Myst;-;Best game i have played give this game 10/10 would recomend to a friend fawking luv this game
Go0dzilla;-;OLD REVIEW - Cause its swaggy get it rekt yolo#FreeWoman Was I high or something? New review is it's pretty good, runs great, and all that.
Chris2578;-;if your pc can handle the amazingness then get it 123.5445454 out of 2
I'mNotGeorge;-;great game
4D Hazard;-;iF IT WORKED I WOULD LIKE IT
milos;-;Great game i just dont like the fact that bans carry over from game to game.
WuZaa;-;Great game. Bohemia Interactive does great work.
Dalran;-;It's a really good strategized tactical 1st/3rd person shooter and I enjoyed playing it, but i could only play on really close local servers because it takes a really good custom gaming PC to run. If you don't have good specs I think you'd only be able to play single player.
B3AST X A1RSOFT;-;i want the game i will be getting it soon this will be a cool game soon once i get it!!!
Room Temperature Legumes;-;Pretty good game, was really surprised to find out my computer could run it. Guns feel a bit flimsy at point (run for five seconds with LMG, aim sway makes you shoot around guy five feet in front of you) but there's a satisfying feeling when you win a gunfight. Also, worst design choice ever - if you played Arma 2, know that the inventory button in Arma 3 is 'I' not 'G'. G, by default, throws a grenade. Just saying.
CAPTAIN NELSON;-;people pretend to be certified pilots, but then you ragdoll to the bottom of the aegean
Bwae;-;Like Skyrim with Iranian soldiers that 420 noscope you from a 1KM with a 9mm pistol they used their  to shoot with.
CobaltSteel;-;Gud game 2 lern armee stoof
MrCyberdude;-;2014 Best Military Simulator available for the general public. make sure you try out the mod, King Of The Hill (KOTH)
x.Stalker1o2;-;Arma 3 if you love Modern Warfighting to a new level and loved Arma 2 then most likely you own this if you Don't then what are you waiting for. If you have not played any of the Arma Series pick this one up you are in for a Real Treat!
Metal as F&#K;-;Really awesome game, runs like poop on my fx8350/290x rig though. It really likes intel processors, being a singlethreaded, CPU heavy game.
SwegCrab;-;why cant i run this ever time i click on the arma 3 short cut it brings me here
GeT_HaTchiLa-M-BenQ;-;awesome experience.!!
diwako;-;Arma 3 and the rest of the Arma series is best enjoyed with either a good organized and not so serious group or friends. Since this game lives by it's user created content there is an editor included that let's you create you own missions. Let those be small or large, easy or tough, you are the creator. Not to forget the steadily growing amount of user created mods. This game is a simulator (sometimes for walking long distances), so do not expect any arcadey gameplay, you get shot, you may live and treat your wounds or you may die instantly. Tactical thinking is the key here and running head on is mostly the wrong thing to do.
Watch in Awe;-;The DLCs are disrespectful towards the players. ArmA mostly deserves a very good reputation due to it's fanbase and community modding content. By adding content you have to pay for they are not only screwing with their loyal customers but spamming you with advertisement if you do not own the DLC for the VEHICLE / whatever you want to use. It's a shame, because ArmA 3 is such a great game. Just like ArmA 2. But because of this, I cannot recommend this game to anyone. Milking the cow is one thing, but forcing you to drink out of it's udder is udderly nauseating.
AOF | Allroy;-;Good game, i recommend king of the hill game mode
Dr. (_)_)=========D M.D.;-;So, you kill ragheads, and then you install mods. 9/11 would buy again
Vanical;-;Everything Simulator 2013
mox;-;GREAT GAME BUY IT
Dawson Inglis;-;This game is amazing! highly reccomend getting battle royale for it
The Valkyrie;-;its good
DaBaX;-;Started the campaign. Proceeded to die dishonored in the mud 50 times in roughly 20 minutes... Best death by firesquad simulator ever. 12 out of 10, would recommend playing.
Great White;-;really really really boring when boring really good when good. 9/11 - IGN too much millitary
Oh wow, lovely;-;>Plays offline 3 hours. >Decides it's enough. Goes multiplayer. >Buys a car >Teleported by a hacker in a strange place. >Gets a parachute from a guy. >The parachute was actually stolen. >Gets shooted by the guy. Best game. 10/10 would stole parachute again.
Sir Cassius;-;Love this game. Would recommend to anyone who has played the ArmA series.
Mang;-;Might be my favorite game.
bombs away;-;this game is so cool
PURPZ;-;i bought this game for $60 and the next day there was a 50% off sale. Not even mad about it. 11/10
GlockManx7;-;i really need to know how to get my money back
Alpha Legion;-;Wow - great game. I really wish I had tried it out sooner, although it is not on sale often. Get it on sale! *EDIT - OK, so Ive played like 20 hrs. I have to say, if this was released in 2013, and its on the verge of 2015 and the game is sooo f'n buggy and unoptimized - it really makes me wonder. That, in a nutshell, is the exact reason I held off on buying ARMA 2, or 3 until almost 2 yrs after initial release... and its still pretty crazy that I have to manually optimize memory and stuff to get even 1/2 decent FPS. And while reading all forums and stuff - why in the hell do I see some go-kart racing DLC? What the hell are they doing over there that they add a go-kart DLC over actually fixing the game? I really enjoy the gameplay (when it runs smooth) but wow what an unoptimized setup (and I have a pretty high end PC). I truly feel like I just bought an early access release. And by the way - do they have a proper english proofreader? I mean, I see typos, missing letters, and obvious grammar slip-ups that are easily noticeable. That alone should be a giant red flag. Well, I hope this gets resolved, but not likely since its been 2yrs since release... good luck Bohemia - if you keep releasing unfinished games, someone will inevitably replace you with a better, more optimized game. Just look at all those hungry game studios and devs - its going to happen if BI keeps putting out shoddy products. Thats the way these things work...
Luke;-;Is good for shooting people with your gun.
Im a Mighty Taco;-;Sorry to say but this game is wasted potential at this point. I hate to say it because you can see how much work they put into the maps, and guns, and im not a programmer but it seems like an amazing feat for a company this size, also the. I put 68 hours of gameplay exploring the content, and online, and trying to enjoy the game, and it is very good sometimes, mostly online. So what issues does this game have? Well first the A.I is still subpar, better than arma 2 but still subpar. Many times my entire team has been wiped out by 1-2 guys because they happen to not be facing them and don't react the way they should, OR one squad mate goes to the other side of a wall and gets shot, and no one comes to his aid. I have managed to be successful, but I have to control every single action of my team to prevent them from getting shot, that it takes away any fun from being a squad leader. The other problem was the graphics and UI of this game make it impossible to spot enemies, I know that they are wearing camofluage but the jagged looking foliage and low contrast make it unrealistically difficult to spot who is firing at you. I think that most of the people giving this game good ratings managed to find a good online server, because that is the only time you get competent teammates and the game could definitly be good then. But much like Arma 2, most of my time online was spent waiting to get picked up, or trying to find out where to go. not the devs fault, but it needs to be known for anyone thinking about getting this game. If you have the patience to find good people to play online with, than I could see the game being fun. If you have the patience to do this, and like simulators you could like it, but the issues this game has killed it for me. If they would just fix those 2 things, I would recommend this game, because they are major issues and would need to be overhauled completely.
Lt. Colonel smith;-;bohemia did somthing right!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! love you bohemia but dayz fix it.
AirAssassin;-;This Game.......Its a large map sandbox designed game.It takes a beastly pc to run it however it will freeze alot over the time that you get it.The trick to learning how to be good at it is teamwork,strategy,tactics, and common sense.You don't need to be the best sniper in the game to have fun and be good at it.Every person counts in combined operations since every person is a part.It has a good modding community and in general a great game.
[EGS]{ARG}HERO;-;why can i write a review don't even have the game lol
Viski Kex :> | tipofthehats.org;-;I PLAY THIS GAME ALOT GOOD GAEM YES FUN
Darth Vader;-;The game is just amazing if you like Arma 2 you will definitely like Arma 3. If you never played that game get it now, you will enjoy it for sure, the simulation is good but not perfect since sometimes he have obstacle that normally in real life you will be enable to do,but you can't in arma 3.But yeah 1 thing is annoying is the crash sometimes you can get in Arma 3. Let me explain my experience when I started for the first time the game. First I open my game I go in multiplayer,and I join a server. All my keys where messed up, so I had to keybind everything after 15mins, I was almost done but I get hit by a car and die and my game crash. So yeah 10/10 would get bump and crash again!
Boxtop;-;I like the game, I played it on the free weekend but I couldn't buy it soon enough while it was on sale, so now I have to wait even longer to buy it, I just really wish they would lower the price because its been 60 bucks since the day it came out...
TaterTotJimmeh;-;"A" is for amazing, "R" is for i'm not really sure, "M" is for magnificent and "A" is for amazing again and 3 lastly 3 times the amazingness (true fact...trust me I'm a doctor)
Epileptic-Boy;-;Bohemia Interactive is doing to ARMA just what EA/Dice does to Battlefield. Content release after content release with no attention given at all to actually 'FIXING THE GAME'.. But I guess that's the sad truth about gaming corporations today..
-Big-Daddy-;-;THe fact that use Battleeye like a anticheats engine is enogh to give a bad rating !
Mas^S ()-SelenA;-;great game 10/10 would play!
pcpubay;-;One of the best games you can buy.
Please Buy Me An AK;-;Most realistic, entertaining military gameplay i've ever experienced. I love how you can make your own senerios and play them. It makes the game have infinite sinerios.
McLovin;-;game realistic and is stradegy if you like a fun challenge you should get the game
Harry Pooter;-;This game sucks bad.
AWP | Cisco;-;Best game i ever played. 10/10
Snippity;-;Spawned killed many civs were the gun shop was then i saw one getting held up so decided to be nice so i shot the bad guy took his stuff nice gun btw then blew the civs head off with my favorite gun the m1911 *BAM* he fell to the ground dead Will do this again but i was kicked off the server 10/10
DaddyFatSack;-;Arma 3 is for Real Cadets.
Banditto;-;it's a good game yeah.. 10/10
dragonkillerz;-;great game good graphics if u like shooters get this
usmc2007;-;LOVE IT !!!!!
Kyle [SNC];-;Great game with a lot of potential to be something more than it is, unfortunately the game engine sucks. After more than 2000 hours on arma 2 and 3, its still the number one complaint. Maybe they'll get right one day? If you like Mil sims, get this. This isn't like COD, you won't be doing any 360 no scopes. You may be running to get into position for over and hour to get to your objective and for that one chance of a shot. Tactics is a must, there is no god mode. Do anything stupid and you will be punished severely. 7/10. (would be 10/10 if they had a better engine)
Big Man;-;decent game but rather shabby compared to arma 2, devlopers cud of done much better stuf but decided not to i cud of done much better job
Streid;-;Still buggy as previous arma's. A lot of frustrating desync. Not much main content, but big mod support. Not worth it.
3.14;-;Very good if you have the comr to run it.
Rezinul;-;really good game lots of cool fetures i think that if i play this to mutch it will get to a point to where i wont stop i recemend you buy it i like it
DeadMoose;-;A helicopter DLC REALLY!?!?!?!?!
pj;-;just purchased this game on Dec 26 2014 ARMA 3 - Digital Deluxe Edition does not work on my I7 PC and the game keeps crashing I would like my funds returned to my account on steam.
Ribblez;-;You can race go-karts. 10/10
caleb.arma;-;Dis be aight
Noob in Training;-;Extremely boring, Instant buyers remorse.
Big Dox;-;Basically ruined a year old my life. RDM in Altis Life Dupe in Wasteland to get Tanks. Cheat in Battle Royale to Win. JustArmaThings
~PinguMaster~;-;DON'T BUY THAT GAME !! Battleye will global ban you for nothing and you will be banned from all server for nothing and you will have to create another account to buy it with 60$ again , only if you throw money from the windows because its the same thing , its disgusting to do that , the game telling us to leave our account and buy the game 2 time , good job Bohemia you introduce this  (Battleye) to your game to ban all player of your game for no reason and win 2x of money for telling to player to buy it again and again ...
Zaedric;-;So much fun! A great change of pace from any other FPS
CLARKIE98;-;I personally think Arma 3 is a terrible game and a waste of my money. The campaign is dreadful and the multiplayer is worse. You can never seem to get a game on multiplayer and when you do you're usally kicked from the server. Campaign... you constantly die and the AI do nothing but also die so you're usaally on your own against an enitre army. This game is not what i expected and no where near what i wanted, i wasted 25 on this game.
Vioxtar;-;Arma 3 has a ton of potential to becoming the all known 'war game' we'll all love and play. It however suffers from major faults which are holding its absolute success back. It suffers from relatively poor performance, art and design inconsistencies, some odd game mechanics, and relatively weak visuals. Bohemia Interactive has a lot to work on, and no, it's not going to be another vehicle DLC pack that I'll be looking for.
Marticus;-;Well good... Recommended
Deputy Doge;-;Its awesome
DaBoss;-;100 Hours of fun! Worth to buy.
WORM;-;AWESOME!! Highly suggest this game. Endless possibilitys.
Inverkip;-;Played over 1000 hours, only to be banned for "hacking."
WienerInABottle;-;I really need help here! When i startup the game it freezes when i load the bohemia interactive logo and i tried all the standard methods of fixing the issue yet nothing worked. Does anyone else have the same issue and/or know how to fix the issue?
Moink&Kilo;-;I bought this game for myself and a friend while it was "on sale" for christmas/blackfriday and now im  that after that sale it went on sale again for even cheaper wtf steam....
Derek;-;Worth it just for Battle Royale.
Johnny Tremain;-;Realistic, hardcore battle simulator. Not for the easily bored. A+
tyrone;-;ARMA 3 is definitely one of the best shooters out there. Such a step up from ARMA 2. It still has bugs and content is still being rolled out, but it's a beautiful looking game and plays smoothly. Negative reviews being posted about the game 'running like ' are just people's poor computers. Definitely recommended. 9.5/10
Kris;-;I hope you enjoy having a decent pc and get under 20 fps on some servers.
Mr.Flames;-;One of the best games I ever bought on steam
Irony Man;-;Can't play multiplayer. Many people has the same problem. I just bought this and it doesn't work.. Just freezes when you try to look for servers.. Money WELL SPENT !
Lane;-;BEST GAME IN THE WORLD and i dont own it :[
Anglez Kid;-;Children play Call of Duty Boys play Battlefield Men play ARMA
OSS1E -Y-;-;For advance players. Not for Eddie Hultman.
[420] Deadmancrave;-;yes its good but for some reson my pc does not want to run t over 10 fps no clue
Sleazin;-;Game of the year 2013-2014 imo
Maximus Decimus Meridius;-;I have not bought this game (yet) but i played it in the free weekend. I loved it, I love how realistic it sounds. Sure the no bipods are a little bit annoying. But the game is continually tweaked and small things will be added in due time. I am a big fan of sound effects, and Arma 3 delivers them on a silver  platter with the best poutine in the world. The purchasing factor on this game was sound effects. After about 5 minutes I found my way into an artillery. Then I fired it. Oh My God, I felt the rumble in my feet (subwoofer on my desk) and the bang in my ears. Arma 3 is the best game if you want the best sound effects in a shooter. Battlefield, Call of Duty, and World Of Tanks, don't even come close to this level of sound effect quality. Arma 3 is in a class of its own, and when I say that I mean that there is not even a teacher because all the other games have to take from Arma 3 in order to be in that class. For me? This is hands down the game of the decade. This game is awesome in sound, graphics, mechanics and realism. I would buy the  out of it
Exodus;-;1. fix the ai intelligence 2. fix the neck rubberbanding 3. fix the fatigue 4. fix bugs such as not being able to heal and forced walking
Gnome Child | Dank Memes;-;I RECOMMEND THIS GAME!! IT IS ALREADY IN BETA!! :D
Ben;-;This game... OMG THIS GAME
Chief @WorkKids;-;Even worsely coded than Arma 2 somehow, looks like it was optimized by chimps using their feet.
Daredformula;-;If your stuck with CSC and Battle Field then your missing out on great millitary games go right across you deadly cross hairs because Arma is a more realistic simulater of battle so if you here a single pop or crackle you may experince the real army feeling of fear. Arma 3 contans great single player and multiplayer action with multible modes to choose from my personal favoret Altis Life which is and rpg mode. Arma 3 also has realistic shooting (as in not so easy to hit someone) with out being careful. I suggest Arma 3 to any 1.
Death-Wolf;-;i got banned form all servers don't play this game it's a waste of money you get banned from one server it's all servers. unless i get unbanned i hate this game.
x.Stalker1o2;-;Arma 3 if you love Modern Warfighting to a new level and loved Arma 2 then most likely you own this if you Don't then what are you waiting for. If you have not played any of the Arma Series pick this one up you are in for a Real Treat!
Metal as F&#K;-;Really awesome game, runs like poop on my fx8350/290x rig though. It really likes intel processors, being a singlethreaded, CPU heavy game.
SwegCrab;-;why cant i run this ever time i click on the arma 3 short cut it brings me here
(C4)Romme434;-;well had game for a bit, not worth the $$ id say dont buy this game, this game feels like it was made for the year 2005. games choppy its not a smooth shoooter, mapes are boring looks like a shity run down russian cold war town..
sexy bagel;-;Right from the git-go you are in a virtual reality which is basicly training, you get familiar with the controls and play it a few good 3 or 5 mins Then you get farther in the game and you realize, the entire game is about driving around a basicly endless map that has a few houses and such Pros and Cons Pros Fun multiplayer shooter, even eithout the multiplayer great level design Cons Really terrible graphics it haunts me to this day, like those targets AFTER the vitrtual reality looked like tan pieces of plastic The controls were so sencetive I couldn't go down a simple flight of stairs. My overall rating? 3/10 still better than cod though
MrAlwaysKarma;-;Can someone please buy Arma 3 as a gift to me please :(???? You see, I am very poor and I just cant afford a game like Arma 3. I just love this intense game and it has a wonderful sensation. I wish I could just get my hands on it but I dont have the required amount of mey just yet. Im just begging anyone out there that is kind to buy me this game as a gift. It would touch my heart deep inside me ;). Im crying now as I type. If anyone out there has a heart that is strong enough to be generous I would Highly appreciate it :). Most people won't listen but it will be awesome. THANKYOU!!! ;)
Soap;-;I don't know what to say about this game but heres a pancake recipe! Ingredients: 100g plain flour 2 eggs 300ml semi-skimmed milk 1 tbsp sunflower oil or vegetable, plus extra for frying pinch salt Method: 1: Blending in the flour: Put the flour and a pinch of salt into a large mixing bowl and make a well in the centre. Crack the eggs into the middle, then pour in about 50ml milk and 1 tbsp oil. Start whisking from the centre, gradually drawing the flour into the eggs, milk and oil. Once all the flour is incorporated, beat until you have a smooth, thick paste. Add a little more milk if it is too stiff to beat. 2: Finishing the batter: Add a good splash of milk and whisk to loosen the thick batter. While still whisking, pour in a steady stream of the remaining milk. Continue pouring and whisking until you have a batter that is the consistency of slightly thick single cream. Traditionally, people would say to now leave the batter for 30 mins, to allow the starch in the flour to swell, but theres no need. 3: Getting the right thickness: Heat the pan over a moderate heat, then wipe it with oiled kitchen paper. Ladle some batter into the pan, tilting the pan to move the mixture around for a thin and even layer. Quickly pour any excess batter into a jug, return the pan to the heat, then leave to cook, undisturbed, for about 30 secs. Pour the excess batter from the jug back into the mixing bowl. If the pan is the right temperature, the pancake should turn golden underneath after about 30 secs and will be ready to turn. 4: Flipping pancakes: Hold the pan handle, ease a fish slice under the pancake, then quickly lift and flip it over. Make sure the pancake is lying flat against base of the pan with no folds, then cook for another 30 secs before turning out onto a warm plate. Continue with the rest of the batter, serving them as you cook or stack onto a plate. You can freeze the pancakes for 1 month, wrapped in cling film or make them up to a day ahead.
Samisk troll;-;this game is awesome for its multiplayer and campaign and dont forget the editor part, oh gawd how many hours i have spent on editor so yeah i recommend this game if you like action and tactical combat. the dlc's on this game is great, my personal favorite dlc is the heli dlc cause i love to fly helicopters in that game, it has also a go-kart dlc and that's very fun with friends to race with. so yeah i rate 10/10
Epileptic-Boy;-;Bohemia Interactive is doing to ARMA just what EA/Dice does to Battlefield. Content release after content release with no attention given at all to actually 'FIXING THE GAME'.. But I guess that's the sad truth about gaming corporations today..
House;-;Great game, hate that the dlc comes up in my game, I would buy for the right price, purchased carts, maybe if helicopers was priced around $5.00 that would be exceptable, Since at this time I dont have it, I would like to see the DLC ads in my game gone, Mods and DLC are great dont get me wrong, just no need for it in game.
A very scared cat;-;Spent 60 dollars for this game played it alot played the alpha and beta to test the game then today got battle eye banned for no reason and can't play one of my favorite games ever, it seems like bohemia interactive is so cheap they have to use battle eye, a screwed up hacker security setup that bans people who do nothing I was on yesterday play altis life then today I get on to go play with a friend I get a ban message, they are too cheap to use VAC that actually works and doesn't ban people that do nothing it bans people that do hack and break the game I have also been banned on arma 2 OA and I sent a support message to battle eye, and bohemia interactive, and then I got a bot that messaged me back saying that I need to go to steam and I did I went to steam and I got a message from one of they're support consultants an actual person not a freaking bot I commemerate steam for this and I scould bohemia interactive and battle eye. I will be missing out on arma 3 life, city life, battle royale, and many other fun game modes because I get banned for no reason by battle eye.
the real MLG OSHY;-;Glitchy, unfinished, overhyped, overpriced game finishing DLC, carried on the back of DayZ and semi popular Arma 2 mods, constantly broken controls, horribly unoptimized, and the most unrealisitic realistic shooter out there. Garbage at it's best.
Rogue Ranger;-;Arma 3 is in my opinion, one of the best shooter's out there! its tactical and takes alot of teamwork. you can play singleplayer which is fun, but you get the best experiance playing with friends and being able too use your teamwork and tactics to complete tasks. the games graphics are stunning especially if you run it on ultra, the map is HUGE! it can take you about 30 min just to drive across, the game can also be easily edited using the editor and there are many fun game modes such as zeus that you can play! all in all i give this game a 9.3/10 its addicting!
JoniSaints;-;Amazin buy it play it make love to it
sonicslender;-;best army game yet
BlackDog9;-;This game is great. There is a lot of intensew firefights that go on in the main game, like the campaign, or some multiplayer modes like King of the Hill, or Wasteland, but where the real fun comes from is altis life. Altis life is a RPG multiplayer game mode. You are a civilian, and u can become a cop, or be a rebel and sell drugs. Very, Very, Very fun. 11/10
[GLG] beach;-;Truly  game.
ikke0666;-;this game has to mainy glitsjes that the have to pay the players!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
trevor.yerman;-;I do not recommend this game unless you have dedicated friends to play with. I would wait for GTA5
kritschtof;-;holy  this game has more bugs and errors than windows 2000
SORCIER;-;Campaign is cool until you have to control your AI team... then it becomes kind of boring since the AI doesn't do quite what you asks of them and they end up dying pretty easily.. Mods seems to be ok although if you are an Arma 3 rookie it's a little hard to play at first. Cool game but wouldn't recommend it if it's not on sale though.
SucH aim;-;This game is very unrefined. If you play the campaign, use the ENDMISSION cheat because some of them bug and some of them are impossible (not kidding.) Some missions are fun. I went online and tried some multiplayer. Just some dudes driving around in vehicles, nothing fun there but I might try more later since I spent money on this game. Overall I don't recommend the game. It's clear that you need to modify the game with mods and scripts but the base game and campaing should be involving, fun and consistent.
Cpt. Kangaroo Pimp;-;What a  pile.
PineApple on holiday back 2 week;-;Ok so this review is quite short and you probably think it's really stupid but anyways. This game is amazing from the user created mods to the interesting missions and level editor. I got this game about a year ago and instantly got hooked to the King of the Hill mod my first day of playing it i got to about rank 12 and i loved every second. The next day i started playing some more but when i logged on i was banned why? No idea ws admin ban (random numbers i don't care about) I thought it was just that server so i tried joining another banned tried another banned until i realized i was banned from all servers. This especially sucked because i had just baught the game and i was not hacking i have played flashpoint arma cold war arma 2 arma 2 oa and never cheated/hacked in those games. Due to this incident i can not recommend this game as i wasted my money and only bothered to do this review now because i watched a RhinoCrunch video "Sniping 101" which was awesome and i hungered for arma but i never satisfied it.
sithcyclist;-;Well, So far arma 3 has been an excellent game! Except for one problem. I CANT PLAY ANYMORE! So I get on arma and go to play wasteland and then I find a server, Join it, choose my role, and then i get the loading screen for the server. As i hear the arma 3 backround noises, Battleye justs ruins everything. "You have been kicked off the server (Client not responding) I would like it if someone from bohema or battleye did something about it. Ive only played for three days and this happened. I dont know how to fix it. So i spent $40 on a piece of crap that wont let me play. All I have to say is that Battleye should be removed. Theres thousands of more servers to go play on. Let them hack! How about you do the work instead of a client that doesnt work! I love arma 3 but sadly, this is what keeps me from playing it! This was 92% of the games I play. But iI cant play it because you guys wont fix it. So far WE HAVE! Ive seen other ways to fix it but none have worked for me. But instead of keeping players on by taking away some hackers (As in the ones that dont know what there doing) You taking away 1/3 of the population of arma! And the sad thing is, YOU KNOW ABOUT THIS! Its been on your forums! Its been sent to you! BUT YOU HAVENT SAID ANYTHING! I am just dissapointed that you made an excellent game that 1/3 of the people that bought it cant play! I just hope you read this and realize that your game is going downhill. - One less player
Jawwwdin Smith;-;9/11 would bang
Filthy Fish;-;Like Arma 2 except ly optimized
PyroPanda;-;If you liked Arma 2, you will love this even more.
usmc2007;-;LOVE IT !!!!!
AstroSloth;-;I have changed this to a positive review as originally i was very dissapointed with the vanilla of this, only with weapon mods and a3L will you have a fun experiance witht his game
Ritualistic Dave;-;Buggy and unrealistic
SSgt.Kattmat;-;I have played this game nearly 400 hours and it is really worth the price. SO MANY ING GAMEMODES!
A Fluffy Alpaca;-;Can play as goat, 11 out of 10 would reccomend to local radiator
Hentai Grill;-;Great game
Major. Lennox;-;Game not worth the money! UNLESS! You have a super hightech computer! Waist of 45Euro!
TC9700Gaming;-;good game recomend it to people like my self and others who like virtul reality game,fighting,action and rpg love it great job bohemiea thanks again good job
Noble5707;-;personaly i envy this freaking game. i love it! the great graphics, combat, and i love how immersive the game is. its easily one of my favorites on steam i played for a bout a week and never wanted to stop. if only i didnt get so many lag spikes and if my PC were better. but regardless of the problems my PC has i would play every day if i could. i highly recommend this game to any experienced PC gamer.
Doobie-Wan;-;as i write this the Australian military would use a sumilation like this if not, better. thats why win wars ppls... America uses AA3 sim games thats why they ask for our help!.... enuf said.
Microsoft Word;-;Was banned from dayz since they had battle eye, cant play arma because ban was carried over from another game. Dont buy if you were banned on any battle eye server
GeneralsAlert [T];-;The reqirments are WAY too high and too good for my Pc to handle
ApexShotZ[1stGLD];-;So along time ago i did a review on this game. But now im older and i understand more about what i said so heres a new one. I love this arma its not as good as cold war or Arma 2 but its still just as much fun. I play this one alot and as im writing this im playing it i do think you should get the game because its alot of fun and has alot of things you can do in it like.... King of the hill, Life, Coop and much much more What i like to do is go in the editor and make mission for myself and my friends and we have alot of fun with that also theres so many mods if you dont like the factions in the game you can just go online and download more.
FrenZie;-;I only have 8 hours on this game but I've already had a ton of fun on the game. It's a great time but you should probably buy it from  or when it's on sale.
QMQ Mr.Dragon;-;I have no words.....What can i say?? 11/10!!!! Nice gameplay rly fun nice graphics and its so good! + some great dlcs [dlc]
offline j;-;would buy
Lonesurvivor112;-;The best army simulater out there. Arma 3 Give you many differnt choises to kill someone, weather it be a heli,plane,tank or by gun its still fun. You can play this for hours. One thing i reccomend is that you play on a wasteland server. Save up and get yourself a tank noob before you die!
RPGesus;-;No jump button. Stops trickshotters. 11/10
Good_Night*;-;I enjoyed it! hope they make it free for ever someday.
[TF:GO]Shadow Warrior;-;This game is great. One of the better shooters i have played. very real and the gamemodes i have played are very fun. if you are consdering buying this game then dont hesatie and get it today
Schmime;-;Best/only millitary sandbox simulator
Aleksandar;-;I dont like the game bcs its like another type of fps you cant jump...i still havent figured it out yet anyway...you USE SPACE FOR USE FFS WHAT GAME DOES THAT....in sandbox takes 100 hrs to find your friend...i still havent figured out a better way to get closer anyway....admin spamming airplanes and +100k$......SO i give this gameeeee 69/420. P.S its fun when you after 10k hours get to a ing gun store and 2 armored trucks fly into you and you're friend and you both die...
Cvhelp;-;Great game, much quality.
MR. MUFFIN;-;really good game but if you have played cod or cs you might use some time to get used to the controllers :D
|TTL| TheTrueRikky;-;This game comes with constant fun and different types of gamemodes and a massive community of mods!
ITS TIME TO GET SNIPING!!!!;-;great game but they hafto inprove the grapics a bit
Lt.Bob.Frankie;-;it is so realistic and like the army nice game Europe
BlackNinja(IsraelGamer);-;bad game first impression in the multiplayer i got into heli with random player, so alot lags! the heli fly forward suddenly It flew backwards and it repeats itself after 5 minute pilot committed suicide with me -_- So I decided to play the gameplay story mode... i got i died so many times i could not progress in the game there are moments I could Save and a lot more moments i could not Save the game running 300 m in the forest really?! and die in the process and do it again more 100 m!?!!!! so I quit I think I'm going back to play Battlefield 4
Flirtatious Flamingo;-;cod is better
ooko0;-;Very complicated game. No one helps you in game they just kill you and tell you to learn to play... how can i learn to play when you keep killing me? Don't buy this game.
la lyfe;-;Don't get people to download the game for free, then charge them to play the following day.
Kyle Crane;-;Arma 3 is really fun glad i bought it
hrjaren;-;No guglovo nor toxin traktors. I think I'll pass.
haziqbooster;-;i just bought this game...but i cant play the multiplayer...the screen will froze.. i look for the solution but nothing happens.. i dont have killer network manager(cant find one), lower my ping and soo on but nothing happens...please i beg of you please help me fix this problem..i realy want to play this game... i just bought this game using my own moneyi realy wanted to play this game.please i beg of you help me
red striker 27;-;why cant i play i downloaded the game and it coms up with another fing and it says i have to perches it but its in my steem libery
Twennon;-;Multiplayer is laggy as . Single player is just ing stupid, spend most of your time out of breath in a bush waiting to recover or being shot by the AI who take 5 bullets then still manages to kill you with one bullet. Then just when you think you completed the mission, you step on a land mine and die. you then have to restart from an auto save point which is another 500m walk away from where you last was.
j3TR10o;-;NU LUATI CA DUPA PLATITI DUBLUI FUTAL IN EL
SALT;-;Arma 3 is really fun, but sometimes can get really boaring when not playing wiht anyone or without interacting with other players.
Sheriff Kerry;-;10 frames per second of ing yes
Jim Lahey Trailer Park Supevisor;-;excellent game. Its much more slow paced than a BF game but its very fun. Nice and strategical like.
WiKKiD;-;Very, very, very Beautiful and Awesome game! The graphics are absolutely amazing, the gameplay is realistic and awesome. Overall rating for Graphics and all, 100/10! Definitely recommended! If you like realistic military combat simulators, this game is strictly for you!
TH3 MATALAN;-;yet again another epic shooter, this game is fun and a big improvement with dlc and online content
drgame;-;Great stragistic shooter, and really realistic
itzxjosh;-;Fun game, It's very boring if you have about a handful of players, like 5 or 6, at least on the server I played on first, but then I joined a server with 112 player max that had about 97 people already. Total chaos, very exciting, altho I eventually got booted from the sarver for side channel spam, as it so named it, they were kinda dickish with thier rules on that server for some reason. Still it has great potential :) 8.2/10
Ace of Losers;-;This game is one of the more realistic games in my library..(probably the only one). While not one of my personal favorites, if a semi-realistic military combat simulator is what your after then it is a must have. If you arent looking for something too realistic there are many public servers that take the game and make it into a new game such as Altis life which basically transforms it into a criminal simulator. Overall it is a fun game if you are looking for what it is designed to be.
torins444;-;i feel this game should heve included some form of a gta like free roam cause I was kinda expecting to have the oportunity to explore the world I'm aware that there were mods that could make this happen but I dont realy like having mods take up more memory space of a game that is already about ten gigabites
bayfield32;-;first i want to say that this game is amazing and i loved playing during the free weekend. however, i have a major issue. i came onto steam to purchase the game, thinking it was still 50% off, but when i checked it was full price again! after rereading the declaration of the sale and free weekend i realized that it said that the sale ended on Monday, yet there were people saying they bought it on Sunday. this is where i got confused: the free weekend trial for Arma 3 ended on sunday at 10pm. the sale itself ended on monday. i thought that meant i could purchase it half price on monday, but i see that it is full price right now. does this mean that in order to actually buy the game (because you cant do so while it is in your library during ther free weekend) i had to buy it between 10pm and 12pm at night before monday? tell me if im right or i misread the article. PS: sorry if this has to go into a special help section or somethign, because i just couldn't find one. EDIT: of course i found the help section AFTER i posted the question. sorry about that.
ronniemota;-;CAN SOMEONE PLEASE MAKE A MOD TO FIX CONTROLLS SO THAT ITS SIMILAR TO COD OR BATTLEFIELD WHEN USING A CONTROL;ER
God;-;This game is not as good as Arma 2 and the mods are worse but at least you can play battle royale on it (sometimes).
Freddie Mercury;-;Spends $60 bucks PC cant handle the game Goes to egghead/ebay and buys a graphics card Total dollars spend on this game = $590 plus shipping and handling
N@sHuL;-;Am I brain dead? I don't understand all the hype for this game. Someone PLEASE enlighten me. The good part is that this seems like a very realistic military sim with stunning visuals. The bad? Where to start? The netcode is a joke, even an insult to a game which claims to be "online". Players and vehicles teleport around the map, colision between vehicles rarely works, bullets take 1 second to travel 5 meters (I tested it on the rabits on a server with 50 ping). The performance oh my the performance. On the lowest possible settings I am unable to maintain 30 (THIRTY) FPS on a server with 50 players. "Get a better pc you f***tard". This rig can run Battlefield 4 maxed out on 64 player servers, with the lowest ever recorded FPS at 40. The servers and the community are not what I expected at all. I expected coordonated military operations. The only 2 game modes which seem to be played are ALTIS LIFE RPG which is a cops and robbers open world RPG and KING OF THE HILL which turns into a mosh pit with no rules and absolute chaos. Again someone please explain to me why this game is praised so much. EDIT: It is not all bad in this game. I do not understand why but on some modes and on some servers the netcode and framerate are alot better. Also you can find a few people doing what you expect from a game branded as a military sim, actual coordonated military operations. Overall it is a mixed bag but worth a look.
PineAppleJerky;-;someone stole my pants and i blew up my friend with an rpg 11/10 would bang IGN
MillerTime;-;Best game in my mind. Started playing ARMA 2 back when it came out and the amount of mods you can get for both is amazing but this game takes it a bit further. I can spend hours playing dress up and making meth in my underwear, nothing else compares. And if you want to play with milsim groups there are plenty out there. You can go diving with the female mod so you can have your babe with you, go sky diving then watch the sunset together. 11/10 will try to hit on that chick again.
Shroderman;-;It was very fun while I could play it whilst I had for free but now its been removed but overall this game is very fun and the multiplayer is very entertaining I highly recommend this game 9/10
Flame;-;I became actually generally proficent in combat knowledge and tactics with this game. Thanks, Bohemia; I can be soldier man now.
CherryS;-;Starting to hat arma 3 beacause i every time i try downloading it wont download and dev dont even respond to you!
WAROFTIMEWW3;-;awsome!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
Slick Willeh;-;Doesn't suck
SwiftCola;-;i like taking my pants off in a war
Battleroid;-;Clunky and boring as ever.
vazybot;-;i played this game now 1500 Hours and its awesome. So many Mods to play Like BattleRoyale Wasteland King Of The Hill Altis Life. 10/10
Pirskatti;-;I may not have even played 10 hours of this game at the time I am writing this review but THIS GAME IS SPLENDID.
Fastening127;-;It has potential but definately is not there yet.
illuminati;-;NO faze clan NO moms with camera 4.5/10 IGN needs MLG
Not Loreans;-;Better than Arma 2. Added snipers already!
Heavy Metal;-;Simulator of a future war.
Player1;-;Diz geym verry laggy and low fps
Superskunk73;-;The Zeus dlc was apparently installed on 12/31/1969.........
SSTR;-;Do not buy this game untill developers fix this problem! you will be sad a lot... (explaining the reason in following) shortly demostration whom needs visual proof: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=vDMdzwanxnY for those whom just wants to read: This game's engine is not using your graphics card & cpu properly to give you a good gameplay. even if you have 3000$ gaming rig the best you can get is 20-40fps. If i put every single graphics to very low or disabled(shadow etc.) ... i get 22 fps... If i put everything to ultra settings including AA & renders guess how much i get... ... ... 21FPS! ... ... this game is veeeery badly optimized and engine is failing hard on hardware usage. Developers are not caring about the issue since arma 2 its same problem all around!
Microsoft Word;-;Was banned from dayz since they had battle eye, cant play arma because ban was carried over from another game. Dont buy if you were banned on any battle eye server
GeneralsAlert [T];-;The reqirments are WAY too high and too good for my Pc to handle
ApexShotZ[1stGLD];-;So along time ago i did a review on this game. But now im older and i understand more about what i said so heres a new one. I love this arma its not as good as cold war or Arma 2 but its still just as much fun. I play this one alot and as im writing this im playing it i do think you should get the game because its alot of fun and has alot of things you can do in it like.... King of the hill, Life, Coop and much much more What i like to do is go in the editor and make mission for myself and my friends and we have alot of fun with that also theres so many mods if you dont like the factions in the game you can just go online and download more.
QuietVolcano;-;this is a recommendation
TC9700Gaming;-;good game recomend it to people like my self and others who like virtul reality game,fighting,action and rpg love it great job bohemiea thanks again good job
Noble5707;-;personaly i envy this freaking game. i love it! the great graphics, combat, and i love how immersive the game is. its easily one of my favorites on steam i played for a bout a week and never wanted to stop. if only i didnt get so many lag spikes and if my PC were better. but regardless of the problems my PC has i would play every day if i could. i highly recommend this game to any experienced PC gamer.
AtomSplitter;-;I played the weekend trial of this game, and it was outstanding I must say. The graphics are amazing, the weapons are realistic, the world is highly detailed and amazingly big, the multiplayer is great fun, generally an astounding experience.
herrbiermann;-;Terrible PC customization. FPS drops on multiplayer make it almost unplayable.
Stanley;-;Terrable UI really overly complicated controls which ruin the experence also game runs really badly low FPS. Boring clearly for train spotters and virgins only. 1/10 utter rubbish.
oavotoc;-;Poorly optimised, couldnt get more than 20fps no matter what settings i tried. Tried enabling hyperthreading through shortcut perameter and that didnt help. A lot of people online with high end hardware also report low frames.
Dazh of Dankest Memes;-;So boring and Broken Should be free permanately 0/0
GEORGEVASS;-;nice game nice graficks i catn say any more i NEED TO PLAY!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
QuietVolcano;-;this is a recommendation
Redemption;-;Some good stuff is waiting for you. I recommend it!
cogaming99;-;personly it was a waste of money. i did not like it what so ever
anarky321;-;i constantly felt like i was cutting this game slack for the scope of it's map but in the end the campaign is pretty AWFUL, way less interesting or even realistic than the original OFP (which is a blast btw), they've done almost zero to make controlling your AI squad even remotely interesting or intuitive, the gunfights feel very clunky, performance is meh , graphics are POOR by today's standard even on max settings, multiplayer is often a lagfest here's a word about military realism - most SP missions have you go in either alone or with a squad, ingress is mostly on foot so is egress, there are zero radio options for backup or any kind of coordination, i didn't even find an option to choose with position in a vehicle an AI should take, so you are alone and you get wounded trying to take on an enemy base? can't call for backup and good luck egressing on foot, even at 4x speed while your character grunts like a pig in labor..its certainly nothing approaching realism...i was in the infantry this isn't how warfare even remotely works id say that Arma2 SP was far better in this aspect with vehicles and a way to call a helicopter to pick you up and drop you off...it felt way more intuitive overall no i would not recommend this game, having a giant map doesn't excuse all the above mentioned issues, also having a gigantic map and a 75 or 100 player limit is more of a frustration than a benefit id say if you want a good military game either play OFP or Arma2 campaign both are rather good
TacticalGameBoy;-;12/10 Best Millitary Simulator
Mr.Hemiroids;-;this review is from someone new to the Arma series and military simulators. The most enjoyment I have found from this game has to be the scenario editor. If you enjoy map editing and/or scenario editing I would highly recommend this game. Also the multiplayer is quite enjoyable if you find a good team or good scenario. The game is graphically gorgeous. Has some of the best lighting effects I've seen since Metro. On the downside. Your character fatigue is ridiculous. For being a simulator you will immediately die if shot. But on the other hand you have to shoot the AI several times before they will. The game can be very complicated at times if you're not familiar with this like myself. All in all it's a very good game if you're willing to put the time and effort to learn everything.
Duck's;-;Its good!
circuitloop;-;wow it's like i paid for arma 2 again.
Fallen;-;F*cking best game ever and lots of diffrent game modes
El Chapo;-;really great fps game. theres not much wrong with this game, it is really fun to play
Pluto;-;One of the worst games I have ever played
The Sexy Cactus;-;Great game it is addictive and there are lots of great community made mods to play with when you and they range from the interesting to the rididulous. HIGHLY RECOMMENDED
EnragedN3wb;-;A great step forward from Arma II, Arma III is a beautiful military simulator with infinite possibilities! There are hundreds if not thoudands of things you can do in this game, no matter what your taste, and more are being added every day with the steam workshop. This is a must-have game for anyone who enjoys a good military shooter, however, bear in mind this is an ARMA game! There WILL be desync, and there WILL be other quirky bugs related to the physics engine! All-in-all though, I believe the fun that can be had in this game FAR out weigh the small problems that you will find. I HIGHLY recommend this game!
Redbreaker47;-;Damn it colonel, shut up!
Crim;-;Tons of bugs, the AI is horrible, the enemy AI can shoot your  off from across the map, commanding the AI is a , trained soldiers can't keep their weapon still after sprinting 5 meters, C-3PO has smoother movement than the player. I know this is a milsim but it doesn't play like a sim at all, controls are confusing and there is too many of them and they're spreads across the keyboard making me feel like i have to use both my hands on the keyboard. It feels like I'm trying to fly a spaceship, not make a human do simple everyday movement. Yes I know I can place my own keybinds but what's the point of making the controls stupid like this in the first place? Flying planes and choppers seems to be harder than it was in arma 2, I'm not sure if anything is changed or if it's just been a long time since I've played Arma 2 so I'm not gonna criticize that. As far as tanks and other land vehicles go it has the same problem as controlling the soldier, stiff and confusing, and the "instructions" aren't really helping. If you like the feeling of actually having control of the charcter you're playing. Don't get this
trollface12341234;-;AMAZING GAME but there are some problems -glitchy missions: the f*cking AI can't walk past a godd*mn wall and i have to restart the whole thing -failure to present the battle eye login thing: it says its running but its invisible AND I CAN'T PLAY THE F*CKING GAME BECUASE OF IT NOW
Hippocriticals;-;It's great.
assassin19132;-;it said a long time ago the free version was out for a day left i download it and the sell was over i play it 1 time an now it says have to buy the game now whats up with that
ndog197;-;its ok the garphics are good olnly if everytime you try to connect to server you go COMPLEATLY OFFLINE its like it cuts your whole intire connection to the internet
Danky Kong;-;anyone who is looking for a realistic military experience unlike call of duty and stunning graphics this is the game for you because this game is war,it is hard to play without exitment when the health in this game is realistic meaning one stray bullet can mean death,so yes i recomend this game, it has alot of content and even more with the steam workshop,it is a very good game with a great community,and it is probably one of the best games i have played on steam.
Novack;-;I've only played a little, I like it alright I guess.
Dariush;-;i do not own this game 10/10 would bang
Revolver Bossalot;-;Only played a few hours, but I'd buy it again if I could.
PwnNu;-;ArmA is a great game. Sometimes it can get boring but doing op's or campaign mission that are custom can be a blast to do with your friends. Overall I would recommend this game to all of my friends.
Dragonite [Mike];-;Great game and fun gamemodes
SwiftCola;-;i like taking my pants off in a war
Battleroid;-;Clunky and boring as ever.
milk;-;I love milk but I did not love how much less content this game had so good day to you and I am not a good pooper
Kreker;-;Why are you still here? Just to laugh? Every night, I can feel Arma... guns... even BF2... the fun I've lost... the games I've lost... it won't stop hurting... it's like they're all still there. You feel it, too, don't you?
ksa666;-;good game but sometimes drop fps most of the time
Monty;-;A fun game with a good mod support but still, it has its disadvanteges, like when u die, the ragdoll animations and u can get shot 50 times and walk away, still pretty good
Mr.Black;-;Super tactical tacticalness of being tactical 10/10 military simulation again. The book is way better and more tactical. But still tactical.
Canceled Fish;-;Got in a truck. Didn't have a wheel. 10/10 game.
Joker;-;1/10 would play arma 2 again.
JDuesbury;-;I've only played this in wasteland but i would say it is amazing.
Ace of Losers;-;This game is one of the more realistic games in my library..(probably the only one). While not one of my personal favorites, if a semi-realistic military combat simulator is what your after then it is a must have. If you arent looking for something too realistic there are many public servers that take the game and make it into a new game such as Altis life which basically transforms it into a criminal simulator. Overall it is a fun game if you are looking for what it is designed to be.
torins444;-;i feel this game should heve included some form of a gta like free roam cause I was kinda expecting to have the oportunity to explore the world I'm aware that there were mods that could make this happen but I dont realy like having mods take up more memory space of a game that is already about ten gigabites
bayfield32;-;first i want to say that this game is amazing and i loved playing during the free weekend. however, i have a major issue. i came onto steam to purchase the game, thinking it was still 50% off, but when i checked it was full price again! after rereading the declaration of the sale and free weekend i realized that it said that the sale ended on Monday, yet there were people saying they bought it on Sunday. this is where i got confused: the free weekend trial for Arma 3 ended on sunday at 10pm. the sale itself ended on monday. i thought that meant i could purchase it half price on monday, but i see that it is full price right now. does this mean that in order to actually buy the game (because you cant do so while it is in your library during ther free weekend) i had to buy it between 10pm and 12pm at night before monday? tell me if im right or i misread the article. PS: sorry if this has to go into a special help section or somethign, because i just couldn't find one. EDIT: of course i found the help section AFTER i posted the question. sorry about that.
Superskunk73;-;The Zeus dlc was apparently installed on 12/31/1969.........
Flarin;-;Way better than Battlefield 3 and Arma 2. It plays smooth, it feels right. Just. ing. Awesome.
ultratoilet;-;its very fun game buy it now !
TheOnlyUser;-;It has dumb cops 21/10 ign
GroxazGaming;-;I can write a review, but I don't own it? Loominati comfuurmed! Duuhhhh Seems like a good game, i'll recommend it. Cool cool.
Allahu Devinsaur;-;After the very high paywall for the initial game, they try and charge you 16 dollars just for a weapon pack of 7 guns which effectively doubles the amount of the vanilla weapons. This game seems like a cash-in like most triple-A titles.
Wickednavyman;-;The BEST GAME EVER
obiewon;-;I have never played this game but Steam still wanted me to write a review. I give this game a 0\0
Drizzle;-;Great Game...
Deathly Horror;-;Fantastic, but unfortunatly you need to find a good group to play with, but worth it all the same.
PedobearSexDemon;-;Arma 3 is a good game for everyone who likes the feeling of beeing in a warzone or just a solider driving cars and flying planes all around the map makes it a fun game that is hard to get sick of
l3al3ii;-;Buy it as !!! you never try you never know!!!
John;-;It has to be one of the best games i've played, and i have played almost every single console and pc game out there. just literally everything about the game is incredible. the realism, the gameplay, just its a truly amazing game i paid $59.99, im fine with that price for future expansion of the game... constantly updating the game. i currently play Arma 3 Epoch, and i really enjoy the mod, most of my hours are from the mod and i havent even tried the other mods yet. highly recommend the game to anyone unless your a call of duty fan boy or your a young kid. As soon as the marksman dlc comes out, of course i will be getting that. so if your on the fence with this game DONT even think about NOT getting it. The one and only one con to this game is gonna have to be the opimization. If you DONT have a intel chipset its gonna be very hard to run this game, i currently am using a AMD 8350 and i only get 30-low 40 fps in multiplayer server Standard settings with a GTX 960, so with me loving this game soo much i am currently saving a little money to purchase a Intel I5 4690k so i can run this game at ease with my card. So if you have a intel chipset and a decent graphics card, you should be fine with this game, and I HIGHLY HIGHLY recommend gettng it, if you dont like the vanilla game, the mods make it 200% better. Men Play Arma Boys Play Battlefield Kids Play Call Of Duty
AdamStain;-;I did not have alot of time to play the game but the time i did play everything was pretty cool, the game aswell as the community. Not alot of 10 year old boys screaming in multiplayer wich was also a plus. So i recommended this decent piece of a game to all you dip.
Agreenarrow;-;In a game all about war, Surprisingly you dont get much action unless your in a tank or in singleplayer. The best moment I've ever had with this game is where your about to evac and your helecopter gets shot down, and you and the survivors with no comucation to HQ have to walk 10km while carrying a dead body of your comrade all the way back to the spawn. Just walking and talking with your fellow soldiers. 8/10 ~Agreenarrow
xXItzKarlXx;-;After getting towed by a heli and dropped from 300m in a armored vehicle to then bounce off the surface of the ocean and hit the heli descending to see what happend to me, i can recommend this game. 11/10 would get towed again
10/10 aim;-;I rarely play online, and don't do much single player. I have no idea how i have 100 hours, it must be good.
TACTICALnoob;-;a little fusterating at first, but once you get the hang of its alot of fun, i had to re-bind some of the keys to make me more comfortable but other then that i love this game!!!!
2001 [];-;Good Campaign, Exellent Graphics, Fun RP
Yoko Senpai <333;-;i liked the game at first, i liked the details, i liked the HUD, i liked the control setup, and so on. What i did not like though is the fact that it is not that good at multi-core rendering, so if you have an AMD 8-core processor, then it may lag a little bit, (for some reason 6-core processors work better than 8-core processors on this game, even if all the cores ahve 4000MHZ both on the 6-core and 8-core)
Chris;-;Its a very good game.
Migliosi;-;Cool Cool 10/10
op;-;the war game of my dreams.
=FV= Snipy;-;The mods really make this game awesome.
Jonesyy;-;Bloody, Bloody Fun Game! A Couple really fun gamemodes! Especially Altis Life. 70% of all my hours on this game were on Altis Life. Definitely worth the buy, just try not to get banned. P.S. Would have atleast 21 more hours if not for "The Cheeky Nandos Dean Hall" for globally banning me. Deez Nutz
Weatherbee.A;-;ARMA is still clunky frustrating innaccurate Garbage, I like the scale, bullet drop, and the selection of weapons/vehicles that's it, but interface and interaction is recycled Junk, the immersion is ruined by the inaccuracies of the game "cant Jump, cant climb fences, cant run more than 4 feet without dying of exhaustion, etc:" can't effectively interact with your environment, AI is the worst i have ever seen in any game since Goldeneye for N64, engine is horribly inefficient and clunky (I can run it at Maximum Settings With 60 FPS No Problem but it dose not look as good as it should for the load it puts on ones pc, and it dose not even use all of my cpu/gpu to do it......, it is not a simulator it is a frustrating exercise in lazy coding, and very poor interaction, the "Inventory System" is Garbage and ruins immersion. all they did was add new models and up the poly count compared to ARMA 2, they need a smoother feel of interaction in their games, and no 3rd person view, whats the point in making a game "realistic" when you can switch to this magical 3D Camera, and you spend a lot of time digging through menus, rather than playing a game. BF4 with More animations/Timers for actions would be more realistic. and a basic inventory system would smoke ARMAs broken  if EA where ever to make a game world in the Frostbyte engine that is that large. ARMA is a slow clunky bore fest that kills any allure of a tactile feel with the hobbled game play and clunky unrealistic mechanics, this game should only be played with a group of friends, and w/mods that fix some of this is the only way to go. even still it is pretty bad that the modders and gaming community have to be relied apron to make the game better because obviously Bohimian don't know how to innovate. and the ridiculous aiming sway is beyond the most , and the most inaccurate thing i have ever seen because when i was 13 years old i could reliably hit targets out 150m out with iron sights, on a 15 year old 308, and the characters in ARMA have a furious shootout @ 50-100M without hitting  or the sway going crazy! and this is with Bleading edge Tech in both their weapons and sighting systems, and a soldier with years of training and experiance..... and I am no expert marksman, don't believe me take a trip to the range it isn't that hard to prove me right here.
Murica1997;-;I would have recomended this game but now it doesn't really work anymore and like 2 months ago it worked on my computer bu now its well
Level 40 Senpai;-;If you have the computer to run it prepare to have the best time of your life. I have played Arma 2 since 1 year ago, dayz mod, and other server just make me smile. Memories of executing Russians with Norwegian guys. Running over people with cars and dying from hilarious bugs. Arma 2 was amazing. Later on I got Arma 3, every penny of the 60 bucks it cost this game was worth it. It is so far my favorite game and when you play with others you will create memories that you will never forget. Lets just say Arma 3 is the best game I have ever played, and I've played a lot of games.
Dmbjr02(everything was stolen);-;well this is a good game but i got the game to play a mod called "atlis life" but i guess they added it into the game and i dont know how to play it. :(
The GreyFox;-;Just buy a tank and you will love it
Dildor The Defender of Porn;-;Famous last words: "Is that a grena-"
Roygatto;-;Lot of amazing mods, I think anyone who plays this will LOVE Altis life. So a great time with friends and who doesn't enjoy stealing other peoples organs? Just make sure you have a decent Rig or you won't have a very good time. 10/10 would play again :D
aPeacefulCat;-;Great game. the life servers are amazing!
Toxicwire;-;I just realized I've logged in 263+ hours into this game without giving it a review. I have ADHD, so it's really hard to keep my attention, especially in games, a hobby I love. Let me just say. Arma 3 has taken 263+ of my hours while the upcoming game has only taken 180+ of my hours. Really? Is there anything else I need to say about this game?
VSTIG rip;-;Very fun and enjoyable game I would recommend a lot.
mrDeo;-;BUy it Gibe moneyzz to arma
[USMC]eman0311;-;Besides the fact your enemies turn into slender man everytime you shoot them, this game is by far best arma besides combat operations and arma 2 but graphics do matter cause in low settings on arma 3 is like medium on arma 2. Also this game is very futuristic in a way the CSAT are the closest thing to the modern day terrorists and the AAF are your greek resistance the only modern thing in this game is NATO they use commanche helis, MRAPs, Ghost hawks, and who ever is wondering whats a ghost hawk? it was the prototype heli used to transport the navy seals to kill osama. Finally the game modes are crazy fun like escape from stratis and they have steam workshop so you can download missions instead of making one your self they also have pvp but due to desync it wont be as fun as playing coop with friends. The campaign in this isnt like the one from previous armas its more dynamic it tells the story of how NATO is being attacked by AAF and the CSAT i wont spoil anything because this is a review not the campaign
ThisIsPatrick;-;fps are horrible
babyboi1410;-;BEST GAME on the market!
justinlee;-;1221 hours and counting of fun and heartache
shocku  8.3.16;-;Pay 20, download, join server, find good looking sniper rifle, pick it up with mad smile on your face -> U NEED A DLC FOR ANOTHER 15 TO USE THIS GUN SO GTFO AND BUY IT. seriously I wouldn't buy this game if I knew that I'll be limited by some  DLC's
Gordon Freeman;-;I wish i could like this game, i really do. but after about three days of trying to get microsoft .net frameworks to install for the game trying over 28 differnet solutions found on the internet and trying to get help on the phone from microsoft them selves, i at last wiped my entire computer to factory settings.... finally was this my moment of truth was i gonna be able to play this game? i was sadly wrong after udating windows and my drivers restarting my computer twice i downloaded steam and installed Arma 3 took about a half hour total download and install including the first time start up finally i see the arma start up menu.... im excited at this point 3 days of constant strugle to get this one game working i click campaign and it asks me about the bootcamp tutorial thing i go yah why not ill do it to get used to controls it loads up to something that can be described as an open plane with cubes here and there with a blue soldier with camo gear on, it says arma 3 bootcamp i sit there waiting for something to tell me what to do few minutes go by im getting bored of waiting so i start pressing every button trying to move, look around, some thing anything.... i found only ne button that did anything it was the ESC button. so after about 15 minutes of that non sense i decide to just jump inot the campaign hoping that it will teach me the ropes along the way.... i load up the game it tells me to walk about twenty feet to a heli and hop in so i do. after what seems like a 5 minute heli ride we land and it tells me to go report in, after figuring out i had to just walk up to one soldier and have him salute me i wonderd what i did wrong because when i walked up to him it said check point complete and that was it for about 8 minutes where i wonderd around went back to him pressed a bunch of buttons cause no one said anything no text popped up nothing finnaly after those 8 minutes it gave me three objectives right in a row get in a truck, drive to outpost/road block, and then drive some where else..... i got into the truck drove to the check point/road block and....... i waited, and i waited some more and more turned the truck off, backed up, pulled forward almost hit the guy, turned of the truck waited said well maybe im supposed to jusat run the guy over and break through the barricade. nope dont do that you fail and have to restart the whole objective over again from the heli after you all ready waited 20 minutes at the road block..... i tried again three more times i now have 5 hours on record and i have not even started the game yet im gonna give this game a 1/10 because of graphics only cause all i saw was a good looking game that i couldnt do anything in.... 1/10 probably gonna refund waiting simulator 2015
Cuthbertoo;-;Getting abuse from talking in side. I cry hourly...
*F.H.O* *Icebird*;-;i like it cause it good game and i dont know why i get global ban :(
castov11;-;horrible game, no community at all. all vanilla servers are password locked. do not purchase this  of a came.
=CKA= ToraKuma;-;Great Game! Play with a group and it awesome!
Zero Cool;-;Buy it JUST DO IT! Have you ever had a dream but you couldn't never make it true? Don't give up just do it, While other people fail you will be there trying hard to reach your dreams. Don't let your dreams be dreams JUST DO IT! BUY ARMA 3!
twitch.tv/Giraa;-;Altis Life, Breaking Point MAAAHHHH 10/10 COOP 10/10
THE_WAFFLER;-;it's like dayz but you're already looted
GamerLithuanian;-;Good game i like it ,but there is bugs.
nuffy;-;If in the morning you bathe in pigs blood, you MIGHT be able to squeeze 60 fps out of the game with a 980 sli, an i7-4790k and 32 GB of DDR4 ram
MoneyWhore;-;I was ban in the first week of the game for no reason then the tards at battleye respond to my message with an automated bot!
Mosais;-;Not much to say about Arma III. It's the best in milsim that the world has ever seen! A must-have for every PC gamer.
jstarc;-;These Graphics are better then my eye-sight.. But the game runs like crap
Lord Revan;-;If you grew up playing call of duty kind of games, this isn't for you. I can safely say that because I did grow up on playing fps like call of duty, and this game is a little too real. Could never get the aiming right, I must have shot at a guy 100000 times and never killed anyone, huge map, so it takes awhile to even see anyone. But if you want super realisitc, this is for you!
SuPr3m3b3inG;-;This game is the best game ever you can even make your own missions and share to the world, i made 2 you can engage in tactical combat with a group of strangers or with friends when i say tactical i mean it , if you can get your head around the keys on the keyboard which takes a while. i once stripped down to my underpants in this game and pretended to be dead in middle of the street and a group of guys wondered past me then i picked my gun up and blasted them all hahaha killed by a underpants man lol they even looked at me to see if i was dead its simply amazing
H3llwurm;-;The most realiztic shooter Ive played. It is very well done, and very tactical. Only down side for me is there isa 3rd person view option
CheshireScarab;-;A great addition to the arma series! Great gameplay and controls with an ever expanding arsenal and range of vehicles. Graphics are top notch with tones of new mods coming out all the time too! A must buy for fans of the genre.
Numb3rM4n;-;I thought this game was very well designed. The levels were structured very well, but the graphics were kind of weak.
McSniffles;-;The best and biggest milsim sandbox out there. If you're a fan of PC gaming, this should be in your library.
Linblum;-;Unoptimized garbage
ZyloLogic;-;Played it a little, thought it was alright.
ecuriel350;-;PLEASE HELP. GOT AN ERROR MESSAGE WHEN FIRST TIME TO PLAY.VERY DISSAPOINTED.
Toms;-;i had the lucky chance of playing arma 3 last weekend - which i had to compromise and complete my godlike mission of downloading it. Got on a server , got shot in the head in wasteland for missteping into a "territory" which was 1 meter and "amazingly there" shot two ppl got ultimate loot and died. 10/10 would fap again.
Fluxx;-;and i cannot get refund 8 core cpu and 7870 1ghz clock and i run it at like 0.000000000001fps
emny;-;This is a great game, with huge map and its very realistic. There are already zombie mods what makes this game even better so for 45 you actually get more than one game. One of the best FPS's currently on market.
zose;-;this game is good and all.. but its complete garbage. first of all its fun..... when it actually works... i bought the game for 40 bucks. had fun... but now i cant even ing connect to stupid piece of  server without the game ing about how its stopped working. if it worked 10/10. but its so  i have to give it a 0/10
sick shades;-;Great game! You'll need a pretty good PC as the graphics are f***ing amazing. 10/10
dankmemes.com;-;really good fun, plenty of mods/expansions & like the other arma games, will provide many hours of entertainment.
DeiBambini;-;Get this game, you won't regret it. Enough said.
finn.com;-;good all round
FNCE|Batman;-;peice of  dosent work and always crashes
Africa Is Not A Country;-;Literally worse than Hitler.  niqqers and Obama! HEIL HITLER!
Shadow *SkinArena.com;-;This is a funny war game.
Matt;-;Insanely boring. After the first few days of playing, I finished the campaign and went into multiplayer. Once you finish the campaign, there is absolutely nothing to do, because nearly every server on the multiplayer is either broken or the same thing as the last one.
BigSmellyHippy;-;Landed hellicopter on tower four. Ejected off the side of tower four.
1-800-get-rekt.com;-;it has good graphics IGN rated 10/10
Riwkiw Zalnw[TH];-;I am not have any Hack tool in my computer But this gmae have banned me. I can't play Arma3 Mods Altis Life now.
Codsworth1;-;Requires DLC to use some of the guns, booo, 4.4/10
BagmanG;-;Don't let your dreams be dreams. Yesterday you said tomorrow. Make your dreams come true. Just do it. Do it. Just make your dreams come true. Just do it. Just do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Just do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Just do it! Some people dream of success. Whilst you're going to wake up and work hard at it. Nothing is impossible. You should get to the point where anyone else would quit. But you're not going to stop there. What are you waiting for? Just do it. Do it. Do it. Just make your dreams come true. Just do it. Do it. Just do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Just do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Just do it! If you're tired of starting over. Stop giving up. Just do it. Just do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Just do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Do it! Just do it! Buy the game. If that hasn't inspired you to. I don't know what will.
Rosman_Joker;-;I know it's expensive but look at all the stuff you like RPG and the graphics but it's alot better with a friend.
REC-9;-;I have a 980 and can barely get 30fps on high this game is extremely unoptimized
Coach Bombay;-;Gold glove played it so its good
Snow Tigr;-;Arma 3 is an awesome combat game which combines open world complexity with call of duty style accessibility.
jamescleland;-;I haven't spent a LOT of time playing, but so far I'm really impressed. Highly recommended :)
SuPr3m3b3inG;-;This game is the best game ever you can even make your own missions and share to the world, i made 2 you can engage in tactical combat with a group of strangers or with friends when i say tactical i mean it , if you can get your head around the keys on the keyboard which takes a while. i once stripped down to my underpants in this game and pretended to be dead in middle of the street and a group of guys wondered past me then i picked my gun up and blasted them all hahaha killed by a underpants man lol they even looked at me to see if i was dead its simply amazing
H3llwurm;-;The most realiztic shooter Ive played. It is very well done, and very tactical. Only down side for me is there isa 3rd person view option
Lord Revan;-;If you grew up playing call of duty kind of games, this isn't for you. I can safely say that because I did grow up on playing fps like call of duty, and this game is a little too real. Could never get the aiming right, I must have shot at a guy 100000 times and never killed anyone, huge map, so it takes awhile to even see anyone. But if you want super realisitc, this is for you!
Mosais;-;Not much to say about Arma III. It's the best in milsim that the world has ever seen! A must-have for every PC gamer.
Level 40 Senpai;-;If you have the computer to run it prepare to have the best time of your life. I have played Arma 2 since 1 year ago, dayz mod, and other server just make me smile. Memories of executing Russians with Norwegian guys. Running over people with cars and dying from hilarious bugs. Arma 2 was amazing. Later on I got Arma 3, every penny of the 60 bucks it cost this game was worth it. It is so far my favorite game and when you play with others you will create memories that you will never forget. Lets just say Arma 3 is the best game I have ever played, and I've played a lot of games.
Dmbjr02(everything was stolen);-;well this is a good game but i got the game to play a mod called "atlis life" but i guess they added it into the game and i dont know how to play it. :(
artic66;-;my game says news offline and i cant see any severs what do i do
booty;-;Great game, Fun multiplayer lobbies and great signle player campaign
dnkey;-;This game ruined my life. 10/10, would enroll in virtual military school and finally enlist after 3 months of boot camp again. But for real. This game is the ultimate military sandbox. The modding community and player interaction really make this game. Imagine every scripted epic combat scene and now imagine that actually happening, non-scripted and with all real players. Just buy this , trust me.
dillonmittan;-;Half the content of Arma 2 for many times the price...
Friedrich Nietzsche;-;Amazing game. As a huge fan of the Arma series, I have to say this is a great addition. I can't wate until they add more content.
BrutalPenguin;-;great game
RiX;-;Very well done Military Combat Sim. RiX 9/10
Beast Mode Cowboy;-;I have a few hours in this....it's okay...
Lava;-;Damn, my game-selection standard increases extremely due to Arma3. I'm lacking games!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
FaZeMarble"NIP F0rest";-;Great game can't go wrong with it. Low end PCs may not run the game very well but still will get at least half of what the game has to offer. Great game to play with friends, some of my favorite game modes are - Alitis life, KOTH(King of the hill) and some 10mil start servers. Most realistic war simulator out there, Its just an AMAZING game overall can't go wrong with it considering all the game modes and side features it has to offer, I would recomend playing the game a little while untill you get used to the game before buying the DLC's since some of them are pricey and you wouldn't want to waste 40 odd bucks or so on something you aren't going to play ;). 10/10 Purple stickers
Mr Wesh <HyperX>;-;LOVE IT
v | Crump;-;"It's okay I guess..." -Arma II 9/10
ShamWow;-;Not recommended.
eupward;-;Framerate is awful in all situations and the game is insanely unoptimized.
RqRedemption;-;A game i would recommend to people since alot of stuff has happend to it over the last mouth or two having some well devloped mods such as Epoch, Arma 3 life, Breaking point and many more mission files you can put hours of game time into
Elrohir;-;One of the best shooting RPG Games i have played.
Dr.Larry;-;I recommend this game but be warned there are a lot of bad things mainly due to some clunky controls, stiff animations and engine limitations(as well as performance issues online). There's nothing out there like it It's one of a kind really. It's a massively open world military simulator. The scale is huge and this is reflected perfectly in it's online modes and mods created by the modding community. The downside of this is they have one huge map, Altis, and that's all that's really there(No one plays Stratis which is the only other map and it's a lot smaller). So, you're pretty much stuck with the same map, same buildings, same roads, same cities, etc., etc. It would have been nice to have a bit of variety, at least from an official source as opposed to having to download maps from the modding community(Which are mostly maps imported from ARMA 2). This isn't to say that Altis is boring or a badly designed map -- it's quite the opposite! -- but having spent 100+ hours on the same map you do wish for a bit more especially after two years of development(Including Alpha and an expansion/season pass). The scale of the game was really brought to light in one of the first mods created for the game back when it was in Alpha; the co-op game mode Invade & Annex. This mode basically opened up the entire map for deployment from a central base complete with side missions that were entirely up to the players(100 or so) to take out. Missions required teamwork, coordination, squad based compositions, transport management, scouting, air support and heavy and light armour to complete. You would be deployed anywhere on the map with your squad to take on an objective and it was purely simulation based where you followed the chain of command to tackle objectives, requested support and had to wait for air/infantry/armoured support to arrive. There really was nothing like it in any other game and still isn't as far as i'm aware. Mods Speaking of mods this game has a lot of popular mods which, one could rightly assume, may even spawn standalone games of themselves given the huge amount of interest in them and the sheer amount of players who buy ARMA III specifically for some of the mods on offer. To name a few: King of the Hill - Mosh put style game mode where three teams fight for supremacy over an object(Most often entire cities or towns) by having as many players as possible from their team in the objective, killing enemies to lower their presence. Altis Life/ARMA 3 Life - A life RPG where you eat, team up with other players and take on roles in the virtual world of Altis ranging from picking apples, mining, fishing to becoming a rebel, mugger or even joining the police or military to enforce the law and fight off rebels. It's an RP experience so you're forced to act in character to make the mode more immersive(No random killing, you have to engage and have reason to shooting/killing people). Battle Royale - Just like the movie Battle Royale or, for the more modern crowd, it's similar to The Hunger Games. You parachute onto the island, land and try to find weapons and supplies to survive and kill other players. The objective is to be the last man surviving. A zone is marked and it gets smaller as the game progresses. If you're not in the marked area by the time you're given you die. The mods are really entertaining and while some are very simple and add onto the base experience they make the base game that much better although I would question why some mods simply were not developed by Bohemia to begin with and released with the game as standard. Controls and animations Controls are pretty janky. The animations are stiff and can get you killed. It takes a long time to learn all the controls and then even longer to relearn the controls for specific servers that have keys bound to different keys than what other servers have as standard. It's not a bad thing having all these controls as they do make a difference but what's bad is the animations which force you into a full animation loop which is slow, cumbersome and essentially makes you a free kill. For instance, if you want to holster your gun your character will stop. He will then initiate the animation. Put the gun away. Then he will stand up. Only then will you be able to move your character again and you can't interrupt these animations. You can't even run or walk while they're being performed which is simply frustrating and downright bad design. If you're in a firefight and mistakenly take out a pistol instead of your rifle prepare for five seconds -- if you're lucky not to die while this is happening -- of animation hell where you're left with pulling your hair out, screaming at the screen while you're in the middle of the battlefield, standing up and, rather hilariously, carelessly taking your primary from your shoulder with zero s given. Needless to say, the animations are pretty bad in most regards. Animations that can't be interrupted and require you to spend 5seconds performing the most simplest of animations is just bad by any stretch of the imagination. I don't think anyone can defend it and i've never heard anyone try to. Performance issues Performance is a huge setback for this game for the main reason that online performance, the core of the game that people are here for, depends entirely on the server you're on and the scripts it uses. If it's a poor server that doesn't get reset every so often you'll see your frames drop by 50-60%. You could be at 60FPS and then, due to the poor server, you're down to 15-20FPS no matter what computer you have. It's just one of those things you have to accept. You will also experience random freezes and random dips in performance even if you're on a good server. Some freezes can last from 2 seconds to 10 seconds or even longer. This has nothing to do with your computer. It doesn't happen so often that you'll find yourself dying over and over but it happens enough to be notable and strangely enough it doesn't seem to happen in firefights but mostly when you're sitting around doing nothing or just driving on an empty road. It's questionable to say the least. Having said that i'm running the game on close to ultra settings with an FPS of around 30-40 for the most part on a Windows 7 64bit PC, no SSD, 4GB DDR3 RAM, an i5-750 CPU at stock speed(2.67Ghz) and an AMD r9 290 4GB graphics card. There's still slowdowns and performance still largely depends on the server i'm on and what mod it is. In single player my frames will easily double and be consistent with no performance drops. Single player I probably should have started off with single player but I felt a pros over cons is the best way for the flow of this review. The single player isn't great if i'm to be honest. Enemy AI will spot you from a few miles(or km's) away before you even have a chance to see them. You'll be told by the AI leader to target and kill an enemy at X distance or to proceed to location Y only to die because you can't see the three aimbot AI perched three kilometers away on a hill with assault rifles seemingly sniping at you. You'll die a lot and it will only feel like a cheap death. Deaths are just cheap in the SP campaign which is reflected in one of the earlier missions where you enter a minefield and get blown up instantly which is the game's way of saying: "Trial and error, you'll know next time." It's cheap and it's bad design for a game simulation or not. The story itself isn't great either. Conclusion It's worth the money. There's no game out there like it and there's no game that offers as much as ARMA III does in terms of sheer scale and simulation. There's a few negatives to go against the game but ultimately this is definitely something you should have in your game library if you even remotely enjoy shooters or military shooters of any kind.
UltraRedstone;-;Arma III is a combat simulator. It creates an envioroment where you can perform and learn the basics of the movement of a military soldier. The campaign is really good, there is nothing wrong with it at all except from where I find it hard at some cases. But overall it holds a realistic simulation of how its like. I also love multiplayer on Arma III. People can transform CO-OP gamemodes to a realistic enviroment in multiplayer, like some people can form squads and they like to make it look like a real squad which contains planning, tatical, commands, things like that. It makes the game look real. Arma III was released 7 months ago but grows a better game each time. There are certain amount of bugs and glitches in it but its very rare the bugs or glitches occur.... The game is quite expensive I know, its 35.99 but its good to spend money on a brilliant game like this. If you want to spend more on it you can buy Digital Deluxe Upgrade for 8.99. I recommend buying the Deluxe Edition for 39.99, make sure you like what you are buying of the Deluxe Edition. When you buy this game I hope you have alot of fun. Thanks!
Juicy-Surge;-;What more to say than you will loose yourself in how immersive and realistic this game can be.
MustBeRam;-;Well, What can i say.. Arma 3 is a one of a kind game. Its a twist on the average, fast paced, FPS. Don't get it if you think you'll survive a bombardment of bullets and walk away perfectly fine, one bullet to the chest and you're done. This game is a slow paced shooter, Its takes patience to play. You can't fight two soldiers at once. But what the game does offer is some of the best graphics. And stellar gunplay.This game needs a lot to run. The only cons are the team mates. Most are there to play and help you. Some asshats are straight from COD. And will shoot you and not help the team. Two tips you need to know, This  is tough, your K/D doesn't mean jack  to you. Its about the team winning. Second, its about team work, Telling people where tanks and soldiers are location is a must. Team work people is the key to victory.
Methodical;-;Hands down, the best combat sim out on the market!! On a scale of 1-10... I give it an 11!!
QuantumMECH;-;I can barely go into any server, and event then i get kicked from the very start without doing nothing. Host your own vanilla servers, bohemia! That game is unplayable!
Dddi3000!;-;I cannot recommend this game, for it is virtually unplayable. That is, multi player is very much broken. It is so badly optimized, you only get maybe 20-30 fps playing it, even with new nVidia GTX-980 you get low fps. And it doesn't matter if you lower the graphics, has no affect. Which is sad, 'cause this game has good potentials. I really wish it was playable, but it just isn't. Maybe if you have 10 GTX titan cards...
Dan:);-;Here are some positive & negative things about the game: +Sexy Graphics +Huge scale map +Realistic Combat +Character Customisation -Really bad car models -Not very many weapons -Too lazy with vehicle differences On a scale of 1-10 I would give this game an 8/10 just because of the modding community behind the game. Arma 3 pretty much never gets boring because you always have new mods coming out and giving you new experiences to enjoy.
Mr. Mommy;-;Shift+W, Scroll+F, and 609-619-7348. Those r the only buttons u press
Stonewall Jackson;-;Sgt Jackson 31.05.15 Final Entry Stranded, we have been caught in a bitter fire fight lasting over 2 days. Ambushed, as we attempted to flee from the island by an elite infantry unit, we sort refuge in an old farm house. My men and I fought bravely, holding back the enemy. Contact to HQ has proved fruitless, they have abandoned the island and the few soldiers that remain. My thoughts in this quiet period turn to family and friends back home, my lovely wife and two twin boys. If they somehow get this journal, I want them to know I love them dearly... I cannot dwell too long, I can hear the enemy. I hold back the tears to keep face in front of my men. We have seen that the enemy do not take prisoners of war, in fact they make an example of captured soldiers in a truly horrific manner. When captured, you are stripped of your items, and forced into a vehicle drove by the AI, the driver is given a way point from one end of Altis to the other. you are not allowed to leave the vehicle or drive the vehicle yourself. They are barbarians. My men and I are down to our last rounds of ammunition, I myself only have my side arm. We know we will not survive the next assault. I have thought about saving one round for myself. but I don't want those s out there to have that kind of satisfaction. My engineer Kevin, a brave man with a mustache worthy of a medal on its own merit, he approached me and told me he has one explosive charge left... We discuss our options. Knowing full well our situation, Kevin, Johnson, Taylor and I have decided the last man standing will detonate the charge, we will go down fighting to the last. The charge is set. I'm not a religious man but if there is a God, may he have mercy on our souls. I hear the enemies battle cry. Farewell Despite the occasional clumsy AI, This game is that realistic. Just fantastic, BUY IT NOW.
Nigel Farage;-;The game its self is pretty , its altis life that makes this game. www.altislifeuk.co.uk
pr0xi;-;I think this game is good
Matt 2k8;-;In my opinion, much better than any of the previous Arma games. First and foremost where do i start? The animations, the graphics and the physics are all improved perfectly and it just feels like you are at war! The optimization gives you much more freedom to tweak graphical settings. The Co-op just has to be the best feature, knowing that everyone depends on you and you depend on everyone as a team.
tylerboi;-;homecoming is a dance that everyone wants. No PDA dont kiss ur date homecoming is greaaat
Kanye West;-;Stole all the ammo out of a allies back pack and drove away., 11/10 also is breaking point...
uNique;-;awesome game but lilte bugy still
KeyboardCatAttack;-;I'm extremely frustrated, but at the same time extremely entertained. Cool cool.
demon nebula;-;this is a super realistic millitary based game. i mean whats not to love?
Orange Is The New Orange;-;This game is so amazing in grahics and gamplay you can use the editor to create cool missions and senarios theres TONS of mods and missions to download as well as an ok and very hard story. its also AMAZING when it comes to multiplayer. 100/10
Naw Hen;-;Not as realistic as Carl on Duty: Black Cops 2 ascii / unicode #noonegetsit
TGH-TheGameingHotDog;-;Good game.. well.. kinda.. It said arma 3 is a game were if you buy it you get EVERYTHING with it.. for free well its a lie you can't get in a helicopter becase BUY ARE F**IN DLC WE NEED MONY EVEN THO THE MAIN GAME IS $60 i can't grab a gun from a box because BUY ARE DLC SO YOU GET A WATER GUN TO SHOOT AT A GUY.. YOU CAN'T GET A FLARE GUN BECAUSE... BIG SUPRISE DLC!! i spent $60 on this game im not spending $34 for dlc that lets you get in a heli or drive a go kart :/ This is a good game ether way its just bull**** about the dlc.. please don't turn into a buy to win game maker BE please don't :/ ========================================================================= Looks =11/10 Gameplay = 9.7/10 Phisics = 9.9/10 Addons = 1.9/10 so about a 7.8/10 on the game total ========================================================================= Thank you for reading..
Drickett;-;Great game, I have no problems with it really at all. 10 / 10 worth the money.
Weeaboo Jones;-;Played a little, had fun. 10/10
Veranda;-;Best Milsim i know so far 10/10 would play it everyday
WickedTangyNinja;-;very slow paced!!!
Misty;-;ITS JUST ING FUN
Stingarino;-;Yes a very fun game the only down side is that if you were to shoot someone they will take like 6 shots to the body to die...
[FP]fluffyunicorn1;-;guy i need help with one thing i am new 2 arma, i want to play altis life how do i get????
Rezznow;-;Ctrl+S. Do it and you will be happy. =)
Waited;-;Hello Everyone, i just want to say one thing BUUY THIS GAME just no questions why just BUY THE GAME, i might have 90 hours on it but trust me you will have alot more then me once you buy it, and it's way more fun with friends. So heres why you should buy it if you dont Belive me then let me tell you why. Pros: 1. ALOT of people play the game so it wont be hard to find a server you like or someone to play with 2. so many things to do like Atlis life ( which is like living in ARMA III ) and Wastland and much much more 3. so many GUNS and VEHICLES Cons: 1. You might need a good desktop ( not a laptop unless it AMAZING ), also no matter what specs you have the game might not run full ultra 2. you need a good intel card so like a i5 but i recommend a i7 4790k anything below this you might have some problems cause arma runs fully on CPU and a little bit of GPU so i recommend a good GPU so you dont bottleneck you pc but overall this is a great game and enjoy :D
Hooker Spit Soup;-;Never losses playability. So much to do! Best game on steam! 10/10 Will lead my friends in to combat again.
Frillin;-;I went into this game knowing that the game company Bohemia were and are idiots. I know this by looking at reviews for DayZ and seeing people talk about how they use the same engine over and over and it causes problems. They think that they always know best and that their games are flawless...even though it's clear to millions it isn't and they refuse to listen to their customers. With that in mind, I downloaded and played. Compared to what I've played of Arma II (the demo which was bugged) Arma III is a lot more polished. Graphics are great, the sounds of guns firing is crisp on both firing and the receiving fire end, and the open map is massive. Getting items and interacting with vehicles/items is unlike anything I've played in any game. Unfortunately the learning curve is REALLY steep. You go in basically clueless and have to figure out a lot yourself. They have tutorial pop ups for the campaign (and part of the reason why I say these guys aren't smart is they originally released it without any singleplayer) except that it pops up IN THE MIDDLE OF WHAT YOU ARE DOING. They could save a lot of time just giving a regular laid back tutorial mission like virtually every other game does. And they did do this in the Arma II demo. Your team's AI is bad. They love to run out alone and get shot to death leaving you to fend for yourself. And enemies are very smart. They stick together, they're patient and man are they deadly accurate. Nice challenge for sure, but I wish they were realistically accurate. Even from a huge distance they rarely miss; and most carry assault rifles with dot sights. Multiplayer is much, much worse if you haven't done the campaign first; but it's still as equally confusing as going into the campaign. I must've pressed about every button to try and chat with people with no success. I tried to configure it in....also no success. And the loading time getting into any server is quite long. Understandably long though since it's a huge map and there's an objective. I think for this portion playing a previous Arma game would be best since they expect you to have played them apparently. There are definitely a lot of problems with this game. AI should be fixed more evenly for a smoother experience (no I am not saying make the game easier. I love the challenge and the adrenaline. But I'd love to know I can count on my fellow soldiers.) and a set tutorial should be in place. Assuming people know everything, regardless of playing every Arma game or not, is always a bad idea. There is one thing no one could deny. The Arma games are one of a kind. No one has come closer than this franchise to having the most realistic war experience. But please Bohemia....stop being self centered  and listen to your customers and take their ideas and complaints into consideration. Other than the problems I had fun playing. But I wouldn't recommend it unless you know Arma and how it all works. At the same time though, I do recommend this game. It is not a casual shooter in any way. All it takes is a couple of bullets and your team could and can be wiped out. Flanking is truly your best friend and your worst enemy. And communication is just as vital in singleplayer as multiplayer. The experience can't be matched. EDIT: I've finished some singleplayer and had much better experiences with multiplayer. It's a must buy in my opinion by this point. I don't revoke anything that I've said before but once you know how to do things it's fun. To save newbies time: Left Ctrl + G allow you to switch grenades and Left Ctrl + Right mouse button allow you to switch scopes (when you have two). You'll pretty much need a GPS in order to know where you are and where everyone else is (usually). And "/" is how you type chat in the servers. Cheers!
Cannibal-Hippie (LCG);-;Only Buy If you have a personal NASA Super-Computer
polidore111;-;this is really bugy
Han'Nya;-;Very realistic and has verstaile module options. A very realistic military fps/3rd person simulation game.
latonyagray86;-;hey I have been playing this game for a while so plaese can I get this game for free
Kirk;-;this game is super fun... if u really wanna have fun join the unitedatlis:altis life server. staff is really nice and they have a great team!
Stingarino;-;Yes a very fun game the only down side is that if you were to shoot someone they will take like 6 shots to the body to die...
Misty;-;ITS JUST ING FUN
[FP]fluffyunicorn1;-;guy i need help with one thing i am new 2 arma, i want to play altis life how do i get????
Rezznow;-;Ctrl+S. Do it and you will be happy. =)
dnkey;-;This game ruined my life. 10/10, would enroll in virtual military school and finally enlist after 3 months of boot camp again. But for real. This game is the ultimate military sandbox. The modding community and player interaction really make this game. Imagine every scripted epic combat scene and now imagine that actually happening, non-scripted and with all real players. Just buy this , trust me.
Shiroe the Strategist;-;The models are simply awesome, the sounds are reused on some guns, and you need a motherf*cking warmachine to run it with only 30 fps in medium resolution.
John F. Kennedy;-;its VERY FUN
Part Tim3 Hobo;-;Just....this video should explain it all: https://www.youtube.com/watch?v=2B0lwO8rpXc
DazGoose;-;Best Military Shooter there is
Spliced;-;Great mod support love it but lacking content. will eventually ge there
Quicksilver;-;I played CoD, it's ok I played Battlefield, it's cool I played this for a day... Meh. It's a game.
SeaSprayWhale;-;Very Good Game-
usaS;-;Pretty much the number one game if you're going for realism and large scale tactical gameplay.
seB;-;Amazing game had it for like 2 weeks and have 100+ hours
Zombielol5;-;Best game i have ever played.Its really realistic.:D
TonyS;-;Best game ever except the realism when you breath.
Void;-;Great Game lots of fun to be had!!
Brave Sir Charge;-;Worst game i ever bought! My Little Pony is even better!
Sareez;-;Was 8/10 without DLC weapons (Because of optimization issues) but since marksman DLC, with DLC weapons hitting 1 hit kills, made the game easier for casuals. Which made Wasteland (Excluding Sa-Matra), King of the Hill, and some Altis Life servers lame. It is currently 6/10, above average because multiplayer is ruined and isn't really fun anymore. But I still recommend the game. Campaign is great, physics is great. :)
Korbo;-;-Spent hours in campaign doing scouting missions of no importance. -Carefully select a loadout in cooperative and get heli ride to objective only to get shot down by a bad pilot flying too high. -Used real life tactics with a handful of good players to take out objectives -Spent half an hour crawling around with a Lynx in Wasteland mode to snipe a single guy 900m away and then spent another hour waiting to ambush a group of players with claymores and take all their money. It has plenty of issues and is a niche game but if you like the idea of getting some friends together to conduct ambushes on poor unsuspecting people with half an hour of no combat then you'll like this game. Slow is good in this game. 10/10 would assault a church again.
nannerpuss;-;Have to ammend my recommendation after making it almost enitrely through the campaign. Why "almost" and not "completely"? This game has the most awful AI I have experienced in a long time. It's honestly at a point where the enemy AI are either expert snipers, with any weapon at any range, or are completely ignorant and stand in the open waiting to die. Realism is entirely gone from the firefighting, which is ironic considering this is supposedly an ultra-realisitc "war simulation". The customized difficulty controls consist of two sliders, "Precision" and "Accuracy". At 40 for example, the AI will not let you win a firefight, period. At 30 they are so dumb they miss 80% of their shots and are basically waiting to die. The only inbetween is "35" which is much closer to "professional sniper even when using a 9mm pistol" than "normal guy who sometimes can hit you." It's pretty absurd, frankly, and almost comical when they market this as a simulation. I won't even go into the friendly AI. It's so bad it's become a joke and meme at this point. There are dozens of modders who have tried to address the issue, which is fine, but the fact that the team AI is so bad after years of patches says a lot about the developer's priorities. I can no longer recommend this game unless you can tolerate your team standing straight up in the open, running in circles, firing recklessly into the air, or missing every single shot without a SINGLE WAY to control them or help in the middle of a fight. This sounds ridiculous, but I was intentionally killing or letting my team die just so I could finish missions. Not sure how this game is so positively reviewed, honestly. It's like they did everything right, except the important parts. Cannot recommend.
Yui;-;Can I have 2.4k hours of my life back?
PHQU | Zombie;-;THi game, Is the game of games. Yes.
Equinox*Raindrop;-;Altis Life = Better then Real Life
iVictimize;-;Extreamly  game, not what I expected at all. I want a damn REFUND!
Ugly;-;man if only this games community wasnt ing terrible then maybe it would be worth it
ItsKracken;-;This Game is really not what i wanted i runs like  and feels like crap with these wonkey controls.
B17zack;-;this game is awesome i love it its so realistic and everything so i will continue playing this game cause it is to awesome alright :)
DefiantRebel;-;Arma 3 is a good game but im not sure if Steam supports mods such as the popular Life mod. Will reccomend buying it for hard disc just in case.
Nanoxic;-;You really should buy it, but u need to have a good pc :)
Equinox*Raindrop;-;Altis Life = Better then Real Life
PHQU | Zombie;-;THi game, Is the game of games. Yes.
Brave Sir Charge;-;Worst game i ever bought! My Little Pony is even better!
Sareez;-;Was 8/10 without DLC weapons (Because of optimization issues) but since marksman DLC, with DLC weapons hitting 1 hit kills, made the game easier for casuals. Which made Wasteland (Excluding Sa-Matra), King of the Hill, and some Altis Life servers lame. It is currently 6/10, above average because multiplayer is ruined and isn't really fun anymore. But I still recommend the game. Campaign is great, physics is great. :)
Korbo;-;-Spent hours in campaign doing scouting missions of no importance. -Carefully select a loadout in cooperative and get heli ride to objective only to get shot down by a bad pilot flying too high. -Used real life tactics with a handful of good players to take out objectives -Spent half an hour crawling around with a Lynx in Wasteland mode to snipe a single guy 900m away and then spent another hour waiting to ambush a group of players with claymores and take all their money. It has plenty of issues and is a niche game but if you like the idea of getting some friends together to conduct ambushes on poor unsuspecting people with half an hour of no combat then you'll like this game. Slow is good in this game. 10/10 would assault a church again.
Void;-;Great Game lots of fun to be had!!
Zombielol5;-;Best game i have ever played.Its really realistic.:D
Gabenfoodle;-;I had 110 Hours logged on this game three months ago. Now, I have 600. What the , Arma. What the .
cold0dog8^_^ * csgobig.com;-;Great tactical FPS(or is it?) game many mod that supports it 8/10 - cold0dog8
Gabenfoodle;-;I had 110 Hours logged on this game three months ago. Now, I have 600. What the , Arma. What the .
Centauri;-;"Wait for helicopter pick up simulator" 0/10
BrannyFTW;-;Brilliant game! If you have friends to plau with and a powerful pc pick this game up
FanTheLp;-;After only 24 hours of gameplay the game done goofed. I can't play it and when i try to redownload it it does not work. So gameplay is a 8/10 but the Dev's is a incredibly low score of 3/10
yehink;-;Solid game and super fun to play with friends. I would definitely recommend to anyone who loves realistic shooters.
Taisune-Miku;-;This game... is magical..
Sergeant Pugsley;-;One of the best games i have ever owned. If you like war and realistic situations i Recommend this game a lot.
Venom;-;I belive this game is the best army simulation games you can get and the game is worth the money i have played 568 hours of the game and im still not bored of playing its because there is a lot of things to explore and not just that you can download things from the steam workshop and you can put up things you have made to the steam workshop to share with your friends or to share to everybody.
Trices Mailwind;-;I used to like Arma quite a bit, number two and three. I was one of those players that would hop servers looking for a good time, try and do something sort of coherent, get my  annoyed in by a certain portion of the player base that should not be mentioned, *Cough* Ginsberg *Cough*. I had my fun with the game, and that was about it. But then I hit the REAL MEAT of the game, community. Being able to play with a group of buddies is the peak of enjoyment from atleast vanilla Arma. You toss Arma's beautiful modding community into the mix, and this becomes a very different ballgame on the same field. When I happened upon a small, friendly community that I would soon dub, "a bunch of jolly s," I fell in love with Arma on a completely new and fantastic level. About 600-650 of my hours logged where in the span of a year playing with these guys, and it was a fantastic time. The more you have available to you, like a personal server, the mod base, ability to use the editor, the more depth the game has. That all compound on the imagination of you and your buddies. Wanna screw around? Go ahead and run across Altis with your  hanging out, thumb up your , barfing rainbows on those who stand in your way. I'm not saying your can do this, Because you may be able to put that together IF your determined enough, or IF someone else is. Want to do something Para-seriously, with proper radios that can be really crappy because who the hell put that mountain there, call signs etc., go ahead! This game can be a pretty cool thing to hop on and kill  on, and it could also be a real ing hoot of a time wrecking  with your own band of Jolly s. If you can handle the realistic Mechanics and enjoy this style of FPS, I say this game is a MUST HAVE. If you struggle with the games that aspire to be highly realistic, this probably wont be for you. Some other very useful traits of character to have going into this game is the maturity to play cooperatively with atleast a neutral disposition when playing with others, and patience to sit through some long chopper or car rides which can hand in hand with maturity and being able to contain yourself.
Nessy;-;Arma 3 is a major improvement over Arma 2 even if you think it lacks content is wich you got to remember Arma 2 on launch in 2009 had lack of content, but bohemia interactive has always done this they always add more content in updates and even after release just look at Arma Cold war assault. This game is clearly a big improvement over it's predacessors even is faithful to it's roots, even though most do not like the futerstic setting of Arma 3 it was something different to try but the campaigns it self was fun to play through i enjoyed the different styles of the campaign of the situations i won't go into spoilers but the way the campaigns are played is good example of giving a "live" world it does lack co-op but with good reasons it was good playthrough i had i do like the story it was way better than Arma2 it was what Arma2 tried to acheive but they really improved it on Arma 3. Thanks to this studio we have a great game and still gets support and added content through updates and the gameplay might change slightly from time to time and if you have performance issues just head to bohemia interactive forums they will get in touch asap and let you know if they working on a solution for you. Great support and great game and as stated earlier a major improvement over it's predacessor i have no issues with the game it self because my faith in this studio is very strong and secure because i been playing Arma series for a long time and all i can say is they are dedicated to the fans. Now for the serious notes, This is a simulator with great dynamics and ballistics and a whole real life of islands to explore even go under water in the sea it's not a gimmick it's how you use your tactics that counts it's really good way of sneaking and inflitration the game is still being improved yes things will change over time give it time and you have more than what you payed for because you supported a studio as stated before Dedicated to their fans and they are interacting with the community.
SweetBabyJ ()*:;-;pew pew enemy sniper on the hill pew pew "gets shot and dies" re-spawns in the same town and you gets items when got shot. best realist simulator out there in 2025
fortypercent;-;Amazing gunplay, particularly sniping. the bullet physics are well implemented. Well designed open-world and decent mulyiplayer player base. ALTHOUGH, the game runs like , on even the best PCs. You're probably better off waiting for them to fix this major issue, if you like to play games above 20-30 fps
[Snizza] EyesofWrath;-;Eh. I'm gonna plug away and play this to the end someday, but even if you buy it now and aren't affected by the fact that the initial release contained maybe one fifth of the final content they slowly leaked out to users, there are still so many issues with this game that it's not really that fun to play. Yes it's realistic I suppose, if you don't count the fact that you can be shot in the face by a man with the vision of an eagle and the aim of a robot, who is so far away or hidden behind bushes that you can't even see him, but it's not fun to play. Consider the mines in the forest of the second level that you can't detect, and kill you, forcing a checkpoint restart and a frustrating trial-and-error progression through the area again and again. Consider the checkpoint about 5 minutes along from that one that is placed at the start of a 3 minute march, followed by a battle that, if you die during it, makes you start back at the beginning of the eventless 3 minute march. Consider these issues exacerbated by the manual save system that only lets you save at certain times, effectively dooming you to long endless stretches of replaying and replaying until you can slog through whatever ery they stick in front of you. Consider the poor optimisation that leaves the game chugging on a high-end pc, and still displaying all kinds of low-res textures anyway. Consider the frequent updates that corrupt your save files and render them unplayable. Consider the lack of a co-op campaign - one of the few things that made the buggy mess of ARMA II fun, and literally the only reason I bought this game in the first place. Perhaps I should have done my research, but then perhaps I had no idea what the total content of this game would contain when it bought it and was shocked to find it bare-bones, until they released the last of it months after I purchased it. In some ways it's a vast improvement over its predecessor - it looks much better, and the confusing and encyclopedic control system is explained MUCH better. The mission objectives are also a lot clearer, and completing a given mission isn't as much of a 'pray that you're in the wrong place rather than that the game as bugged out' scenario. But I still I don't know what Bohemia were attempting with this - so many design choices leave me tearing my hair out in frustration (why on earth would it take them months after release to add a tutorial section to the game? Should that not have been one of the first pieces of content released?). However, I suppose that most of my gripes regarding content have been resolved at this point, so at least that's a plus for those considering whether to buy, but all the odd little design quirks combine together to make playing this game a minefield in itself. One wrong move and you're ed. I do not recommend this game.
chevy80c10;-;This game is trash. Arma 2 with updated graphics and controls. You cant run for more than 10 seconds at a time because EVERYONE IS OVERWEIGHT apparantly. Just ruins the game. Cant go anywhere quickly unless its in a vehicle. AWFUL... was going to buy if it was like 10 bucks at christmas sale but not anymore. This game blows just like arma 2. The only thing arma 2 had going for it is dayz mod. and even that got old.
KillaKucumber;-;Buggy mess in which I get around 15fps in large multiplayer battles on the lowest settings on a GTX 670. Oh, the AI on single player is absolute dog , too, but at least I get around 40fps on single player! :D
Abracadavre;-;This game is buggy as , have fun clipping through walls and spawning outside of the map, physics... it's like from one of those indian movies, if you hit something you gonna feel the impact after few seconds. Do not buy this game.
Deise Knuts;-;unoptimized, has  game modes i can get in garrys mod, all game modes require you to suck the admins male sexual organ just to get in, and good luck if you can find your friends, because this piece of  doesnt even tell you, no, it's not ing unrealistic to show you where your friends are, and it doesnt make the game more realistic, it makes it annoying and stupid. Overall, im glad i didnt spend 30 or 60 bucks on this astraphy because this game sucks major monkey caca, 2/10 id rather play duke nukem forever
Bruce.B *;-;what? how can I write a review? I don't even have this game... -_-
heiheiheahbefheafhahbhdwhbsajwas;-;my dang multiplayer servers aint popping up in the server section why it do dis its a good games but that glitch sux
Senpai;-;While crawling at the amazing forest enjoying sights you're spotting an enemy in a bush 5 meters from you. You're making a 3 well-placed shots right into his unprotected face from your heavily modded fictional MXC(whatever that means). Blood animation confirms that you've been successful. Enemy runs into the other bushes. He probably HEAVILY injured.. This is what Arma3 is. Unpolished, unfinished game with fictional weapons on a map that makes you feel yourself an alien. They should really expanded Eastern Europe theme instead =\ Arma 2 Wasteland > Arma 3 Wasteland
KuRushie;-;First off i have to say i HATE Multiplayer games. they are not fun for me in the slightest. just a bunch of idiots modding to win. so i never tried the multiplayer. I got this for the Singleplayer, and i have to say it sucks. its far too scripted. i cant do any thing my way i have to stand here.. stand there... listen to some idoit talk and curse for half a hour when he could just say it over the radio whilst i walk or drive so i am not so bored with the crappy dialogue, but no... It's BORRING. Even when i actually got to shoot half a hour later... the gun physics are so lame i laughed and shortley after quit and uninstalled it. If you shoot a rifle at 50 metres square at a target the size of a torso, the bullet will hit it, but in this so called SIM it won't most of the time. Guns just are not that unaccrate. shotguns have spread not rifles. a rifle at 50 metres will be 1 cm each way tops not 50 cm. that alone is enough for me to quit and uninstall it and NEVER play it again.
Lady Tasha;-;Terrible optimization, controls, plot and animations. Most of servers have "white list" so they will kick out as you join them. When you find a "good" server all you play is a walking simulator and not a war game. I am not a Call of Duty or Battlefield fan but i think they are good games if you compare them to this. Also, people pretend this war game is "realistic". No, it's not. The only realistic thing is the boredom
Zedpade Smurf;-;THIS GAME IS A ING PIECE OF A BUGGED !! NEVER BUY IT!! TOTALY FAKE-SCREENSHOTS BUGGED  JUNK...JUNK...JUNK....---- NEVER BUY IT!! NEVER.... U CANT PLAY THIS PIECE OF  CRAP...WORSE THAN EVERY GAMEE GO AND REPAIR THIS !!!  YOU BOHEMIAN-INTERASSDICKS ''DEINSTALLING'' !!
Apollo | Harrison;-;Literally the best military simulator on the market. Not the Vanilla content perhaps, but it serves as the greatest platform for the mods that people create. Immersion factor is basically 11/10, stop reading this and buy the damned game.
Mr Foo;-;Downloaded Game into steam, Played for 40 Hours total. Game disapeared from computer. Redownloaded, Played for a while, Game disapeared again. As someone with a download cap and 2 other gamers in the house, was. not. impressed.
jleval;-;This game has not worked on my machine. I bought it, but there is no way to get a refund, or sell it or anything. When I go to the makers of the game, they say to go to steam for a refund. When I go to steam, they so go to the other guys. 60.00 down the drain for a game that I cant play. This will be the last game I download, and I wouldn't recommend it to anyone
harr1s0n;-;Don't even get me started with this .
Benjamin Linus;-;too expensive
AcePhoenix007 [in England];-;The title of this game should be Walking Simulator 2013 instead of Arma 3. Thank god I played this during the free weekend, because if I bought this right away, I would have done anything to get my money back. Multiplayer is quite basic and simple. Spend 10 minutes looking for a car, drive 30 miles, find someone, get killed, repeat until you get some sense knocked into you. That's Arma 3's multiplayer in a nutshell. "Realistic" shooters aren't always the best shooters, and this game proves that point. I honestly would have played Call of Duty: Ghosts instead of this. ON PC. That's how bad it is. Don't buy this game, save your money. It's not even worth buying during huge sales. If you want a survival shooter, get DayZ, not this.
Tyrannosaurus REK-9;-;What a pile of ****, needs heavy updates.
Dee(licious);-;"...and to 'use' an item simply (cough) press ctrl+i+11+#+face+enter and VOILA... you can now use the item!" Really? -_- Oh wow, that is realism in the 21st century -___-
Rakldder;-;From my point of view, it's still in early development, years from completion, horrible CPU and GPU-utilization (stutters constantly) not to mention bad PhysX performance (proprietary nightmare) lack of basic weaponry, vehicles, low-res vegetation and textures. The main campaign is full of bugs and glitches (shooting through everything without you ever having a chance spotting them) scenarios are a joke, incomplete, horrible voiceacting and bad audio quality, almost silent all the time, lack of weaponry and content (to much focus on overly expensive dlcs) and the overall experience is cheap, incomplete and you will get the feeling that the developers don't know what the  they were doing back in 2013. Update: TBA
DiddyDidIt;-;ing attriociuos game, spend an hour running to get shot by a bush biggest joke of a game ever. Its not even ing finished it looks horrible and runs horrible but thats what u should expect biggest no way Bohemia would optimise the game even slightly. I can run crysis 3 settings maved out completely solid 70fps i run this  piece of a game at 30 at max and when i change the settings to as low as possible i get 20fps. WHAT THE  KIND OF  ARE YOU MAKING FINISH YOUR ING GAMES. The only reason this  house company is still around is because of ing dayz and that is even . awful game 0/10 for effort -100/10 for not giving a   you.
Duccy;-;game of the year
TMHLegolas;-;The controls and gameplay are way too clunky for me. I don't get the appeal it has for people, maybe I missed something?
jadrammal;-;DO NOT BUY THIS GAME UNLESS YOU LIKE TO ROLEPLAY AS A MILITARY DUDE OR SOMETHING. YOU WILL LITERALLY WALK AROUND FOR 8 HOURS TRYING TO GET TO ONE PLACE. If you really like that kind of stuff, why not just join the army ?
Stingy;-;ughh. waste of money...
TedTheDrugBear;-;sucks since i cant play on any of the online servers. i have the same problem with arma ll. i would highly suggest this game if everything was just one simple download, but its not. i tried getting arma 3 and arma ll to work  welll as the dayz mod and i have had no luck.
Typhoon Delta;-;I think that Arma 2 is better. Arma 3 lacks the atmosphere.
isvlasov;-;If you want to buy this game to play coop with your friend - never try do this. The only reason to do it is if you want to see "server is not responding" all the time you want to connect. It is very strange that such an easy issue is still not solved in 2014. Don't spend your money on this game.
Procryonicx;-;Did not like it to much... Overhyped and booring
iseanm;-;If you like playing with 15 fps this game is for you.
Darko 42O;-;Cars in this game are absolutly terrible.. Not to mention the mad desync, causing you to crash your vehicles into your friends, and ending any chance of a successful fun game. Honestly. TOO BROKEN.
krijger;-;I don't have a review for this game yet.....I dont have a review for this game yet.... Holy crap I cant believe I havent reviewed this game yet. this game is honestly my favorite game for more reasons than any other game could possibly deliver. Arma 3 is a near future set game that delivers combined arms operations for a massive number of players. This game is definitly a more mature game. This game reward tactics, cordination, patience and attention to detail. This isn't a shooter for the masses. honestly arma is a niche game for a niche audience. Sure it has down falls, but they can be overlooked if you give it a chance and really experience what this game can do. Providing massive options and a massive map is only part of the magic that is Arma 3. A bunch of ingredients are useless without a good kitchen. Arma 3s kitchen is the editor. The editor allows anyone to create anyone to make missions with almost any asset in game. This provides endless replayablility as well as an excellent way for peopel to create missions to play with friends. The game play isn't perfect, it can be slow and nothing is going to be over the top like battlefield or CoD but its does provide an excelllent military simulation where every death will be infuriating but acceptable and every victory glorious but hard fought. The maps is over 219km squared, but alot of it feels empty and the parts that aren't feel really empty, with the map more would be less and I could go on, but I wont for the sake of brevity. The AI leave something to be desired, friendly AI seem about as smart as a bag of rocks, except the rocks win every time. They don't follow orders well, if they do, its almost certainly cluncky and awkward. The opposing AI are just as bad. If they don't see you from a mile away and kill you with a cold bore headshot, theyre sure to hit the deck and see right throught the bush you are hiding in and return fire accordingly. There is more to this game than what appears when you first launch it. The mod community is massive. There are mods for just about everything, which makes anything possible. These games totally expand the game to insane new heights, and some change the game all together. The people who play this game are amazing. I have made some awesome friends because of this game, and continue to make more as I go. Playing with people who compliment your play style improve the game ten fold are a critical part in the Arma 3 experience. This series has been around for over 9 years and continues to grow and mature with every installation and so does the community. I love this game and the people who play it. I don't think I'll ever stop. So here's to the next 9 years of Arma games. 10/10
< [xTc] XtremeCandy;-;This is absolute BULL####! The fact that there are only TWO helicopters and BOTH are for TRANSPORT!? Are you even serious about keeping your community base Bohemia? I swear it from this day onwards that I will NOT support any of your games that are released EVER in my life again - and you most definitely will not catch me reccomending this lackluster effort of a game to ANYONE - on the contrary I will make an active effort to warn others away from purchasing this piece of ####! First you release a game in alpha and promise that the entire game will be ready in the next few months, it took you over a year and a half just to release a SINGLE PLAYER CAMPAIGN. HOW can you call it a game when it does not even have a single player campaign? Then you rip off your community by charging $15 for an obvious last minute effort to release a DLC to get a quick bit of money? #### you and your company. Seriously. The expectation for this DLC was atleast 10 different helicopters in mutiple roles - from new attack helicopters and support helicopters, from offering different utilities such as possible winching functions? Yet you are determined to destroy a great franchise and name for a game with your lackluster efforts in releasing both game content and support. I hope I am not the only person who feels this way and that the word is spread because I hope that with these efforts that your company actually hits the banks and liquidates because frankly the ARMA reputation would be held more intact with you going bankrupt than with your current efforts. -This is coming from a veteran ARMA player who has bought into your franchise for many years (just check my steam library if you doubt this). LONG STORY SHORT: DO NOT BUY THIS DLC, THE DLC PACK OR EVEN ARMA 3 THE GAME AS YOU ARE GAURENTEED TO BE RIPPED OFF BY MONEY-HUNGRY LACKLUSTER LAZY PROGRAMMERS THAT HAVE GOTTEN TOGETHER TO RUIN THE NAME OF A GREAT FRANCHISE. THE GAME IS AVERAGE AT BEST, AND ANY GAME CONTENT PROMISES ARE EMPTY AND LACK DELIVERY. BOHEMIA NEEDS TO BUCK UP BEFORE ANYONE SHOULD EVEN CONSIDER PURCHASING ANY OF ITS GAMES OR DLC'S.
Kero (Gone for 2 Weeks);-;NEVER BUY GAMES FROM TRADING SITES!!! YOU CAN GET A REVOKED GIFT LIKE I DID!!! PLEASE UPVOTE THIS REVIEW TO KEEP IT ALIVE!!!
Eridan;-;Most realistic army simulator? more like the most realistic b*llsh*t simulator. This game is about as unrealistic as whales with detachable pen*ses that fly to jupiter and f*ck jupiters babies while on steroids. I can name 3 games more realistic than this right now. World of Warcraft. Toontown. Fapville on steroids extreme. THOSE ARE ALL 10x MORE REALISTIC. But if you wanna hear the big black juicy good parts of this game well here they are. This game features breaking your legs from 3 foots drops. dying from jumping out of a vehicle moving 2 KPH. Dying from drowning in an enclosed submarine. DERPING FROM LSD THAT YOU GOT FROM A F*CKING HOBO. but best of all dont forget the jerk circles. (this review was made entirely for comedy purposes) serious part -----> this game is pretty bad and they keep making it worse
2 week vacation BYE;-;This is by far the most dumbest and worst game I've ever played, the misions are ing horrible, nothing happens in 30 mins and then only 3 guys pop up and then nothing happens for another 30 mins. If you are ready to start hating yourself then buy this game and regret it forever. It's was a mistake buying this
OutworldDickrider69;-;ARMA III HELICOPTERS While exiting a helicopter it hit me and I died. I tried again and my parachute didnt deploy. I tried again and I died from hitting the air hard enough(WTF) ARMA III GROUND VEHICLES My tank hit a fence and broke down. My truck did a flip on a 1 cm high pebble and crushed me. A quad bike nipped the back of my truck which caused it to explode as if it was hit by a rocket. ARMA III PVP People go under the ground and shoot you. You get fatigued from walking 2 metres but a red dot sight will cure that for you somehow. You swap kills a lot because of lag. ARMA III GRAPHICS Graphics can be good but high end computers lag. ARMA III FUN Doesnt exist.
Stepan of Rivia;-;Battle Royale mod launcher. Requires a powerful CPU to maintain decent FPS (even at the lowest graphical settings), especially in cities.
9/11 Was T-Sided, never forget<3;-;amazing game, the fps isnt to good tho.
jimm3ron;-;very slow paced. controls are clunky. campaign makes absolutely no sense! if a game is not attractive enough to play for free, then its not something i would pay for ever
Sergeant_Mark_IV;-;Singleplayer feels like Duty Calls, Multiplayer feels like Red Orchestra without fun.
Ether;-;its a great game with good campagne great multiplayer work fine rare glitches (Yes arma with rare glitches) i only with more weapons and vehicles becourse Arma 3 is in a close future whe got some rly cool vehicles and weapons but i miss Hummer with 50c or good old Black Hawk also some weapons like M4 or normal AK47 :)
Edward_penishands;-;Pretty .
Fruitus;-;It was okay 10/10 ~IGN
AHappyKitten;-;i cant join servers, everytime it says "Battleye initiliazation failed" Does somebody know the answer to this problem?
Liguera;-;arma 3? more like GAYRMA 3 BECAUSE IT FRICKIN SUCKS AZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZZ okay lets begin this 1. the graphics are frickin terrible, they look like they were made in a ps1 connected to a nes and atari 5200! they are very horrible and yet the game was made in 2013, what the FRICK! my god couldnt they just use an engine that made call of duty advanced warfare? the game would look stunning with the engine 2. the gameplay is bad, like real bad. there are no crosshairs, hitmarkers, and the recoil looks it was made by a drunken donkey because you cant shoot normally and your character looks fricken gay wielding the gun. 3. the maps are big and empty, also the props are repeated 2,000 times making the maps look boring and not even new. worst of all, you find an enemy in 1 hour because the maps are so empty, that you and your team cant find the frickin enemiess 4. story doesnt make sense and its only you joining the military, that's it. you play the bad campaign and realize that all you have to do is listen to your gay boss who will yell at you if you dont shoot at the frickin enemies the story is so bad that the ai is gay and unrealistic unlike call of duty so arma 3 is a very bad game and its very overpriced, it would be better if the developers werent such monkeys and learned from call of duty, they would be rich and grateful by many fans so i give arma 3 a 1/10, bad game
The #1 Surrey jack;-;I am ing mad this game cu k i just payed $60 for  sake and it wont launch ive tried everything ing !
Waifu Crusader;-;No more falling and breaking legs? 11/10 GAME OF THE YEAR
rim6o;-;"This is not a game for people who want fast action movie style gaming, this is a game for people who appreciate the finer things." This is the kind of line you'll find in most positive reviews of ArmA 3. The thing is ArmA 3 fails miserably in every single front involving both 'the finer things' and the basic things. BI Studio decided to use an ancient patched-up engine, used since the times of the Operation Flashpoint. You'd think the bright side of this is they used the saved money and resources to put everything into solid focus on most important aspects of a 'military sandbox' they claim they've dished out. Long story short - they didn't. ArmA 3 is not actually worth a comprehensive review so let me show you some of examples of how bad execution you can expect in every single corner of the game. Ironically, the praised mods greatly expose ArmA 3 as a game that doesn't provide even a basic set of properly implemented essential features. What the DayZ developers achieved with the engine also show what kind of bad apple ArmA 3 is. Performance: ArmA 3 has already become legendary of it's poor optimisation within the gaming community. The game has completely inadequate system requirements to what it presents. Even taking into account some little simulation (unlike by the common opinion) under the hood. All of it topped with lack of proper use of multi-core processors. Just one of the forum topics on the subject: http://forums.bistudio.com/showthread.php?147533-Low-CPU-utilization-amp-Low-FPS Damage and wounding model: I knew it wasn't perfect but what I saw and read left me in awe. A 'military focused sandbox', 'military simulation'. So you'd think the model is at least solid, right? If so we could as well call Return to Castle Wolfenstein a military sandbox. FEAR 1 would be something ArmA 3 could only aspire to. To put it simpler: The model is non-functional. You can shoot a man in a freakin' finger few times and he will die. You can put a bullet through the back of a knee of a man and he will only flinch. Helmets protect whole heads uniformly (yup, including the face!), bp vests protect the entire torso uniformly. To put it into perspective some of the damage and wounding aspects of ArmA 3 are worse than those in the decade+ old Operation Flashpoint (same developers). See: http://forums.bistudio.com/showthread.php?168548-Damage-system-sucks-fix-needed&p=2784549&viewfull=1#post2784549 AI: Not a trace of human-like behavior. In a close quarter engagement if you put bullets into AI's arms it will only flinch slightly. First, second, third - flich, flinch, flinch. And the he'll kill you with a perfect head-shot, without any delay. AI also simply 'isn't bothered' to survive. AI under suppressive fire? No problemo for AI! See: http://www.armaholic.com/page.php?id=23969 Sound: You'd think sound location (spatialization) would be important for developers of a 'military sandbox'? You pretensious brat! Arma doesn't use any sort of spatialization. By now you should already know better you shouldn't expect positional audio of any sort (HRTF, binaural, Rapture3D...;7.1 surround is not positional audio). The game doesn't even do the basic stereo panning on many sound samples (sic!). It's unplayable for me without DolbyHeadphone enabled in the preferences of my Asus Xonar. To top it off, if you imagine a certain situation should involve 20 audio samples (steps, equipment 1, equipment 2, wind, ambient, birds, door opening, squad mate unholstering his pistol...) you can cross off about 10 of those to get a feeling of how rich the ArmA's audio environment is. 'Erm... so maybe... the potential?' Until there will be a copy of 'ArmA's potential' for sale I'd like to stick to evaluation of what I see. Even if I give it some slack it doesn't really make the picture more bright. ArmA has been released a year ago. Fundamental aspects of it by all signs need rewrite or ground-up implementation, which isn't even on the horizon. You plan on giving feedback and asking on the forums. The only thing you'll get is a slap in the face in a form of a shopping cart DLC, women DLC, real sea streams DLC or maybe Latin America Forces DLC.
Budeholly;-;This game was just too slow for me.. Some servers are 'meh' at best. The maps are so large and the server populations are so low, its a very slow experience. I've tried several of the game modes, which does tend to make for a different play experience, but for me, I like combat atleast every 3-5 mins in a game versus running/driving/flying across maps for 10 mins to get to the action.
[F2B] Swiggles.;-;Really fun game, the problem is that most people still play ArmA II.
Pokebreaker;-;It was fun at first, but it grew old quickly. I purchased due to Atlis Life mod, and quickly found the lack of players willing to comply with server rules, made the game not so enjoyable. The large maps are nice and all, but too damn big for 100 or less people... I enjoy the realist consideration of the game, such as fatigue from sprinting, and its effect on aiming. Overall, ARMA 3 does not have a lasting effect on me. Some of the situations that occur are very fun, and memorable, but I often find myself logged in, running around in circles doing nothing. For large scale combat (meaning hundreds of players at the same time, in the same location), on maps the size of Arma 3 maps, I would recommend Planetside 2, which is a free-to-play game. The simulation ARMA 3 offers is extremely impressive, and quenches my thirst of rendering 360 No-Scope Headshot noobs useless. However, as a game, I don't enjoy it as much.
LUCKY 7;-;payed for this game today and played it today and must say im very disapointed and sad it cost anything near 60$ when mp lags to a  :/
nkf2003;-;Arma 2 is better
D4 W3!rdW01f & Pengu!n;-;Arma 3 is one of the worst games i have ever played and i have no idea how people play the game, the controls are confusing and completely ridiculous, you set the game to the lowest difficulty and still die by a single shot. and if you happen to press a certain button (still no clue which button that is.) your game completely freezes on itself and only allows you to move and look around.
Jake;-;so i got this game and wont even let me install it or show in my library but to my friends it says i have it wtf.....
havenfj:::::::::;;;;;;;//;-;Very boring unless you like realism
rAttmAniA;-;This game is a huge disapointment so far, like they took ACE mod and used new graffix.
[1stNOG]General America;-;I would not get this game until after it fully comes out. The game is in what still appears to be an alpha stage, in which there is very little content. They need to keep coming out with new vehicles and guns in order for this game to be worth buying. Right now, I would recommend ARMA 2 before this game, as ARMA 2 has much more content.
TazBabyUK;-;a must have game
The Defiler;-;Arma 3 isn't worth the price. For $10 maybe... But we all know how greedy Bohemia interactive is. The game is so-so even if you have friends who will play it for you. There is only so much you can do on an island with 20+ weapons and a handfull of vehicles. Even the level editor is kind of basic. Optimization is MUCH better than ARMA2 but is still  poor leaving the game looking disgusting no matter how good your rig is. You can get a good hour of fun just screwing around but it'll wear off. Stick with Battlefield Bad Company 2 on steam.
K.;-;JUST  YOU BATTLE EYE
BAWB FAGET;-;unoptimized gar, no matter the rig. Not worth 60
Trapavelli;-;It always chrashes no matter what i play and there seems to be no fix
Rice Revanz;-;Tis good, like, really good...
Alexsys;-;This game is quite a simulation game, not hard to learn the basic, i will recommand this game! i got all the collection and i'm still enjoying Bohemia interactive games! -Open world-a giant freedome! -RPG mission-for those who likes to role play and get freedome, -and an awesome simulation game!
XXX_BlazeitBlunder_XXX;-;Worst FPS ever... Battle Field is far better than this trash...
Mp3zer;-;NOT Worth 60$ don't buy glitchy as all hell servers dont work when you try to host then bag ping framerates are terrible makes your spelling terrible because you dont want to look at this anymore and you just want to be done with it to complicated no console to do anything crappy editing tools and everything else this game is on par with dayz right now as it stand which = Crappiest game of the year awards NOT WORTH 60$ DO NOT BUY
The Defiler;-;Arma 3 isn't worth the price. For $10 maybe... But we all know how greedy Bohemia interactive is. The game is so-so even if you have friends who will play it for you. There is only so much you can do on an island with 20+ weapons and a handfull of vehicles. Even the level editor is kind of basic. Optimization is MUCH better than ARMA2 but is still  poor leaving the game looking disgusting no matter how good your rig is. You can get a good hour of fun just screwing around but it'll wear off. Stick with Battlefield Bad Company 2 on steam.
The #1 Surrey jack;-;I am ing mad this game cu k i just payed $60 for  sake and it wont launch ive tried everything ing !
havenfj:::::::::;;;;;;;//;-;Very boring unless you like realism
rAttmAniA;-;This game is a huge disapointment so far, like they took ACE mod and used new graffix.
Lost Tech;-;A game about walking.
#PleaseStandBy;-;Fantastic game! Really great graphics and a lot of fun if your into Simulation Shooters!
Sir Fieel the Universe Destroyer;-;Well, every single FPS is  compared to ARMA III. Just. This.
TysonSux666;-;This game is ing great 1000/10
Airforceguy805;-;This game is AMAZING. With its various gamemodes such as King of the Hill, Wasteland, Altis life and Invade and Annex,(All made by the community)this game is very fun to play with friends online. Single player is suprisingly good for an Arma title so brownie points to the campaign dev team. But I will say this, the game is a constant work in progress. I have seen it progress since alpha and even now, they are adding units and they are not yet done with the campaign still, but as long as it mantains the level we have been seeing, then I think its worth it. 10/10
Jaxswat;-;Tried it out on free weekend. Can't stop playing. Who needs sleep when you have Arma 3?
superman9632;-;this game should be free i think people who made this game wants money so much that he made this game cost
Darell3;-;Gameplay is good. But then it's the ArmA series, the servers are not optimized properly, even with high-end hardware your bound to get low FPS. Until they actually get their  together and optimize the game. It's a NO from me :P.
Pyrowman;-;Way too expensive. It could have been so much better, if only they had optimised it for non-NASA PCs.
Sebastian A. [DK];-;its a  game, you have no clue what you doing. in basecamp you cant hit at taget at 400m, the game dont explane how to work the scope. if you press careful ones right click you get the small red dot on top, if you hold it down you zoom in at the side of the riffle... WTF I WANT TO ING USE THE TELESOPIC SIGHT!! HOW HARD CANT IT BE TO EXPALINE THE PLAYER TO USE A SCOPE.. IS THIS GAME ROCKET SCIENCE?  THIS GAME! dont buy it, dont support at game developers that make games cryptic. why even use x to duck and z to lay down.. WHY?
Darknesh;-;NOT worth the price. Luckily got it when it was alpha for $30. Lacks content and engine is still a piece of crap.
DingoDukes;-;Worst 40 i spent in my life super laggy and i got banned globally for no reason
Socks;-;Got into a plane and accidently ejected dooming my squad
PotPants;-;I got sent to jail for saying hi to a cop 11/10 would role play again
deg deg;-;lol i don't even own this
Ze Leetgrain (NG);-;It's like ArmA 2, but 3.
THAT BELONGS IN A MUSEUM;-;Worst game i've ever played. This is , and this is the worst 30 I've ever spend. .
Bexy - T S M B O I S;-;I know this is only beta, but I already know that this is going to be one of the greatest multiplayer to date. The combat simulation is perfect, the tactical gameplay is perfect, the squad system is perfect, the open world is perfect. The graphics are perfect (You will need a good computer to handle this game.) 10/10 BUY IT!
Wai Yu So Gai;-;Worst ing game i've ever played.... The least optimised game i've ever played, unplayable with 1-35FPS all the time wiht a GTX780.... Dont buy unless you want to spend 50 Euros on 100% pure garbage
Tony Abbott;-;best uninstall simulator 2021 wont let me move changes my controls to  ones tutorial is ing horrible wont let me join any games 666/911 DO NOT INSTALL
Brett H;-;Nothing like COD, or Battlefield. It's absolutely killer on a pc I have a amd fx 6300, 8gb ram, and a geforce 760 4gb. I get about 20-35 fps on medium settings on multiplayer. Soon to be ugrading to intel and a 900 series geforce gpu. Other than that if you have a good pc buy this game. 9/10
C4Gamer;-;Nice Game Never got the Chance to Play Arma 3 Life tho
<McMarko>;-;i dont even have it and i fell like its the best fawking game ever :D 10/10 would  if it was a girl
Senpie :3;-;Great game
Incest;-;when you climb to the top of the west gate and you are contemplating suicide and you wanna play a video game at the top and you just launch any random game in your library and this one launches you will throw the laptop off first then dive after it hoping the debris from the destroyed laptop kills you if the fall does not because this game is the game that will make you go west gate yourself f.uck you jacob you autistic incest rat you made me waste 60 dollars i will f.ucking r.ape you c.unt
Joe Bandit;-;Can someone buy me Arma 3?
Volvo give rankup pls I buy skin;-;I ran over someone and they flew away. 10/10 game
Vivid;-;This is my opinion on the Game, do not freak out: This game is a military simulator, so it is for certain people who enjoy this type of hardcore Games. I'm just going to say this game takes a long time to get used to and you will not get many kills. I'm just going to say if you come from Titles such as Call of Duty this game will be very confusing to you. After playing it for about 2 hours, I have to say it was very fun and I only got one kill. The controls were very confusing, every key on your keyboard is used. I had a hard time even knowing how to get into a vehicle or such. Other then my opinion on the game, this is a very good Simulation of the Military where not everything is about Camos and "Skins" This is the real deal and as realistic simulation is going to get. If you come from Arma 2 you will like this game as it offers much more. Do I like the engine? No. This is only reason why I'm giving it a No, how are you supposed to play a game with such confusing controls and lack of Knowledge given to you? I'm just very confused when I get into the game... Buy Arma 2 and see how you think about that game before buying this 60 Dollar game
Mj. Shepard;-;Arma 3 BattlEye banned me after 95hours of game play for no reason. and These no support contact for BattlEye for this issue, and all bans are non-revisable. To be aware... do not buy this game you may have to buy a 2nd copy. "Average of this happening to players is 9% of the player base" Done throw away your money!
Teddy;-;Summary: Tensions rise as NATO peacekeeping forces begin to leave The Republic of Altis: a strategic fault-line between crumbling European influence and a powerful, resurgent East. But when a key radar facility drops off the grid, a Mediterranean flashpoint risks escalating into global conflict. Also Gameplay: The engine is a big step up over ArmA 2. Things like the adjustable stances, dynamic fog, physics and underwater terrain add tons of possibilities in the game. Setting: This is one of my major problems with the game. Sci-fi and simulation don't mix well. While I know that everything in the game is possible, the fact remains that most vehicles and weapons are pure speculation. The equipment not being used in present day armed forces partly kills the immersion for me. Hopefully ACE mod will fix this. SP content: The campaign (so far) is awesome. BI managed to improve the storytelling and the gameplay as well as the realism. MP: performance in MP can be horrible, depending on the gametype and server. I don't often find populated servers with interesting gametypes, as there only seem to be 2 popular gametypes on public servers. Collapse
Bunni[E]^;-;Would buy!
KILLACLOUDLUCAS;-;Absolutly Amazing army simulator, Great with friends if you wanna try something tactical. GREAT Game and love the custom maps which people make. Very high quality and considered and can keep for entertained forever! Great Game. 9/10 Con: The only con i have is the AI is very skilled when it comes to where you are, they know very much. but thats the only downside i have.
Hel;-;basically Greece sim 2014
Clean Criminal * Sharkoon;-;A good modular game, you want a shooter... you got it... you want a RPG game... log on to a server... you got it... Workshop support, active community.... and a bunch of play-time!
RAZOR;-;this game is the ing best !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
L6Flare;-;Awesome War game always up to date!
Acetylene;-;Just played my first battleroyale and it went pretty good. I killed 5-6 guys and was 1v1. Well I lost 1v1, but it was an amazing game. My heart was racing. Awesome game
Jadek061;-;A thoroughly enjoyable game, a bit of a steep learning curve in order to better understand the control systems and the basics of aiming and shooting accurately, however the community is awesome. The long-range team based encounters are amazing and it is without a doubt one of the top 2 MILSIM games out there. If I had to chose between BF2: Project Reality or ARMA III i wouldn't be able to these two games are the best examples of MILSIM games you can find.
TH3 GOVINATOR;-;How the hell could a someone so physically unfit and bad with a gun make it into the military? Has to stop for a breath after a 100 meter run, when getting shot at is able to aim the gun literally everywhere BUT the target.
SCP-That_SpyStaples!;-;ARMA 3 makes me want to slam my head into the keyboard
sTj <Blu3>;-;WOW  never spent my money that well -.- BIG SARCASM THIS GAME IS FAR FROM BEING A "SIMULATOR" Its not balanced, gameplay/control are HORRIBLE, This game is a waste of Time, Money, Brain usage. I DONT RECOMMEND THIS GAME WHAT SO EVER
That_Random132;-;this game allows you to experience realistic combat gameplay in a massive military sandbox.
Clarkabot;-;Bring it out on mac!!!!!!!!
SmacnCheese;-;Many different type of missions for solo type players and a lot of game types for those competitive types. 10/10.
EvroMalarkey;-;This is indeed the best Arma game we have ever seen.
Thompson and Thomson;-;well done, but my friend compano keeps dying on everything ;-;
Atomic_Holepuncher;-;This is good.
{TBAG]}Snarf;-;toReal4me 3/10
MrToasty;-;Bad game,bad graphics dont download Its fake
Onii-Chan My Socks Are Moist;-;>Went into a server. >9 year old screaming about how DayZ is better. 11/10 Like Arma 2 with guns.- IGN
BuMMeR;-;Its a great game ! Me and my frieds are playing at the Arma every day and we are very ENJOY !
slewthy;-;This is a game that really does requeire pacience and skill to play happyly you have to really get to grips with the controls to be decient at this game, i am not brilliant at it but i still really enjoy the game even if i dont pwn people. There can sometimes be some lag problems when you first get this game (you really need a good graphics card) but this is easly fixed overall i would rate it 9/10.
Ewol_;-;Great game. If you like shooters this game is for you! Even if you dont like shooters, get it.
Grunt 007;-;I've owned this game for only one day and I already have 15 hours logged... I cant stop playing. This game will kill me. Buy it and die with me. 11/10
goochygaming;-;recomed for simulator players it really enjoyable but 1 of the probloms is the fps about but overall that a like the game and the stuff you can do on it and it recomed for simulator player
kingjaxsean;-;Great Game!
Snedger;-;After playing shooters for a while, I have never experienced anything like ARMA. The whole series offers intense gameplay, and I surely could not be the only one to say, after a gun fight, you will be shaking with adrenaline and excitement. If you've played DayZ (Which has the same engine, practically the same game but with zombies) Then you'd know this experience pretty well. I recommend this to anyone!
joeboy2066;-;IT WAS TO GLICHEY FOUR ME
Snedger;-;After playing shooters for a while, I have never experienced anything like ARMA. The whole series offers intense gameplay, and I surely could not be the only one to say, after a gun fight, you will be shaking with adrenaline and excitement. If you've played DayZ (Which has the same engine, practically the same game but with zombies) Then you'd know this experience pretty well. I recommend this to anyone!
GAMEntertainment;-;Does not function correctly, lots of bad code - 2/5 Stars for failing to fix a single Ram-Memory bug for ten years through like fifty titles of the same game.
[WPE] Buffie;-;Awesome game. Well worth the price.
ROV;-;this game should change its name to BAN3
unknown.man;-;this game is a very good game i recommend to buy it the graficks are good and good details as well good job
Rebel Rusky;-;Killed my friend with a stolen go-kart while robbing the Federal bank in Altis life so did'nt have to split the money. I only recieved 10,000 10/10 would kill again.
Capt. Baldy;-;Still horribly unoptimised. A year now and it still runs badly. Random hardware configurations of less powerful systems sometimes outdo those of very powerful rigs. Most of the work done in game is done over 1 core therefore very high clock speeds will benefit over multi-core, low frequency setups according to B.I, but this is not necessarily true since some people find that the game is not properly utilising their CPUs to the fullest extent. I beat the recommended requirements but regardless of settings, tweaks, etc the most I can get is 40fps at 1080p. I've waited patiently for over a year now and still this game runs very badly, regardless of settings, drivers, OS (tried Win 7, Win 8/Win 8.1). Sadly 40fps is a generous mark since when heavy action occurs the frame rate typically tumbles. I have a Core i5-2500K at 4Ghz and a HIS Radeon 7870 IceQ X @ 1100/1250. Unfortunately this game is pretty much unplayable for me and has been since I pre-ordered it during the Alpha stage. Apart from single player missions being added after release and some bug fixes here and there, performance issues are still a big problem for many people. Unfortunately biased people with a love for ARMA will disregard this review and vote negatively. They believe that because their performance is fine, that this review is untrue and therefore deserves a thumbs down. This doesn't take away the fact that the ARMA engine is incredibly inefficient and unoptimised and doesn't take away from the fact that in many reported cases, weaker systems have better performance over beast rigs with very high clock speeds, core numbers and multi-card configurations. Again this isn't always the case but it has been reported on many occasions and highlights just how unoptimised and hit n' miss the engine is. The gameplay is good, the performance is not. Buy it at your own risk. Do not childishly downvote this review just because you have a blind passion or appropriate setup for this game.
Recla;-;THIS IS A DAYZ RIPOFF GAME PLS RATE MY REVIEW SO I FEEL KOOL
Snake;-;GET IT
d4rkf0rc3;-;Nice, really nice.
cggreene;-;Very good mil sim.
AsOiX (US Central);-;Good for people that like real army simulation. There are some really hardcore servers, then there are just silly ones. All in all a great game.
Captain-Splat;-;Great game must have
SUPERMANINJA;-;Too much like Arma 2, except Arma 2 mods are way better.
Pewpewpew;-;Not a game for the casual shooter. Slow and steady is the key as this is a simulator, not an arcade game. Those who love combat realism will love this. With realistic physics, there is a lot to do in this simulator.
Ghost of Hoi Ching Future;-;Pretty boring after a while. Gets old fast.
The Lord Bane;-;Many fun Such hard Much annoy in other news this game is very different to every other shooter, more complex. hard but fun.
LAW-11-NYC;-;7/10, has the potential to be a better game with time if it is still supported.
IvoryState;-;What are you doing, Stalker?
mottrising;-;my favrate game recomended at six stars
Grunt 007;-;I've owned this game for only one day and I already have 15 hours logged... I cant stop playing. This game will kill me. Buy it and die with me. 11/10
goochygaming;-;recomed for simulator players it really enjoyable but 1 of the probloms is the fps about but overall that a like the game and the stuff you can do on it and it recomed for simulator player
kingjaxsean;-;Great Game!
Ewol_;-;Great game. If you like shooters this game is for you! Even if you dont like shooters, get it.
SpinDie426;-;The only way i can describe the inner workings of this game is to envision a car junkyard. Now imagine throwing a giant white sheet over that junkyard and painting nice colors on it. Thats what arma3 is. Just unnaceptable for a 2014 title. I can't believe how poor this game's engine and game mechanics are. It's just shocking to look back 16 years at games like delta force 2 in 1998 and think that this is actually worse. There is so much erratic behavior as a result of poor engine mechanics it is not even possible to even pretend to try fixing them all. After looking into it i discovered that this game uses the same exact base engine as operation flashpoint from back in 2002. The same engine that arma1 uses, arma2, and now arma3. It's like trying to re-use a 50yr old boat trailer meant for 13ft boats on a 100ft YACHT. It's just lazy and unacceptable. I even read a huge article about how the actual developers of the game confirmed that the engine does not utilize multiple cpu cores. And why would it? The engine is ancient and just heavily modified. (i know this is the part where you argue and toss out comments like 'Ohh but you didnt type in the command parameter -8 threads or something shallow like that) that does nothing. If a game is not hard coded from the base engine to unload different tasks onto different cpu cores. Than it does not make any difference if the game can recognize multiple cpu's or not.) Arma2 had much better graphics in terms of realistic color pallette. If you ever look at arma2 screenshots or dayz videos, it actually looks real. And there is so much in the way of woods/trees/bushes and other vegetation in arma2 to the point where you genuinely feel like you are in the woods. Arma3's colors are unrealistic and just plain fruity. Arma2 was more acceptable as a 2008-9 product. Do you remember all of the different maps in arma2? Do you remember the THOUSANDS of different structures in terms of houses/outhouses/farms/industrial machinery. What does arma3 have? It has one map. Stratis. And the other map is no different. So please don't tell me arma3 has two maps when it just recycles the same terrain from stratis.
Dante;-;If you have a somewhat of a decent PC its fun if your willing to spend over 800 bucks on a nice PC if not well this aint the game for you.
BuMMeR;-;Its a great game ! Me and my frieds are playing at the Arma every day and we are very ENJOY !
That_Random132;-;this game allows you to experience realistic combat gameplay in a massive military sandbox.
Clarkabot;-;Bring it out on mac!!!!!!!!
KILLERBOBRge;-;I can just say this game has no real physics... If you play it enough you will hear the term arma'd meaning you fell off some steps and broke your legs or you crashed into a small bush and your truck blows up... If they put forth the effort for real physics then I would give them a thumbs up.
Galaxy;-;Rip off of the game that created video game, Leagues of Legends.,
Dockirby11;-;i rly want this game some one gift me it :D
Naos;-;I would recommend it to someone who is new to the series...However..If you are a hardcore ARMA II player like myself Then DO NOT BUY THIS...Unless you want to play altis life or some other crap.. this game was one of the biggest let downs
Sawkilla;-;This game shouldn't have been released yet. Deadlines kill games. I love this franchise but this game is a big, steaming, pile of poop. I DONT RECOMMEND IT AS OF NOW....This game isn't worth 10 bucks and they are still trying to scam people out of their 60 bucks! For 60 bucks I want a perfect game in the aspect of NO BUGS. This game is full of them. It seems every update that comes out makes the game worse, not better. The devs care about the money not the game. The same bugs are there since the alpha release... Save your money on this pile of garbage.
Jimi;-;Pile of , biggest waste of money ever. It should be illegal to sell a game as broken as this for 45 mother ing euros. 5/5
joepothead;-;cant go invert on xbox controller fix it please i cant play otherwise
kY;-;SHIVER ME TIMBERS!
Jemme;-;Unfortunatly, I was unable to play the multiplayer very well because of the horrible frame rate I was having... I would not recomend you buy this game if you don't have above average gaming pc
[Int.X]ThOrn;-;Such a beautiful game, excellent realism and tactical combat, you truly feel immersed in a real war.... however ARMA 3 has major failings, firstly it is poorly optimised, runs on only a couple of threads, meaning the newer your pc, the slower the game will run. The review pc was a Piledriver 4.5GHz 8-Core AMD with a 680GTX Card, Ultra High Settings the game had the same frame rate as Low Settings - Averaging between 18 - 30fps, which was jerky but playable, until you got somewhere where a tank rolled in behind us and started shoooting, then everyone there was down to 3fps. People say there pc runs fine, but half the people I know who play are barely able to move and shoot, Until Arma 3 is fixed and written properly to support modern hardward, you should not buy this game. The developers have never managed to fix Arma 2, I hold little hope they will fix Arma 3!
Flammable Hobos;-;Call me stupid, close minded, or awful at this game. I read the reviews, plenty of people said "you either love it or hate it." Welp. I tried joining 3 or 4 games. It was buggy as all get out. I clipped through random crap, there was no meaningful tutorial, the controls were confusing, and the maps seemed huge once I managed to join. I had no idea what I was doing, most of the guides were either in Cyrillic or were mentioning some game mode, nothing outlining the basics. I'm not usually one to say something is overcomplex and walk away, but  this game is hard to enjoy. I'll take another crack at it I'm sure, because I did just sink $40 in to this that I can never have back, but I'd advise others to avoid purchasing, even if you aren't a filthy casual like myself. Because damn. This game is stupidly obtuse.
Puggles;-;its an alright game not as good as the past installments but it does bring some new stuff to the table; improved graphics , more stances and better running animations. dont think that they should have set it further into the future just wrecks the immersive factor. also contains loads of bugs and frame rate issues. i would recommend buying arma 2 and arma 2 OA first before buying this becuase the modding community has not backed this game enough and as far as i know they have not added ACE/ACRE mod and a propper vietnam usung mod yet.
TripN KniveZ;-;THIS IS JUST TO RECOMMEND OTHERS LIKE ME... THIS IS IN NO WAY SAYING THE GAME IS HORRIBLE. I understand it's not a casual shooter, but coming from Battlefield to play this? I know what people may say about my review of the game, but holy ... Movement mechanics by far are TOO COMPLEX... I typically expect to use only the minimum amount of keys to perform movements, but what the ... I am not going to count the plethera of those required to perform different movements, but it's some kind of high  number. I played the campaign as far as I could take and halted completely when it came to flying the UAV... I took me about 10 tries until I gave up and shouted obsenities at my TV... Every time I tried I flew it into a rock, a house, myself, and even into the ocean... TLDR: I dont have the patience to play this, nor the appetite to constantly learn how to bind keys. If you are a casual shooter kind of person stay the  away from this. Trust me... I'm pretty good at battlefield, but just terrible at this. (TWO DIFFERENT GAMES COMPLETELY) I guess that's what makes this game unique. PROs? it's pretty beautiful though...
SpetZay;-;Nope. becuse i got randomly banned.
Kaomin;-;More than 600 hours in game, last version (1.14) and even today I feel like I play a beta version of the game, too many bug!! poor physics, which I could be refund...
Omgwtfbbq;-;Very slow moving, not a very friendly multiplayer environment, very disappointed by the gameplay.
Shield1739;-;Arma 3 is an AWESOME game, I have not played it much, but the amount of time I have been playing i have had SOOO MUCH FUN! If you are looking for a War Simulator, here you have it!
Bucketnate Britta'd it;-;This game is legit and amazing. The devs try not to call it a sim but it's as close as you can get while still being a game. It's very realistic with damage and weight models. Body armor and helmets give a degree of protection. The same applies to the variation of vehicles in the game. The 2 maps are HUGE and there are plans for DLC in the future which will no doubt add on to that. Speaking of addons the giant mod community for the game is always hard at work making new missions, weapons, and vehicles to add into the game free of charge. There is endless replayablility with this game and if you're a shooter/military game fan then this should be in your library. Honestly, if the game was more optimised (Insane CPU usage for projectile physics and AI decision making) I wouldn't even play half of the other shooters that are out today because Arma does it all and MORE. Pick this game up!
Elisabeth Volken;-;Dont buy this game, ArmA 2/AO is way better.
Trixie Jensen;-;"It's like Call of Duty and Battlefield." -IGN
Hub;-;This game is ing amazing You SHOULD buy this amazing game
oO Para Oo;-;i prefer arma 2, the current day wepaons not bug eyes yawnsville.
PurpnJeff;-;A very fun, military game that gets really intense.
Stevie Wonder;-;Love this game
Reathonax;-;get to shoot bullets with guns
levi;-;I can wear a tron suit and drive around in a GO-CART and blow up bases with an RPG, 10/10
WoLFiiee < changaming.com >;-;PC Cant Handle The Sheer Power Of The Game, Getting About 15FPS Some times Even 3FPS, I Even Upgraded my PC So i could PLay the game.
Vadelicet;-;Epoch Mod. First time playing, I find some ghille clothing and a little pistol with two magazines. I take off running around, exploring and such. See a helicopter, I go to hide. Once it passes I keep on running, right? Well, I notice this little black thing in the sky following me around. It turns out to be one of those little quad-copter remote controlled drones. So I decide, eh. I'll just outrun it. I take off and hide behind a building, thinking I'm safe. Not even two seconds later, there's a sniper round that hits the wall next to me. So I freaking book it about 200meters into these tall bushes. I have ghille camo on, right? I should be safe. Well, after about a minute or so, something moves past and catches my eye. It's this naked, armless, bloodied up ... thing. I full on gun it straight out of that bush, just moving as fast as I can to get away. It decides to follow. I unload two magazines into the foul abomination that it is before it finally dies. (Let's be honest, I missed... a lot) THE THING EXPLODES. IT'S HEAD COMES FLYING TOWARDS ME. I backpeddle, expecting it to explode... Only for a truck to come out of nowhere and run me over where I stood. 10\10 would play again.
Phantom;-;It's  lol
Andr;-;Don't buy this game! Its (y) with ALOT of bugs and  that just ain't gonna be fixed. It took them 2 years just to get the bipod in the game. Even when there was a HUGE demand on them on their forums! and in the meantime they took themselve to make the  DLC Kart! I can run the game on ultra. And if you are going to be doing some sniper duty. You will be disappointed, because after a not so long range(400-1000) you will see floating rocks and ppl walking in mid air! (They are of course walking on the ground, but that is invisible) So you will not know if you are shooting at ppl or the invisible ground that might just be in front of them! This game represent 5 thing: Bugs, Bugs, Bugs, Bugs and yes, Bugs!
T0AST4LIFE;-;great game for multi-player servers and story, but mostly multiplayer. Arma 3 life is AWESOME!!!
SpiteU;-;This game gave me PTSD.
Idk-Foster;-;Mouse scroll Simulator. Want to give orders? Scroll down the menu. Want to get your inventory? Be in a specific area and then scroll down the menu. Want to stop / start the engine? Scroll down the menu. Want to switch guns? Press the scroll wheel twice. Nuff sed, If you love scrolling down the wheel constantly in a 60 Game + DLC " Game " This is for you. Too bad I dont have a job. Wish me luck, * Robs the bank for 60 *
Pnazer;-;Please buy me this epic peice of a thingy.
PhotoCock;-;not bad...could be better if i could find the secret m3lons in it...i was promised m3lons
Kris Kringle;-;I don't own this game but it let me write this review. 420/360 - IGN Would review again.
Actionizer;-;Amazing game, good graphics and way better optimized than ArmAII Addictive and has amazing scenery and surroundings within the game.
whiteknight62b;-;Arma is a game about choices and split second reactions that mean life or death. I never play alone when I play Arma and I expect the same for you. If your a fan of dayz without the huge consequances of dayz then this is a great game for you. You fly planes, drive cars, mow enemies down all while playing on a huge map with lots of enemy players. Its hyper realisitc with things like engine failure wheels popping, non regenitive health, food and water levels, and of course the fear of war. The three game modes I suggest you play is altis life, wasteland, and the Battle Royale mod. All of those are great. You can see by the hours I've put into this game how much I love it. I plan on putting many more hours into it in the near future.
Warmanreaper;-;Absolutely horrible.. DO NOT BUY , ESPECIALLY IF UR BANNED ON DAYZ SA , These pieces of  did something thats probably illegal, most likely buisness fruad... They dont tell you or give u a warning, if ur banned on dayZ that you'll be banned here as well.. The Devs are complete , They dont even give refund even tho THEY DIDN'T WARN US ABOUT THE BANS!!! Do not buy it , they are milking money so hard... if you dont you will thank me, Cause this game is like a Arma copy with new guns... it sucks so bad..
KILLERBOBRge;-;I can just say this game has no real physics... If you play it enough you will hear the term arma'd meaning you fell off some steps and broke your legs or you crashed into a small bush and your truck blows up... If they put forth the effort for real physics then I would give them a thumbs up.
GAMEntertainment;-;Does not function correctly, lots of bad code - 2/5 Stars for failing to fix a single Ram-Memory bug for ten years through like fifty titles of the same game.
Galaxy;-;Rip off of the game that created video game, Leagues of Legends.,
[WPE] Buffie;-;Awesome game. Well worth the price.
ROV;-;this game should change its name to BAN3
unknown.man;-;this game is a very good game i recommend to buy it the graficks are good and good details as well good job
Phantom_Wolf;-;Got to play this game for 2 hours on the free weekend. I had this game already on my wishlist and now I want it more.
MadLlamaGames;-;The free weekend for this game gave me the experience I needed to be convinced to purchase it. As I was playing the game all I could think about was how much time I had left to play it and I enjoyed every moment of it. Your experience may vary because of the different servers you can go on that have different play styles to them. Its a beautiful game and I cant see myself getting tired of it anytime soon. Try to play this game with friends, it makes it 100x better!
wilsonj7772;-;I played arma 3 on this free weekend i thought it was just like mw3 or battlefeild but then i relized it was an experience like no other game i have played. I would rate this game 100 out of 100 trust me its awsome. Thank you for the free weekend so i can try this game.
NinoTheNub;-;great game!
I_LOYK_PIGZ;-;great game i was at this one spot and someone shot me and then they revived me, i got a headshot and dey be ded
Burnout619;-;this was an amazing game, im so glad that i had a chance to try it on the free weekend.
michelle.maloney;-;It is a very fun game and I hope they will lower the price because it is so action packed. Also I am excited for Arma IV.
ValkyrieTeiwaz;-;I loved the little time I had with this. For some reason Steam won't let me play it for free for the Free Weekend (maybe because it's already in my library.) Anyways, this is not your run-of-the-mill CoD nonsense.
Rick Grimes;-;Great game hope it does on sale for the christmas sale <3
All4tyme2;-;cool but wanted more time to play it
Schmied;-;It awesome!!!
[ ];-;Good game but it needs more nazi's 9/10.
Juzo;-;Fun game to play with your friends !
LAW-11-NYC;-;7/10, has the potential to be a better game with time if it is still supported.
IvoryState;-;What are you doing, Stalker?
mottrising;-;my favrate game recomended at six stars
granderojo;-;From the outside looking in ARMA III imitates the best and worst aspects of postmodern war. The vast majority of your time in this game will be frustration from shear amount of bordom, that is until a firefight breaks out & it's the most intense game you've ever played. The juxtaposition between these two emotions is not unlike every headcam video of a soldier at war that are all over the internet, so if that at all interests you, I'd say buy ARMA III.
Cleffi;-;bugs, bugs, bugs and low frames. i have GTX 660 frostbite and i cant run in the max. I play BF3 ultra and 30frames... this game is waste of money
Hwanwok;-;Best Arma Series game ever :3 when it on a free weekend and yet still better but i wish to get the game when it was free but way to expensive i would recommend the game for those people who dont have it
Rayheat;-;Great graphics,More realistic than COD
Mountain goat;-;I played it a little bit, but my computer had problems, but from the footage that I have seen it is a great game and if you can run it, you should get it.
Tom The Medic;-;8/10, Arma 2 + more graphics = Arma 3.
pKz *CrystalClear;-;snakes are made out of rock
[CPC] FISTFUCK.avi (shep);-;I hate this game.
roy20.wc;-;This game is pretty terrible.
BuckZ;-;Could be very good but isn't simple as that.
Vladimir Putin;-;Nice game!
Haze;-;Best game in terms of realism and simulation
playtime;-;hAVING FUN IN ARMA THEN I RAN MY CAR INTO PD BACUSE GUY WITH GUN MADE ME AND I WAS ARREST BY A  NAMED TREY
NiP AlfSwagert *Chaturbate.com;-;FrankIAm played 500+ hours 11/10 must buy to be cool
bzl;-;Pretty fun i run around for 17 hours, and then i found someone and they were elite solider IRL and pwned me. good game.
{=CSGO:JEWS=} mixtape;-;a terribly optimized game. if you dont have a good computer i would not recomend buying this game.that and its a peice of . other then that the only pro is the mods
MegaDael;-;this is meant to a realistic simulator right? so far i've only got a huge free smulation of complete lag. Done with Arma 2+3, for the love of God do not make another game Bohemia..you're base game sucks and the mods only suck half as bad..
Pandicorn DankCS.com;-;I have no idea why, but this game is kind of boring. I want to like it, but I can't...
RISINGFIRE600;-;i got the game for free on a steam sale and bc of an update i have buy thte game again.
LEGENDARYstevo;-;Its an ok game best part of the game is obviously its multiplayer but with the constant connection problems it can be a drag and its not realy worth a buy considering other games do mp better!
Jm1946;-;i paid 30 pounds for a game that crashes every 5 minutes. I have checked forums and i have tried to fix this problem for the last month. I dont think the issue is with my computer. I dont mind any of the other countless bugs in this game but i draw the line when it crashes constantly. How am i supposed to imerse myself when this is constantly happening. I am gonna just stick with arma 2 which is a fantastic game and has already got a better community.This game is more then just a dissapointment, its unplayable.
SuperHeros CumLord;-;Pretty Awesome
Lampa;-;Needs some tweaking but overall enjoyable military shooter, i like it.
Animus375;-;Has alot of De-Sync and makes you pay for extra addons that should be added to the game to begin with, and they just rely on the community to finish their un-finished game, the main problems with Arma 2 was bad optimization and de-sync and after 4 years of making this "New game" they still have the same problems, that they still decide not to fix. I really don't recomend this game.
freshkill9191;-;Whoever is over the aiming department .To you sir i say.....duh....duh...duh...downsyndrom you   .I shoot alot in real life and this...this is just pathetic,like truly pathetic.The skill it takes to hit someone running without a gun is just godlike.In real life hitting fast targets really isnt no more difficult than one moving slow but yall act like it takes a navy seal to shoot a gun.I dont know if yall are part of the anti gun group that thinks you dont have control of your gun while aiming but you do.even a 5 year old does
Noah;-;I tried to 360 n0sc0pe. I teamkilled, its fun. 10/10 - IGN
EzMeGuStA;-;I just got the game for the free weekend and i loved it,so i bought the game and i do not a at any point wish i did not buy the game
Husky The Scout;-;The game looks pretty good but just don't try to run it with an AMD cpu.
kalem;-;i love this game its fun to play with friends its abit to much money but it still is a good buy. i got muy coppey from  for 21 cheaper than steam +1. i have a link to the game on . {LINK REMOVED} https://www..com/arma-iii-steam-cd-key-ru.html {LINK REMOVED} https://www..com/
Ammonzing;-;so buggy / glitchy, so frustrating, that i dont play it.
Clyde Mayonaise;-;The new update ruined helicopters. total . not sure what kind of  would think the new controls are better.
Protons;-;where are the crosshairs on this game? if there are any i must be getting unlucky and picking all the servers without them. i mean yeah ok graphics, but bad animation details, doesn't really feel like a shooter when you can't aim down the barrel of your gun, or even see your gun sometimes. The controls for this game are ridiculous, there's no need for all those controls, games not hard they just spent alot of their time putting useless stuff in it.
Kurumi;-;I love how there is so many other gamemodes to play my favorite to play is Atlis life its just so much fun and i cant see any problem with this game
UltraViolence;-;Totally boring and stupid. It is not for fun. Buy evolve or Battle field hardline. this is Garbage
robert.gazzard;-;After several months of trying to use this game I have had enough. Today the latest update removed all the mods in expansions (with no guidance about how to reinstall them) that made this half completed game playable. Despite its huge potential and possibilities, BI have developed and sold a half completed game thats over complex, unintuitive, with poor; single play functions, gameplay and AI command & control, editing and character / vehicle modifications. Despite excellent features (Virtual Arsenal and Editor) they are not interconnected but isolated elements requiring complex and 'out of game' processes to bring them together! When was this acceptable? For some reason its set in 2030 (why?) and relies far to heavily on the modding community to make up for its fundamental weaknesses (e.g. BIPODS for LMG and snipers rifles are an urgent requirement you can not use the weapons effectively (or realistically). But no Bohemia Interactive priorities 'Go Carts' over critical game weakness to be addressed, waiting 2 years to have this addressed in the DLC Stream, can I ask how I get my money back please?
ok;-;3 hours on record gets globally banned. best anti-cheat system saw it coming before it happened vodka/10
Orland;-;Ok. I think, generally this game is a truly beatiful modern warfare simulator. This is really one of the best milsim game ever. But. There is a cons, and, of course there are situations that force you to say something like this: "WTF ? My AI teammate stuck in a lying box ? Seriously ?" - especially if the situation is tough and you need fire support from your team. So, AI is really stupid. It's a rare thing for your teammates to properly find optimal waypoint, even, if they just walking behind you. And, of course question of the overall game performance. 4770k/16GB ram/2xSLI 780 and frame drops to 4-5 fps when there are huge explosions. Again, i want to ask the developers - seriosly ? OK. Guys, just optimize the performance, please - this is a really GREAT game suffering from bugs and really bad netcode.
James009;-;Arma 3 is the best I've seen in the series. My only really gripe is they didn't get the liscences to actual military equipment and firearms and, as a result, there seems to be a lack of weapon variety. Furthermore, I feel that the factions are too symmetrical in an age of assymetrical warfare. Regardless, you can certainly have some fun with this game especially with the massive editor and STEAM workshop support. Lastly, I challange the developers to implement female characters given the recent advancements in the United States regarding female soldiers serving in combat. Guys, don't fall behind on history.
burrellboyz;-;the game wont even run i want a refund
umiNat;-;I joined a Wasteland server (by Sa-Matra) today and here's my story. I spawn in the middle of nowhere. I spawn an ATV and crash. I died. Next, i spawn in a city with 3 people in front of me. I kill all three, a tank rolls up, I blow up from a tank shell. Then, i spawn in another city, with 2 cars right in front of me. two people show up with assault rifles, i shoot both in the face with a pistol and i take their loot. then i see an armored vehicle with a mounted machine gun. I find a heavy machine gun in the vehicle, and another assualt rifle. I repair the vehicle, ride off, and capture a base, which, shortly after, gets raided by 5 people. I jump in the gunner seat, mow the enemies down, and hold off the base until i get sniped by a guy a mile away. I spawn in a town close to the place i just died, i jack a guy's car, and i drive up to my captured base. When i get there, a guy takes me hostage, takes my weapons, strips me of my clothes, takes me into a room, and he instantly gets shot from the same sniper that killed me. I run out naked, take a gun, rush a guy that was in my base, and i get shot in the back from a paratrooper. I then spawn in an airfield, with only a pistol and a medkit. I shoot a guy camping in a building with an assault rifle, i take his gun, i mow down 8 other people. I take a rocket launcher from a guy i just killed, and camp on the roof of a building. I then see a transport helicopter with 10 people inside, i take out my rocket launcher, lock on, slowly... and i let the rocket hit the side of the helicopter. Five seconds later, the whole airfield shakes with the boom, and i walk away like a badass, leaving the wreckage of the helicopter and letting the bodies burn inside the twisted hunk of metal... then i get shot by a fresh spawn with a pistol and one magazine. All of this in just 26 hours of the game. 8/88 -IGN "Needs more guns and 'Splosions' " In all seriousness though, this game is amazing. It definately takes patience to play though, and sometimes, it can turn into running simulator 2015. The map is HUGE, the servers are great, Optimization is absolutely TERRIBLE. and i mean it. My specs are pretty high end, and my rig can barely handle the game on very high at about 30 fps. If you are looking for great fun, play this game. Love the mechanics, love the thirst and hunger mechanics, as well as the gunplay. Not your average call of duty or battlefield shooter. This is Legit. If you have read this review all the way down here, then Just buy it already.
Mrshingles;-;3/10 Bad framerate almost always, steep learning curve, most game modes dont play the military sim it is built for they all play the RPG cops and robbers garbage. Most servers kick you for wrong version even though its the same.
RISINGFIRE600;-;i got the game for free on a steam sale and bc of an update i have buy thte game again.
LEGENDARYstevo;-;Its an ok game best part of the game is obviously its multiplayer but with the constant connection problems it can be a drag and its not realy worth a buy considering other games do mp better!
Jm1946;-;i paid 30 pounds for a game that crashes every 5 minutes. I have checked forums and i have tried to fix this problem for the last month. I dont think the issue is with my computer. I dont mind any of the other countless bugs in this game but i draw the line when it crashes constantly. How am i supposed to imerse myself when this is constantly happening. I am gonna just stick with arma 2 which is a fantastic game and has already got a better community.This game is more then just a dissapointment, its unplayable.
SuperHeros CumLord;-;Pretty Awesome
burrellboyz;-;the game wont even run i want a refund
Mrshingles;-;3/10 Bad framerate almost always, steep learning curve, most game modes dont play the military sim it is built for they all play the RPG cops and robbers garbage. Most servers kick you for wrong version even though its the same.
Torrin;-;I like the campaign so far but everytime i try and join a MP gmae it wont let me and i dont know why. i really would like to play MP but i cant so im losing out on alot of content :(
R0GUE;-;Very realistic, but doesn't run multiplayer at high frames.
TheLemonCakeStrangler;-;Was tasked with roadblock duty, then within the span of five minutes it esclated from mundane tasks of the average grunt to Joseph Mangela levels of war atrocities. I rate it 44/44 slaughtered civilians. Some major bravo sierra.
ecimir;-;Very bad game. How realistic is to miss 30 times 100m away enemy?? I played damned airsoft where I could hit 50m away opponet with first bullet. When you hit enemy it jumps in air just like in the movies. You are moving with same speed while you are crouchhing or standing. Wtf? Also graphics look ugly and performance is bad. BF4 is bad game but it still better than this. If you want realism go for Insurgency.
Just some random guy;-;fist $60 game I ever wanted to undownload. It remined me of E.T. on the atari, but E.T. was better. negative 1337/420 would uninstall again
RebelX;-;The graphics don't look as good as they do in the shots, multiplayer servers never let me join and the controls are convoluted
Dreadark;-;For people that say CS;GO is realistic and fun, I give you this. Arma 3.
Vaycron;-;Have not played much of this game yet, but from what I have experienced so far it was over my expectiations. I bought this game to play Roleplay servers mainly and battle royale, well I hoped on the RP servers for a bit and just did nothing much but hopped in the back of a guys big truck and we drove it into the ocean it was pretty entertaining and battle royale, I have yet to try it but from videos on youtube it looks just like hunger games on lets say minecraft but way better with guns,cars,etc. Coming over from Garry's Mod roleplay servers to arma roleplay servers and all I can say is, Why didn't I find out about theese awesome servers on arma 3 before. 10/10 AMAZING GAME HIGHLY RECOMMEND IF YOU ENJOY ROLEPLAY OR HUNGER GAMES LIKE EXPERIENCES.
SpiteU;-;This game gave me PTSD.
Idk-Foster;-;Mouse scroll Simulator. Want to give orders? Scroll down the menu. Want to get your inventory? Be in a specific area and then scroll down the menu. Want to stop / start the engine? Scroll down the menu. Want to switch guns? Press the scroll wheel twice. Nuff sed, If you love scrolling down the wheel constantly in a 60 Game + DLC " Game " This is for you. Too bad I dont have a job. Wish me luck, * Robs the bank for 60 *
Atomic Kraken;-;After trying it during the free weekend I can say this is definitely worth buying, I'd get it for myself, but my PC specs don't allow me to play on servers that are highly populated (80+ people). Good community and many different type gamemodes (also the breaking point mod) make it worthwhile.
Pallo;-;Arma 3 would be great game (seen my cousin and some streamers play it) looks awesome and stuff, completed training too, but when I try to play multiplayer, cant connect to servers.. every server I try, I can't even get to the lobby. Tried everything but nothing. Thanks alot for nothing
Nolzad;-;Server Browser, works 10% of the time, and if it works, only shows empty Servers   Engine, 2x Titans wouldn't be able to run this game at Super Ultra 1920x1080 60 fps flat  Great Mods. tough these mods become  because you cant play them or enjoy them properly hence the  engine/server browser
Titanshow;-;Almost as reaslistic as Call of Duty.
Jackpot has fucked me 73 times;-;sexy game best game 2017
xisnine;-;I have better pc specs than the recommended settings and i can't get more than 18-21fps. which is unplayable so i rate this game 1/10 cause it lied to me and now i wasted $30 i'm already super picky what i buy and this just made it even worse
caleb126429;-;Dis be aight
| G2A.COM;-;I absolutely love this game! The community is huge and amazing with vast amount of servers to be chosen from, Altis life, wasteland, domination and other common game modes like conquest, DM etc... And with a large support for moding, the game can be played litteraly forever with mods coming out nearly every day on a popular website Armaholic, but even the base game is entertaining just enough with servers with different game mode types that are updated regulary. And if you dont like what is given to you you have the option to go out on your way and make your own missions or mods and play them with your friends. The game looks very nice on Ultra settings. there are no major issues with the game besides very small and usually unoticable bugs that are often fixed very quickly through updates. The game has a range of interesting DLC such as the new Kart DLC orginaly as an April fools joke was released due to popular demand and the game still has upcoming and anticipated DLC. I would definetely recommend this game to anyone as it offers a wide range of options of how and what you would like to do in the game.
Ultimate Programmer;-;ARMA 3 is mechanically and graphically better than ARMA 2. The problem lies in the fact that there is far less content and extreme preformance problems on AMD systems. I simply cannot recommend this game due to the many problems in preformance.
Dockirby11;-;i rly want this game some one gift me it :D
Naos;-;I would recommend it to someone who is new to the series...However..If you are a hardcore ARMA II player like myself Then DO NOT BUY THIS...Unless you want to play altis life or some other crap.. this game was one of the biggest let downs
Maximgot;-;NO this game can suck my  (no homo)
EpilepticDuck;-;Not alot different from arma 2 only major differences: graphics animations and models(characters,weapons,vehicles etc. multiplayer(feels faster)
<3;-;Its a great game if you are into militerized games and if you are i suggest buying it
Vice778;-;It...Is..AMAZING
Randalf The Greybeard;-;Its a damn amazing game So much fun, When your roleplaying, Fighting or just playing zeus with your buddies i do feel they tried to soak up money with the helicopter DLC but personally i dont mind they do NEED money for a new engine which im sure they will try to make. When your roleplaying speeding from the popo's in yer trusty hatchback yeling CYA M8 then when you come back around you wheels get popped and your car just stops you just go like .... oh my god D: RUN It has a Very very big and challenging campaign depending on the difficulty your playing at personally im finding the campaign to be alot of fun! and the battles on altis life RPG the battles just OK OK OK this game Has so much content Cons - Old Bohemia Engine - Helicopter DLC was said to be free but then when it came out ._. - yeaa i cant think of much else 10/10 100/100 1000/1000 213819273123712738973/10
SkySatan;-;Arma 3 seems to have a lot to offer in terms of multiplayer, but still not so much for the player looking to the single player experience.
Physiics1212 | CSGOFAST;-;Its A Very Fun Game Espically For Altis Life
umiNat;-;I joined a Wasteland server (by Sa-Matra) today and here's my story. I spawn in the middle of nowhere. I spawn an ATV and crash. I died. Next, i spawn in a city with 3 people in front of me. I kill all three, a tank rolls up, I blow up from a tank shell. Then, i spawn in another city, with 2 cars right in front of me. two people show up with assault rifles, i shoot both in the face with a pistol and i take their loot. then i see an armored vehicle with a mounted machine gun. I find a heavy machine gun in the vehicle, and another assualt rifle. I repair the vehicle, ride off, and capture a base, which, shortly after, gets raided by 5 people. I jump in the gunner seat, mow the enemies down, and hold off the base until i get sniped by a guy a mile away. I spawn in a town close to the place i just died, i jack a guy's car, and i drive up to my captured base. When i get there, a guy takes me hostage, takes my weapons, strips me of my clothes, takes me into a room, and he instantly gets shot from the same sniper that killed me. I run out naked, take a gun, rush a guy that was in my base, and i get shot in the back from a paratrooper. I then spawn in an airfield, with only a pistol and a medkit. I shoot a guy camping in a building with an assault rifle, i take his gun, i mow down 8 other people. I take a rocket launcher from a guy i just killed, and camp on the roof of a building. I then see a transport helicopter with 10 people inside, i take out my rocket launcher, lock on, slowly... and i let the rocket hit the side of the helicopter. Five seconds later, the whole airfield shakes with the boom, and i walk away like a badass, leaving the wreckage of the helicopter and letting the bodies burn inside the twisted hunk of metal... then i get shot by a fresh spawn with a pistol and one magazine. All of this in just 26 hours of the game. 8/88 -IGN "Needs more guns and 'Splosions' " In all seriousness though, this game is amazing. It definately takes patience to play though, and sometimes, it can turn into running simulator 2015. The map is HUGE, the servers are great, Optimization is absolutely TERRIBLE. and i mean it. My specs are pretty high end, and my rig can barely handle the game on very high at about 30 fps. If you are looking for great fun, play this game. Love the mechanics, love the thirst and hunger mechanics, as well as the gunplay. Not your average call of duty or battlefield shooter. This is Legit. If you have read this review all the way down here, then Just buy it already.
Classy Tortoise;-;Better than Battlefield 4 and every other fps combined times 2
Twoundead1;-;doesnt work with a 3000$ pc yeah right buddy get your  together
GIGABYTE;-;One of the most laggy game I have ever played! It says it needs OS 7/8.. I have windows 8.1 It says it needs processor i5... I have i7 It says It needs 4 ram.. I have 4 ram -_- It says it need GeForce GTX 560.. I have GeForce GTX 650 It needs DirectX.. I have DirectX WHERE DID I GO WRONG? 6k worth Nothing.. Extremely Laggy Please fix the issue's
legitmidget03;-;Played this when it was free. Good game. Its only 30$ right now and i spent my 50$ buck on reign of kings and CIV V cuz i didnt know this was on sale. WORST DECISION OF MY LIFE. I cant believe how bad I missed this amazing deal. Asking any kind soul out there to please gift this to me. It would be much appreciated.
DerpyNinja;-;game not recommended lol
Husky The Scout;-;The game looks pretty good but just don't try to run it with an AMD cpu.
Kris Kringle;-;I don't own this game but it let me write this review. 420/360 - IGN Would review again.
James009;-;Arma 3 is the best I've seen in the series. My only really gripe is they didn't get the liscences to actual military equipment and firearms and, as a result, there seems to be a lack of weapon variety. Furthermore, I feel that the factions are too symmetrical in an age of assymetrical warfare. Regardless, you can certainly have some fun with this game especially with the massive editor and STEAM workshop support. Lastly, I challange the developers to implement female characters given the recent advancements in the United States regarding female soldiers serving in combat. Guys, don't fall behind on history.
sweet liquory load;-;this game is ing garbage hang urselves
Atomic Kraken;-;After trying it during the free weekend I can say this is definitely worth buying, I'd get it for myself, but my PC specs don't allow me to play on servers that are highly populated (80+ people). Good community and many different type gamemodes (also the breaking point mod) make it worthwhile.
Komikos;-;This is very good game, it is my feivarite game <3
Trapped in Bubbaville, Send Help;-;They improved Arma 2 a lot to make this game, but it isn't in the right areas. The game takes place in 2034 but they still have you using a map and compass. Left control and right control key combinations are in here, but I don't want to play a game where I have to use control as a modifier for my keys at any time. This game needs more menus, commo roses, and context-sensitive commands, and needs to get rid of the dead weight. Don't buy it.
Gubs;-;Very true to being in the military, boring and miserable.
lawngnome;-;"how  of a game can we make? idk lets find out" -story of how arma 3 was born
LGB-Anubis;-;Don't bother trying this autistic game
Maktyler12;-;Would recommend 10/10 only thing is DEEZ NUTS!!!!!!!!!!
Edyward;-;MAY/9/2015 I compare those two games because i believe a game's review score should matter by comparing it to the best games. Also both are fps/ 3prson, so i believe while the temathics are different it is the gameplay that matters. NOTE: My specs are above recommended for Arma 3 ARMA3 30FPS Small car variety Weapon variety is good Weapon gameplay is good GTA 5 60FPS Big car variety weapon variety is great weapon gameplay is medium Still Arma 3 is more complex(unnecessary),bad optimized(after all this time), and well not that impressive. After all this time i still cannot recommend it.How it feels for me is inferior and boring. I put gta 5 here because it's popular and in perspective to how much they add in a city and still make it work at 60 fps.In Arma 3 you see mostly empty cities or a base here and there, witch makes me think what fun is there if everything is empty and still kills your fps. Final score 5/10 :It's a good game i don't doubt that, but the "fun" goes away like a car passing fast in front of you.If you don't have any friends to play with,it is a don't buy.
TheRedMarkZ;-;This game features a lot more than it may seem. It's got lots of gamemodes and different experiences even if you do play the same gamemode over and over. Everytime you play will be a different experience, may it be your role, the difficulty, or the ai. It's all different every time. You can find a lot of funny moments where the game will glitch out on you a bit but it's not really game-breaking, it's just a moment you can laugh about. Plus the amount of customization in the game is unbelievable, There's so much different changes you can do to the game, from changing your character's voice or face, up to making a whole addon and even more. Im not gonna say the game's completely perfect though. The main problem may be the community, but from time to time you'll not meet with that problem; some people will be nice to you and help you if you're a newbie to the game, and some will just go hard on you and troll you but those guys are rare, as people dont appreciate them on the servers. The gameplay; Now that is one hard question to answer. The gameplay mostly matters about you, and the gamemode, how you want to play, will still be valid, but you are restricted to thinking a lot about your actions or you'll get shot by some guy from 800 meters while he's only using a simple rifle with no scope. As you would guess, another problem is the AI, sometimes it may act rediculous and sometimes it's just the best AI you can find in a game. now, im not gonna go over the gamemodes here as it's better to find out yourselves, but i'll just say that King Of The Hill, Wasteland(mostly fun with friends), and Zeus(you'll be most likely to spend days on this one) are the ones i recommend. The community: The community has an endless array of addons you could use to change your game and/or experience. I'm not gonna say much about it except this but there's alot you can say about the community. The Engine: this game requires a beefy pc(currently at its state) but the engine is brilliant, It can run alot of data without having to give you frame drops or hard CPU usage. The engine is mostly dependant rather more on the RAM than the CPU, i recommend atleast 6-12 RAM for this game if you're gonna play it alot. Overall: The game's worth a shot for people who like to plan their moves and think about what they do it before they do it, altough you will find mostly funny moments and non-serious moments in multiplayer but less than serious moments that are mostly enjoyable. Certain people refer to this as a "Walking Simulator" but the point is that ArmA III is mainly focused on infantry and combined arms, you WILL find yourself walking and running alot to objectives, but that's how it is in real life too. The game is focused on reality and will be a hard challenge for people who arent used to this type of gaming. You can find alot to do in this like commanding AI and/or players, which is always hard at the start, and participating in large assaults on towns such as Kavala. In my opinion, ArmA III is worth a shot.
TheLemonCakeStrangler;-;Was tasked with roadblock duty, then within the span of five minutes it esclated from mundane tasks of the average grunt to Joseph Mangela levels of war atrocities. I rate it 44/44 slaughtered civilians. Some major bravo sierra.
ecimir;-;Very bad game. How realistic is to miss 30 times 100m away enemy?? I played damned airsoft where I could hit 50m away opponet with first bullet. When you hit enemy it jumps in air just like in the movies. You are moving with same speed while you are crouchhing or standing. Wtf? Also graphics look ugly and performance is bad. BF4 is bad game but it still better than this. If you want realism go for Insurgency.
Just some random guy;-;fist $60 game I ever wanted to undownload. It remined me of E.T. on the atari, but E.T. was better. negative 1337/420 would uninstall again
RebelX;-;The graphics don't look as good as they do in the shots, multiplayer servers never let me join and the controls are convoluted
Dreadark;-;For people that say CS;GO is realistic and fun, I give you this. Arma 3.
Vaycron;-;Have not played much of this game yet, but from what I have experienced so far it was over my expectiations. I bought this game to play Roleplay servers mainly and battle royale, well I hoped on the RP servers for a bit and just did nothing much but hopped in the back of a guys big truck and we drove it into the ocean it was pretty entertaining and battle royale, I have yet to try it but from videos on youtube it looks just like hunger games on lets say minecraft but way better with guns,cars,etc. Coming over from Garry's Mod roleplay servers to arma roleplay servers and all I can say is, Why didn't I find out about theese awesome servers on arma 3 before. 10/10 AMAZING GAME HIGHLY RECOMMEND IF YOU ENJOY ROLEPLAY OR HUNGER GAMES LIKE EXPERIENCES.
Sgt.Rex;-;Possibly one of the best military simulator games I've played with many features to add a lot of realism, as well as it's endless in-game editor to make your own scenarios. Over 800 hours I've played is saying something (lol), and additionally, with the help of the amazing modding community, the game can be easily adapted to anything, from spec ops to city life.
Adam Stern;-;Arma 3 and all the other Armas are too dificult you better buy anothre game.
Tactikel;-;I was talking to a guy in a courtyard and a tank out of nowhere squished him. So I stole his gear, then a guy came over a started shouting "ahahahahahhahahahhhhhhhhhahahah" with unusual music in the background while placing a Satchel Charge on the floor nearby and set it to 1 second, he then said "fly me too the moon". I've always wondered if he fulfilled his dream of space flight.
SpaceCoder;-;its a great game if you can overlook the bugs and the desync... i would recomend hopping into a atlis life server then go and make some in game money and make some new friends and have fun! its a really realistic game but ill have to give it 8.27/10 only because its buggy :( but if you overlook the bugs its 9.75/10 on my books!
Jian Yang;-;Yo G its just like cod but with vehicles so... best evaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaaah. but on a serious note it takes a pretty decent pc to run and its really fun if you play with friends
Stridernox;-;There shouldn't be any in game purchases. This is how companies loose trust in their customers cause you turn around and screw us by trying to make a cheap buck. Go F**K yourself Bohemia!! You cheap  M*therF**kers!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
baerf150;-;Worst game I've played in a long time, way too complex for a game.
SummoneR;-;if you like to suck balls while on a mission then this is for you.
SubZer0;-;normally a nice game but nowadays over a year after i purchased this game im supposed to pay for guns that i had from the beginning ? errr nope i dont. gafu thanksbye. dont fool people like that and call it a dlc afterwards - ridiculous !
Malarky;-;Buy for the game stay for the mods gg
mademan#i_ hoide;-;bought arma 3 for 38.99 , laggy as  & low fps :D , request a refund , get rejected :D , now its 23$ , swallow sadness , hold my tears . lord gaben is love lord gaben is life 11/10 ign would west money again
ayy;-;breathing simulator 2015
BroDude;-;Game optimized terribly only fun part was the go karts
eZKim0;-;SOMEONE BUY THIS FOR ME PLEASE I DON'T HAVE ANY MONEY AND IT'S 60% OFF
Chloride;-;Bugs Bugs and once again bugs
ayy;-;breathing simulator 2015
Logi;-;Just finished the main campaign, it was pretty fun and challenging.
Baba Yaga;-;Okay, I have a lot to say about this game. I LOVE the game - Well, In theory. I run the game at medium settings at 1080p and i rarely get above 33FPS on by Radeon R9 280X OC Edition. THIS MUST BE SAID AND HEARD: -THE GAME RUNS LIKE **** Arma devs need to get their poop in the group an dfix this game, optomization is Terrible. There are a lot of bugs and glitches. They seem to be adding more features like guns and vehicles but they need to focus on the ISSUES AT HAND. The only reason i'm giving this "thumbs down" is becasue it just has too many issues, and that's a major problem. The game itself i really love.
eZKim0;-;SOMEONE BUY THIS FOR ME PLEASE I DON'T HAVE ANY MONEY AND IT'S 60% OFF
Mondale 2016;-;Chopper shot down, drug off to be executed, 10/10
BroDude;-;Game optimized terribly only fun part was the go karts
();-;not COD 69/420
Leakedboxman360;-;I once bought turkey bacon.
Jamw12's Left Hand;-;Preety good game, you shoot .
vMon5ter Reload [HLCSG] | ECO;-;Arma 3 Is a Unique Millitary simulator with Jet's, Armored Car's, Tank's. And Lot's more, You play the role as Cpl. Ben Kerry with NATO. You go along in 3 Chapter's. Survive, Adapt & Win. It's a truly Amazing campaign, The Graphic's are Great, I love the multiplayer. Its simply The best Game ive played Since I bought my first game GMOD. 500/500
Weekend Warrior;-;Not the best graphics but a very good game, awesome "world" huge maps.
paulowen1;-;Were to even start with this game to be honest its beond fantastic it has fast become my faverout shooting / war sim EVER! worth every penny! so much to do ! and once you get over the slight learning curve it opens up even more . 10/10 fantastic game!! buy it!!!
420sniperslayer#YOLO;-;Nice game
sunshineguerilla;-;fatigue model, grass and grenade throw are not so good.
Th3DudeWh0L1ved;-;Arma 3 was a dream for me for a while but when i bought it everytime i launched it it crashs 10 to 15 minutes after i launched it.
3000 Vaginas;-;This game has some twitchy movement and bad controls. The frame rates are buggy and graphics are just "meh". Reminds me of a lackluster CounterStrike. Not worth the money in the least.
HooksGURU;-;A tactical sim, that only has aspects of a game. ARMA III is not intended to be a "game." It does not have the action most are used to from today's millitary shooter genre. What it does have, it has in spades. A deep simulation environment that spans accross some of the largest landscape to be placed in a title thus far. A plethora of weapons and set ups allow for equipping the perfect blend of survival and attack. The ability for user made content to be easily added to the base of the files, adds for creativity and fun. ARMA III is a title that asks you to make your own fun. It will not be for everyone, and even those who may enjoy camping out with a sniper rifle for hours on end, may find it dry and cumbersome. However, if you are looking for one of the more realistic takes on millitary shooters. ARMA III will have what you are looking for. Even if it doesn't, it gives you the tools to make it.
Ubernet67;-;As an Operation Flashpoint, ArmA 1, and ArmA 2 Veteran, and having played ArmA 3 for 200 hours, I can safely say that ArmA 3 is the best ArmA yet. It improves drastically on many of the previous games' flaws, as well as adding some cool new things. And I will admit, while there could be many more missions, weapons, and vehicles in the game (there's a lot less to do than in ArmA 2), it makes up for it by having steam workshop support, as well as being extensively moddable. For me, the campaign so far is the best campaign out of every ArmA game. Sure, it's no where near AAA standards, but it has more than kept my interest for far longer than ArmA 2/ArmA 1's campaigns. So all in All, I would definitely reccomend ArmA 3 to anyone who likes Tactical Shooters/Strategy and Military Simulation games.
Tranda;-;This game is the reason my girlfriend of four years and I broke up. I do not regret a thing.
Soupacabra;-;I can't play this ing game withoutdoing bootcamp every ing time i try to play this ing  game
Dustin;-;Finally a fun ArmA game to play co-op and/or online matches with people. Insane graphics and in-depth controls with a good combat system. 7/10
Heisenberg;-;Its good
Bran Flakes;-;MP doesn't work. Anybody who plays MP has autism.
Heisenberg;-;Its good
Bran Flakes;-;MP doesn't work. Anybody who plays MP has autism.
Teckno bublik;-;this game is great but not worth the money. not iven a good computer can make the fps go to 60. still great game with many funny mods.
ThePathOfBlood;-;Worst game, Scam, Fraud Faulse information be cautious don't let the pre release trailers and new ones DO you over.... Here's what they said you could do but you can't 1) they said you could take the enemies outfit and clothing and wear it and disguise your self as them sneak into base and not get shot of you're not seen or caught doing the crime ---- NO YOU BLOODY CANT 2) everything about sneaking into bases is a lie, it's not even implemented into the system.. 3) They even said , they were not planning on Releaseing FIXED-WING aircraft into the game, but because people made mods and were going on about it, after so long they actually released them - PROVE This game isn't a simulation it's a screw over version of arma 1-2 and Operationflashpoint series 4) Phsyx? What they wont show you or tell you is how BAD AND DISGUSTING it is, Example you're driving a main battle tank, you deside to drive through a small less than a meter high wooden fence. the tank maybe or will either 80% chance, 1# break, 2# blow up 3# become badly damage, 4# become partially damage 5# you take health damage same with driving it into a bush or a tree, same with cars, oh and you can't drive road baries over or the run way ones.. you'll just blow up lol same with the off-roaders and massive trucks.... Top cons about this game Disguse Physx Lack of trucks/tanks/fixed-wings - fixed wings " planes " badly made, they tilt like hell wont even fly in straight line can't call airstrikes or support like - Arma 2 or Arma OA Missions are crap and short... Delux and Limited edition - Thought they said all DLCS free. this is a scam and a lie you've got to pay for carts.. Good things? Not really much, Improved graphics, Improved actions and charractor movements..
drDeath;-;hated it. every boring inch, The new release back when, crashed etc. (i had the toy grade release.. mostly empty) but July 2015 tried it 1 more time. but the game is great, (clucky) and has great potential, if the user wants to spend a month learning this horrid UI.... im sure some young kids will do that... is see many dont. like 10% or more. if you can read the trash bins of the reviews.
ziggy1010- bruce wayna;-;it sucks
Matthew Mcconaughey;-;two words. Don't Buy This GAME.
CJCOGSWELL;-;DO NOT GET THIS GAME you will be able to play it for a couple days then battleye will read a false positive and global ban you without a refund or lifting the ban DO NOT WASTE YOUR MONEY
Johnny Tsunami;-;game of the year 2006
Muunswole;-;Just from the short amount of time I managed to play this, I already find it impossible to recommend. And browsing through both the Steam and Bohemia forums, seems like a lot of other people suffer the same issue that prevents me from doing so. It runs like . Complete, total . And not the good kind either. Like, no matter what settings I go on, it framedrops between 10 and 30. And this is singleplayer. It also controls like . It's a shame too, because the world and game looks nice and I'd like to explore it's potential. Oh well. Save your money and buy something that actually runs at a playable framerate.
Fernandinho;-;Bugged piece of ****
A jiggly koala;-;it is a good game but no matter how good ur pc is it will drop frames and not only that but it is max lock on 30fps plz steam give my money back
SilkiuMeistras;-;U focken wot m8? I swer tu got, i stab u in da arshehole with m,ah chuopsticksz best review ever 1/10 would bang agein! - IGN
Kit Alan Stag;-;Overall, this game is not an enjoyable experience due to several key factors: The foremost being the enemy AI which are unbearably difficult to fight. A lot of the time it seems the game will put nerfed teammates with you againsed enemy AI that are impossible to fight againsed with the weapons and equipment provided. The game will often put you in positions where you are on your own againsed impossible odds -- Not in the fun, challenging way either. More in the way that you're laying in a field by yourself, being bombed, while having to take down several enemies at long range with unsilenced weapons with no cover (keep in mind that these AI spot you the second you fire a weapon and will 1-shot you instantly.). The only reason you should purchase this game is for the mods and multiplayer. This game's optimization is absolutely terrible, so unless you have a really bulked up gaming PC, do not buy this
Samydog12;-;Compared to arma 2 this game is no where near as good as arma 2 was. Pros: Goodish graphics Better voice acting More enterable buildings slightly more realistic sounds Cons: Terrible FPS on a good PC Hardly any weapons Hardly any air vehicles Altislife is crap So save your money
blizzard999;-;Nope
COMIN FOR YA BOY;-;Brought me to my current train of thought. -"Never buy another video game"
Haar;-;Same engine, just prettier with FUTURE CASELESS WEAPONS and UNDERWATER SHENANIGANS. Not worth it, keep playing ArmA2.
xbox live major nelson here;-;this game is a pile of
remicayouette;-;This software is beautiful, absolutely. But the game play is slow and frustrating, making it a negative experience. The AI is absurdly accurate too; you can hide back as far as you want and it doesn't help.... you could have run so far that those enemies are tiny dots even through your scope, hidden under a few bushes and trees a LONG ways away, and they will still repeatedly headshot you. Then you can spend another eternity getting back to where you were in that mission. A few minor bugs aside, I found a couple bugs with the checkpoint system; one example is in an early mission where you are swimming from a boat to attack a small village with a few scuba buddies... but on several occassions that I restarted that mission the NPCs would go completely brain-dead and do exactly nothing. It is a gorgeous product, I just wish there was a high quality game with it.
coastline_pc;-;I have played Call of Duty and Battlefield games . Arma 3 just did not grab my attention . The gameplay sucked , the story sucked. Now I am sure there is a lot of people who love the series and I am happy for them . Arma is not worth the price they are asking . If you must have this game ,wait till it comes on sale DIRT cheap !
Ainsley Harriott (donkey);-;Just buy Arma II operation arrowhead, DayZ mod, and you have a game better than this load of crap.
Doy-knee;-;This game lets you have the freedom and creativity to make/play the battles your way. This is not for the casual gamer nor the gamer who gets easily frustrated - most likely caused by the AI's complete stupidity and the terrible damage models. However, this game is stunning. The lighting, shadows and texture quality really push any PC to the limit. I could go on about the bad points, but it's the good aspects of this game which really sets it apart from the rest. If I had to give it a score out of ten - 8/10.
( o  o);-;Not worth the price. Arma 3 is a quite enjoyable game but far from worth 40 bucks. Why? 1. Singleplayer campaign is lame and unexplained. Though I have to give the community a thumbs up for making some great scenario missions (custom missions). 2.The game is poorly optimized. When driving, flying or anything where your character moves fast, framerate drops to extremely low. I mean like from 90-100 fps to 20-30 fps. That's bad. 3. The graphics on terrain, vehicles and houses are just beautiful. Though the playermodels look like they're from a ps2 game.
Ainsley Harriott (donkey);-;Just buy Arma II operation arrowhead, DayZ mod, and you have a game better than this load of crap.
Doy-knee;-;This game lets you have the freedom and creativity to make/play the battles your way. This is not for the casual gamer nor the gamer who gets easily frustrated - most likely caused by the AI's complete stupidity and the terrible damage models. However, this game is stunning. The lighting, shadows and texture quality really push any PC to the limit. I could go on about the bad points, but it's the good aspects of this game which really sets it apart from the rest. If I had to give it a score out of ten - 8/10.
[NBK]Kriegstein;-;Absolute garbage. There's nothing to say except it's completely unplayable. Do yourself a favor and get Battlefield 4, where you don't have to watch 15 tutorials on YouTube just to get into a game. Graphics are from three generations ago. Easily one of the worst games I've ever played.
GRAY;-;ARMA 3 ADMINS KICK ME OFF SERVERS SO I THANK I IS STUPED
Porkchoperzz;-;THIS GAME STOLE MY LIFE
Oy Vey;-;This game is mostly just running in a straight line for 30 minutes and then getting shot my some 10 year old prepubescent kid. it really isn't worth the money unless you have alot of time on your hands. no fun in this game at all.
tinkylinky1128;-;Multiplayer ing sucks.my teammate kept shooting me for no ing reason
querry;-;arma 2 sucked so i guess dis sux too.
DustyLemon;-;If there are three games I would live the rest of my life playing, this would probs be like number 2 ( number 1 of course being LOL you Dota scum :) ). Get this, and if invest a bit of time and effort into it you will reap the rewards by the MRAP loads. If you have tons of spare time (which all of us do but actually don't) I would thoroughly recommend this.
LittleINC;-;This is a best simulation game ever, there are many game mode in this game, like altis life, arma 3 wasteland, sector control, and many more, one word for this game NICE!!!
Autism Unchained;-;no female characters? misogyny at its finest ignore this game if you can as it supports sexism
Deaths Door;-;So many mods to play for every type of playstyle, they really nailed it with this game. You don't see many modable games these dayz.
ReeceHD;-;A good tactical sandbox game but i haven't playeed it very much though :D
iQuit;-;This is not a game. It is an (cr4ppy) engine, which impersonates to be a game. Too much cheating, totally laggy in multiplayer and it has bugs from ArmA & ArmA 2 not fixed yet and I doubt they will ever fix them. Apart from that "trying" to be a simulation, some parts are overkill simulated, where it is totally unnecessary, while other parts are totally not simulated and/or just being there to harass/taunt the PLAYER. I want to play a game with "simulation-like" elements, not a cr4ppy simulation, where the simulated parts are totally BS. Most of the simulation parts are tailored for something. I can not describe it, but it is like trying to light a match, while you are not protecting it with your hands/body to light up. For me this is just ArmA 2 with better graphics and being as e as before. Also even in Sale totally overpriced in what you get. It is like paying for a 10% content game. Did this remind you of buying your last EA or UBISOFT game? It is the same! Before you buy this expensive "engine" watch actual gameplay (not just cut, from Youtube, but real actual gameplay, like on twitch etc.). This game simply lives off the many modders and people around the world, who develop extremely cool modifications based on this cr4ppy engine. FYI nobody ever played the campaign in ArmA2 (becuase its broken :-P) and nobody will in ArmA 3 either... Crucifixion here... get a cheap extra cross for home and your children. This is my POV. If you do not like it, just purchase the game to show off how cool you are. If you like my POV, just add some more hate... xD
etferus v2;-;Disgusted. I played all the Arma's and really enjoyed Arma 2, that game hit the nail on the head. It had everything, sure it wasn't smooth and optimized but It was a REAL sim with the right mods. It has everything, life, ACE and survival gamemodes. ARMA 3 is disapointing... They added DLC's for that extra dollar which is really disapointing, I want to BUY a game and not WORRY about paying more to enjoy it. Sadly in 2014 every game just about has some sort of DLC or microtransaction. It sucks. ANOTHER PROBLEM: NO ONE EVEN PLAYS THIS GAME FOR WHAT IT WAS INTENDED FOR!!! This is a military sim not a bloody "battle royal on some random Island" or any other gamemode. Theres only like 5 empty servers that actually have proper CO-OP missons and they're usually empty. I feel that all the Arma 2 players like me are the only people to experience the true type of gamemode for this game. Connection issues, a few people have it and this game sucks, I lag so many times until I can properly join and play. Boehimia doesn't care either or they would've patched it. Optimzation... I should'nt even bother, just blame the engine. Little kids, Yes. This game has been advertised to little kids way to much on sites like YouTube. It's gotten to a point where Life servers are full of wingy little  who don't even know how to RP and follow the rules of the server, yet waste admins time. They don't get banned either because most of the time they'll donate for a high postion on the server. Arma 3 is never gonna be the same until something changes drastically. It's alright but no where near as good as Arma 2 was. 6/10
Triboot;-;petty gay g4ame do nert buy
Polat Alemdar;-;Too Complicated! Cant join online games!
JOOceBox;-;I was perma banned even before playing a single match
Spooderman;-;SPENT A WHOLE ING HOUR TRYING TO LOOK THROUGH MY IRONSIGHTS. CONTROLS ARE  AUDIO ONLY WORKS WITH $500 7.1 SURROUND ur better off just wasting bandwith on pictures of kitty kats
=TDW=WildFire;-;deas game sucks dont play it
DaPoostaMoonCoon;-;The Arma franchise is completely overrated and boring. or at least as it is right now (unfinished) I personally get fps drops from 120 to 40 sometimes even down to 5fps on my GTX 780 (This doesent happen in any other game ive ever played) I dont recommend buying this untill it is finished.
Klondike Walruos;-;awsome cool
Urist Facefucker;-;i shot a man in cherno just to watch him die
Jason Kibbles;-;I had already bought the game and now its saying i do not. Im not paying another $60. i do not recommend this rip off of a game.
Trystaniel;-;This game would be worth money if i could run it without a super computer.
Ghost csg0.com;-;Great game ARMA 3 DEDICATED SERVER --- iHaze ALTIS LIFE 50K RPG STARTUP http://WWW.IHAZE.CO.UK IP: 5.62.71.192 Great Altis life server just needs more people! Lots of activities to do! Easy to make money!
Sephiroth;-;You're sitting here reading this when you could be playing it. WHAT ARE YOU DOING. HIT THAT BUY BUTTON BRO. DO IT. WHY ARE YOU STILL READING C'MON MAN BUY THE GAME. I DON'T GOT ALL DAY IF YOU REALLY SCROLLED DOWN WTF. NOPE. SUCH COMMENTS MUCH CAPS VERY ARMA WOW buy it.
Alluh;-;my game just dissapparelled at second day i bought it lmao
ReZ;-;Would be a great game if it was playable. Can't connect to any server or game.
nump;-;if you like to invert your controls dont buy this game . i would have liked to use the controller and keyboard rather than the mouse but my 360 wont let me . pity they could not be bothered to remedy this as it looks a nice game.
yokindo;-;Paid to play this game and all it does is ing ctrash after 3 mins in. Takes 5 mins to get past load screen. Save you rmoney unless you want to be frustrated for $60
Morpheus Orpheus;-;If you love ARMA 1 or any of its numerous iterations / spin offs, and/or if you love ARMA 2, do not purchase ARMA 3. It is a cash grab from the ground up, I have no idea what happened to Bohemia in the timespan between ARMA 2 and 3, but I suspect the immense wealth and popularity they gained from DayZ really got to their heads. Featuring 90% less content than any previous iteration, Bohemia wants to give you the privelege of recreating / porting all the necessary content (I'm talking very basic things here like planes, vehicles, weapons, things Bohemia legitimately REMOVED in 3) from the previous games, while offering you quality priced DLC like "Go Karts". If that kinda gimmicky DLC isn't your cup of tea, don't worry, Bohemia has you covered. Upcoming DLC totes core improvements to the gameplay mechanics for things like bullet physics, so you can pay for your patches now. God bless Bohemia.
Kyle Trippy;-;made me feel like i was flying on a large broomstick () later realizing that it was  all along. I understand life now. I'm a Giraffe. Ill never forget the time i met optimus prime. he took me for a ride in his truck interior. It wasnt a dream...i felt like a was there. Feeding my young as father Optimus returns to the nest.
catfish;-;games ok engines different and they added new killstreaks along with diff scopes 2nd one is bettr
Wrex Hammerhead;-;This game is great compared to ArmA 2. Its less clunky and the UI is easier to use. The inventory system is more effective and simple. If you have ever played ArmA 2 then you know the classic missions everyone played. Domination, wasteland, and taki life. Domination has gave way to invade but its still the same. Wasteland hasnt changed, and taki life is now Altis Life. The game itself gives more potential to build upon or come up with better missions. If you arent happy with the current missions, do it yourself or wait a bit. If you are unfamiliar with ArmA then understand this, the game isnt for everyone. This isnt CoD, BF or Planetside 2. You arent going to be constantly stimulated with guns blazing and explosions. But every mode when you die punishes you. Whether it is travel time or losing your hard work. Dying is not something viewed lightly. Which forces people to act smart and fast. Overall, if you are into these style of games. Pick it up, it will be worth it.
Zecht;-;Worst game I have ever bought
Gremreeps;-;wORST GAME EVER DONT BUY I PLAYED ON MY ALIEN WARE X51 AND IT CRASHES I HAVENT BEEN ABLE TOPLAY FOR MORE THAN 2 MINUTES STRAIGHT ITS BS BUT OTHER THAN THAT ITS A REALLY GREAT GAME SO FUN AND EMERSIVE, BUT JUST PLAIN BORING AND  THOUGH?!
Pumplemousse;-;Not much playable servers without bots. If I wanted to play with bots I would buy CS GO, that costs $10...
Trollinator;-;After trying for about 5 hours in vain to just get past a small phase in a mission in the game, i can finally say i gave up. above the insanely hardcore combat system, i got killed countless times by mines that i can't understand how to tell their location, so it's just a simple, annoying, random death. Also the game has a lot of bugs, mainly graphic. i'd say the devs rushed too much. 5/10 game health, 3/10 gameplay, 8/10 graphics, -30/10 gameplay forgiveness. Bought the game when it was 50% off and i regret spending every and each $ for this game which i just can't play.
Moonwalker;-;Idiot game
One Little Minion ();-;It's a good game but if you cheat they ban you from every Battleye secured server(all bohemia games) and they don't give back your money... Some people have the same problem when they doesn't cheat yet... I know the cheaters are bad guys and Bohemia just wanted to help for the people who dont't cheatng...but c'mmon...they ruined my life and they stole my money...
ThaaaBosss;-;8.5 out of 10! I would definitely recommend this for my grandmother and dog in a heartbeat. Very good game and plan to retire as an MLG with my main game as this
Gabe Newell;-;One of the worst engines ever for an FPS.
Fresh1492;-;The controls are extremely confusing and very very numerous, which makes customizing almost impossible. The objectives are very unclear and makes the campaign very difficult and overall a horrible experience. I regret buying this game.
PROJECT: Yasuo;-;Military Walking Simulator with the occasional gunshot or vehicle to drive.
mackjsm;-;This is nothing like ARMA 2... the editor sucks!! and what?? you give us 1 tank.. and 3 choppers and other  no one cares about??! Where are all the REALISTIC toys to play with... this is dumb. ARMA is on the way out and the numbers show that.. Fire your team or your ARMA players will slip thought your fingers..
Koft_Nedted;-;Played it for about thirty-six minutes, I didn't like it, personally I think it's overated, just buy Arma 2: Operation Arrowhead.
DaMagicPug;-;I loved it, i really did BUT battle eye destroyed my account with a global ban to the face when i did nothing. R.I.P
Mendax;-;ing hate this game. Makes my internet constantly drop out and the mods/server browser is extremely glitchy.  you bohmeia
BiG CaLuM;-;It's alright...
VINNIE;-;best game ever on lags a blt but look up vlds pn how to get rld of lag
Saku;-;I hate this game best army simulator as of this date I still hate this game
novelnrich;-;its awsome kinda laggy and gitchy some times when i die fly in air i laugh so hard i rate this game 8/10
connorjr;-;Controls are bad. Glitchy. Dont waste you're money.
76;-;Having played tens of thousands of hours of OFP/Armd Assault/ArmA2 ArmA 3 is a let down in so many ways. - All weapons that fire say 7.62 rnds have identical ballistics (same with each caliber). - Cut 'n paste models http://forums.bistudio.com/showthread.php?163264-Reality-Check - Future setting meaning any old ballisitcs and weapons charastics can just be made-up and worse is none of the player base have ever seen, used or seen used any of the weapons in this game... kinda boring, might as well have lasers. - Buildings looks great but terrian is cartoony compared to ArmA2. - massive island that is barren as hell, can see hundreds of meters through sparse, boring forests... town are all mostly the same and barely any smaller islands off the main one.
Franzisa;-;Don't waste your money on this game.
Lone Wanderer;-;Best game ive ever played amazing graphics good game play lots of game modes just lots to do !! and good FPS all round 10/10
[KGB] Comrade Alex;-;The best game
perry3241;-;ja, i am happy i didn't buy it when it was new. * aming is unrealistic. *and the grappic style is just hurting my eyes My grappic cart is a 2gb nivida 730 gt. *it is also very slow with the opjectives. when you complete a task you have to wait almost a minute. bevore they give the next one.
Aimbot;-;I Didnt dislike this game is disliked how they jus ban me for no reason since i never hacked nor cheated :( this game is perfect but i dont recommend it since they decide to ban me for no reason!
motokokoto;-;Ran into my identical twin on the Life mod. He proceeded to eventually have the people of altis believe I was an evil twin, and had me run out of town via Torches and Pitch-forks. 10/10
master.proceeder;-;A clogy first person shooter with a counter-intuitive User Interface and a tutorial far from helpful. There is a reason there is not much enthusiasm for this game. Simply, look at the reviews on any gaming website that is anything moree than an advertisement machine to confirm.
Mortigern;-;One of the worst game I've ever played. I had great hopes for it, but the graphisms are horrible, the gameplay is really bad, and the difficulty is so high that even the first missions are hard. Definitely not recommanded
Pizzaischica'sbestbro;-;I have has this game a day and already my licence expired
Snake;-;Go to multiplayer, try to join server, get disconnected cause not compatible, repeat 50 times, give up. Repeat.
V. DeWynter;-;the game that makes every other game look like a "filthy casual" game, so good so brutal
Potato Couch;-;When I wiped my  with 50 $ It was more profiteble than this game
BIG BROTHER (I see you);-;Military Simulations 4/16/2013 Arma 3 is till in ALPHA stage not Beta but this isnt the arcade style that most of you kids play by those major company names like EA (Battlefield series is actually made by DICE in Europe) and Infinity Ward (Call of Duty). This is suppose to be a SIMULATION in a way not just walking around and running on the ground but flying crafts and driving vehicles trying to give you that real enviornment feeling that comes down to a simulation game not arcade of Counter Strike fps type.
Disneyforever;-;Is there any reason why everyone keeps killing me on recruit difficulty?
hcwarrior34;-;Nobody bother purchasing this. You think you are going to get a Call of Duty multiplayer atmosphere dont believe it. It is absolutely dead with no actually modes. It is all running around. It is not even a sandbox it is complete trash. Do not waste your money like i did
-;-;spent 2 hours setting the keys well now i can't refund it
[F];-;It's aite.
Florian2406;-;I really recommend this game. The Game itself is a very tactical war simulation but not only that, you can play with thousands of mods for that game and missions, etc. Graphic: - Very nice graphics - One year old graphics but are still as good as new games Gameplay: - Simple Steerings - Easy driving and flying - Sometimes unreal physics (flipping cars, sadly no/not much weigth physics in cars,trucks,choppers and planes) - You can do almost everything e.g. Wasteland, Braking Point, Altis Life, King of The Hill, Battle Royale (and many more) But all in all i can highly recommend this game, me and my friends had and have a lot of fun with this game.
botne539;-;Welcome to arma 3. You play as an american peace keeper with NATO who has has gone through such intense training that he lacks the ability to run 5 metres without dying of what seems to be an asthma attack. In this game you will be expected to kill people 500 metres away with a machine gun whilst smashing your forehead of its scope. This is a coincidence as thats exactly what i was doing with my keyboard 5 minutes after starting the third mission due to losing my sanity. Prepare for the worst spent 15 hours of your life running across its terrible and repetetive terrain whilst being exploded into 5 million pieces by land mines that are impossible to see. Go ahead spend 40 pounds of your money to be dissapointed with the worst story i have ever seen in any game made in the history of PC. Good look. You will need it. -7000/10.
purplemagic75;-;Great game much more fluid than the last one
Grandalf The Gey;-;Trained soldier jumps over wall, drops 3 feet, dies. 10/10 for totes realism. srsly tho, I had competetive jumping off  w/ my friends when I was in 3rd grade and dropped farther.
LostSandwich;-;If it weren't for the mods...
Pshycochicken;-;its not everyday i say ive wasted one hundred hours of my life for no reason but this is one of those days i truly have no idea why i was able to spend even 10 hours on this game never mind 100 Arma 3 1/10 massive waste of time
Doxter21;-;Arma 3 is love Arma 3 is life...
Bloodyvalley;-;Full of glitches (I literally was stuck on a barricade on the side of the road,, my truck somehow when on top of it when I collided with it), unplayable on an i5 3570k + AMD Radeon HD 7970. Pass.
Fuck Steam;-;horrible game. very rarely does anything actually work the way its intended to. no females. no ponds/lakes. no ambient civs. devs lied. F+
Wrona;-;This game was good but, developers lost their minds and game is downgrading. They dont make additional things that ppl ask for (still no working bipods, no fastroping builded in the helis) half of the vehicles are mix of everything from every nation available in the game, There was plenty of a time to release really stabilized version but still every patch just  ups everything, right now optimalization is below A$$
Vlad the Bad;-;Tried it for the "Free Weekend" --1 hour to down load... 15 min. of playing and uninstalling. --From what I could see, the graphics looked really nice across my triple setup and 5760x1080 was natievly supported, so that is good. Too bad I had to uninstall it so fast and couldn't see more, --I hate being told on free weekend, AFTER I bothered downloading, that you can't finish the game, you need to buy it. I wish they would tell me that first. --I could not zoom on the the equipped 10x zoom scope. Just fired blind at the 400m target in training until I hit it. x-box 360 controller use could be better. --The language was terrible. After the last F-Bomb, which was still in just the training part, I had enough and am uninstalling. I know I have it before; "Well that just add's to the realism, that is how people talk". Well I am people, and I was also in the military, and that is not how I talk, If you can't find more creative ways to expresive yourself than constantly using expletives, it just shows your lack of maturity and brains. This may very well be the best military game you play and you love it dearly, but it is deinately not for me.
Ginger Beard;-;Too realistic to a point when it's not fun. Not wort my time and definetly not worth yours.
[NnR] rrlsnow;-;Not that great of an experience for me, lots of people like it but this is just an opinion. :) (Wasted 70$) I never play this game. :(
Captain Headsplitter;-;ur last update sukx so bad. what did it for me is ya'll changed the sniping scopes to 10x zoom max and u can't even snipe with that, i'm a longrange sniper that snipes from 2 km and have to the 60x zoom that was on the sos and until u bring it back i'm done with ur game, I AM NOT RECOMMENDING THIS ANYMORE BECAUSE OF WHAT U DID BOHEMIA. this used to be the best game ever until they changed sniper scopes' max zoom BOHEMIA YA'LL SUK, NOT EVERYONE USES MARKSMAN RIFLES SOME PEOPLE USE THE SNIPER RIFLES AND ACTUALLY SNIPE PEOPLE FROM 2 KM WITH THE LLR AND IF U DON'T PUT THE SCOPES THE WAY THEY USED I'M GOING TO UNINSTALL, RIGHTN NOW ITS NOT GOING TO BE PLAYED, U GOT A WEEK TO FIX IT OR I WILL UNINSTALL, AND GIVE REALLY BAD REVIEWS ON EVERY SINGLE SITE
Edenlly;-;Its . dont play. BErnie IMpulse bought and hates it. every second he has played got him closer to commititing suduko
Ice Cube;-;I recommend getting arma 2 instead, this one sucks
Spooky Ghost;-;AI snipes you with automatic rifles from miles away. AI drives into walls and trees and buildings. Game LOOKS terrible, with garbage HDR lighting system making everything too dark to see, or headache inducingly bright. Stratis map is amazingly bland and uninteresting, hundreds of miles of samey boring Greek villas. Really sad game.
gil;-;Terrible AI / Terrible Story
Prussia Ball;-;Not good.TOo complex..
Sammy_The_Snowplow;-;This will probably be the only ARMA review I will ever write considering my opinion on these games remains largely the same across all iterations. Bohemia Interactive relies on their   licking modding community to make these games playable. Everything in this game feels lazy, unpolished, and Mexican made. The servers lag all over the place and the playerbase consist of 12 year old children and autistic 400 pound mouth breathing neckbeards. This game is a #DontGiveYourMoneyToIncompitentLazyDevelopers out of 10.
madsenburg;-;horrible
Kirk;-;10/10 worst game ever. Horrible controls, extremely unbalanced,  graphics. The developer should be ashamed of this travesty.
get dat $$$$muney%^^$$$;-;gay game idk what i'm supposed to do half the time srs
Bazzaclough -AIMHACKS.COM;-;1/10 this game is very bad, the game is very slow paced and has no kill streaks whatsoever. Also the soundtrack is really bad and contains no Skrillex or even Major Lazer. This all adds up to me not being able to show noobs how much of a dominant player I am. Do not buy this, put it down and play the new Call of Duty instead.
Rozzok;-;2 FUTURISTIC 4 ME arma 2 is love arma 2 is life
Miterk;-;Give my money back please...or a copy of GTA V!
Princess;-;Not Call of Duty
(AAP) Firefox;-;dont have it
goddlesss;-;UGG! another boring shooter.
garfieldjulie;-;it cost to much
_Dizgamer-magic_;-;what the hell battaleye i got a bloody globle ban for what i did use any hack and i got ban for some resone what the hell in going on i use all my money for this and now i got ban for some reson what the hell
Not going to evo 2015 - :c;-;ARMA IS COOL, BLACK ? BLACK ARMY ?
_Dizgamer-magic_;-;what the hell battaleye i got a bloody globle ban for what i did use any hack and i got ban for some resone what the hell in going on i use all my money for this and now i got ban for some reson what the hell
Cata;-;Very lagy on servers with 50 ping people are teleporting, falling dead 2 times
BBeck;-;An absolute waste of money. The game is unplayable if you don't use a mouse. Not designed for a modern gaming system; ever heard of an XBox 360 controller? To Steam: I want my money back you thieves. THIS is why PC games are dying.
Not going to evo 2015 - :c;-;ARMA IS COOL, BLACK ? BLACK ARMY ?
shrimp;-;not enough fries
goddlesss;-;UGG! another boring shooter.
RaYn;-;you need to make it so your self is on the map
moneyfludy;-;I really like this game but i only got to play it for the weekend i just dont have money to get it im not that welthy i wish someone could buy it for me but no one will so geuss ill have to save up for it D:
moneyfludy;-;I really like this game but i only got to play it for the weekend i just dont have money to get it im not that welthy i wish someone could buy it for me but no one will so geuss ill have to save up for it D:
ayy lmao;-;i very much recomend this game
Dyybe;-;Runs like , i have amd 7950 and the game wont go above 30 fps no matter what i do
Enraged-walrus;-;Pros: -Cool concept. -Huge open world multiplayer matches -Lots of vehicles to drive/fly -Good community -intuitive design -Cool Mod servers Cons: -So horribly optimized I get 15fps if everythings on low or ultra on my fairly decent computer that can play 90% of games maxed. -Bad Engine -Server connections are always terrible I haven't really enjoyed one second of this game because of the framerate issues and server issues.
[63e] Stronk IO-San(x;-;Great game really fun with a group of people and if they try to play it serious its almost seems like you r in there.
EyeofValor;-;Very unrealistic for a military sim.
xenotion;-;cops ran me over mexicans found me we round in their suv went to all cops and played "woop woop sound of da police" 10/10 would get ran over again
TheAlmightySausage;-;this game wouldn't let me eat boogers!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!! (?
Andromeda;-;Do not buy this cash grab. Bohemia refuses to fix their multiplayer performance issues after this long? The game is practically unplayable on multiplayer, even with an i7 4770k and 2x GTX 780 Ti. Complete garbage, never ever buy a game from bohemia interactive again.
Corinthian;-;If your looking for a review on this game you've come to the wrong place, but if your looking for an outstanding pie recipe you've come to the right place. Ingredients: 1. 6 tablespoons unsalted butter 2. 1/2 cup white sugar 3. 1/2 cup brown sugar 4. 1/4 cup water 5. 1/4 teaspoon cinnamon 6. 1 pinch salt 7. 5 apples - peeled, cored and sliced 8. 1 pastry for double-crust pie Directions: 1. Preheat oven to 425 degrees F (220 degrees C). 2. Combine butter, white sugar, brown sugar, water, cinnamon, and salt in a saucepan over medium heat. Bring to a boil, remove from heat and set aside. 3. Roll out half the pastry to fit a 9-inch pie plate. Place bottom crust in pie plate; pour in apple slices. 4. Roll out top crust into a 10-inch circle. Cut into 8 (1-inch) wide strips with a sharp paring knife or pastry wheel. Weave the pastry strips, one at a time, into a lattice pattern. Fold the ends of the lattice strips under the edge of the bottom crust and crimp to seal. 5. Pour butter-sugar mixture over top of pie, coating the lattice, and allowing any remaining sauce to drizzle through the crust. 6. Bake in the preheated oven for 15 minutes. Reduce heat to 350 degrees F (175 degrees C), and bake until the crust is golden brown, the caramel on the top crust is set, and the apple filling is bubbling, 35 to 40 more minutes. Allow to cool completely before slicing.
EPIKujik;-;Do not recommend, Stay away!
Looster;-;id rather eat someones ashes then play this game. Ive spent $60 on papper once and thatwas more enjoyable then this ing piece of . This makes Call Of Duty look fun.  this piece of  game.
KickButt2000;-;its bad
Seductive b0ss;-;Arma 3 is great war simulator besides some bugs / glitches you might encounter along the way, it is not like your usual shooter where you run and gun it requires patience and communication with your squad / team to be successful.
Hensch;-;I liked this game.. until BattleEye gave me a global ban just because I used cheatengine to change a number in SINGLE PLAYER for giving me equipment. That result is a Global ban. Is this fair? I do not think so.
Chubbalicious;-;I have a brand new $3000 ALIENWARE computer and this game lags, tried putting the grafics on min did not work, then tried to use the game's "auto setting" still did no work. To best describe the lag, its smooth for 8 seconds and lags for 4 seconds, and never stops that cycle, extremley annoyning, game seems fun but unplayable do to this, BIG WASTE OF MONEY DO NOT BUY.
Ienzo;-;Wost shooter i have ever played.
The Bear Jew;-;This game is very lame, I can't belive that people pay to play that game. I was playing this game around 15 minutes and it was 15 minutes too much. First of all, it autodetect my video settings and thanks to that I was playing with 8 fps! Second, controls aren't comfortable and I freaked out. Please, return the money to all the game's users.
Chubbalicious;-;I have a brand new $3000 ALIENWARE computer and this game lags, tried putting the grafics on min did not work, then tried to use the game's "auto setting" still did no work. To best describe the lag, its smooth for 8 seconds and lags for 4 seconds, and never stops that cycle, extremley annoyning, game seems fun but unplayable do to this, BIG WASTE OF MONEY DO NOT BUY.
Lord Moneypants;-;Terrible game COD Ghosts is better than this piece of  literraly the optimaztion is god awful have fun dying of lag for no reason. Go and buy a better game thats worth 60$ than this .
~* BiZZ Keryear *~;-;One of the worst games ever. The idea is kinda neat, but the result ... I hate the game the way it is. The controls are overly complicated. It literally uses all of the keyboard ... this is ridiculous. This is an fast pace action driven game, you can't make something that uses so many keys without coursing trouble. The game is hardly any optimized ... I would allow this performance for a EA alpha game at best. I have barely 30 frames / second when I turn everything down to oblivion ... but my computer is totally idle When I crank everything up to maximum I only have 10-15 frames, but my computer is still bored. Then I only have peeks in my graphic card of 30% and 70% on my cpu cores. The average however is 25% GPU and 50% CPU. (And I do have loooooots of empty ram) Even with all tricks in the forum applied (which shouldn't be that case that you have to)... there is hardly any performance upgrade. I do not have any sound either. This is not my systems nor my fault, but the games which refuses to output any. The people can hear me though ... which reminds me that the push-to-talk key gets notoriously "stuck". I have to press it several times to make it work, and also several times to make it stop.... even though there is not pattern in it (in occasions it works on first press, or even like intended. But this is rare) This game is so bug ridden, I can't even access the key binding settings ... the game just freezes. And the crash messages appears behind the game ... so I have to randomly click on the middle of the screen for some time to find the close button which finally closes the game. This game isn't EA or wasn't released just yesterday. Those problems and bugs should be gone by now. But they aren't. So if you wan't to buy the game ... don't do it ... you will regret it.
Hensch;-;I liked this game.. until BattleEye gave me a global ban just because I used cheatengine to change a number in SINGLE PLAYER for giving me equipment. That result is a Global ban. Is this fair? I do not think so.
GRIFFIN 27;-;Sucks, way to complicated and WAY TOO many buttons to use !!! I want to get my money back
Havoc;-;It's hard to describe how amazing this game is.
Tomoko fag >TfwNoBF;-;Call of Duty is better
MACA 03;-;Haa Haa Haa Haa... (after the running a while) This soldier get tired soon... and this soldier is really weak when get tired. So I don't want to play this game!! And I don't want such a reality It has very beautiful graphic, but this game system is !! I'll never play this game any more
Srem Life;-;this game ing sucks
andy72184;-;Graphics are good but that's about it, the game will forever be buggy, military is corrupt and you all know it. You all live in hell you are all slaves.
Mr.Shaggnificent;-;Cannot invert Y axis for controller. There is an option to "customize", but you will have to remap the entire scheme because there are missing/double binds. I'm too old and set in my ways to change my ingrained play style for one game. Pulling back on the stick to look up is reflex for me.
Ikrani;-;It's nothing but a thoroughly boring Call of Duty clone. And by that, think "Call of Duty" only more sluggish, lesser-quality graphics, a tutorial that drags on and on, and a weapons customization system ripped straight from Battlefield. I got this game for free and I want a refund on my time wasted playing it.
Ben;-;This game gosh darned mother flopping geddon
[Sigmnt];-;it is just a game not a ing military simulator.
Kalleks;-;Pistols don't work properly.
illusioN <Logitech>;-;Pretty  off that i spent 60 bucks on this game for it to go on sale for 30 bucks a week and a half later.....
SoggyCow;-;controls are bad. 900 hotkeys. no tutorial. most commands dont work. people dont know whats going on. a kid made this..
Kermudgeon;-;Wanted to like it. Tried to like it. I just can't get into it, or the Arma 2 games. Too tedious and annoying. All water under the bridge, but I would like to have back all the money I've spent on the Arma series.
SLee;-;Not for me. I regretfully spent $60 on this game because i like the dayz mod. I know some people will say it's a simulator, but at the same time it's a game, and it's not fun at all. You randomly spawn, always in a town by your lonesome. You trek lightyears ahead to find any action or objective that's randomly changing but the moment you step out of your vehicle you get sniped from an army of dudes in the mountains. Rinse and repeat. I'm normally a multiplayer first, kind of guy but the campaign/bootcamp is entertaining. The game is also an insane rig to run without any framerate. I shouldn't need to watch youtube videos to learn how to make the game run decent.
tallywhacker;-;this is what GTA V multiplayer should have been like , it's a ing awesome game
Sultan;-;nice game ,but waste of money, disappointed.
Bjrn;-;its a fun experince but it should be bit cheaper
[^] Lt. Noiseless;-;Absolutly briliant! Lots of diversity with a big moding community. One of the few modern FPS games that focuses on tactics and teamwork as well as player moddifications and not DLC and profit. By far the all around best game I have played, extremly satisfying when you succeed with something you plan out with your friends!
DragonWarGaming;-;This Game Is AWESOME !!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
GRILL-BILL;-;4th MilSim game from Bohemia. This is by far the best one. The campaign isnt't currently released, but you can still get many hours of fun in the mission editor :)
[SaS] Jalapeo;-;An awesome and probably the best military simulation. Thanks to the very easy to use mission editor, a huge community and the integrated Steam Workshop, there is a multitude of extra scenarios and mods available. Arma3 has plenty in store for you and will be around for another couple of years, as was Arma2.
Toby [BGP];-;Arma 3 holds alot of potential, but lacks alot in its stability. The game has alot of holes and bugs in it that lead to some game play that can leave you disappointed and upset. Their is the terrible dsync, game physics, and overall hacking issues as well as a few other issues that really can change the battles in the game. Beside all the negatives, the game holds alot of promise as well and on a good day when arma is running fine its just loads of fun. It has a whole new feel of play style than any other game, and with all the mods available, theres no end to different types of game play. King of the Hill, Wasteland, Battle Royale, Breaking Point, Altis Life, and many other play styles. I persoanlly like the game tons, and even more with friends, and if your looking for a different type of shooter one with open world exploration and survival, Arma 3 is the Game for you.
weeaboo jones;-;Best game ever. For the best experience play multiplayer. 10/10  M8
Cavtroop;-;Typical Arma game - great potential and terrible execution. the AI is either comically bad, or super god-like with laser bullets. squadmates don't do what you order them to, they have a mind of their own, and its quite pathetic. Random acts in the campaign make me shake with rage - I decided that I was not having fun 'playing' this 'game' and uninstalled. Its unfortunate, because there is so much potential there, but it's held back by terrible AI, questionable physics and horrendous mission designs in the single player campaigns.
Hart;-;Ok, I've been playing Arma since OFP and even though I have played only 3 hours It sucks. All the guys that love the Arma feel and look throw it all away cause this is one big clust F***. The visuals are way too much and I feel that they over shot what they were going for, don't get me wrong it's a cool looky looky but hells no. Not going to recommend this game to anyone.
< Storm >;-;A fantastic military sandbox with many addons & mods to experiment with. It has its fair share of cons and pros, the cons laying mostly with the multiplayer aspect of the game. If you intend to buy this game, I recommend upgrading your CPU as well as your GPU PC specs (if yours don't already meet recommended specs). While singleplayer is a graphical  and is fantastic to play on maxed out settings, multiplayer you'll find it the complete opposite. Multiplayer I found IS managable only if you can deal with the fact that you may have to play on low graphical settings. As a CPU intensive game for multiplayer, you'll have to deal with lower FPS and graphical settings if you intend to play on bigger servers. On smaller servers, higher FPS is attainable as well as higher graphics. If you can deal with this con that Arma3 bears in its mutiplayer system, then your time & money will be well spent on this game. Away from the cons and on to the pros, this game is the best military sandbox out there. With Arma3's many details and functions you can find yourself commanding a squadron of jet-fighters or leading a squad to capture a control point. The scenarios are limitless with Arma3's Steam Workshop integration. All in all I'd give this game a 9/10.
ukman1;-;when you play multi-player most people do no get over 60 frames per second 20-40 fps is average i would suggest googling average fps arma 3 ETC. My pc easily meets the recommended game settings but after doing alot of research it seems like the game is not optimized and people are happy playing a game with low fps. I play alot of first person shooter and fps makes a big difference so be carefull buying this game as i regret it.
Furin0x;-;I'm loving it, and the mods make this game incredibly addicting and also gives it more replay value than any other game. Best game for multiplay on the PC in my opinion.
1ns@n3;-;My rig could barely hold 20fps so i ran around in wasteland shot some people drove a guys car full of stuff off a cliff. 10/10 would run around again.
SubMOA;-;If your computer can run it, buy it. It's a great game.
Hunts168;-;This game is a really fun game. It could use improvements like a better modding community but other than that everything about it is great. It takes a toll on your computer if you don't have a good one, but still I heavily recommend it.
Larry;-;Favorite game, I play this nonstop! Good work Bohemia!
Lt. Dan;-;Sadly i have to not recomend this one, so i got this game expecting hours of fun screwing around on servers, which didnt disapoint, however, that being said, it lacked in many areas. For one, the graphics had much to be desired, and animations clipped horrificly, no to mention the complexity of the controls. its not a bad game, but the graphics and such need to catch up to the content
-{PTK}- ReaperX;-;Arma 3: The only Military FPS you Need Along with Arma 2. Lots of Mods Via Steam Work Shop and a Ever vast developement Team Updating and improving it. With Games like Altis Life which you can be a Criminal or Cop depending on what Server. Ride Go karts "DLC needed" Lots to do.
The Dominator [TTC];-;This game is awesome !!! Gameplay is so good. Play tactical !!
Shelfing Bloodstones;-;This game is like my life. Its long, boring, nothing ever happens but I still for some reason can't end it.
YakuzaTokyoMafia;-;drastically wicked grapics and gameplay. Very teamwork is required in this game which is in my point of view is advanture while I like the way of communication but this game worth is just 40-43 dollar's not 60 $ because its too much for this game.
Plz N;-;This is the best arma game by far. The Altis life servers are amazing
The Jew #DontGasMe;-;So good never gonna be better Buy it
Azuresky;-;amazing game 10/10 very realistic stunning graphics and amazing gameplay from playing a mod to koth
Jameetaye;-;SO REALISTIC I GOT PTSD
Ullas Bageri;-;I think the game is alot of fun couse of there being so many mods and that makes it a large amount of different styles of the game and that makes the game worth buying in my opinion. There just comes out more and more type of mods for the game, some of them are good and some of them are not as good. The mods i like the most is the rp/life mods. The game looks good in my opnion and its worth buying if u like a game were there is alot of different things to do in it.
ItsMrHexx;-;decent graphics, just need to improve AI and vehicle collision/ damage
Sgt.Kokken;-;A more clumsy game is going to hard to find.
G_Devil6000;-;This game is a true test of skill. Fun to play with friends. Team work is a must!
THATSmExY ();-;Great game to play with your buddies!
traphai.jpg;-;i love the mulitplayer you will have a blast trust me Bros..
Comander Muffif;-;Man Shooter III: Explode Man
ReaperZA;-;After a hundred hours of gametime i still discover more feutures... truly an amazing game. Not recomended for immature people because you will be hated on. If you sound like a kid it will take alot of time for your squad mates to trust you
Zed;-;As I love to see games that have the great feeling of realism, this game bring's me the most joy. It has some great weapon physics, hit-boxes, ragdoll and all the other types of mechanic's. The mods to Arma 3 are great like altis life, breaking point, battle royale and others. Like I said, this game is really nice if you like simulators of this kind, and if you don't, go back to Call of Duty ;) <3 ~SadGuy
louis.spiers;-;can you do more free wekends of free weeks please i love this game but dont have that much money to get it so could you do some more free wekends or weeks i really enjoyed them and may consider buying it one day
Aimedaxis (brooks);-;ARMA 3 had a horrible release, it took about a year just to make it somewhat decent, still not a great game. ARMA 2 is still far better in my opinion.
DJG3774;-;This game, I love it! A few friends of mine and I have been playing this more recently and it the most fun I have had in a long time compared to other games. Should you get this? HELL YES!
RX-W3eD;-;Love it.... also has great mods
THE DARK HUMANITE;-;The developers have an IQ 100, but it takes 2 not to make such an amazing game! Guards, play this game immediately or FEEL MY WRATH! If Grodd played this, you always will! Guards, I do not require your immediate assisstance with this game!
The Antimidget;-;Good game, read my review on Arma 2 OA for pretty much what you need to know. Game is roughly the same in my opinion
slender128;-;i have only played this game when it was avaliable for a free weekend and i enjoyed it very much it is alot more optimised than arma 2 it runs better and looks better than arma 2 while also having the essential stuff that a fps needs
oldmancrabs98;-;A very very good dude shooter with things that only can happen in arma. 11/10 its kind of the bomb.
Chiken;-;Great shooter simulator! Singleplayer might be boring for some people, but the online experience with a great community will give you a great time.
Mynio | PSU RIP;-;Bring your friends, and take down these bandits! Coop in core of its meaning.
Nobst;-;If you're reading this review and not playing Arma 3, you've made a very serious mistake.
Spednix .Jr;-;They Should Lower The Price But Everything Else Is Fine Like The Gameplay And The Animations.
[DMR] Strayer;-;My opinion about this game is that its bugged and people just CAMP worse than the camping in COD and BF I truly regret buying this game and I only bought it cause my friends say its great rubbish this game is no where near worth $60
PaPaw's Gaming;-;Great Military sim. This does not play out like a "run-and-gun" game like BF4. This is a tactical shooter and you have to take movement slow and methodical. AI is extremely efficient at killing you, so you cant go in guns-blazing. It has about 5 different character classes to choose from, as well as rarely used vehicles. Each class has their own abilites and weaponry. I would not recommend this game to anyone except those who have a high end CPU and video card because this game's graphics and netcode are very poorly optimized, causing even the best computers to run at low FPS. I have an I7-4790K overclock 4.4GHZ CPU, 16 Gig ram, and GTX780's in SLI and i get from 30-50 FPS in multiplayer. most ppl get below 30.
YOLO_01;-;Probably the best game for serious players who can work together to accomplish the mission.
MonkeyStick01;-;This game is one of the best games I have ever played. To the MP to SP to the editor this game is awesome. not to metoin its beutiful scenery. ive put 170 hours to this game and im not planning to stop!
Stenk;-;Less dangerous than the army but you're still subject to PTSD.
pleasedonttakemynameples;-;yea if you are a guy who plays call of duty or some games then this game is not for you becuse it is tacktickal and you die wery fast but when you learn the controls and the game then... it fun and i recomend it for the person who can toloreit death and to colect your stuff and check out my channel pls https://www.youtube.com/channel/UCFswLNVHcNqMoidDmVdk4Hw
FBI;-;i bought this game and even till now i dont know how to use it idk wut i will do in multiplayer idk how to put things in inventory and how to respawn in a server "last time i joined a server it was horriable it says you are dead wait a medic or wait to respawn ... then i waited and waited 15 min nothhing happens wtf ... why dont hey put a simple game that you can understand like bf4 cod ghosts or GTA 5 ...
[=UK-SF=] Brian Pothoven;-;A very good and realistic game, not for players who just like to shoot alot and kill the most people, this is for people who think strategic and have te patience to wait if necesairy. Keep up th good work Bohemia!!!
TT SergeantSyphillis;-;So, I built my PC specifically to play DayZ and such games. Then Arma 3 was released and I shy'd away from the zombie series and into full on warfare instead. After coming from the COD franchise and the Battlefield games, I was scepticle that I could be any good playing warfare on such a massive scale, let alone on PC. I got cracking and found that this game was actually very very well built. The graphics are smooth and crisp (Depending on your setup) the gameplay is solid and immrsive and you quickly get sucked in to the firefights and stuff. Campaign I found was a little left out, it felt like the game was centred as much around the multiplayer aspect as possible (I was used to that from playing COD) Overall it's an awesome game, would recommend just for the multiplayer part.
DirTy;-;The latest and greatest addition to the Arma Franchise. This game is the best tactically paced game on the market. You could play vanilla and screw around with friends. Or you could go for a fully modded experience. You have many options, you could run a massive drug cartel in Arma III life, Shoot your way to the top in Battle Royale, Fight dinosaurs in the new Jurassic Park mod, Or witness the end of the world in many ways, from Overpoch, to Epoch, to Doomsday. Find your gamemode and your sure to have a good time.
BongZilla;-;Rode a bunny over with a tank, then I was launched to space 10/10 would fly again
Benito Mussolini;-;This game.... Is... can't even say how amazing it is!
GodJesus;-;awesome game for the mentally  seal
OfficerDaFuzz;-;Very good game. Alot of different gamemodes. And not everyone is mean,
Richard;-;I was wondering if someone could help me , I can run the game fine between in the game all the buttons work but what ever I have the moving setup to be , so its normally w,a,s,d but I push the button and it doesn't move , does any know how to solve this ?
farmguy98;-;i really enjoy the game
RadGH;-;This game is very broken, and the controls are horrible. Just like arma 2. Therefore, it's amazing
Nub1015;-;unrealistic. Walked up behind someone unloaded an entire clip of an M4 into them. 25 yards away with them not seeing me or even knowing im in the bush behind him. He turns around and one shot me with a makarov? Just very unrealistic on the things that should be real and the things that doesnt matter they focus on.
madkobra;-;A GAME WHERE YOU CAN SELECT WHO YOU WANT TO PLAY WITH. COS YOU KNOW. A ING REAL GAME WITH ING COMMUNITY AND CARING DEVS AND A REAL GAME WHERE THERE IS BOTH FUN AND SKILL... You select who you want to play with. You select who you want to play aganist. You can try different people and places if they are idiots YOU CAN ING LEAVE AND NO ONE PUNISHES YOU WITH MORE IDIOTISM... A reference game.  game community like 7 year old russian army(dota) and dev like jews who think nothing but money(dota) should watch and learn.
Olly Yeoman;-;Great game Definatley the best game of the year for PC Its a must buy
Destructo_Brat;-;Coming to THIS Pc real soon :))
Oatmeal Creampie;-;It's good.
Giedrius;-;I Played alpha, it was awesome experience.
bradders70;-;it is beast the best war game on steam in my appion
AcePCD;-;Has very good graphics, runs smoothly on some serves. I would recommend this to a friend.
Lazy Miko;-;An absolute monster of a game with possibly the best multiplayer ever.
Ronald Reagen*lockheedmartin.com;-;A lot of fun to play, many mods, nice community, definitely worth it
Draner3;-;This is an amazing game. In my opinion the graphics are better in Arma 2, both are great non the less its wonderful. Its fully moddable and good multiplayer and singleplayer. Its a simulator more than it is a game which makes it even better.
Dip Onion;-;8 outta 8 m8 would not recommend h8.
Colonel Panic;-;10/10 would have "Bingo Fuel" again.
Darth Syphillis;-;A graphical step up from ARMA II, but lacking in content such as weapons, and vehicles, more of which I hope to see in the future! Altis is an amazing map and ARMA 3 provides an amazing experience.
Geralt of Pripyat;-;Things game is amazing, The mod community is great, the custom missions are easy to make and fun to play, the campaign was very fun and took me about 4 days to complete. Multiplayer is fun with tons of server running custom gamemodes.
pepe meme;-;gokart go under car and car fly into building and explosion, get ban for explosion. decent game.
SphereHunter113;-;Best Military Sandbox Game ever! Please add knifing or melee. I would like to know how to join a DM server, whenever i try to join any DeathMatch server it just takes me back to the server selection list.
Danny Cascade;-;good game but you need a beefy cpu and gpu to run this game. Even a single AMD R9 290 cant even get decent framerate. Need to have SLI/XFire to get good fps. Game is poorly optimised for the PC as well. Other then that, game is fun and filled with content.
TR3XED;-;So awesome,reommend to buy!!!!!
Fudge;-;The focal point of Arma 3 is the infantryman. You get the feeling that you are a cog in a massive military machine. Armor rolls in behind you to support the assault, helicopters scream by with cannon blazing to keep the enemys head down. It is a game about visibility, finding your target and fixing them in place while teammates move in for the kill. You will spend as much time looking at a map as you will firing at enemies you can barely see. But Arma 3 goes a step farther and allows for you to take every role on the battlefield. You can be the tanker on the front line, the helicopter pilot ferrying ammunition and men, or the mortar team dropping rounds on a target from a kilometer away. You can even be the commander, and lead the assault via radio turning the entire game into an RTS. It scales incredibly well, and has an AI capable of filling every role. It wants to tell a futuristic story set in the 2030s where Arab countries leap-frog the West technologically. It's a daring choice. NATO infantry resemble today's special operators, like the SEALS or Army Rangers. Against the lizard-like helmets, integrated binocular heads-up displays and futuristic ammunition of the Arab CSAT faction, western forces look decidedly old-school. It's an interesting role reversal. But without a plot Arma 3's daring bits of speculative futurism are reduced to mere graphical pastiche. As it has been released, without a single-player campaign, its just a collection of vehicles and weapons. When playing NATO you don't feel overmatched, and when playing CSAT you don't feel superior. Youre just there. Next to the gaping hole where the campaign should have been, Bohemia Interactive has placed a set of showcase missions. These are largely the same missions that were available during the beta phase. And the alpha phase. Some of these missions feel like vertical slices that could have been presented to the press at conventions years ago. The showcase missions serve a function in showing off the games tech, at least. I was impressed by the lighting and particle effects, pleased to find that ground vehicles handled better than in past versions, and that the AI for allies and enemies has been beefed up. My roughly 2 year-old gaming PC ran Arma 3 successfully at very high settings, though not always at desirable framerates. My puny mind however, with its limited processing capacity, was not able to divine how to fly attack helicopters without multiple trips to Bohemia Interactive's forums and out to YouTube for several fan-made tutorials. Thats because the game that Bohemia Interactive is selling right now does nothing to effectively teach you how to play it. Help screens flash up during showcase missions so quickly that theyre nearly useless. Theres an in-game instruction manual of sorts, but it feels unfinished. Some of the commands  switching optics on the tanks periscope, for example  are listed as "undefined." It was on me to go deep into the menu systems and assign a key to make them work. These showcase missions move unrelenting fast at times. The allied AI makes few attempts to let you catch up when you fall behind, and that leads to a vicious cycle of learning by dying. This made the glitches all the more frustrating. Small hiccups saw allied soldiers sucked inside rocks, or enemy AI who would lay on the ground as if to sun themselves while I carefully zeroed my rifle and walked rounds in on their head. What I would call large errors ranged from the improbable (landing a jet upside down on a mountainside) to the incomprehensible (a low-speed collision of two tanks which catapulted them both 30 feet into the air) to the downright creepy (a seated infantryman lengthening his neck by a foot, T-1000 style). Joining public multiplayer servers was a crapshoot, and there are no Bohemia Interactive servers to play on. The majority of my pick-up games were hosted peer-to-peer. Players looking for regular, stable experiences on hardware capable of hosting more than a few dozen players without serious performance issues are left on their own to roam the wilds of the internet searching for clans. But the searching was worth it, because when I found a good server the experience was incredible. Most of those experiences came from fan-made modifications like Wasteland and Domination  not from anything that Bohemia Interactive shipped with the game. Its as if the games community has ignored the content that Bohemia Interactive made out of spite. Where Arma 3 shines is when you have 6 or more players working with you in a multiplayer session. A set-piece cooperative mission called Escape from Stratis stands out. Here a NATO platoon of 10 is stranded somewhere on the massive, hand-made map. The goal is to find a boat or a helicopter and escape alive. The few times I've been able to play it with a complement of 8-10 friends have been nothing short of incredible. Simply making it safely from one hilltop to the next has been exhilarating. How I know the game is succeeding is that it is teaching us how to operate as a cohesive fighting unit by forcing us to survive in a hostile environment. Once while moving over open ground our platoon was pinned down by multiple enemy infantry formations. We formed a perimeter, called out coordinates and together returned fire and destroyed the enemies allowing us to move to better cover. While we were looting the corpses for ammunition an armored personnel carrier (APC) crested a hill. We hunkered down and gave covering fire while two players carefully brought anti-tank rounds to bear. Then we repaired the APC ourselves and drove off into the sunset.
Trelib;-;one of the best games ive played
The communist Banana;-;This is the best military simulator and there is so much content for the game you could play a new thing every day for the rest of your life it just all around an amazing game
MasterMindDave;-;This game is sexual, but you need a $10000 computer to run it at 30fps
Samadhi;-;I can't say enough good things about ARMA 3. This is a game for someone who wants a truly lifelike military sandbox. This is not COD or BF; for the most part, run and gun tactics will only get you shot and killed here. You will have to think quickly and thoroughly to plan your assaults, escapes, etc. You will die a lot initially until you learn how to properly strategize and utilize the assets at your disposal but you will have fun doing it. The Bohemia content is a blast to play and replay but where this game really shines is in the wealth of community created content that offers something for everyone. The level editor makes it easy to create your own scenarios and tailor missions to your specific desires and play styles. Truth be told I would pay the $60.00USD for this game just to play the Breaking Point mod (think DayZ using Arma3 engine/maps) but either way, the game was well worth the money.
Xsnow;-;Very good game I recommend to buy and play this game its fun in single and also in multiplayer but make sure youre rig can run it smooth
Hunteoi;-;It is the best military combat simulator I never played ! Buy it, try it !
brUuuUu;-;Most realistic military sim until Arma 4 come out.
rebelien;-;love this game 11/10
Sherb;-;I want to recommend, and enjoy, this game, but I don't. Because it is very buggy and feels poorly scripted. Sometimes something as fundamental as interacting with the world, car doors, ammo crates etc. can be really awkward. This can abruptly lead to your untimely, poorly justified, demise. Or if you're really unlucky you'll lay around unconcious for 5 minutes prior to dying! :) I can't forgive the devs or the bugs in this game like a lot of people can. It has been this way since arma 1 - which I never played but understood it was unplayable. Arma 2 which I did play and found unplayable. After two games, I find Arma 3 to be barely playable. I figure by now they 'ought to know what they are doing and how to achieve a desired result. Niche game. I'm sure there's a reason so many people love it. I honestly feel as though I'm not patient enough to both play a simulator game, and babysit the flaws of said game in order to get something out of it. I haven't exactly got a hardon for military games like others do either so bare in mind that your phallus may differ. I would definitely change my review to recommend and play this game if it were just.. less buggy, more playable.. it really doesn't matter if you add gokarts or dragons at this point, just improve the game.
Jake Gyllenhaal;-;this game looks absolutely beautifuland run really good on my computer
Cobra5000;-;This is the best version of ARMA series. Many new modules are very useful for mission editing
Jenga;-;100/10 A game were anything is possiable. Mods were you can see the fish you want to catch , run drugs and sell tortise meat. This game is the only FPS were Maps overlooking the world are usefull and radios are a nessecity , a great FPS if you just want to have array of activities that dont invole you killing or shooting others like mining or picking peaches.
Kraze;-;This Game has cars 50/10
The Bum Hunter;-;game is ok and all but if you expect it to be realistic then you are wrong have fun emptying more than half of your mag into a guy 50m away and he lives
drewpuppyx;-;Oh Arma. The series you love to hate and hate to love. Let's get this straight, this game is capable of epic feats, and then a few sceonds later, it goes full . I mean Gilbert Grape-level  after being a 90's Steven Seagal movie awesome. I will HIGHLIGHT important issues. Let's go through the bad first: BAD: The engine is OUTDATED. People have tried to argue this, but it is objectively old. It's okay to admit. Someday, you'd think they'd update it. Maybe they will, but who knows with software these days. Let's hope so. Honestly, it can be entertaining to watch assualt rifles level large trees, flatten brick walls, and send characters ragdolling. It is, however, a bit absurd. It's not really into utilizing multi-core processors, so you better have some single core horsepower. It seems to like i5 and i7 best. The single player is goofy here. Operation Flashpoint was epic, and had that awesome DLC that was like 1984's Red Dawn. That ing ruled majorly. That really isn't here, and the team AI is atrocious. Maybe it's been fixed in the last few months, but I have seen CSAT tanks go New Jersey Turnpike on my team only to have the AT guy yell "YOLO!" and fire an RPG into it at range of 25ft. YOU MUST GET A GOOD ROUTER/MODEM FOR THIS GAME. I can not stress this enough. I used the standard TWC modem until it blew up, and then I was issued some Ubee garbage which would lose my connection period. The first TWC-issued modem ran every other game I have ever played fine, and ARMA3 okay... I bought a mid-level netgear setup out of annoyance and guess what? DC's dropped to almost nothing and frame stay kind of consistent. This is a MAJOR HELP if you like this game. It may seem obvious to some, but most are not used to catering a single piece of software. GOOD: ARMA is unique. Despite it's quirks, it's still the same old oddball, cool-as-hell simulator you can mod to hell-and-back from 14 years ago. It just has a vibe to it. It's just...cool. This game is basically for MULTIPLAYER and MODS. This is a game for people who want to really, and I mean REALLY want to get into an in-depth, life and death simulation. I have played all of those other FPS games, and here it has no equal. It is INTENSE. People literally lose it in this game. In reality, is it based off of VBS and is supposed to test real-life scenarios. PvP action can get nuts, especially in the woods and in cities...it goes total Rambo. Battlefield, COD....little kid nonsense. This will get your blood pumping. The MODS...oh man. This game is the epitome. King of the Hill, Wasteland, Breaking Point, Epoch, ARMA/CITY Life...Realism units...co-op, it just grows. You get it all, FOR FREE. People even have youtube careers based on this game (well, the family of games). How nuts is that? CONCLUSION: It's pretty usable now. Bugs aren't epidemic as they were, and the community is more important then even the devs in terms of content growth, IMO. That's kind of interesting. It's generally a more stable community than most, and even cheating and hacking as of this writing seems less than it was a year ago. It's definitely worth going down the rabbit hole of ARMA...
Strategyboo69;-;Arma 3 is like Arma 2 except throw in tons of new features and new things to bring to the table. It is still a simulator, however it has improved from its standpoint with Arma 2. Unlike Arma 2 with it making it big with DayZ Arma 3 is huge around King Of The Hill and Battle Royale. This game is very enjoyable especially when you have friend fighting on the battle ground with you! I do recommend this game to everyone who wants to purchase it.
Skry;-;Good, my friend plays it too much 11/10 - IGN
Villhelm;-;I now spend 90% of my time on this game, help me, its too good (play with a communtiy, id reccomend Reality Gaming
Tirenguy;-;I know most people say this is for only really hardcore gamers and while that may be, I'm not the most hardcore gamer, but I've had loads of fun playing altis life and several of the other game modes like battle royale. 8/10 would reccomend to most people but the game is pretty unoptimised (atleast in multiplayer)
Royale Gonzo;-;If you love hardcore military simulations that require you to have octopus hands to play them, go ahead and buy this. No really, it's great.
ClaytFace;-;Arma 3 takes the simualtion to the next level. Optimisation and stability has dramtically improved since Arma II and the modding community keeps the game forever fresh and renewed.
Alex;-;its amaze, just hardware hungry
Dub_y0;-;For me it feels that its really hard to get into the Game.. First of all for the Menu Screen with all those Settings and  u need a menu-license And without a helping hand to get you into some action u will just run around ingame or drive Quad Tho if u got someone to help u out this game can be really fun and has alot of content to offer
#Cpt.Nemesis;-;Buy this game and you will never regret!!
Lord TomScrub;-;Loads of different game modes to enjoy with friends.
name910;-;Fun with Epoch :)
Kanz;-;Landing speed was to high, got me killed. 11/10,
Sebastian....;-;Very fun to play whit friends and whitout friends still fun. Its good grapichs but if you have an  pc dont get it. Its some really fun mods and so many mods you can play so it never gets boring.
Sphexaiz3r;-;I`ve been playing this game for over a month and i`m pleased with it.If you want to buy it i strongly encourage you to buy it if you have a friends that bought the game.This game is made for multiplayer.You can play the campaign and workshop missions.I`ve been playing 3 modes:Altis life,Wastleland and Battle Royal.I enjoy them and i don`t get bored by them.i play with my friends with amplifies the experience. Pros: A alot of mods to choose from Enjoyable if you have friends..... You don`t get bored easily/ Cons:You need a good pc to run this game on 30-60 fps I don`t really liek the singleplayer missions(personal opinnion.) It`s kinda expensive.
Barrett;-;TL;DR: Very good game. Get it if its not already in your library. If it is in your library get it for a friend. This game is a very solid entry in the Arma franchise. It improves upon Arma 2 in every way besides content. But that is even made up for in mods. If youve played Arma 2 and enjoyed it, then youll love this. If you havent played any Army before, youll still love this. It is a must buy. But ill explain why that is my review. Pros: -This game has very good graphics and well optimised -I would go as far to say this is the most "realistic" combat game out there -There is loads of content in the Steam Workshop for many hours of fun and tons of mods and game modes -The PvP is simply the best PvP in any game Ive ever played, and Ive played a lot of games -Compared to the last Arma it improves in all areas (besides content- Ill cover that in the Cons) -There is very few squeakers and trollers, and it has a mature player base. -New inventory system is very well done -The sound in this game is amazing. Cons: -It will absolutely  your PC. You need a good graphics card to run this game. (It runs like a champ if you have a good card) -Lack of weapons and vehicles. (But it makes up for it by having a great attatchment system) -This is not for impatient people. Nearly every mission will have you walk at least 1km. (I dont find this a Con, but I imagine most FPS players would) Final rating would be 9/10. Simply because it requires a very good rig to run it well.
The1InTheBack;-;The BEST shooter out there if you ask me, once you play this all other shooters will look pathetic
HillbillyUSMC;-;The Story for Arma 3 is great the voice acting is a mediocore but entertaing. The multi -player side is fun as well Battle Royale is great way to burn some time for sure. The domi and patrol ops servers are entertaing as well if you can find a group of folks that using comms and teamwork.
buffster8;-;This is by far the best war game/sim I have ever played/RP. There are so many addons and things too! Great Job!
Ben_Gorrie_;-;i really want a demo version!!!!!!!!!!!!
dmi;-;even battleroyale and overpoch are totally worth the money, and there's a lot more behind
Tripfireice;-;This game is great. It's loads of fun playing RP, and doing domination I recommend everybody buys this game.
BloodWarriorPT;-;Good game but you need a top pc for it
AlexXxRo;-;cool !!
ObsceneNameHere;-;Great FPS/Simulator, Not for COD style Fans. -Pros Very immersive GFX With the Mods/Game types it always keeps the game fresh Bullet Physics are accurate excluding windage -Cons Sometimes (depending on the server/mod) you can have a very buggy gui Overall this game is awesome if you like a more strategical FPS (Though it allows you to use 3rd Person). Due to the multitude of servers that run different game types you will find it hard to put this game down. If you like to RP then there is Altis Life which allows you to take up an persona and do task associated with a job that you choose. These types of servers are "policed" by a selected police force. If you are after some team work you can either choose a CO-OP mission which allows players to take on objectives enforced by a very intelligent AI. This being said there are servers that offer a PvP experience whether you want an objective base like King of The Hill or Deathmatch style. This game has what most gamers that enjoy FPS's and even those who may not!
ethanBa;-;Yes totally reccomending this game the campaign may suck but the online! Love the vitual reality with customizable charcters with 1000s of combinations and a great selection of guns! What i didnt like: de-sync in online (de-sync is where a character glitches or objects in game causes lag usually items disappear or you will die) Great mechanics. If you really want a simulator (military) this is the best youll find nothing better then what you see here. PROS Virtual Arsenal Training grounds Great mechanics CONS De-sync minor lag By far one of the best fps games ever COD is stupid now you will never go back
mrredvsblue;-;Great game but only really buy to play with friends
Niburu;-;Best military simulation out there. Huge modding community, wit hthat comes lots of content. The multiplayer is very bugged because the performance depends on the server you play
King Baller;-;just buy it allready.
[HYST] JDM12983;-;If you are into a more in-depth type of shooter - with several community made mods/additions to improve upon the game and add to it - I highly recommend this game. The controls can be a little tough to get used to at first, and the maps are quite large. But a lot of fun can be had; especially with friends.
MrGamingPotato CSGOFAST.COM;-;i personaly think this is a great game becuse it has a nice engien a lot of gamemodes and mods and an active dev team. But its not perfect becuse it has some glitches and bugs here and there but otherwise good game 9/10
Henry;-;It is alright.
Chase_04;-;Arma 3 is a very fun game to play. whether you like the editor, or just the multiplayer you can find your self playing hundreds of hours playing the game. it also has mods that are a ton of fun such as battle royale, arma 3 epoch and many others.
DeadByNow;-;Better than DayZ standalone.
xX69x420XxnNoScopesxX420x69Xx;-;Buy this game now.
VladimirTheInhaler;-;SIMPLY AMAZING. fun to play insurgency and king of the hill
Nitromen23;-;Arma 3 is very glitched ad horribly unoptimized and yet is still an amazing game so i will rate it a 4 and reccomend it!
IntoTheGabe;-;So once you've figured out what the  you're doing you'll like this game, if not then go play some Call of Duty.
IB6UB9;-;Reminds me a lot of DayZ. It doesn't have any zombies, and it isn't as pick up and play as Day Z either. 10/10-IGN
